Seems mighty sketchy.
The existence of the Trilateral Commission was never secret.
Come on man, why would someone go on the internet and tell lies
The current shamu is an imposter.  I heard once that for continuity reasons they would get a new "lassie" each year for the tv show lassie, and they would take the old one up in a helicopter and throw her out into the desert. I don't think this is true, just one of those urban legend things.  
They fear. They fear fear. They don't like the idea of possibilities.   Conspiracy theory has been made into a joke about human beings who are bored with too much time on their hands.  And when you have too much time and money and power on your hands, you conspire.
 Here's the same copy from a different organization.    http://investmentwatchblog.com/42-false-flag-attacks-governments-from-around-the-world-admit-they-do-it/  Anyway, good on them both for spreading the information.
My friend actually posted it to 4chan after he saw it there
clearly those bodies were gassed to death by nazis! look dead piles of bodies in the aftermath of WWII!it must be evidence of the final solution! there is no other way all those people could have died! 
OP has personal tech issue or just makes shit up? Better give it upvotes.
Yes Illumniati groups all the different corporate conglomerates together. It's not just one entity but  ALL the different groups under one name. It's like saying "The Cold War", we know who was in the cold war so you don't have to say every different country or people involved. You simply say the one name and it counts for all.  With the huge amounts of corporations involved in Hollywood there is no doubt that it is controlled by the elite (which again, is a term used to group said people).
Why bother reddit is one example of where it will never change no matter how much noise we make
&gt;Leslie Robertson never said there was molten steel, said "molten metal."  Actually he did say "molten steel" according to the [original publication of the SEAU in 2001](http://old.seau.org/SEAUNews-2001-10.pdf).  Abolhassan Astaneh was one of the first engineers who arrived at ground zero which he remarks as seeing ["melting of girders at WTC."](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C8XBZdJSY68)  The report you sourced was conducted by single engineer working for a consulting company. I also couldn't find it in any journals.  In contrast there are multiple papers by multiple scientists on nano-thermite being found.  &gt; And for the most part, their credentials are pathetic.  Architectural Engineers, Civil Engineers, Physicists, Welding Engineers, Aerospace Engineers, Mechanical Engineers, Structural Engineers, Chemical Engineers. All these people are " irrelevantly schooled" with no experience? You are making quite a broad assumption and generalization here, there are over 2300 people listed.  Considering the outright inconsistency in your claims and sources I can no longer trust you to debate honestly. Thank you for your time.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Waaaaah boo hoo waaaaaah   *tears*
there's no middle ground if you use the word irrefutible. your right we won't ever have all the information, data etc. it was a thoroughly chaotic event, and not a crime scene which could be left in place indefinitely whilst investigated. that doesn't justify filling the gaps with anecdotal, speculative theories and paying them of as irrefutible in the lack of a better explanation
I just remembered this post, so I googled it and felt a bit of a chill when I saw that Putin with the blood splattered glasses was noted for Feb/Mar... Anyone have any further thoughts on this?
crosslinking takes bits of information from two sources and looks for similarities. if you have a 36 Mb file and a 16 Mb file and you want to crosslink them, you break them down into 16 byte "packets", overlay them, and pass information through. when you pass a piece of information through the overlayed packets it returns with some amount of loss. the loss is proportional to the coherency of the packets. identical packets have a coherency of 1 and have no data loss. packets which are completely different have coherency of about 0.3. its not 0 because a coherency of zero means that you have 100% data loss which is not true even if there is no similarity. you repeat this for all packets in the two files and you get an average data loss per packet average for all packets. this percentage is then reciprocated to get the similarity percent.   example, you compare two files and for each packet overlap you lose an average of 20% of the data through each pass. this correlates to 80% similarity 
"killed himself"
[deleted]
So calling people names is the best you can do?
I don't deny your claims on said tribe, but before we decide they're all bad, remember Aaron was one of them, and he chose to be one of us.
yeah ok, we were sane in the 80s... you need to refine your concept dude
&gt;  100.000 people in Israel received their pension from German taxpayers money in 2010.  Guess that's fine if they lived in Germany and just moved there later in life? Or what do you mean?   &gt; Germany payed more than 68 BILLION € since the end of WWII.  I'm very much against any payments 50+ years after the war to Israel (or any other countries for that matter). 68 billion to Israel or all countries combined? I'd love to see sources for that. Is there a wikipedia article or a complete report somewhere that lists every single payment?
[deleted]
Wouldn't even let me take a picture of it, had to sneak attack. He came home late at night and said he got accepted. Weird shit. Also posted on /r/whatisthisthing and got a lot of strange replies. [See thread here](http://www.reddit.com/r/whatisthisthing/comments/2z2ge1/my_roommate_randomly_came_home_with_this_pin_and/)
Wait, are you asking people to actually pay attention to the links they post???? 
[–]toomanyburritos 2 points 2 hours ago   They have these as prizes at Marvin ' s Marvelous Mechanical Museum. They're junk. I have 3. 
[deleted]
What a fucking idiot.  They have to stoop so low because they know they are losing.
[deleted]
Which means that I, personally, have a good chance to see the end of Israel. What a gift from God that would be! What a day to celebrate. I hope it falls all at once, like the Soviet Union.
Hahahahahaha.
I've looked into the Holocaust from a different perspective. I'm Polish, the Nazis killed a fifth of us.  Considering most Holocaust deniers happen to sport a lot of SS/Reichsadler tattoos, I tend not to believe much of what they say.
lol!  All we are doing is enforcing reddits rules of spam.   http://www.reddit.com/wiki/faq#wiki_what_constitutes_spam.3F and http://www.reddit.com/wiki/selfpromotion
That's both encouraging and kind of sad...
I'd love to see downtown blocked right off, nothing but trains in and out. I think it would take more people than were present yesterday to pull such a thing off though. Even then, it probably wouldn't last long before the fuzz started busting hippy skulls to clear traffic up. I can't think of much more that is peaceful and effective. Social and economic disruption gets attention.
Northern NSW Australia here. They use fluoride. I use a large, heavy filter for drinking water. But I still have to cook, clean and bathe in it.
I see this canned response about Aaron whenever I bring him up..I think a lot of people were coached to say this to diminish his legacy
They used the same tactics in Toronto to nab random civilians at the G20. Ran at them in small groups and dragged them away to the buses or vans. You had better believe you were watched, filmed, and if you brought a phone I hope it was a prepaid burner. I kept my face covered, and didn't stick around the area too long, passed through a few times though. All I had on me was a bit of cash, a bus ticket and my house keys. I have to be afraid to protest in *Canada.* Shit sucks.
Skull and Bones, Flint Chapter
Well all ethnic groups should be equally represented in every area of society? If a Jew funds a start-up that becomes successful, he can't hire another Jew until he has a staff of 98 Black, Chinese, White, etc.. people? 
I didn't say I felt guilty, I said I sympathised.  When ISIS cut off the heads of aid workers I don't feel guilty, it has nothing to do with me, but I still sympathise with the victims as it is a terrible thing to go through.
The U.S. is spraying freedom all over my face.  Looks like some of it is bouncing into Canada.
I love Madonna
What kind of conspiracy subreddit is this? You guys are the least helpful group I have ever seen. 
Yeah, with each new scandal we seem to become more jaded.  I know that it's kind of opposite my previous comment.  Difference between what I want and what seems to be happening. 
[deleted]
Muh David Irving who is a noted scumbag, racist, anti-Semite, nazi-sympathizer and, worst of all, a shoddy historian?  In the first edition, Irving's estimates for deaths in Dresden were between 100,000 and 250,000 – notably higher than most previously published figures.[19] These figures became authoritative and widely accepted in many standard reference works. In later editions of the book over the next three decades, he gradually adjusted the figure downwards to 50,000–100,000.[20] According to the evidence introduced by Richard J. Evans at the libel trial of Deborah Lipstadt in 2000, Irving based his estimates of the dead of Dresden on the word of one individual who provided no supporting documentation, used forged documents, and described one witness who was a urologist as Dresden's Deputy Chief Medical Officer. The doctor has since complained about being misidentified by Irving, and further, was only reporting rumours about the death toll.[21] Today, casualties at Dresden are estimated as 22,700–25,000 dead.[22]   In the latter book, Irving claimed that the plane crash which killed Polish government in exile leader General Władysław Sikorski in 1943 was really an assassination ordered by Winston Churchill, so as to enable Churchill to betray Poland to the Soviet Union.   Irving described his historical work to Rosenbaum as an act of "stone-cleaning" of Hitler, in which he cleared off the "slime" that he felt had been unjustly applied to Hitler's reputation  Irving attacked the diary of Anne Frank as a forgery, claiming falsely that a New York court had ruled that the diary was really the work of an American scriptwriter Meyer Levin "in collaboration with the girl's father".[33]  Irving proclaimed Hitler to be the "biggest friend the Jews had in the Third Reich".[64]    
He's problaby just on a sex holiday or something, but i'm looking forward to his return and the debate about whether or not it's really him.
Yeah, cool huh. I've come across a bunch of stuff that would be well suited to your sub. I'll rustle some of it up when I get a chance.
Quick! Discredit the source and ignore the merits of the article! 
Then they appear on r/undelete and if that gains any traction there it goes to r/undeleteundelete which is also remoured to be hi-jacked.  
I come here regularly and I take the sub as a joke, but I think a large portion of readers/posters are actually serious
The dominance of msm narrative, government friendly posts, military friendly posts, cultural brainwashing
Some serious damage control going on in these comments
What this obviously shows is that not all black people are like the perpetrators in the OP video.  And what does *that* mean?  It means that while one does need to be aware of and careful with the tendencies that certain racial groups (whether white, black, Latino, etc) may tend to display, one completely crosses the line when they associate those tendencies to the *entire* group of people.  That's when one becomes a completely ignorant racist.  I'm the first person to castigate *any* type of negative activity on really anyone's part.  However, even if a sizable percentage of a particular group engages in a certain type of activity, it is simply ignorant of people to paint every member of a certain class or race with the same brush.  It's simple logic, and, unfortunately, many, *maaaany* people don't seem to have it.
Heil Hydra
A video by Crow77 who seems to have grown very mentally unstable.  Particularly since the moon has been written about and drawn in paintings the last few thousand years when no hologram technology would be capable.  Mother moon not being there would play hell with tides.  Thanks but I'll stick to learning more about the police state in the US, the situation in Russia, Iran, Israel, etc.
Another voice of reason, who will be viciously attacked for stating the honest truth.
Of became
I'm not condoning this at all, it is deplorable.  I'll use the fancy word, deplorable.  It is sick and wrong.    Just consider why these people are acting this way.  You have to go waaaay, way back and analyze all that has happened and the economic and social injustices that put black people in the place that they are today.  This doesn't have to be.  The black girl who did this beating is there because their environment is sick and has been for a very long time.  She is a victim as well.  Not directly, but some form of indirect action.  This is huge and it should be an easy example that you can use to show the full circle nature of how people have been transformed.....and I think, intentionally.  When a group of people are given no other alternative and no other examples on how to behave......how to conduct themselves, you get this and other good examples of how "bad black people are", etc. etc.  When the examples are fucking "rap" music superstar X and bullet body Y....what else do they have?  That's just one example and my opinion only.  This has been in the works for years and years and years.  Creating a culture of violence towards everyone else that justifies their continued abuse could be used as a tool to divide and conquer.  Someone knows and understands people and the grip fear can have to turn group X against group Y.  Someone or some group of very racist people hate black people in a big way.  Those kinds of people who control a narrative....a continued message that everyone hears.  Someone has control, and the message doesn't come from regular people it comes from the TV.  There is more to this topic and I urge people to look below the surface of the standard comments you may see here.  It is not as cut and dry as this video will be used to show.
Apparently the attacker is already in police custody. http://fox59.com/2015/03/15/woman-caught-on-video-beating-another-woman-and-a-child/
The problem is too obvious. I think they just want to see how far they can push censorship to study how people react. It could just be a social experiment. A litmus test.
[deleted]
You become numb to it, and you stick out like a sore thumb when you try to illuminate co workers or friends. 
Me too. Can someone share some blogs where one can read this kind of stuff? Strangely happiness inducing, motivational and gives me more hope in humanity.
I am not buying this. Just like I don't trust the MSM in the west I also don't trust a news station run by Russian government. Just look at the title " Ukrainian **armed** coup".  Sure there some were photos of armed protesters (likely provocateurs) but what happened in Ukraine was very fare from a real armed coup.  For fuck sake it really was not even a coup  when all elected offices stand in place minus the President that ran off to Russian.  Its sad really to see so much revisionism happening soon after the event. 
Lol, that's actually the opposite of what they're doing. Initially, yes, they did directly support the rebels, but once groups like ISIS (Daesh), Al-Nusra, and the Muslim Brotherhood started to benefit from us financially, we (the U.S.) backed the fuck out. Now are we still selling weapons to the Saudis and Qatar? Yes. Can we really prevent them from giving/selling those same weapons to those very groups? Not likely, especially when the SA and Gulf states have as much economic control of oil as they do. We have to take these things on a case my case basis. Sure Saudi Arabia is run by a terrible dictator, but so was Iraq and Libya, both of which we didn't mind until it was (generally) in ours, and the people living within those countries, best interests to invade and bomb them, respectively. Could things have been handled better? Absolutely, but sometimes you have to deal the hand you've been dealt. We can't just throw our hands in the air and denounce every President and Dictator who has committed human rights violations or is anti-democracy and expect everything to turn out okay. These things don't exist in a vacuum. If you think that the west thinks it's in its best interest to allow these radical rebel groups to control the area and bolster their influence in the region, further destabilizing it (puts Iraq at risk, and Jordan, and even Israel!), then you're dead wrong. Do I know what the answer is? No, but I know that the problem is a lot bigger than everyone realizes and that there's no simple solution. We don't need to completely side with either Assad or the rebels. We don't need to be bullied by Israel into not allowing Iran to build their nuclear program, as we need Iran's support in defeating ISIS and similar radical groups in the region (which Iranian ground forces are currently battling in northern Iraq). Shit is SUPER complex! Is Assad shitty? Possibly! Is he the lesser of two evils in this situation? I would say so. Did he allow ISIS to gain influence so as to put himself in that position? I would also say that's a possibility. Over 10,000,000 Syrian refugees have been displaced because of this conflict. It's probably one of the largest in history. So, just make sure you know all sides before throwing out unfounded claims like that.
history taught in school is sanitized version of winner's story. I found a lot historical events have many layers, conspiracy theories have connected many dots between missing pieces in conformist history, and the reason we are here, /r/conspiracy.  Black mailing is very effective tool to manage bureaucrats.
For some (many) on this planet, this life is actually not about being happy.  It’s not about that.  It’s about *learning*, it’s about *development*, and often, learning and growing is not always synonymous with “being happy" per se.  It’s sort of like getting in shape.  It’s often excruciatingly difficult to get in good shape.  It takes a lot of hard work - a lot of blood, sweat, and tears.  However, through the blood, the sweat, the tears, and the hard, hard work, you *improve* - you get better.  Conversely, there might be someone who’s always “happy”, but since they have no interested in being anything *but* “happy”, they don’t do anything that involves difficulty or struggle, effectively doing away with a huge portion of things that, on *this* planet anyway and in *this* age - the [Kali Yuga](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kali_Yuga) - one tends to *have* to go through great difficulty and struggle if one wants to improve and get better, etc.  That person will not only tend to not develop all that much, but they will likely ultimately end up causing themselves much greater harm and be very *not* happy because they will, in their "happiness", be unwilling to have difficulty, unwilling to do things they don't like and deal with the frustration and sadness that comes with that...and they will forgo doing a lot of things that are perhaps actually *better* for them in the long run.  At the end of the day, therefore, life on this planet might not necessarily be about being “happy”.  It might be about being happy about as much as school is about being happy:  i.e. not very much at all.  School isn’t about being happy.  School is about *learning*.  School is about figuring out how to read, write, do math, etc, etc.  Many absolutely despise school.  Most people are definitely *not* happy while they’re in school.  Most would rather be doing a lot of other things…things that make them “happy”.  However, it’s generally not a bad idea to go through with school nonetheless.  Same with life.  Life on this planet is a school - a very, very difficult school.  We are here to *learn*…learn hard, hard lessons.  This often involves pretty much *no* amount of fun or happiness for many of us.  However, those who meet the difficulties and the vicissitudes and what are often the very *un*happy experiences of life on this planet will grow and develop into better beings.  So, though I respect the points you’ve made, and though I absolutely do not think that we should purposely make an effort to be *unhappy*, I’m not sure that one should necessarily strive too much to simply be “happy”.  I feel strongly that what we should strive to do in this life and on this planet is simply learn as much as we can and grow as much as possible.  Often time that may indeed involve happiness here and there - and this is good.  However, I personally feel the aim and goal in life should be the arriving at and acquisition of *wisdom* more than happiness.  With wisdom *comes* happiness.  I wouldn’t say that happiness in itself necessarily leads to wisdom.
Because I know my roommate well enough to the point I'd know if that was what he joined.
Any suggestions?
Why don't you give it to the police and stop putting mindless violence on YT or reddit. What an idiot you are.  
That's just a request to the FBI, when the investigation was still ongoing. If the FBI has admitted to having those tapes (as your source said) then I want to see that admission.
thanks for the headsup!   edit: i dont see it in redditrequest but it could have been scrubbed i guess
serious replies only
They need to bring some of that 5D healing here lol
I'm a firm believer of the "I would rather be punched with the truth than kissed with a lie" mindset, and at times it is seriously frustrating but I think the key is to find something in life that makes you happy.  A hobby, a sport or activity, something productive and healthy to take your mind off of all of the crap in the world. 
It's my understanding that humans and angels would be 2 separate species. 
BAHAHAHAHAHAhahahahahaha you guys are batshit aren't you?  We study important people in history class BECAUSE THEY AFFECTED HISTORY you fucking morons.
Bentham didn't do anything *illegal*.  They accepted payment and published an article, well within their rights.  They didn't slander Pileni after she resigned...hell, they didn't even bother defending themselves when she slammed them publicly in an interview.  What exactly would she take them to court over?  For that matter, Harrit and his partners didn't defend themselves either.  Not one of them ever said their article went through Pileni before it was published.  I'm quite certain that if the proper peer review process was followed, which would necessarily involve the input and consultation of the editor-in-chief, the authors of the paper would have mentioned it.
They are taking the Defendant's statements - here classified as his social media posts - and introducing them completely out of context.  This is not a new strategy.  A lot of school shooters' notebooks and emails have been introduced, if not in court then to the media, as evidence of planning or to demonstrate the perpetrator's state of mind.  What is new is the social media which makes a lot of this speech public and more easily admissible than say a diary might be.    In reading the article it's clear the defense team is doing a good job of showing how out of context these tweets and posts are and that the prosecutor has mis-characterized some of them to fit the "radical Islam" narrative.  This may backfire and evoke some sympathy from at least one juror and it only takes one to hang a jury.  Lesson learned:  Check your opponent's social media posts.    
Link?
:(
That's what you said last time dipshit!  South Carolina what's up!
Death itself has never really been a problem for me. Its how I die that scares me. I dont wanna die from nuclear fallout or starvation. I just keep trying to raise awareness, that makes me happy. 
Stratfor is based in Austin, TX and its president and senior officers are all former officials of the US intelligence services. The CEO of Stratfor calls Ukraine an "obvious coup":  http://russia-insider.com/en/2015/01/20/2561    &gt;what happened in Ukraine was very fare from a real armed coup. For fuck sake it really was not even a coup when all elected offices stand in place minus the President that ran off to Russian.  What you are describing is a coup. The alternative to that is a revolution.
The degree to which Cotton is being protected on /r/conspiracy is revealing. A measure of shills.
Yeah the whole thing is starting to seem a bit off to me at this point, but I am gonna continue to ask and dig until I find out. 
ten times a day? can you prove this claim? 
Thats the wonderful thing about the two party system.   If I am forced to pick Hillary over Jeb I will, if I think Jeb has a chance of winning.   I dont like it which is why I said I would like to see Sanders in the running so at least we will have a 3rd party participating in this process instead of the same two parties saying the same thing.   Its not delusional to say that Hillary is most likely going to be the democratic nominee, or that her vs Jeb means her winning.   Im a realist. 
How do you know? Did he jump a fence a go partying? Or do you think it more likely that people that needed to knew where he was but the media wasn't informed? 
The way there is a Boston Bombing Trial is very Dangerous. 
Happiness is a choice.  You look around and you see happy rich men and sad rich men.  You can see sad poor men and happy poor men.  You can find happiness in both sickness and in health, in the educated and uneducated alike.  Everywhere you look you can find no constant when it comes to happiness.  The reason is simple.  Happiness is a choice. 
And patdollard is? 
Rule 5. Removed.
This would be hard to explain all these points in a response.  We don't really learn much by having someone tell us the answers anyway.  We have to dig in to the information ourselves.  I think the response from the op is on the right track to start with.  When tackling something like this check your premises, define your terms, and hold your gut reactions to new ideas.  If you're interested I'd look into larken rose, Hans hoppe, Murray rothbard, Stefan Molyneux, Stephan kinsella, Bob Murphy, tom woods, and other similar thinkers.  
no, its not  hillary is very conservative  
they actually won it all
Definitely not as reliable as patdollard.com  Just look at all those objective, factual headlines  /s
&gt;Scientists at Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute have found that when just 10 percent of the population holds an unshakable belief, their belief will always be adopted by the majority of the society. The scientists, who are members of the Social Cognitive Networks Academic Research Center (SCNARC) at Rensselaer, used computational and analytical methods to discover the tipping point where a minority belief becomes the majority opinion. The finding has implications for the study and influence of societal interactions ranging from the spread of innovations to the movement of political ideals.  http://phys.org/news/2011-07-minority-scientists-ideas.html#jCp
Google "reddit+Eglin AFB"
I mean further.
No....Its only being shown to you. Its been around all these years.
[deleted]
1. Only love can change this world  2. This is one or the most interesting times to live in  3. It's an honor to see a global civilisation collapse. Doesn't happen that offen  4. With the collapse, change will come.  5. Humankind will learn from it.  6. And eventually fuck it up again  7. Everthing repeats itself in the fractual nature of the cosmic circle.  8. ...and none of this matters.  9. You cannot spread love if your life is dominated by fear.  Sounds like bullshit, maybe it is:-) Long days and pleasent nights
Exactly, it is a question.  If you check your source, the front page is full of right winged articles.  So anything they say is going to be sensationalized.  Show me a true source and I'll gladly say your right
Ok vanillathunder 420
Actually, no. You are so very wrong. Clinton is not a feminist martyr so please stop trying to put her up on a cross.  And do yourself a favor and don't compare her to capable, intelligent heads of state. She's not in the same league and it doesn't do her any service.
Probably the "not news" part because honestly, read the article. It's based on one guy's word, out of nowhere, deals in absolutes, and seems otherwise preposterous. If other countries are getting attacked, why the hell would we not be? It's absurd to think that a) we're causing EVERY terror attack b) all other nations experiencing terrors attacks are also false flagging every single one, thus invalidating entirely the existence of terrorist groups, which we know exist and threaten us regularly, or c) a single FBI agent of anything but the highest rank would even be privy to the knowledge of that many false flag events. False flags are inherently need to know, why would he need to know of every single fucking one?
Man there's a lot of closeted racists around here lately.
Only the feeble minded would believe coca cola is healthy. That is pure ignorance. 
Small world. Actually just posted about this in another thread in /r/conspiracy  I think we all know why it was halted. 
What's with the sensationalist title?
Nixon was a psychopath 
yea why would we ever hide them in the first place?
Unless revolution, it will rremain a two party charade 
Not a laughing matter.  Jk.  Soo ownthenwo.. How r u
&gt; The image at left above was taken by NYPD helo pilot Detective Greg Semendinger on September 11, 2001, maybe there is at least one person visible at the corner out of the smoke, the 911 Tourist Guy remains unaccounted for and sometimes it looks like it could be him, whoever it was must have died cursing the NYPD for not attempting his or her rescue.   Hey OP, great reliable sources you have provided for us......
[deleted]
So... there's never been droughts in California before now?
[Live stream](http://websdr.ewi.utwente.nl:8901) haven't heard anything yet, this was just posted by anonmessage. **Adjust Frequency to 8992** Also **11175**
Putin is the only reason war is not raging in the Ukraine right now.  No, not the best champion for democracy, but the champion for not wanting to see the destruction of the Ukraine or parts of Russia for the profit of Big Business.  If Putin wanted war, he could have easily used the murder of his rival to launch it.  The fact he didn't tells me they dont want war, and more than likely it was the CIA responsible in an attempt to get war started for the ones the CIA has always served.  Big Business.  They have never been there for the american people.  They have been the Secret Service for the Big Evil of the military industrial complex, The Fed, and the international banking cartels.
Fails to say its at the CIA's request
Christopher Hitchens has an entire book about how two faced the Clintons are, check it out.  http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/No_One_Left_to_Lie_To  This is what bothers me most about the "blowjob" lie, it's that Bill lies so much, he clearly thought he could just lie his way out it.  It's disgusting, and everyone says "you would too!" But the truth is NO, no I wouldn't, because I am not a liar. Only someone who lies incessantly would go on TV, under oath, as the POUS mind you, and think they could just lie their way out of it. 
nobody is denying she is a warhawk, but trying to sling mud at her only empowers her snatch-beast.  only legitimate mud can be thrown at her.
Oh the one month thing wasn't relevant to my comment. I was just merely noting it.
Yeah, it was all over the news when it came out and discussed here a little. 
So many implications regarding my explanation of how comment sorting works...  Seriously though, the implication that ModTalk is somehow representative of some "culture" is pretty out there. The only culture is the culture of people who actively participate in #ModTalk on a regular basis. Access there is widely granted to subreddits who reach a certain amount of users (meaning it is eligible to hundreds if not thousands of moderators). The cross-section of moderators is no different than the rest of reddit as a whole. Hell, I'm just learning about ModTalkLeaks from this comment right here.
DEFCONWarningSystem @DEFCONWS  ·  9s 10 seconds ago  We appear to be losing contact with a couple stations in Alaska. We are attempting to confirm. Again, these are UNCONFIRMED reports.
No.
Why would they need a quantum computer when all the computer stuff you use have backdoors built into them that the government could access anytime?
Lol. How Tusko squirms as he performs the mental gymnastics necessary to defend the faith.  Please get back to me with those quotes. In particular, I'm interested in your claim that there is some testimony which supports the claim that the Z-B was removed during outgassing.
[deleted]
this never happened
&gt;Show me where I made that claim in that post.  You inferred that there is testimony telling us that the Z-B was removed during outgassing when you said:  &gt;there's no reason to believe the entirity of its outgassing cycle occurred within the chamber  Please, provide a witness or "confessor" quote which supports the notion that this occurred. This is an invention of later Holocaust activists to (a) lessen the amount of HCN the morgues were exposed to, and (b) explain how the room was entered while HCN was still being emitted -- as we know that Z-B outgasses over about 2.5hrs (longer in winter).
Wait, I thought she was a villain. I can never keep up.
It made the National News. Was *swept swiftly* away.  Doesn't matter to you, really. 
Because this subreddit is mainly centered around lizard-jews and all the other things that have nothing to do with anything important. It's pretty much just here to act as a ward against anyone taking conspiracy theories seriously on major social networking/media websites. That's what /r/conspiracy is used for - either by purpose and direction including a few moderators who make sure the wrong things get stickied and the wrong posts stay on the front page(while the right ones are deleted), or just because the most vocal minorities out there have used this as their entry into social media websites. 
Fair enough.  Changed to many.
"The truth does not fear investigation"  /r/holocaust
Man, I love Ralph Nader. There is a semi-recent documentary about him called 'An Unreasonable Man' that is very very good which I would recommend everyone everywhere to watch. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/An_Unreasonable_Man  Ralph is one smart fucking dude. 
[See this blog also](http://forum.prisonplanet.com/index.php?topic=208559.0)
This was a long time ago.  I would love to go into detail, but being you're a smart-ass, I'd rather allow you to live in ignorance.  
I'm not trying to change what the word meant. I'm saying my response was a valid response to the context you used it in. In simple terms, you called me an apologist and I said I'm not apologizing (the act of an apologist).
We did go to defcon 3 today. That doesn't happen every day.
Just three things about your question that have worked for me:      Finding my own area, one that I believe in, where i can make the world a better place.   Limiting my scope to local neighbourhood or city etc, one that I can handle. And keeping myself busy in that.   Being contented with whatever amount of happiness and rewards I get. Theyre always very low in the beginning and not enough but improve with time. But its more about understanding contentment.      These really have worked for me.  
It's good to be prepared and ready to counter the propaganda. And on that note....  "The first casualty in any war is the truth."
What source you using? Same one as /pol/ if so that has zero significance.   Not saying they didn't, just make sure your sources are actually correct. 
Well that's certainly unexpected. I like how there's a part that's cut out:  &gt; "You see, we the American people need Prime Minister Netanyahu as much as you do. Weak leadership can destroy your country and then the evil forces can concentrate on America, too."
Cause that is common knowledge around these parts here Bubba.
Thanks for the explanation.
Dude, get drunk when it builds up bad, hit the bar or something. All you can do, you ate that fruit bro, you either embrace it or you live life sad.  
[deleted]
Just read everything about Northrop Grumman. You'll notice who runs the planet if you read enough. Their official site and YouTube channel had me locked in for hours. It's amazing and sad what they can do. Sad because we could all live in Utopia in hours if we got our hands on their tech. It's not even hidden either. They just know they out gun everyone and brag about it openly. 
The sound was fucked up on my phone as well. 
obv
Fucking pigs. 
Exactly. They are doing it to establish a global [Corporatocracy](http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Corporatocracy)
not infecting.  been infected. for some time.  see conspiracy of silence.  It was going back when it was made some time ago.
June 2014   http://science.dodlive.mil/2014/06/10/beaming-data-at-light-speed/ 
[deleted]
&gt;Nobody knows why or how it collapsed and the official story has changed about a half dozen times or more since 2001.  Plenty of people claim to know, including organizations like NIST and organizations like AE911 truth.  &gt;But no building in history has collapsed from fire.   This is just untrue.  &gt;Then they said that it was structural damage, that it was so wounded by shrapnel that its basic structure couldn't support itself and collapsed in on itself.  I believe that was an initial assumption, but further testing led to the conclusion that structural damage played little in the collapse, aside from initiating the fires that eventually led to its collapse.  &gt;But then a few photos of it were released showing that it had nothing more than cosmetic damage. The government has since cracked down on people posting footage or photos of building 7 from sept 11th.   Considering the prevalence of 9/11 conspiracy sites and resources on the web, I find that extremely hard to believe.  &gt;Ok then they said that the vibrations from the first 2 towers falling caused it to shake loose and collapse? Like an earthquake I guess.   I have never once heard that argument before. source?  &gt;I think the current story is that in the 1970s, before Tower 7 was built there was a power substation on that spot. It was to integral to the NYC power grid to just tear down so they build building 7 around it and thus had to sacrifice its structural integrity to accommodate the substation. Kind of weird considering that tower 7 was also supposed to serve as the mayor and chief of polices headquarters during a natural disaster, riot or terror attack and was stocked like a bunker.   I was under the impression it had some offices of some official agencies. Source for the "stocked like a bunker" comment.   &gt;OK also there is the fact that several people in tower 7 said that bombs were going off in it and they were stepping over dead bodies before they got out and the building fell. These people who are on tape on the day of 9/11 saying what happened have either died or are just being ignored... because.   People report hearing explosions. Consider the events occurring around them, these explosions could have come from a variety of sources. Controlled demolition explosions tend to occur rapidly in sequence followed immediately by the building collapse. People hearing explosions hours before hand is hardly evidence of a controlled demolition.  &gt;Also the footage looks like a controlled demolition, or at least it looks like one of the thousands of controlled demos that we've seen over the years.   How does it look like a controlled demolition? How many controlled demos involved bringing down the interior of a building collapsing first?    
Start something up and you have my help. Be the change. 
&gt;No, brain matter was blown backwards.  A gunshot blasting through a skull will blow matter in all directions, but the vast majority of matter was in front of the head. The photographic record is rock solid on this point. The interior of the car was covered in it, the Connallys were covered in it. Hell, some of it even ended up on the dash of the car.  &gt;Plus, if Kennedy was shot through the throat and went straight through to hit the person in front of him, why did the bullet that blew his brains out not act the same way?  The bullet that hit Kennedy in the back passed through him without striking any bone. That's how it was able to continue on to hit Connally. The headshot hit his skull at full muzzle velocity, which is what caused the bullet to fragment.  No answer for the head snapping forward at the moment of bullet impact? 
M'pancackecollapse
..that was satire, man!
it's just a distraction
Amazing. I still see people vehemently defending the idea that the passport fell to the ground and was found by LE virtually unscathed and within hours of the crash.  Funny, looking into the story we find that a mysterious man found it and then ran off after giving it to LE. And thankfully this mystery man somehow knew it was the terrorists and gave it directly to the chief of the terrorism task force. 
they build on the precedent set by the previous - and refuse to prosecute any of them lest they lose those precedent powers...  A terrible house of cards built on sand - it will fall because it is unsustainable.  
No, i have not, but with that question, it all makes sense now
  Is this possibly part of the Putin fear test? 
I believe it's a series of snap drills. Started with NATO in Latvia and Estonia, Followed by Putin's Response, followed up by US/NATO response to the response. Its truly a clusterfuck atm
You are calling it a sudden forward snap but if you are shot in the throat and you lower your chin and then you relax your neck your head will go down on its own.  That is what is happening.  For all we know he may have just lost consciousness from the bullet shot to the throat and that is why his head suddenly drops.  This is not the sort of "snap forward" you should see with somebody not seatbelted in and shot with a rifle in the back of the head.  If he was shot from behind and his head reacted as violently as you think it did his body should have been thrown forward as well and not pushed back into his seat.  There is nothing holding him in his seat to cause his body to recoil back.  He should have just continued forward if he was shot from behind.  His body should have slumped over into the seat in front of him.  
I think the real issue is where the molten metal came from. Not whether or not melted metal is required for it to collapse.
SERIOUS: Ive been a truther for a long time and this is some of the best recorded information all in one place I have come across just in this sub. My belief has always been no plane hit the pentagon at all and it was likely a cruise missile. But, in the videos towards the bottom a lot of witnesses seem to have seen the plane enter from the north side over the navy annex opposed to the official story of a plane enter from the south side. OK so we all know the official story is a lie. Are the witnesses lying too? What am I missing? Those videos say they are proof of NO PLANE at all. 
I think Netanyahu will lose, too. I have social media acquaintances that would previously only criticize Netanyahu in Hebrew. Past few weeks, they've started doing it in English. A silly way to gauge sentiment, for sure, but I think it's a notable change.
Pretty close. Perhaps they saw how successful it was for the Catholic Church and decided to replicate that.
I want in.  I just need to sell this bridge....
[Excuse me...](http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/432/952/727.jpg)
&gt; Barack Obama will beat McCain/Romney and the world-which is becoming increasingly critical of America will be pleased, and ignore the fact that Obama will change very little about America's foreign and domestic policies.  How familiar
I was under the impression that Russia's Central Bank had already been nationalized. I see the article is from December 15, 2014 so maybe it has? Anybody else know for sure?
As long as that better world doesn't include carbon credits or any other such nonsense.
"gas chamber door, Arizona"  The first letter is lower case. 
Which subreddit do you think I come from? 
You mean as Colorado dries up.  Since California and Nevada take 80% of the water we have out here on the western slope.  Seriously its bad.  The reservoirs out here are drying up and the old timers are telling stories of a very different landscape.  [This](http://www.nature.org/media/california/california_drinking-water-sources-2012.pdf) is an interesting read that explains were Californians get their water from.  Short version they take it from 8 other states.  I say take because its not really sharing when one party(CA) is taking so much more that it effects the other parties(CO being most effected since the CO river is main source).
Has the same mods/problems as reddit 
don't feed the trolls
&gt;  it's why I choose to supplement my diet with iodine.  Well done.  
It would be a great start to learning about being a fraud or a con man
[UC Davis pepper spray police officer awarded $38,000 compensation](http://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/oct/23/pepper-spray-cop-uc-davis-compensation).
You just proved my point again. I pitty you. But mostly whoever raised you. 
Q&amp;A keeps it simple. 
That i dont know, but they know good work when they see it.  They would be the ones to know how hard it is just to get a demolition to go right.
The following videos sure paint a different story ...  https://np.reddit.com/r/holocaust/wiki/videos
I'd be extremely surprised if B-2s were *not* outfitted with control electronics that NG commands.
I don't know what GLP is. It's never a slow day in Paradise. 
The burden of proof is on the "official conspiracy theory." We say controlled demolition because the evidence points to this. It looks like an apple, tastes like an apple, its a fucking apple.   They say fire because...? They were told to. A theory that cannot be tried, tested or replicated.  The world has gone topsy turvy. 
I believe it's pronounced "meem". I may be wrong.
That's great that you're not JTRIG.
I might be alone on this, but having an age limit so high (18 years old) is absurd. People are already having sex by then, as it's quite awhile after hormones and such flow strong.   But as long as the law stands, we need to stop dressing jailbait in thongs and putting them everywhere. 
Why didn't you just submit the link?
if they tax what we breathe can get they a carbon credit for genocide in another country?
This reply is cliché as fuck, but I wish I had more than one upvote.  Printing and hanging in my office tomorrow.
Because of just how difficult that is?  A remote controlled missile GUARANTEES that the job gets done.  Think of everything you have to account for if doing it manually.
If the argument is that the collapses "looked like a controlled demolition" and caused the buildings to "collapse in their own footprint" then it's necessary to assume that such a demolition would have needed to be conducted in the same way as a traditional explosive demolition.  Maybe a few hundred charges and singe cut beams would work, but that's not what creates the precise controlled demolition claimed by truthers.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Because Alex Jones is a shill. 
nothing to worrie about russia just checking out the neighborhood
What you said basically sums up a lot of what I think when I read stuff like this. The response I usually get when I say something similar to what you just did is "but the bible says it's bad" or "god says it's bad" that's  hardly a well thought out logical response.
I think it's funny. The problem I have is being lied to, and government involvement in naturalism. I thing these are great things, but not when crammed down our throats, sugar coated and frilly.
[deleted]
Still waiting on a response from /u/avogadros_number - I generally think along the same lines, would like to see him answer these questions.
&gt;I never said that I feel like you're in the wrong for choosing monogamy in the end, hey, poly just isn't for you.  I see this sentence as. "I never said that I feel like you're wrong for choosing to live your life sober in the end, hey, drugs just aren't for you.  Read my quotes...  &gt;At least for myself...  &gt;To me the lifestyle is...  This is all my own experience along with everyone "in my experience" We can agree to disagree.  As for the transgender link, you can argue with those people. I personally do not think they are lying and there is a reason why it took will power to stop. Learn more about addictions and the brain. If you want to continue to feed your dopamine cravings in the name of "you can't just love one person" - that's coo. The bottom line is whether you want to admit it or not, a simple fact that you just do not **want** -to- **choose** to love one person because that would be inconvenient to your own personal desires. And the people that you choose to "love" will also only be loving you because of their own selfish desires. The whole lifestyle is based off what he/she can get, not give.   It's kinda like when I also use to smoke weed everyday. I had a ton of friends. We were so loving and sharing all the time. These were my friends for years....until the day I quit smoking weed. Then I found out who really liked me for me as soon as I took weed (sex) out of the relationship. It was like poly to mono all over again. Of course to you this will just be another "bad experience".   I now choose to be with people that have self control and are able to commit.
Should've called the non-emergency number rather than 911 for that.
Something something Stalin  Something something applause  First man to stop clapping something something  Icepick
We all know and there are news in media about male pedophils, what we don´t hear, are female pedophilis, this doesn´t mean that there aren´t may. But as females are considered as caretakers of children, nobody doesn´t even suspect, that there could be some wrongdoing. So basicly female pedophile doesn´t have be even rich to get away. 
East coasts get colder while west coasts get warmer; it happens before every ice age. Never mind the diminishing sunspots that also precede every ice age; we know the sun has nothing to do with climate change, and needn't even be considered.
The scientific method isn't rightly my criteria, it was developed long before I was born. And yeah, when faced with the chose of taking unevidenced claims on faith or reserving judgment due to the lack of such evidence, I recommend the latter as otherwise one is likely to wind up mistaking pseudoscience for fact.
which can easily be explained as wind baffling against a building that is on fire. ever drive down the road and crack the window just right and you get that baffling sound/feeling of the pressure fluctuating...  you got lots of opposing forces here betwwen the prevailing winds, the "chimney" effect, and the fires inside burning hot and blowing out windows.  depending on how the wind is blowing and how it's interacting with the smoke trying to come out of the building i can see that happening.  but i don't know for sure.  what i do know is demolitions don't look like that either.  when they go it's wave after wave of rows of charges all synced up so cut in unison... so you can predict the stresses and the way the building will stress... so you can trigger the collapse the way you need it to go.  and there would be very bright flashes with each one of those, and lots of noise.  still haven't seen any evidence of an actual demolition.
extensive planning by morons is still moronic planning.
Good memory.
Ah yes. "Sanity". Where you just deny the work of thousands of people because you're scared of what it implies. 
Infoliars.com at it again, I see.  Buy my gold!  Buy my water filters!
What does TEB mean?
Yes, good example. Large corporations simply cannot be trusted to put truth over projected profits.   The first studies that showed a link between tobacco and cancer were made in the 1920s, but Tobacco companies and governments managed to selectively "ignore" the independent evidence, relying on big tobacco sponsored studies saying cigarettes were safe and not addictive until the mid 1970s.
And yet, history is mostly written by the victors.   
If someone is against MJ legalization you should ask them why they hate freedom?  That's my new go to move. Don't even try to argue facts, just ask them why they hate your freedom. Watch their head spin.
Which, among several others, is the reason I prefer to drink from my well.
One major vehicle for the enslavement of poor countries is the World Bank, which is Imperial mafia finance. It forces poor countries to open themselves to exploitation from the global Mega Banks and Corps.   Thanks to China the “Asian Infrastructure Investment Bank” will be an alternative. Or how to borrow money without surrendering the sovereignty of your people.   The World Banks should just go and die now. The world will be a much better place.
controlled by who?  have you watched The Spook Who Sat by the Door?  its a great film.
Just more confirmation that I made the right decision getting off facebook. 
Until the rot sets in. I've seen it in real life too many times. It all starts well and then you'll give people power and the idiots are coming floating to the top.  Always.
LOL, new satire site?
[deleted]
I generally try not to discuss politics with coworkers but if they ask me I won't lie about what I think on a certain topic. As for my friends and family, they all know where I stand. Some of my family (uncles &amp; aunts mostly) are the type of conservatives who still think Bush was a great president, so my cousins think its funny to start a political debate at family gatherings because they know I won't back down to the neocons of my family. My friends generally see things the same way I do, which I guess makes sense why I would consider them my friends.
Death by firing squad would be my preferred choice of execution, and I don't mean the one guy has a live round the rest have blanks so no one knows who fired the killing shot;.  No I want everyone to have live rounds, turn me into Swiss cheese.  
I don't see how being a woman has anything to do with it, my GF happens to be a woman and she's smarter than me.   I've seen people complain about women 'not getting it' on this sub, I don't know where that is coming from. my last 3 girlfriends were awake. Early into dating one even broke down and was like "before we go any further I just have to tell you that I don't think terrorists did 9/11 and I don't trust my government OK? Like this is important to me I have a lot of weird political beliefs we should talk about."   
[deleted]
Things are looking up for Harding.  
Leave it, just downvote. that's how things should work.
I don't think his dad is half the person a lot of people here think he is.
* [Sky King Mainsail Broadcast](https://soundcloud.com/user202510146/skyking-skyking) * [Test Count](https://soundcloud.com/user202510146/test-count-2015-03-17t12-04-36z-89920khz) * [EAM"S Broadcast](https://soundcloud.com/thor-schweipe/sets/eam) * [More Sky King](https://soundcloud.com/thor-schweipe/sets/skyking-skyking-chatter-on-8992) * [Phonetic Codes](http://vocaroo.com/i/s14LM5amILWo) * [More Phonetic Codes](http://vocaroo.com/i/s1JRM9eyhE6O) * Sorry it took a few minutes to compile this. These are from yesterday!
Likewise. I've never had any charges that weren't fully reviewed when questioned. They even have reversed overdraft fees when I was wrongfully charged twice for something back when I was in college and money was tight. Thanks for the reply.
Which will have what effect on the outcome? Does Canada's powers-that-be have any obligation to do what the "public" wants, any more than the US's legislature?  We just spent all morning reading about the "surprise victory" of Netanyahu after "polls" in Israel were "in favor of Herzog", etc.
All that has happened before. Putin was alive when it happened. He was KGB for a good portion of it. He knows how the game works.
Technological progress, always increasing our freedoms and self sufficiency!
It is the light going through the air and water, not the light being reflected by anything.
The thing is I wasn't arguing that every merger there was a conspiracy, as you fallaciously implied. Many mergers did occur during a recession, and, significantly, those were not small banks merging with bigger banks, but huge banks merging with gigantic banks.   You asked how corporate acquisitions are conspiracy. They're of course not, per se.   Do you really think that corporate acquisitions are never a conspiracy? Given what's at stake. 
You know, the sad part is that's it's a very good analysis of the situation, and it has to be "stuck" here in conspiracy because there's nowhere else to put it -- r/news or r/worldnews will not touch it with a 10-foot pole.  Still a wonderful analysis nonetheless.  Now there is an semi-honest broker, finally.
we have two options  do something or do nothing  if CC is real and we do nothing we are fucked  if Climate change is not real and we do nothing at worst we create jobs   But look at it this way DO oil companies like global warming? no  who benefits from global warming Denial? oil companies   so r/conspiracy do you like oil companies? 
But they're right, I mean, it was done to make people richer. I would think a conspiracy should include a hint of nefarious activity, not just business as usual. Someone else claimed that recessions were deliberately caused to enable the mergers, but that's not supported by the simple fact of the mergers, and they don't want to support that claim at all.
Google it, I read it was for counterweights, might have other uses, too.  But they don't say what planes use it and they're vague on for what, if I recall what I read correctly.
his hyperloop idea made me laugh 
&gt; don't think we have ever left the planet because of the van allen belt  Agreed, though I think the technology Apollo claimed to have used was insufficient regardless of the Van Allen Belts.  The amount of fuel that would've been required to get to the Moon and back (and how much it would necessarily weigh) alone is enough to prove their story BS.  Here's Wernher von Braun talking about the type of rocket that would be needed to actually reach the Moon:  &gt; It is commonly believed that man will fly directly from the earth to the moon, but to do this, we would require a vehicle of such gigantic proportions that it would prove an economic impossibility. It would have to develop sufficient speed to penetrate the atmosphere and overcome the earth’s gravity and, having traveled all the way to the moon, it must still have enough fuel to land safely and make the return trip to earth. Furthermore, in order to give the expedition a margin of safety, we would not use one ship alone, but a minimum of three … each rocket ship would be taller than New York’s Empire State Building and weigh about ten times the tonnage of the Queen Mary, or some 800,000 tons.
No, I'm American, but I have Ukrainian ancestors too -- Tartars from Crimea, long ago, barely more than slaves. My gf lives in Minsk, Belarus. I visited Kiev last summer -- beautiful city... or it was, anyhow. I have a friend who lives in Kiev. It has been painful watching her change into a different person over the past year. She has changed from a sweet girl into a fascist who doesn't see Russians as humans anymore. I have shed many tears for what my country is doing to Ukraine. The US has destroyed that country.  You say "hundreds of Russian tanks" have invaded. Any evidence? We hear claims of this every two weeks. But where are the photos? The video? Has it occurred to you that *your* media is propaganda? Or do you blindly trust it? These maps you've seen of the Russian invasion. How do you verify them? What if you're wrong?   FWIW, almost all media in the US is propaganda. Not just the news, but all television, movies, music... even church and education. It is very frightening when you realize what is happening. The American people are, effectively, living in an artificial reality created by propaganda media. And so are you, I'm very sorry to say. You have been lied to on a massive scale.
Russia is deffiently flexing their guns.  I wouldn't put too much into it. 
Somewhere in NK, Kim Jong Un barks at some flunkie: *'Why didn't anyone told me those dogs take bribes!?'*
&gt;all presidents  This is not true.  The best that I can tell is that Jimmy Carter was not part of the cabal and, to back it up with a fact, he fired GHW Bush from the CIA director position as one of his first actions in office.  He did face repercussions from this.  The Bush family used their Saudi connections (remember "Bandar Bush") to drive the gas prices up (never ignore linking the Bushes to the Saudis).  This was part one of making Jimmy Carter look bad.  Part two was how he negotiated with the Iranians to ensure that the hostage crisis would not be resolved until he and reagan secured the presidency.  As a two stage attack, these artificial crises made Carter appear incompetent in both domestic and foreign policies along with making him appear to be a weak leader in the eyes of the international community.  It's called an "October Surprise".  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/October_Surprise_conspiracy_theory
Rockran... I watch your posts and although I know you are a a shill at worst and a useful idiot at best, I am going to take the time to explain something to you.  It is a personal anecdote, so you can dismiss me as a liar now or you can take in what I am saying.  I know, personally, one of the people that worked on the WTC 7 report for the government.  He is like Einstein genius level smart and I have known him since childhood.  I have never discussed this with him and we have never talked about his job.  I know that he at least once was a good and moral person.  I am also a scientist who works in the private sector.  When you are working on a subject, you conduct your research based on exactly what your bosses want.  There is a difference between an assignment that states "Find out the truth about what happened" and one which states "Prove that this scenario we have outlined is feasible."  These things happen.  I saw it happen in private industry.  Scientists are asked to support made up marketing bullshit.  The politics and pressure of being a high level government scientist is something I will probably never be able to fully comprehend.  I'm sure you can understand how highly plausible this type of scenario is, especially when you consider that the data to actually prove their story to be true will not be released and is classified for "national security" reasons.
home now.  yep that's the one.  Thanks,  to you and /u/plato_thyself 
My doctor said that he would recommend the ketogenic diet for my epilepsy but its just so god damn hard to stick to. With a lot of support and a gradual lifestyle change I was able to do it for about 2 years. I'm gradually getting back into it now. I highly recommend it to anyone who wants to lose weight or for any number of health problems. It's fucking magic. 
&gt; a conclusion backed up by the Parkland doctors.   http://www.jfkmurdersolved.com/doctors.htm  Hmmm...nope. 
[deleted]
But from a logistical perspective, is there any reason to really down a jetliner, just to manufacture a ditch full of garbage? 
Post to antipozi, not here.
I was far worse than that. I was still in IRC until well after myspace was dead.
[deleted]
Technically *not* in the mail.    Unless chainmail is being used.
&gt;there are 105,847 licensed architects in the U.S.    How many of them have seen what AE9/11 truth presents?
Please add - [South Tower Plane Speed](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2zhw5l/what_do_you_believe_is_the_single_best_argument/cpjbzg3) to your list. Thanks.  http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2zhw5l/what_do_you_believe_is_the_single_best_argument/cpjbzg3
Someone posted that it's a Pierrot mask pin. The masks vary, but some of the pins look damn similar. Apparently it's involved in a swingers club. Makes sense that some DB who is trying to act like his secret sex club is so amazing even pictures of relics isn't allowed
[deleted]
Dude, you are preaching to the choir. The real problem is the US public. There are hundreds of critical flaws in the official story that are obvious to anyone who cares to look. 
The arguements of those who try to support the official story.  I mean,  watching Bldg 7 fall down is not an argument,  its just a strange phenomenon.  And let's admit it,  truthers can't prove what really happened,  not without a proper hearing,  a proper investigation.    The most convincing truthers are mainly good at pointing out the glaring problems with the official story,   which by now has become a national myth as powerful as the 4th of July.  Watching a person come to their senses regarding the official lies,  there is so much riding on it,  in terms of identities and memberships,  it might take a decade for truthers to find their place,  and learn how to deal with the believers.    Its like deprogramming a cult member.  Most truthers still fall for attacks by the believers of the official story,  and for diversions.  Most people think that if you deny the official version,  you MUST substitute a more convincing version.   When truthers fall for this,  they are dead meat,  from the point of view of an argument.    Because they have no more proof than the official story.   We haven't even learned how to argue after 14 years.
Dude I love the show - keep it up! Been listening since this summer. Admittedly not a plus member but I guess I gotta do it now since we got a back and forth. The Jen Briney ep was great.  I think I've got enough confidence to jump out there myself and start something, and will be proposing something during Jen's AMA on the 24th. Check out the thread if you can.  You got a new plus member shortly. I guess the reason I've delayed is because the first hour of your show is usually so good I feel that I'm already satisfied.  I'm sure you're loaded with show ideas, but have a pitch for ya. Before you respond feel free to comb through my history, but I think it could be neat.  I hope you're enjoying a little drink/smoke in Cali. It's 18 degrees here in New England and I'm ready to relocate after this epic winter.
Fantastic information here. Thanks guys. 
Why are you soooo afraid to answer the question?
Those pics are blurry as fuck. A child with crayons could do better. NATO *would* post clear pics **if they existed BUT THEY DON'T**. Why not? Because it didn't happen. Not sure why you cling to propaganda so tightly.  I didn't read the interview, but you understand text on the Internet can be faked, right?
&gt;Really they said "Kite, Kit, Steal, Playing, Must". Just a random collection of words.  How does the author know the words are actually random, and were not explicitly chosen for whatever reason? They didn't write the sheet, so they don't know why those words were chosen, thus it can not be stated that they are "random". That is only an outside observation.  &gt;I notice a lot of skeptics quick to point out how the words are spelled in this video but none of them willing to acknowledge the homophone aspect.  This is absolutely correct. Steal and Steel are spelled differently obvious, but pronounced exactly the same. So it doesn't matter if you are actually saying the word "steal", because you are saying "steel" at the exact same time, both words are pronounced the same so you are technically always saying both words.  &gt;If you feel there is meaning everything, then you will see meaning in everything. It does not mean it is there.  That's disingenuous, as we are talking about words, most of which have multiple definitions. Just because you think a person is using a word to mean one thing, doesn't mean they actually are, especially not when they say just the one single word on its own.
There appears to be Mod abuse in every SR. r/conspiracy discusses it a lot. 
As well as how many upvotes and downvotes the posts have.  All this would involve too much transparency in this place, however, and the trolls and shills wouldn't be able to troll and shill.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's rigged. Just like the US. Not that it matters, any of the other candidates would be just as awful.
Did you read the re-write? It still talks about the racism and bigotry of Netanyahu in just as harsh terms. It just doesn't lead with it.
Slackware or bust.  That's still a thing, right?
I think it was no secret that Prescott Bush helped Hitler come to power and traded with the enemy (for which he was charged). 
How would it have been done without anyone noticing?  It is a non-trivial process - it's not changing the filters on the air conditioners or whatever.    With setup/takedown and cleanup, they'd maybe have 1-1.5 hours a night to do the work.  It would take ages to actually accomplish the work necessary to bring down a 50-story building via demolition.    Concrete columns throughout a good part of the building would have to be drilled and loaded with explosives.    Steel beams would have to be torched to weaken (a nasty, loud, bright process), then have linear shaped charges attached.  Then wiring, detcord, etc. would have to be run.  Hundreds of meters of it, if not more.  Meanwhile, while all this work is going on, it would have to go unnoticed by any of the thousands of people working there or the building maintenance staff.  Then, add the fact that no [series of loud explosions](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SaBQ3AkRetI) was heard before the building's collapse, which would be a necessary byproduct of all those explosives being put in place.  So, which is more likely:  1) The above scenario, fraught with its long-lead timeline, attendant failure points, and squads of workers who would need to be kept quiet?    OR   2) That damage from debris from a giant building collapsing across the street, and resulting uncontrolled fires weakened the structure at critical points and caused the collapse? 
Sovereignty...  If you can pull it off
So how exactly is that a bad thing?  We are the only country that doesn't require voting....
You're just leaving Robinson for dead now? But he was your star witness like 2 posts ago!  Yeah, I've read that article numerous times. Conspiracy link spam doesn't impress me.
Maybe you're a shill for the shills to defend shills!
since when did /r/conspriacy become /r/whiterights? if you want to masturbate about your aryan genes why not go there?
hired snipers? Right, I also read about Latvian mercs supposedly on rooftops firing into the crowd, there's no valid proof of that other than independent expert "analysis".   90% of Crimea is Russian? Not 90%, try 80%, but still a majority. Look, Ukraine knows Crimea wanted independance. Ukraine always knew this, but because it's attached to Ukraine, with all the gas, electricity and other infrastructure coming from Ukraine and also an important maritime region they did not give it up. Yes, we know the people wanted freedom, but they were granted autonomy in 1995, so they basically were a region with a functioning independent legislature but no actual president. Wanna know why kiyv was pissed? Imagine if the U.S. went through a political revolution, kicking out the current regime that was neglecting the country economically, and during the regime change Mexico grabs New Mexico. Would you be pissed? Now I know New Mexico is a solid US state and no way it would ever favour Mexico, but that's not the point. The point is Russia kicked Ukraine when it was down. Our slavic brothers cut off our land when we were in the midst of a revolution.   NOT a coup.  Another thing, you say coup. I couldn't open your link in reddit, but does your "coup" involve the networking camp and the colour coded t-shirt provocateur guys on Maidan? If so, tell me and I'll respond.   So, MH17 was shot down by Kyiv? A little proof would be nice. And in fact, I'd like to focus on that. You can discard my other points as my opinion and not anything else. Let's talk about MH17.  (Also, both sides shell villages and towns, Donetsk and Luhansk have killed over a thousand in residential shelling, themselves.)  
I guess they have a 1 play play-book?
Well that's just gross
Still watching this, and so far I am LOVING IT!!!!  Thank you so much for sharing!  So far, gotta say this; the wives of the men lost on 9/11 were called "Jersey Girls", but if you were to Google that term, you'll get a whole lot of worthless "entertainment".  To me, this is further proof of the media's whorish attitude toward this topic.
Nice one! Thanks - never knew this existed. 
Or maybe advertisers don't want to be associated with such gruesome images
Brother, we did 9/11 to ourselves.  I gotta tell you, this was one HELL of a bitter pill for me to swallow, because that means we supported countless deaths of innocent people for no other reason than to make a very few money.  All our boys that died or came back with missing limbs?  Yeah, they just helped make a few people money.  That's really all it was about.    This has been going on for a while now.  Hell, that's what Vietnam was all about; to prolong the conflict as possible to optimize profits for the complex.  Hell, we killed, at least, half-a-million children while the American people cheered on.  No one seems to realize that we're killing civilians.  We're just murdering innocent families and stealing from them.
i often wonder if things in general need to get really bad before they become good. 
[deleted]
I am actually from one of those African country where we have have both the americans and the chinese.  My explanation is based on what I have seen with my eyes and understood.  Simply put, compared to the chinese, the americans and the french actions are not really showing interest to the people. They give advice, orders, and those on top listen.   The chinese have a much stronger impact on the local economy. They might be harvesting countries natural ressources, just like the others, but they leave behind better infrastructures, teach the locals.   So personally, even though the westerns image is much better looking than the chinese one, I would prefer getting butt fucked by the chinese.   And they do not interfere with the local regime and give opinions on things that their opinions weren't asked on. 
Check out Plato's forms. There's nothing new but if you package it in fractals you can make it appear novel.
All the videos are right there to be viewed no dollars required.
1.2 is the dead civilian count since 2003 Middle East invasion. Pure drone kills are in thousands. 
He sullies Barry Goldwater's name by merely mentioning it.
When the jews with their international financial and political machinations stop being the big problem. Tattoos are not proof of an externination program, and many people who survived the German work camps have been brainwashed with the same jew holocaust propaganda that everyone else has been hit with. It's the jews fault that they had to be controlled in Germany for being constant internal traitors to the German nation like they have done for centuries in many nations.   [Holocaust Mega-post](http://grizzom.blogspot.com/2013/12/hard-facts-of-holocaust.html)  [9/11 Mega-post](http://grizzom.blogspot.com/2015/01/fox-banned-news-9-11-israeli-connection.html)  [The Holocaust Hoax Smack-down](http://holocaustrevisionism.com/HolocaustRevisionism.com_-_Holocaust_Revisionism_by_Mark_R_Elsis.pdf)  [Over a hundred locales expelled Jews before “Zionism” was even a factor. Why?](https://theuglytruth.wordpress.com/2014/08/15/over-a-hundred-locales-expelled-jews-before-zionism-was-even-a-factor-why/) 
What do you mean redacted? Like are parts of the book actually edited and left blank or is it just no longer for sale? 
This just in, Britain's unemployment rate reaches 100% among citizens!  Wait...
Can I ask what you think actually occurred on September 11th, 2001?  The part that never made sense to me is we have a zillion videos/witnesses of planes crashing into the WTC towers.  But you think this did not occur, or in addition there were explosives planted?   I'm not trying to troll, I'm genuinely curious.  I could perhaps see the government having for knowledge of the event and ignoring it, to further their own purposes.  But I don't get why lace a building with explosives and then crash a plane into it? It seems redundant and highly risky.
LOL. This is exactly why we're rolling over to VOAT.CO in droves. Fucking shills.   Thanks for the opportunity to yell at a fucking MONSANTO SHILL! Fuck you wherearemyfeet! Fuck you and your neonictinoids. Fuck you and Roundup. FUCK you.
Posting your contradicting opinion on a post is not an attack. In fact, it should be encouraged.  The fact that you are less inclined to look for posts related to your interests or expertise is not proof that someone else is a shill.  Furthermore, someone being a shill has no bearing on whether or not their argument is correct. Address the argument, not the user. Shill accusations are nothing but a laughably transparent cop out.
Hope that helps.
Exit wound on film. Multiple first hand eyewitness explaining the exit wound. Sorry, kid. Thanks for the admission though!
Immigration is really a problem, it just isn't as bad as the exaggerations of this jew rag... yet. If jews know how to do one thing, it's exaggerate a story. But they love pitting one group up against another while they profit from it.
[Room key](http://imgur.com/a/feJwr)  Its weird cause this one is paper usually they are plastic. The ones for holiday inn I reuse if it is a RFID card just leave it in my wallet so they don't have to give me a new one. Been using it for 2 years now.
You're a idiot.
&gt; Movement =/= snap.  It is when it's that fast.
"The Ultimate Revolution" is a pretty chilling term. Especially considering the context in which he uses it. Pretty naked and blatant talk about Psychiatry as well. 
It's amazing how only a few college campuses have had protests to divest from fossil fuels. I'd be mad as hell if I was paying for dead-end investments. 
Your posts are more sad than anything.. the pathetic diatribes of a sheltered social-reject..    What happened to you when you were a kid? Some bigot clearly had a profound influence on you at some point, for you to just spread hatred to towards such a large group of people. Someone fucked you up. 
is funny because is true
Perfect /r/conspiracyjerk title!
The state of censors is .... Censorship.  Surprise surprise.  The minute reddit brought in censors ...errr ... moderators it ceased to be community driven .  You cant have ok censorship. You are either censore dor you can talk freely.  Once you enter the debate about which censorship is "correct" then you become part of the censorship problem.  There was never spam on reddit. Blatantly commercial appeals were handled well by the voting system. Spam was the excuse they used to bring in censorship.  Reddit is a censored arm of Advanced Publications owned and completely controlled by the 7 th largsst mainstream media families in the world whp also owns conde naste and other mainstream media.  It was sold by its open minded founders for a rumored $20 million dollars years ago. You cant blame the kids who started it . And maybe they were told they would have some control etc but it doesnt matter. Reddit is now a heavily censored story discussion board and not a communoty driven story board driven by upvotes and downvotes. Any mainstream media source that says that is either intentionally lying or frankly so stupid and ignorant that they shouldnt be writing about Reddit    We used to influence presidential elections and national issues on reddit. Now we simply come to loook in vain for some original wisdom and cooperation while we wait for a better platform to emerge.
They can be parked out in the Nevada desert with the other 3,000 we already mothballed.
yup the site is down
I'll check that one out, thanks!
Your right, all of those retail workers, baristas ect should just get a banking job - The point is that they can't afford to live there - London is pricing out the people who keep it running - I'm just going to assume your joking.  A college of mine left as they couldn't afford to rent (and obviously not buy) and she is a nurse - earning double minimum wage. Seems insane that they price people out who do things like make sure you don't die.   Now London knows this hence a high speed railway is going to be built to bristol - where I fucking live - meaning soon I won't be able to live here. I'm not sure what the people in charge are thinking and will never know as all the words they say are spun
&gt;How is this evidence of anything other than planes flew above your area?  It's not. But if you just *believe*...
Wow... I was only thinking like presenting an ID card, but you're right.  That's a perfect opportunity to push that ID technology...  "Please put your right thumb on the glass and give me your left hand so I can scan your chip.  And we'll just cross reference that with a facial recognition database..."  Scary... 
Cover up.   I hope this story continues to receive scrutiny. If we're lucky they'll bring out the "false memory syndrome" brigade. That will be fun to watch.    **Edit: I'd like to add that this story has been attracting shills like flies to shit.** Here is a [possible example](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2zjgj4/all_of_the_hampstead_ritual_abuse_whistleblower/cpk45z1) I'd like you guys to consider.
Your fantasies are entertaining.
The moon landing is a hoax. You couldn't leave the planet if you wanted to. 50th anniversary coming up and nobody has been able to "replicate" the science. That is evidence of pseudoscience 
Fucking trash.  Dude looks like a meth addict and starts off confrontational. His fat baby momma immediately says there may be medication in the car.   And is that the baby's name on the side of the car!?  
If one can justify giving police agencies MRAPs, retired military vehicles built to withstand explosive blasts and absushing, one can justify giving police agencies retired tanks.
I have a mystical power over you. I command you to continie to be a jerk to alienate people from you and your fud spreading.
According to the judge who ruled in favor of the father: “The individuals who have watched online film clips, read online articles and believed in the allegations would do well to reflect that ‘things may not be what they seem’, and that it is all too easy to be duped on the basis of partial information.  “There are many campaigning people, sadly, who derive satisfaction from spreading their own poisonous version of history irrespective of whether it is true or not.”  I think there's truth in what the judge has said here. Us the public have only had partial information since day one, because there has been a massive coverup since day one. In my opinion it's clear  someone is most certainly spreading a poisonous version of history and that would be the judge, the police force, and the headmaster at the school. All I want is a proper thorough investigation and the truth.   edit: formatting
Society of Jesus Warrior psycho alert
Haha yeah a fourteen minute video and the downvotes started after about a minute. They didn't even give it a chance /s
also;  Pharmaceuticals great 
There's a company, I can't remember the name,. that if you mention there you get an insta-ban. They are controlled op.
Now doing 6 months for defacing government documents.
Good video!    Unfortunately thats what the entire world has become about.  Making money.
Well, that and the fact that the shills clock out at 4pm on Friday.
Redditrevisionist probably forgot to mention it, but during the Nuremberg trials, German officers were tortured and had their testicles crushed (all but two had permanent damage there after the trials), into admitting to  committing the atrocities. Luckily, the Germans had the last laugh, as many said they killed **20 million** Jews, and other ridiculous and scientific impossible feats, to ensure that people will one day know of the farce that was the Nuremberg Trials.  http://www.reddit.com/r/holocaust/comments/2mccvl/the_torture_of_german_officers_to_gain_false/
Invaded? No. Bombed/missiled/destroyed from inside? Yes.
Posting this as there doesn't appear to be any mention of this case elsewhere on the sub, would be interested to hear people's thoughts on the case.  Part 2 of the video [here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BkfbToZoBN4).  Part 3 of the video [here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KWS1SRPJD60)  Police Crime scene photo's &amp; details [here](http://www.scottishrepublicansocialistmovement.org/Pages/SRSMWillieMacRaeCrimeScene.aspx).  Further information [here](http://www.scottishrepublicansocialistmovement.org/Pages/SRSMWhoKilledWillieMacRae.aspx).  A decent blog post (not mine) about the case [here](http://calumcarr.blogspot.co.uk/2014/12/willie-macrae-parts-1-to-4-consolidated.html).  A more recent newspaper article looking at possible links of his "mysterious death" to the UK Government Paedophile cover-up [here](http://www.express.co.uk/news/uk/541793/SNP-activist-killed-over-child-sex-files).
imo, this is a **global** *crime*, as people "wake up" maybe, hopefully, we can shut it down.
thanks, appreciate the info
What?   Torture isn't a conspiracy. Torture is an active programme that several Western governments have been caught red handed doing. It's not a supposed occurrence with very little evidence and heaps of speculation, it's a well documented technique.   It shouldn't be in /r/conspiracy it should be in /r/news and /r/worldnews where there's more people to discuss it. Having it down here in the basement of reddit does it a disservice. 
STILL more begging? Damn, kid. You need to fill your free time with some hobbies!   &gt;Yup, all those witnesses, right?  Yup.   http://www.jfkmurdersolved.com/doctors.htm  I came back from lunch, and went to the O.B.-Gynocology section where I was working. At approximately 12:30 P.M., the triage nurse called us to bring a cart out to the entrance. We took said cart out the door, and it was then that I realized who was in the car.  Several people helped put the President on the cart, and we then proceeded to the Major Surgery section of the Emergency Room to Trauma Room #1. **Mr. Kennedy was bleeding profusely from a wound on the back of his head**, and was lying there unresponsive.   You already said you prefer your side. Good for you! But you can beg me all you like I (we all) aren't buying it. Sorry!!! 
While I appreciate you providing me with those fucking hilarious sites (I mean, a "research institute" that primarily talks about Morgellons! funny shit), I have to wonder why you decided to comment on an 8 day old post? There are plenty of chemtrails posts to add your (I'm hoping) parody links to. Go troll some chemtrails people on a more recent thread.
i'm not able to help solve the problem, but being a former Sprint customer, i would just say: get a new provider.
When you've made a fair amount of money to cover your time and hassle (hopefully), can I request you donate the book to the Gutenberg project please? Freedom and sharing of intellectual resources would be my request for your book. 
Its attacking irans control of iraq, and they have to neutralize syria before they can attack iran. 
[deleted]
I kind of feel like changing my provider at this point is rather like moving from one prison cell to another, while remaining in the same prison complex.  Perhaps the problem would go away if I changed providers, though--I hadn't thought of that. It would be too much trouble at the moment because we're locked in via a contract.  The next thing I'm going to try is to call Sprint again, and this time be more forceful in demanding that, if they don't know of a solution, then please find someone higher up who does.
&gt;  but it doesn't seem the thought was too critical or intelligent  i think taking what basiago says at face value is the complete opposite of critical thought.  &gt;Brett Stillings, Bernard Mendez, and Laura Eisenhower all independently corroborating things that Basiago himself said prior to getting together with him constitutes quite a bit more than "hearsay".   how is it not hearsay? corroborated facts, not just what one or two fucknuts said.   &gt;However, a conclusion drawn without illustrating a sufficient amount of evidence for it at least indicates that not a great amount of real thought was put into the topic.  I looked into it like 6 years ago. sorry if i didn't commit any of this bullshit to memory  &gt; I can discern clues, indications, and likelihoods.  And basiago's claims are anything but likely      
Your previous post was guilded twice with similar ramblings. Its not like I could tell how many upvotes this would get. And my saying its being lapped up was based on the circle jerk of the comments. Ego stroking, having 'higher levels of awareness' etc.  Telling people that the negative feelings/things in their life is their own fault, that's simply wrong. Depression isn't as simple as choosing to be sad day in day out. And who the fuck are you to say that an outside influence can't be to blame?   As for your take on following a leader, have you ever watched how primates socialize? There is a heirarchy. Its engrained into us, its how we succeed, by working together in a social manner.  What you are saying is probably good for some sort of self help book, but it has no bearing on being 'awake'. There is zero correlation between mental health and believing that 'they' are out there, controlling the media, governments, poisoning your water, spraying your air, bringing down your own nation's buildings and staging elaborate hoaxs every month or so.  I would say that paranoia is pretty far from being mentally healthy.
The new york times has catered to israel requests in the past, and continues to do so.  Calling them the jew york times isn't racist, it's appropriate  http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2zieji/the_new_york_times_published_a_piece_about/cpjfy6l
&gt; what is the deal with the revisionist holocaust theory  [FAQ](http://vho.org/Intro/GB/index.html) and see ['Essential Introductory Reading'](https://www.reddit.com/r/holocaust/wiki/articles).
This writer needs more sources. Could be a very important piece.
They'll be parking them in orbit around Mars soon enough.
Fantastic. Got it bought, thanks
I get what you're saying. 
Governor Perry won't be running (successfully) for national office now.  &gt;Governor Perry refused to grant a stay of execution, saying through a spokesperson that "The Governor made his decision based on the facts of the case." Governor Perry said that the "supposed experts" (using finger quotes) were wrong and not to listen to anti-death penalty "propaganda". Perry aide Mary Anne Wiley said the commission's $30,000 hiring of fire scientist Craig Beyler was a waste of taxpayer money. [-wiki](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cameron_Todd_Willingham#cite_note-7)
Just like the jews in Germany right?  
Thank you so much for these quality posts. Could you please make a subreddit consisting of posts like these? They give me hope.
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
[deleted]
OK sure, however, I would respectfully disagree. I consider the [Complete 911 Timeline](http://www.historycommons.org/timeline.jsp?timeline=complete_911_timeline) to be an absolutely hugely compelling resource when trying to make the case that the mainstream story about 9/11 is a tissue of lies, precisely because it manages to do this while still being impeccable about it's sources.  In this case I would be truly happy to see some sources that were less than impeccable, which is why I was asking for the 'most credible' source for this claim.   As for the statement I'm a shill, well that's bullshit, but then a shill would say that, so I'll just let that one go.   Fortunately, I hope, /r/conspiracy isn't in the business of censoring people who disagree with the group view, so hopefully we can just agree to disagree about the desirability of evidence and/or 'source's ;-)    EDIT: just realised that my original reply didn't ask for the 'most credible' source as I had originally intended. It used the much harsher 'somewhat respectable source' phrasing, so yeah I guess I can see why that would set off alarm bells for some poeple.
/r/Ukrainianconflict would appreciate your posts. 
Has a building ever free falled from just burning before? Also, what was the "pull it" comment all about From Larry Silverstein? The owner of the buildings. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p34XrI2Fm6I
Did nobody check the source? It's the Far News Agency. They're the Iranian equivalent of Pravda or RT. We can't keep falling for this propaganda, guys, no matter what biases it confirms!
So he's found more than a year later eleven miles from his house.   I guess the question is, can the body be analysed to determine how long he's been dead?  Or even how long he's been in the water?  
&gt; The whole point of peer review is checking if what is said is correct, and if the models used are precise. Why would you just assume their inputs are correct?   ...that's exactly what I just said. I'm glad we agree.
I always wonder when people post a load of links like that if it's supposed to be a silencing tactic. You blast the other person with a load of links so that they probably won't click on them and you can say you've won the argument.  A lot of racists on reddit use the same tactic.
no they found an old sewer line which was the size of small dog
Yeah, funny thing about that Snowden coverage...
... what does any of this have to do with what I said... and how are neo-nazis in any way denying the holocaust? AND HOW DID YOU SEE YOUR GRANDFATHER DURING WWII?!  This is some of the worst trolling ever.
So my fears are actually correct then? I just watched this video, because I had no idea Gates has a depopulation regime: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gROhNaJoGzI  How are you okay with this? Even if it's only 10-15%, I want the option to have children if I so wish, I have that right as a human being, as do my children and theirs..
Why would we need a link to the thread when you already screen-shotted it?   Smells like a call to vote brigade to me. 
There's so much confirmation bias in this thread it's crazy. Fars is a nonsense source. I've been shouted down for saying it before and I'll probably be shouted down again. There is not a single shred of tangible evidence for these claims so it's just noise not worthy of anyone time. Fars always has been a waste of time and so long as they keep shouting at "Big Satan" with f all to back it up they will continue to be so.
Link?
Its been grand guys, welp, after ww III, i'll catch yall on the flip side. Cause this is how you get ww III. Good for him though if he succeeds
Does it also have anything to do with oil and gas? Isn't the current Vatican pipe from this area too? Didnt this sub predict this exact chain of events would happen (after the pope was elected)?
"Hell hath no fury like a woman scorned"
did you watch the vid? he said where he said the conditions and by the way how do you track unmarked planes?
People who aren't thinking clearly and are letting their emotions dictate their response? They tend to do rash things... and a divorce will do that to people, ask anyone who has gone through a particularly nasty one.
You're welcome.
yeah... it's not a joke.  [livescience.com](http://www.livescience.com/47737-stephen-hawking-higgs-boson-universe-doomsday.html)
They are interchangeable. There are plenty of reports of fighters going in and out of Syria/Iraq fighting on the various fronts. Look it up, I've already provided that link for you. We are giving weapons the FSA and IS fighters are coming from the FSA using the weapons we've supplied. Can you not see the picture? If we know that the FSA is working with IS, how is it so crazy to think that the US wouldn't "miss drop" munitions for IS? It's two birds one stone. IS is the boogie man and FSA is fighting Assad and they are BOTH working together. Think about it man. 
You're doing God's work son. 
What's the significance?
You have no answer for the anthropologist report you haven't read.  The autopsy photos have been verified by everyone who's seen them, including every doctor who was in the Parkland trauma room. There was no rear exit wound.  You lose.
I expect the charges to be dropped. Can't let the latest child raping cop off the hook, after all.  That would compromise their total immunity to all laws.
Concern troll.
My point exactly, it's the chicken and the egg.
I simply assume that *all foreign relations* engaged in by the US government are founded on corruption, lies, hypocrisy and serve mostly to benefit the corporations that have sufficiently bribed politicians and the wealthiest 1%. This has saved me a lot of time and hasn't failed yet.
also, a controlled demolition of that magnitude would take weeks/months in preparation. Couldn't be done/decided on the same date
[deleted]
Yep [utopia for 1000s of years] (http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_conflicts_in_Europe)
Oh don't try and pretend that the Venezuelans have him in a Gulag, he was known to be in Bogota. I don't presume he got himself on a plane back to Caracas. If he doesn't try to contact you or your family from Colombia, that's because he chooses not to.
Dude, it's not SCIENCE, its called informed consent.  
[deleted]
I follow all the rules and regulations in accordance with my profession.  I am not obligated to get a flu shot.  You're acting like I'm some sort of typhoid mary going to work with open, oozing sores.  Quit making assumptions about me.  Quit insulting me.  Educate your own self about what precautions are taken by medical professionals to keep infections from spreading from patient to patient.  You obviously are much more verbose than you are knowledgeable. 
&gt; if you had the balls to call me that to my face, you would never be seen again.   No! Bad!  Sit. Stay.
Doesn't seem like a conspiracy when police agencies are refusing to disclose the information of how they are tracking us. 
Sigh... [Unsuprisingly your free fall argument has been dealt with.](http://www.debunking911.com/freefall.htm)  So you're saying that they demolished a building, to destroy 'records'?! Ha. Ahahaha. They managed to do the months of work to prepare for the demo of the building without any account for it, but getting rid of some accounts was **just too hard.**  So to your account 'they' (after years of planning) lost control of one of their planes. Two hit the buildings, but the third was just a failure. They then demolished the two towers, from the top down (which has never been tried before). Then hours after, the transformers blew in tower 7 they thought to themselves, “Fuck it, no one will notice. Blow it up anyway."  What you have presented is just unsubstantiated nonsense so far, so please try again.
[deleted]
I hear you, but I didn't meant to suggest that adults should live in a carefree/ignorant/childlike state. I referenced kids to remind people (and myself) of what it feels like to be totally happy in the moment.  As adults of course we've moved on from wanting to spend our days playing with toys. But that doesn't mean that we can't find the same joy and sense of purpose that little kids have. We just have bigger fish to fry now need to step up to the challenge. 
Unfortunately, it is the case. No link from the photos, to the autopsy. Period.  Unfortunately:   http://22november1963.org.uk/pierre-finck-jfk-back-throat-wounds   Regarding the wound, Sibert said it was in the "...Upper back of the head."   Just like the other sketches. How curious?!   http://www.jfkmurdersolved.com/images/dennisdavid.jpg   Dennis David, who saw JFK's wounds on autopsy photos, indicates where he saw an entry wound.   Dr. Kemp Clark, neurosurgeon, said: "I was called because the President had sustained a brain injury." "It was apparent the President had sustained a lethal wound," Dr. Clark said. "**A missile had gone in and out of the back of his head,** causing extensive lacerations and loss of brain tissue. Shortly after I arrived, the President's heart stopped. We attempted resuscitation, initiating closed chest heart massage, but to no avail. "We were able to obtain a palpable pulse by this method but again to no avail. President Kennedy died on the emergency table after 20 minutes. .  **"A missile had gone in and out of the back of his head"**   Aubrey Rike: "You could feel the sharp edges of the bone at the back edge of the hole in the back of his head."   More: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Dvbuv_eLISk    **"A missile had gone in and out of the back of his head"**
I was referring specifically to Building 7, where upon review of the explosion through the use of video, the building implodes straight down, implying that it was detonated. I have not explored the rest of the conspiracy yet, I'll get back to you on it when I have more time to look into it.
Wow. You sound like a shill if I ever heard of one. 
I haven't been up on the "truther" movement lately. Could you briefly explain to me the conspiracy that you think happened? 
Problem: Big Brother. Reaction: Oh no Big Brother is bad. Solution: Salvation from Big Brother. Set up of non-Big Brotherly Best Friend Society. Peace and love and harmony...  Hegel did it best.
When I see the OP's comments started getting gang-downvoted into the negatives, pun comments start to rise to the top, anyone who mocks the premise of the thread gets upvotes....  This is usually the pattern in this subreddit. It means that the trolls/shills have shifted to a higher gear, because the last thing they want is for this post to hit critical momentum and potentially reach the larger audience of this website.
That doesn't make it any more or less constitutional. A constitutional amendment is literally constitutional.
You all will be singing a different tune when the Venezuelan steamroller crosses the frontier and starts gobbling up US territory!
Whoohoo! We're not toxic!
&gt; I believe I have a soul and a spirit. That soul and spirit governs and commands my physical body, which serves and obeys.  Seriously? It's not like your body is a vehicle, and you're some little ghost-like pilot who steers it around.  You are your body. Your body is you. There's no "duality" here - it's a singular item.  &gt; It may seem that this is just a bunch of random info  Now you mention it...
Edit: Thanks for the downvotes! Downvoting is not for what you disagree with. I am so glad for all the rebuttals and contesting of the statements of fact I wrote! I guess facts contrary to your shitty, unbased conspiracies are toxic. Fortunately I still stand by this (and won't dissassociate myself by deleting it) but Reddit thinks no one deserves the right to see my words by automatically collapsing my comment and thus categorizes my comment as not deserving the same equality as other comments enjoy.  This video is so fucking dishonest. Let's sum up what is known:  * Collapse of nearby 1 WTC ejected burning debris into WTC 7. **A fucking 133x133 feet by 110 storey building collapsed 400 feet away.** [Image: 1 WTC's footprint is at the bottom. The building in the middle is 6 WTC. The remains of 7 WTC are in the upper right.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Collapse_of_the_World_Trade_Center#/media/File:September_17_2001.jpg)  * The water mains were broken: "The primary and backup water supply to the sprinkler systems for the lower floors relied on the city's water supply, whose lines were damaged by the collapse of WTC 1 and WTC 2."  * Uncontrolled burning for hours; no water = no sprinklers to suppress the fires. Most office fires get some help from fire suppression, but this was not the case with WTC 7 and that is why similar fires have not caused such catistrophic collapse. There was also very little attention given to the fire and was burning for **over 7 hours** after the collapse of 1 WTC.  * There was a visible bulge noticed on the building. I imagine it was there for hours. It's known that the building was having extreme issues holding itself up.  * The core of the building collapsed first. This is observable in many videos. Many conspiracy-themed videos and presentations do not show or explain that.  * The remaining external structure (it now has little or no internal support) collapsed without much resistance at "near-freefall" speeds.  There's so much nonsense in that video. The evidence is so easy to obtain but it seems like these people are too fucking lazy to read and actually examine the evidence.  I'm not contesting all the conspiracy theories, though I do believe that the actual destruction of all the buildings is not a conspiracy. I'm simply pointing out that, if there is in fact a conspiracy, none of this bullshit is a part of it.
**UPDATE**  &gt;**March 20 Update:** Just when Google was about to resume serving ads to AntiWar.com, the site received another notice claiming that another page was in violation. This one didn't feature Abu Ghraib photos at all, but rather an Associated Press photo of [corpses in Donetsk](http://original.antiwar.com/chris_ernesto/2014/05/28/heads-up-the-us-is-losing-in-ukraine/). (Warning: That link, as you can probably guess, is very graphic.) While it is understandable that Google would rather not serve ads next to corpse photos, this presents something of a challenge for a site that is, as its name might hint, dedicated to opposing war, in large part because war involves the production of a great many corpses. AntiWar.com has run probably hundreds of similar photos over the years, and Eric Garris compared finding each one of them the site has ever published, for the purposes of removing AdSense code from each one, post-by-post, to "playing whack-a-mole." If AdSense is too squeamish for any and all graphic but newsworthy content, it's hard to see how it can work for publishers of independent journalism. The rest of this post continues as originally published (and updated).
Merica!!!! ...yeeeeeaaaaa!
The full sequence is shown in this video.
I did not think it was necessary to provide additional links to the comments, as they and nothing else from the original thread are displayed by OP's link.  [duckvimes is talking about how to spot same person versus two doing copypasta.](http://np.reddit.com/r/actualconspiracies/comments/2zntsy/user_creates_over_twenty_accounts_controls_over_a/cplcgjw)  [BTR responds with an article about toxicity.](http://np.reddit.com/r/actualconspiracies/comments/2zntsy/user_creates_over_twenty_accounts_controls_over_a/cplfbro)  [duckvimes responds somewhat snarkily and claims he is arguing a different point.](http://np.reddit.com/r/actualconspiracies/comments/2zntsy/user_creates_over_twenty_accounts_controls_over_a/cplhqoh)  [BTR responds with a sarcastic insult.](http://np.reddit.com/r/actualconspiracies/comments/2zntsy/user_creates_over_twenty_accounts_controls_over_a/cplj8au)  [confluencer goes right to name-calling BTR.](http://np.reddit.com/r/actualconspiracies/comments/2zntsy/user_creates_over_twenty_accounts_controls_over_a/cplfulr)  [BTR responds in kind.](http://np.reddit.com/r/actualconspiracies/comments/2zntsy/user_creates_over_twenty_accounts_controls_over_a/cplg3bs)  edit: Just as clarification, I don't know any of these users and don't feel my life will be made significantly better or worse by the exclusion or inclusion of their posts. What I took issue with is when people decide they have won an argument because they used a logical fallacy and managed to get the other party to insult them personally.  edit2: fixed links to np.reddit instead of www.reddit
Because the real world cannot possibly be as transparent as you believe.
i pictured you holding a warm cup of tea while saying this
I've heard that alot, and I'm not saying I don't believe it,  but how does one go about proving that  the central bank of Afghanistan (or any other central bank) is controlled by Rothschild?  Do you know of any difinitive sources on this matter
[deleted]
You need to check up on what AIPAC does and what the jewish lobby across the world does and come again.
Did U.S. authorities SILENCE him???  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scott_Ritter
Any reason given?
http://www.globalresearch.ca/america-cleanses-southeastern-ukraine-of-ethnic-russians/5388101
&gt; ... And the LORD spake, saying, "First shalt thou take out the Holy Pin, then shalt thou count to three, no more, no less. Three shall be the number thou shalt count, and the number of the counting shall be three. Four shalt thou not count, neither count thou two, excepting that thou then proceed to three. Five is right out. Once the number three, being the third number, be reached, then lobbest thou thy Holy Hand Grenade of Antioch towards thy foe, who being naughty in My sight, shall snuff it."
It's almost like I should have included a /s at the end.
[Meta My Data: NSA Part 2](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_o2djiZOxyA)
They already did that, now there going after the gun runners. I think the state is scared. But we with have an occupying force in Darwin to protect US from the Asian menace.
any country that makes it's monetary decisions based on IMF and WB orders is Rothschild controlled. 
Funny, the article says pretty clearly the problem is pesticides, not GMOs.
Hmm. I didn't know anything about a few of these incidents. But from looking at it, it appears that most of them were in reaction to other events.  The only thing I can really say is that the Soviet Union did a lot of the same stuff, and that again, a lot of what we did looked to be some form of reaction.  I would consider that we added fuel to fires, but didn't necessarily start it.
Explain it
No.  It's not "the *one* video that can change the world".  It's really a great, great message in it, but that is a 100% bullshit title because it's not like *this* video in particular is "the ONE" that can change "[*everything*](https://imgflip.com/readImage?iid=61533)*!!*  Please.  It's a *good* video.  It's one that can inspire us...and *should*, in fact, inspire us.  I think it's a very poignant message, and one that we should all really imbue and embody more.  But if you think "this" is the "one!" video that "can change WORLD!", then you're not aware of how much change the world really needs.
He's **STILL** begging!?!?!  100% that the images are not from the camera provided. *If* it was a lens issue, there was 0.000000% effort to retrieve the correct lens.  Photos printed on wrong paper. Photos manipulated before the pictures were taken.  Your **one** hope was those pictures. You no longer have them. And you're **STILL** blathering about the panel!!!!  Debunked by your own source. You have soooo little that you are forced to repeat yourself over and over, even after it has been proven...that you don't have proof!!!!  You missed a spot! "So while Horne was unable to confirm an innocent explanation for the mismatch, he was unable to exclude the obvious, sinister explanation: photo tampering. "   Saundra Kay Spencer, a photographic technician who developed and printed JFK autopsy images at the Naval Photographic Center (NPC) in November 1963, told the ARRB that she saw an image that revealed a hole one to two inches in diameter in the backside of JFK’s skull. She located the spot on a diagram of a human skull, marking a defect that is considerably larger than, and well below, the small spot interpreted by the HSCA as a wound of entrance.  Moreover, she said that the images she developed looked nothing like those in the current inventory, but instead showed JFK’s wounds all “cleaned up”: “…none of the heavy damage that shows in these [National Archives] photographs were visible in the photographs that we did.”[314] Moreover, the paper on which the current photographs are printed is not the paper that was used by her lab in 1963, a point on which she expressed confidence because she had kept in her personal possession, and produced for the ARRB, some of the distinctly different paper that was used at the NPC at the time she printed JFK’s autopsy images.[315]  The significant witness evidence that the ARRB had compiled undermining the HSCA's autopsy conclusions is not the only reason the Review Board found to mistrust the HSCA’s autopsy analysis. It also made the fascinating discovery that the Select Committee had not been entirely frank when it reported that it had authenticated JFK's autopsy photographs.  HSCA: “Because the Department of Defense was unable to locate the camera and lens that were used to take these [autopsy] photographs, the [photographic] panel was unable to engage in an analysis similar to the one undertaken with the Oswald backyard pictures that was designed to determine whether a particular camera in issue had been used to take the photographs that were the subject of inquiry.”  Looks like the HSCA thought the camera was important....but let's go further!  holds your hand  It turns out that in fact the DoD had found the camera. The DoD wrote the HSCA that the Naval Hospital only had one camera of this type in its possession and that, “the only [camera] in use at the National Naval Medical Center in 1963”[319] had already been sent to the HSCA for study. The HSCA, however, wasn’t pleased with the camera the Defense Department had sent. In a letter asking the Secretary of Defense to look for another one, HSCA chief counsel Robert Blakey explained the problem:  “[O]ur photographic experts have determined that this camera, or at least the particular lens and shutter attached to it, could not have been used to take [JFK’s] autopsy pictures.  *nom nom nom*    https://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=QO7lR64leSk#t=222   The more you beg, the funnier it gets! Hey....do that joke about the anthropologist panel again! It's a crowd favorite!!! It's also funny to watch you execute all your little cute formatting. As if it somehow validates your already debunked information. CUUUUTE  
A lot of Ukrainians understand the US led a coup in their country, installed a junta, and is using a bloody civil war to try escalate a world war of East vs. West.  
\&gt;He does it for free
[deleted]
I've actually met people who are lost in their own denial.
[Graham Hancock](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=62PvCXiFP-Q) touches a little bit on it.
Again no audio - you can see the small roof penthouse or utility building collapse first like the nist model which the video does not show and again the video claims explosives takes the audio off the footage
I stopped visiting that sub when I was a looney because there was no way there was fracking chemicals in my neighbors water.   Water that I have seen with my own eyes come out as a slime toxic sludge.  Fracking an untested method is 100% safe, to say other is crazy /s.   I wonder if people originally spoke out against lead paint and shit and how their thoughts were received.
yep. and murdered one of his friends. a really really shit moment for him. i read somewhere that part of his years were spent in africa, before he was elected, and he really got to know a lot of people well there. its one of my favorite/saddest pictures of him. he really wanted things to work, you know? people can try and shit on him after he got murdered, but the truth prevails. one thing that the Oswald-believers cant argue with, is why the fuck was Dulles put on the Warren commission? that alone shouldve sent alarm bells ringing with anyone with 1 ounce of current events knowledge. but i think that the people were shellshocked for a very long time (not all people of course: jim Garrison, mark lane etc) and by the time the public kind of realised, the case was all closed up. 
[deleted]
That.. Kinda scared me in a most uncomfortable fashion..   I did not enjoy that video. At all. The vibe was so off.  Especially the demon sheep part.   I don't get why this video was made by Cnn. 
 Admins do not enforce vote-manipulation unless there is a report from a victim or moderator of targeted sub.   &gt; Even the silly sausages over at /r/conspiratard manage to do that. Why can't we?   Your talking points are outdated.
Lets say worse case scenario WW3.  How fast could Russia expand west? comparable to the blitzkrieg? faster?
Besides the rings, jewelry, and pins? She has never hid her association with them from me and when I was little I would accompany her to the meetings where I would wait in a playroom with other kids. As I got older I was allowed to do my own thing.  When her meetings were done they would bring food and coffee into the meeting rooms and we were then allowed to go in and sit with them while they made small talk with each other.  The meetings were mostly held at the church, but many times they were held in other close cities and other churches and I did not accompany her to these meetings.   I honestly never thought of it anything other then harmless ladies doing harmless church stuff.  I am more interested in the roots of these societies then their current practices.   I believe most of these societies have been incredibly watered down and only a core group of practitioners actually follow the original ideals.  I believe my grandparents were just part of the watered down versions.  But I am still interested in what makes these societies tick and what it was that attracted my grandparents to joining.   Since my understanding their(these types of secret societies) religious beliefs while being christian are often quite different and have other things like kabalism mixed into them.
dved for off topic, no doubt e.e How do my fans ever sleep? &gt;.&gt;
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Do you really believe your friend will tell you everything? Ask the right questions and maybe you will find the right answers. Keep an open mind but the rituals they preform allow demons to tap into their bodies(obviously not a good thing). Look at the dollar bill(count the stars, count how many leaves the eagle is holding). It's like a piece to a puzzle. All i can say is keep finding more info, the evidence leads to much bigger and horrible lies. The truth nowadays is not so easy to bare. 
Synchronicity! 
there is a video of John Kerry openly admitting that building 7 was pulled. apparently he was somehow unaware that it was a secret.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rJsJjYwYOAA
Maybe he meant the people in the European theatre, known for liberating French towns and concentration camps, although I'm sure they saw their share of atrocity too.
Obama did nothing when he had a super majority in his first two years. That should have told us a lot. :-/
I don't believe you. Post the other side. Post a picture without some tweezers holding it - this looks like a stock photo from a museum used for advertising a new exhibit..
It's amazing what propaganda can convince you of.
Well... the gulags in USSR served as a re-educational units for some and labor camps for those who committed crimes. As some1, who's brain have been soaked in anti russian history histeria, would think(know) that the whole USSR was built on the shoulders of the criminals, which in my opinion to some point would be fair, but not true. The workers in gulags have been producing mostly army shoes and brushes for them. Makes a difference, because the the gulags were re-educational units, unlike the U.S. prisons and because the held, have been working for the state, and not for the private military corporations
I'm pretty sure it's a widely recognized fact that Tolkein wrote the hobbit and some lore for LoTR in the trenches of WWI.
Those follow it too. In Requiem, the characters all want better lives. Their call to action, however, leads them down a path of destruction rather than heroism or redemption.  They all enter unfamiliar territory in search of their goals, meet people that "help" them in their quest, and are eventually changed by their journey. Not in a positive way, obviously, but it still follows the pattern even though we're not really rooting for any of them.   The Road does as well. The man sets out to find a safe place for the boy. The boy is his only concern. The man just wanted to protect his son and find a safe place for him. So they set out in search of that goal, meet some people along the way (though none of them are very helpful to say the least ) and by the soul crushingly sad end, although it's relatively ambiguous, we're left to believe the man achieved his goal for the boy and they both were changed by their journey.   It doesn't have to be positive change. The whole thing can be a massive bummer from tip to tail, but it will still follow that pattern.   Edit: I guess my original list probably shouldn't have included the word "Conquer" as it sets up an idea that all stories involve a triumph of some sort. 
&gt; And no melted steel claimed.  No, eye-witnesses only claimed there were literally rivers of it at ground zero.  Must be a truther lie, stupid emergency workers don't know jack about metal.  Fucking retards, thinking they can save people from a *collapsed sky-scraper*; everyone knows that collapsing sky-scrapers leave no survivors and everything pulverized...
The videos do explain the penthouse structure collapse, it's the telltale bow of the structure only seen in controlled demolition.
this is a toll road for freedom
Hey man, fall back. Alex Jones hasn't been this sure of a total takeover the US government complete with FEMA camps and all out civil war since 2011. Remember he predicted it would happen in 2012? 3  years later and he's still predicting it's about to happen! He's that committed to your freedom.   So be a man, buy some testosterone boosters and iodine supplements and RESIST TYRANY!
I'm afraid she is going to be just fine.  Bush Clinton again.  Hopefully, I'm wrong.
You were notified about a job at the prison?  This whole using-prisoners-for-cheap-labor thing is new to me. I wonder why I've not ever heard of this after 22 years of living in the USA?
Or you can just get a no logging off shore VPN.
I think they followed you home
Yeah I'm sure they need such a massive police escort in tow to transport a carnival prop.
It has never been proven wrong.
&gt;He had been suspended with pay  Motherfuck this BULLSHIT!
Proof? Ask your government bud.
How is that you joined the military? Because you were so sure of the WMD in Iraq? Or you knew it was a lie that you supported? Either way, it shows which side you are on. See you chose to put your blind faith in your government. But that's not what good citizens in a democracy do.  I understand you might have made mistakes. But you're a bigger man to admit it. If not, you are nothing but a mindless slave.
I wonder why.
I'm done with you, nothing but hot air. You're spouting the same shit that has circulated and been responded to for years.  If you are truly a skeptic, write down a list of things you deem to be 'damning evidence' and look up the debunking of such a claim, *there will be one*. If you don't find it satisfactory, show *why* its bullshit.   Until then. **You are the fucking sheep.**
It's really just an age-old, cliche sell out story.
I think reddit is a pretty cool guy. Eh censors emotionally unacceptable truths and doesn’t afraid of anything
&gt;TopMindsOfReddit needs to be removed  On the contrary, /r/topmindsofreddit allows us to know how much what we say is bothering those people, and how absolutely obsessed they are with supporting the official narrative.  They are outing themselves for the propagandists they are, why not allow them?  &gt;along with Conspiratard as subs.  Why? Let the record stand of the activities of that hate group and the daily mockery they spew online.  &gt;Why are they allowed to exist at all? Their ONLY purpose is targeted harassment and vote brigading.  They don't use vote brigading, everything is posted with .np links, people can't delete that and use it as normal from other accounts.................................  &gt;There is literally no reason they exist other than to mock, belittle, and bully people who think differently.  Yes, so why not allow a permanent record of their thoughts to stand online as a testament against them?
As the questions are asked, I may decline to answer some of them or only partially answer some due to doxxing concerns.  &gt; Where are you from?  The United States. That's as specific as I'll get.  &gt; How do you make a living?  I work as a freelance consultant, mostly in science and technology. It's very hard to describe, actually, but it's a decent living.  &gt; Do you spend hours upon hours debating the GMO issue as a hobby?  The nature of the work that I do requires me to be sitting at my computer desk for long periods of time, either doing actual work or waiting for things to happen. I have reddit open on a second monitor and respond to comments on subjects that I'm interested in during my downtime. GMO technology happens to be one of those subjects.   Outside of the gold that I was gifted for one of my comments last night I have received exactly zero compensation for the comments I have posted. So I guess you'd classify it as a hobby?
[deleted]
I maybe shouldn't have said that but I'm pretty sure I came across the /r/ for one that said it was invite only. It might be in the side bar. 
"exact same policy" ≠ instigating a war in Iraq and occupying Afghanistan for almost 20 years for the sole purpose of securing oil rights.  George W. Bush, Dick Cheney, et. al. deserve to stand trial at the Haige for international war crimes for what they did the name of the United States.
NIST actually admitted that fire alone caused the collapse.  &gt;22. Would WTC 7 have collapsed even if there had been no structural damage induced by the collapse of WTC 1?  &gt;Yes. Even without the structural damage, WTC 7 would have collapsed from the fires that the debris initiated. The growth and spread of the lower-floor fires due to the loss of water supply to the sprinklers from the city mains was enough to initiate the collapse of the entire building due to buckling of a critical column in the northeast region of the building.  http://www.nist.gov/el/disasterstudies/wtc/faqs_wtc7.cfm
doublespeak.
https://voat.co/v/Conspiracy/new
Yeah, pretty sad. If they didn't know it would create more corruption, well....you know.  Imagine when Comcast greases the palms of 3 of the 5 members on the panel. Now that the "gubment" has tge control, it'll be as bloated and slow as everything else Big Brother touches. What was that saying Padme had when the Emperor was elected? Something along the lines of, "Liberty falling to the sound of thunderous applause."
I truly believe in this. I don't know the logistics of profit-sharing businesses but what I can tell you is that I want to live in a world where anyone working 8 hours a day in ANY job should have access to medical treatment, medication, clean water, a dwelling that isn't fungus ridden and in a basement and the ability to eat fresh and healthy from the grocery store. I feel like if you just graduated from art school the government should subsidize you in some way. If you're a glassblower, the government should subsidize you. etc. Let's remember that JK Rowling wrote Harry Potter while on welfare.   At the end of the day we're always going to have delivery drivers, McDonald's employees etc. Not everyone is going to be a lawyer, doctor or engineer etc.  I don't think just because you decided to work as a delivery boy you should be subjected to a shitty minimum wage existence. There's a lot of money to go around and there's enough to go around, it's just that my future colleagues will be too greedy to give any of it up because,  "MORE MORE MORE MORE MORE I NEED MOOOOOOOOOOORRRRRRREEE"  "MEEEEEE ITS ALL ABOUT ME. I DESERVE IT. LOOK HOW HARD I WORK, HES A PIECE OF SHIT BECAUSE HE WORKS AT DOMINOES. IM BETTER THAN HIM, HE DOESNT DESERVE TO EAT SEAFOOD A FEW TIMES A WEEK HE DOESNT DESERVE TO TAKE HIS FAMILY TO THE MOVIES OR TO DINNER BECAUSE HES A SHITTY DELIVERY BOY, VACATION? DIDNT WORK HARD ENOUGH FOR THAT YOU IDIOT"    ^ That I absolutely despise and will not tolerate.  
what evidence do you have of this?  All of modtalk has been leaked so I'm sure there is something right?
If you read the NIST findings they said it was a fire fueled by office furniture on one floor around one column. Also there are some reports that the sprinklers didn't work. Thus all you'd have to do to repeat this is shut off the sprinklers, and start an office fire on one floor with the available office furniture that would fit around 1 column. This is what NIST has claimed and this is what my observation is based on. 
Relevance?
It pays to have a 'discredit' card when playing the game of lying to and manipulating your electorate, it also helps to have useful idiots willing to seem intelligent by latching on to the programming of these bad actors and do the bulk of the work of your malfeasance for you.
to be fair, al jazeera's USS liberty docco was great
Watch the documentary ['Hitler's War: What The Historians Neglect to Mention'](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7mA0kk29DBA), based on the research of (retired) Major General [Gerd Schultze-Rhonhof](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HBLgZAv_Iqo).  Better articles than this one:  - [The 'Good War' Myth of World War Two](http://www.ihr.org/news/weber_ww2_may08.html)  - [The Origins of the Second World War](http://www.ihr.org/jhr/v07/v07p-95_Franz-Willing.html)  - [Hundred Years of War against Germany](http://www.vho.org/tr/2003/4/Werner373-385.html)  - [The Unknown History of the 1939 German-Polish Conflict: A Brief Synopsis](http://www.wintersonnenwende.com/scriptorium/english/archives/articles/wrsynopsis.html)  - [President Roosevelt's Campaign To Incite War in Europe: The Secret Polish Documents](http://www.ihr.org/jhr/v04/v04p135_Weber.html)
Dr. Stephanie Seneff doesn't need me to discredit herself. She's doing a sterling job of that herself.  By the way, your link backs my view, not yours. Did you forget to read it?  &gt; "A kid labeled autistic today could have been labeled mentally retarded 10 years ago in the same school system," Shattuck says. It wasn't until 1992 that schools began to include autism as a special education classification. 
All via based on "White Privilege" guilt-trip pushed in U.S. media.
That and almost every douche bag thinks his was the greatest president because he got a blow job. 
HC is a fucking joke to any real leftist.  Run this rightwing, pro-union busting cunt, and if voters elect her, Americans get what they deserve.  I say 'they' because I can only hope by then I'll be in a sane fucking country.
omg gunz r sssssscary
I think, as a modern person, you are far too disconnected from the effects that such stories had on the young boys of the past.  These myths, along with a disturbing amount of abuse were, and to some degree still are, very pivotal in the creation of willing warriors. Even religion, which promises rewards after life, is part of the myths we tell so that they will volunteer for military service.  Its dangerous to the war plans of a violent state for people to know the reality of life and death.
Yes.
They've already done this to people.
Corporate sedition, conspiracy against rights, racketeering.
The souls of your children
They know I never sleep.
While im writing this .i hear background music ,,'baby,baby,baby o,baby..'
Yes.
So a question I have is then, where can I get true news? None of this censored, or bias based crap. It's aggravating how clouded things are. Is there anywhere to get the real stuff? 
Just to be clear fuck Hilary doe
A connection has been established linking  #Wha? Wha?  to  #*wah-wah*  With an attachment "not to be confused, written or spoken".  Remember, the **Third Way** is the way you find after satisfying both you, and the other's way. The **Third Way** works best at country scales. 
How about he reinforce his stance and have us all boycott paying taxes. This is the only thing that will ever stop the system. Once enough people do it that they cant lock them all up it will go viral. Then we can rebuild. 
The way the media created an anti-semitic shitstorm out of it made it seem pretty obvious that Mossad had their hands all over it.
You probably should, if invalid insults are your idea of getting into a debate. This is the exact shit I would expect from this sub lol.  *tips le tinfoil hat*
[deleted]
[deleted]
Basically satanists: Quotable Quotes from the "Chosen People": https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1TFnowRN0fg
There are still similar systems in most places, but usually not as invasive as TSA.
I see many gullible people here.  Many people read headlines and accept them as truth, without fact checking.
^Hacked this profile to post this message [This story will not go far because Matt will take his on life in custody.]
Tell that to people stashed in the prison system.
Im nust glad simon from Ukraine finally admitted there us a lot of Nazism within the Ukrainian army.
For clarification if you're not going to the link, this is a meeting involving the "Group of 7"(G7) which include representation from Japan, France, Germany, Italy, the United Kingdom, Canada and the United States to discuss, "major global issues pertaining to the collective countries of this 'informal group' of leading industrial nations".  .. Something like that.
Dead Kurds.
Well they won't be getting those hard drives back
Essential hidden truth. Proved by "science". Denied and demonized.
I was about to ask the same thing.
Why would it be necessary to use dead humans as compost? There are other alternatives.
If they're deleting post because "it violates their rules",then where can you post? Every other sub is taking posts down all the the time
He said he was in a “possible drug-induced psychosis … secondary to amphetamines, cocaine, or other stimulant medications.” How is that 'interpreted in a fuckton of different ways'?  And you completely ignore the fact that the arrest report said it was on espionage grounds.  It's pretty hard to get extraordinary evidence if the question is whether a powerful government is covering stuff up. That just seems like a criterion you're putting in there to never question your government.
&gt; tower 7 didn't fall at an accelerated rate cause of some fires  That's correct; it fell about 5 seconds longer than what you can directly see.
Its American news, it doesn't belong in /r/worldnews  &gt;Disallowed submissions  &gt;    US internal news/US politics
Only if you have one of the old ones. The new ones are SSD. You need to up your pcmasterrace game.
&gt; Pretty sure deleting persinal things on a forum you own is ok.  hey bootlicker, what are you doing here?  Pao doesnt own reddit, BTW. Idjeet on top of rulefag. 
Hey what are we in line for?
I guess my point is, you could be running a virus free VM on a compromised host and it could appear that your system is clean from the VM perspective, but it's really "compromised from above", if you will. I am sure they can suck intelligent data off the hypervisor layer. 
Yeah, definitely a strong genetic component. Scientists have identified a dizzyingly large list of genes which have been linked to autism which is in contrast to most other neurological diseases which generally have been linked to one or small handful of genes. I do research on an gene called FoxP2 which has tenuously been linked to autism but more strongly linked to language learning.   &gt;I'm generally of the opinion that if a man / woman hasn't produced children by the age of 30, then it's time to close that particular door. It's not a popular opinion, but we have plenty of people, and waiting longer than 30 starts to bump up your odds of a genetically damaged child.  I'm going to have to disagree with you there (probably no big shock to you). Having children late past 30 changes your chances of having a kid with a genetic disorder from very very rare to simply very rare. The trade off is that most people who delay having a kid are better prepared to have that kid and can provide a more stable home. To me that seems worth the trade off. 
Rule 8. No memes. Removed.
I think the protection of the petrodollar system is one of the most overlooked motivations behind almost all US imperialist actions since the 70's. The entire War on Terror has been a farce that was designed to maintain US control over world oil supply, along with the standard of the US the dollar as the "world currency"   Iraq, Afghanistan, Libya, Syria, and next up in line Iran, have all been targeted by the US due to their desire to start trading oil in other currencies like the Euro or the Chinese Yuan. When these countries started losing faith in the declining US dollar, the US used brute force to take control of their oil resources and maintain foreign reliance on our currency.   The US will do anything in its power to keep this hegemonic system in place at the expense of the global economy, and remain solid in its footing as the lone superpower.  Countries that present no forceful threat to the US dare to make an independent choice regarding their most important export, and the overwhelming size and sophistication of the US military is always there to push them back in line...with no regard for the destruction or "collateral damage" it causes.  If the petrodollar were to collapse tomorrow, the results would be pretty devastating to our economy, since countries with reserves of US dollars they had used to trade would then instantly flood the American market and result in hyperinflation. It would have a ripple effect on our economy, interest rates would skyrocket, the money supply would expand then contract, and the US will be in the middle of an economic crisis. Basically...the house of cards that they built would quickly lose its foundations and crumble.  Due to the powerhunger and greed of the corporatist US foreign policy, they have shot themselves in the foot by placing so much of their economic future in the hands of this corrupt system[Here's an except from [a wonderful article on the petrodollar system](http://ftmdaily.com/preparing-for-the-collapse-of-the-petrodollar-system-part-3/), that lists what would likely happen if the petrodollar system were to fall apart:  ----  **So… What Would Happen If The Petrodollar System Ended Tomorrow**  Allow me to briefly explain the impact that a sudden loss of the petrodollar system would have upon the United States of America.  * Foreign nations would begin sending a flood of U.S. dollars back to the United States in exchange for the new currency needed for oil.  * The Federal Reserve would lose their ability to print more dollars to solve America’s economic problems.  * The Treasury Secretary and the Federal Reserve Chairman would meet to determine the best course of action.  * That action would involve an immediate and dramatic increase in interest rates to reduce America’s money supply.  * Hyperinflation would ensue temporarily while the interest rates took time to take full effect.  * All oil-related prices, including gas prices, would reach outrageous levels. Washington would soon realize that the total amount of money in the system would have to be dramatically slashed even further, leading to an even higher increase in interest rates.  * The clueless American public would demand answers. Those on the left would blame the right. The right would blame the left. And both political parties would seek to blame the Federal Reserve.  * People with adjustable rate debts would be crushed and massive layoffs would occur as businesses suffered from the high interest rates.  * Asset prices across the board would plummet in value.  * Amid the financial carnage, an economic recovery eventually would begin to take place. But this new American economy would be tremendously smaller due to a drastically reduced money supply.  -------  So its easy to see how much of an interest the US has in keeping this afloat, yet of course you rarely ever will hear even a mention of it in any mainstream news outlet. It is the cold hard truth of an American foreign policy born on lies and phony justifications, one that cuts through the bullshit to reveal where interests really lie: $$$.
2400 engineers vs "Those buildings? Not built well. Bad design. Shitty fire protection. If everybody hadn't gotten so emo, they would have had a lot more questions for the engineers "  Yeah I don't believe YOU.
https://pay.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2zt8dx/greenpeace_cofounder_why_i_am_a_climate_change/
Someone posted this before I had the chance to, I am not hiding my opinions and it is very clear that I was the user involved in this modmail.  Modmails between users and a mod team are public. This was not leaking and the only conspiracy here is /r/technology mods attempting to censor stories about reddit. 
&gt; How do you explain this like someone is 5 to get them to understand?!   "Grandma, a lot of people will do almost *anything* for money, and the more of it one has, the more it doesn't really matter *what* rules exist.  They can get almost anyone to do almost anything.  We humans are basically dumb, useless, easily-manipulated whores, grandma."  But yeah.  You're right.  Lots of times, people will likely not listen.  Like, take my father, for example.  He is an *extreeeemly* amazing man.  He's actually about one of the most amazing human beings I personally know - and I mean that independent of the fact that I know him as my father.  The dude's really on another level, I feel.  However, he's been a suuuuper devout Catholic practically from birth (*his* birth...i.e. long before I came along).  Almost became a priest, as a matter of fact.  He doesn't necessarily proselytize, but, when we talk on the phone, he usually talks about "Jesus" and how "he's the *only* way".  I facepalmed, or smh when he says things like this and calmly explained to him that "Sure, Pa.  Jesus is cool.  No problem.  But what is even greater and more important is the fact that there is a *cosmic energy* that is even greater still, and if one hones in and are guided by *that* - independent of any 'Jesus' talk whatsoever - they'll be quite alright too."  He's a cool and intelligent enough human being that he'll listen to it, and even agree with the general principle.  "Yeah, son.  You're right."  And then the next week when we talk, he forgets all about the conversation we previously had and always ends our talks w/"And son, remember.  Jesus is the light and the love and is the *only* way toward truth and salvation.  Always pray to him."  And I cringe and facepalm once again, saying "Okay, Pa.  I love you.  Until next time." and hang up.  The point?  Some mu'fuckers just won't change certain perspectives in this lifetime.  It would be too much for them - especially if they're old mu'fuckers.
The video does not show them placing bombs. Your additional ad hom bullshit doesn't change that.
This isn't right. The spin of an entangled particle is undefined until measured, at which point it is known and so is the state of the entangled particle. Spooky because this happens instantaneously regardless of the distance between the particles. 
Both are power hungry and learn to hide their ways of manipulating others to get what they want.  The only real change here is that they improve their skills of deception.
&gt; Pay attention to the way they are walking in the beginning.   Not seeing it. 
When I first clicked on that link, I didn't get very far because I didn't get into his groove, but I came back to him/them and ended up in tears while listening to [this album](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ekI3WnkAv7k&amp;feature=youtu.be).
Disgusting comments, pretty much an anti Islamic rally In there
I have not smoked crack and I have never snorted coke. I have no intention to do either in the future. So no I do not have any first hand experience with crack or coke.   That being said I have read a lot about addiction, from people much smarter than you or I, and the data doesn't back your claim.   Check out Dr Carl Hart; he has a lot to say on drugs and addiction. If you don't want to read check out this vid clip:  [The Myths of Crack Cocaine](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kjwBePXTP4c) (approx 2:00 they really get into it)
For real he should of never given up the only copy of the files, enough movies have shown us you should always have a back up for the back up of the back up.
Probably because the mods of that sub are horrible. 
small fire, a rolling fire that burnt then extinguished across the office floors, not one continuous raging inferno that burnt for hours.
&gt;  It's all just the word of some kid who got locked up for kiddie porn.  Uh, you seem to be forgetting something!  It's also the word of his mom.  So I don't know about you, but I'm convinced.  Mommy would NEVER lie simply to get her kid out of prison.
You're saying that, not me.
I know, I remember that.  I make sure to mention any time I can.  I only remember absolutely *nothing* about it being resolved.  Good times....
What proof is there that these kids weren't deliberately placed in harms way by Hamas?  That's exactly the kind of bullshit they'd do.
Satellites in low earth orbit DO NOT pass through the Van Allen's as the so-called moonwalkers did.  Next.
Conspiracy Theorist have never had a good name, they wanted you to stay away from this.  No Fear. Just Love. 
Yeah.  There's a reason why they launched it "quietly".
Belarus, Kazakhstan and Russia.   such a powerful regional currency. 
Beck isn't even worth mentioning 
Better be careful calling anyone racists. I was warned by a mod today of my term using such and violating rule #10 and  my posts were deleted and threatened with a ban.
Then buy it right now. And PM me in a week.   Because things be *happening* man, and you're either on the sidelines or your in on it.  Get in on it. Because I need *you*.
We should make it a point to leave shit comments in /r/worldnews like for every submission whine about how it should be in some other sub reddit. 
[deleted]
Citation needed.
You have been reported for sexual misconduct sir, please keep it love and light.  This is not how humans treat each other.  Humans must learn to show compassion and empathy.  I am sorry your heart was beat up as a child and now you take that anger out on everyone else.  Forgive those who hurt you and let go my love, you can be free to.
Was that a queef? Or some sort of response?
Wow . . .  you really cant tell the difference between a drawing and an action.  Through this whole thing I was sceptical but I finally see It. You literally cannot see how liking a drawing of something is different then wanting the real thing.  That is just sad.
[deleted]
This.
[I'll just leave this here.](http://youmadnow.com/hillary-jeb-2016/)
That proves nothing about this case. 
Define "natural" and explain why it's important in this context.  If you're urging the use of caution with these substances then I agree, but to me it sounds like you don't quite know what you're saying.  &gt;You want to be happier or whatever. Do as op says and just let go man. Fuck society let your moral compass guide you in life.  If it was that easy we'd all be happy. Some people need something like pyschedelics to help them break through.  &gt;People that say they did drugs for anything other then to get fucked up are bull shitters that are trying to gain influence plain and simple  For someone who preaches letting go you sure are a judgemental asshole. You should try taking your own advice.
The same planet where Ted Gunderson and John DeCamp collected interviews with scores of witnesses; many who'd never met one another. The same planet where Gunderson and DeCamp excavated tunnels underneath the Boys Town facility, proving allegations of their existence made by witnesses. The same planet where Gunderson and DeCamp unraveled financial irregularities that ultimately led to prosecution and conviction of Larry King for mortgage fraud.   They collected significant corroborating evidence before making serious allegations in public.   You guys want to play private detective? Act like one. So far it's been amateur hour at the dunking booth. 
If users could create their own titles, it would be more about a submitters opinion then the actual article linked. No?
Sen: Rahm’s reelection is essential to maintaining the value of Chicago’s debt market  Re-elect Rahm or Else?  -Vote Fix is in?  03/22/15  -Emanuel has 16-point lead  -Chicago Tribune, Sun-Times endorse Emanuel
&gt; And for some reason I want to watch Prometheus again...  It looked cool but I thought it kind of sucked in general.  Way too many loose ends and plot holes, along with totally conflicting and inconsistent character motivations.  Probably had a lot to do with the fact that the script was almost completely re-written in pre-production.
Nice to see from the votes, how much she's hated. Maybe her fifteen minutes is over.
I don't know shit about it. You're not going to get anyone who actually **knows** to explain it to you. Because... that would be self-incriminating.  You're not asking an honest question. You are attempting to avoid thinking by having a simple scenario explained to you like you're 5 - there in your title it is, even. There's a difference between an honest question and bullshit fishing. Honest questions are based upon a foundation of consideration and even imagination... time spent, effort spent.  That you can't come up with the very simplistic scenario in which this works out means you haven't done that.
Aaaaannnnddd I'll be asking for something that backs up that claim.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Rule 6. No caps lock. Removed.
Darwinism? Poetic justice?
I'm an atheist for all intents and purposes.  I'm also a philosophical Taoist, an ex-Muslim, I'm beginning to study magick and hermetic principles, and I bought a Tarot deck.  Just because someone is an atheist doesn't say anything about their interests and beliefs other than the fact that they DON'T believe in God. 
This is the stupidest shit I've ever read.   Being an atheist means all existential questions and mysteries are "tossed a side"?   Stop embarrassing yourself. 
Not true. My dogs could still have sex. It's not like they sew up the vag or cut the penis off.
Poor moderators don't always make logical sense when it comes to their decisions in which it can be very possible that they are. I am not a moderator so I don't know what their basis for removing something is. If you are a moderator, how can you let something get that much attention before removing it? There are multiple moderators b the way, it is not that difficult. Hell you don't even have to check every post, you just have to check the ones that are getting the slightest bit of traction because other people know the rules and will down vote accordingly. If something gets 3000 up votes and also gets gilded, I think the people of the sub want that there regardless of the rules, but that is a different issue entirely so I digress. Bottom line, I don't know what the moderators are doing letting something get so highly rated before removing it, maybe they were all on a break at the same time, maybe none of them were at a computer all at the same time, who knows.  There is no arguing that the post broke the rules, that is undeniable. But, the circumstances of the removal of said post raise important questions. How did this post get such a high rating before being remove and how was it able to happen? What were the mods doing while it was climbing the page of the sub? Should they be able to remove a post for breaking the rules when it is content that everyone is clearly interested in? I mean sure, you can always re post it according to the rules, but it can be said that the traction for that post is gone at that point. People have seen it and are no longer interested in regurgitated content. That is how the internet works. The average person sees something, and then they move on.   I feel like I am getting a bit off the main point of this so ill end with this. Yes, the post broke the rules, but said removal took far to long by moderation standards. The mods are at fault regardless of them having authority. The post should have been removed much earlier. It is their job for crying out loud.  
Lol my point on DMT was a bit sarcasm its aimed at giving them a spiritual lesson no amount of baby killing will let them forget. Id say a gram to the face in a gas mask for each one should do it. Shrooms and acid leave you a little play DMT straight jackets you before the ride.
Ex-fucking-actly. So well put, thank you. 
with all the bull thats posted and it being one sentence , Im going to call you a drama queen for using terminology such as "took the time to post an entire OP over..." Is drama your middle name? Just so you know thinking something happened is the same as considering it but knowing it did is knowing. Sooooo who the fk said its what happened our are we talking about thoughts here? like i said thinking/pondering isnt knowing. There is no need for thought police im sorry and i will accuse you of acting like thought police for stating anyone that thinks/considers that America used ufos against Russia on the 17th is near sighted. Weither its right or not concievable or absurd the way in which you attacked it was very ignorant not stupid simply because i dont find you unlearned just choosing to ignore reality hence ignorant. Yes Yes i know the way i phrased certain things allows for you to pick apart and construe certain things i am saying, BUT i did that on purpose, choose to follow the train of thought you are reading or choose to insert your own, reality or dillusion, your choice...your only one ^_^
Well I think if I even considered it an option I would first see what kind of robots they are. If they wanted to kill us they would. If they want us as pets, okay. Death or pet. Choose one. 
[deleted]
A first past the post electoral system is by it's nature a two party system. There is no such thing as a third, fourth or fifth party. There can only be two parties that have the largest base, the rest are simply spoilers. It is the nature of said system. Again, this is a function of the system, it is how it operates. It is similar to playing a game of basketball and saying "Why not kick the ball into the hoop? There's nothing physically stopping it from happening." Yes, theoretically people can do that, but it would require changing the rules that govern the system.  This may do a better job of explaining than I: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s7tWHJfhiyo
Some very disturbing (but on the other hand, welcome) chatter out there that elements of the US military have had enough of the lies. They want their country back.  If I were in the CIA, or one of those responsible for 9/11, I would be very afraid right now.
Nope.
I don't think most people are 'proud' of the troops.   Actually the troop question can be very complicated. It's much too complicated to use in this scenario unfortunately.  There's tons of people who "support the troops" but don't "support the agenda".  You can find absolutely tons of people who find it perfectly acceptable to say things like "I dont support the war in Iraq, but I do support the troops"  A lot of them don't really understand the forest for the trees, and I can't really blame them for it.   So pride in troops is much too complex.  It most especially doesn't relate to something like "Pride in rape and murder".  That's just ignorant and absolutely kneejerk clickbait writing.
They get off Scott Free after shooting people, and we are to believe they will face a penalty for this...   I'm not going to hold my breath.
Lol, why are you so patriotic?  Did you fight in World war 2, if not, how can you brag about saving Britain?  Lets not forget that one of the largest causes of world war 2 was the American great depression. Your country caused the depression, which allowed Hitler to take power in Germany. It was the Americans who wanted the league of nations, then they fucked off and left it to crumble, leaving Britain, France and Italy in charge of running it.   
Here is [snopes](http://www.snopes.com/politics/clintons/bodycount.asp) going through that list one by one and debunking most of them. 
I don't think Tea Party ever was independent, just good marketing to that effect, but I agree with your larger point.    You make a good point with the Sanders/Cruz/Paul tactic. Their supporters (if not the figureheads) likely have more in common than they realize, namely targeting the corruption of the system itself. Sadly, right-winger/libertarians would never go for a self-avowed socialist and the lefties would never go for the batshit parts of the Cruz/Paul supporters, so instead of joining together where they align, they slink back to the voiceless fringe of their respective party. "This election is too important to go third party" has been the refrain for the last 20 years at least, so a center-authoritarian always wins.
Oh, totally.  I had the same thought and sat on it a bit longer and figured actors would be a pretty close analogy to it, what with the prevalence of nepotism and the connections the parents have established over their careers.  Though, I'm sure damn near everyone has a higher chance of following their parents footsteps...
I wish it were more about the mindset, we never have people working for us in government that knows what it's like to live on minimum wage. 
Oh is your time valuable? Did I take you away from something?  It wasn't my intention to question your logic and bother you. Perhaps next time you should finish what you are doing then answer me or anyone else that finds your claims completely biased.   Just because a few persons in history you believe were on drugs but haven't witnessed yourself means nothing. You won't convince me otherwise and furthermore its childish to attempt to try and do so with others.  Do you remember the thread topic? Where did I once say you shouldn't do them? I said you should be informed of the potential hazards. Why do you want to give anyone false pretense that they will be a better person for doing drugs?
Yeah, but it's so rich and thick and choc o lit that you can't drink it slow 
WHAT MAKES THE GRASS GROW GREEN   BLOOD BLOOD BLOOD MAKES GRASS GROW GREEN
Socialism does not equal communism.  Read up on -isms before going off on subjects you dont understand.
[deleted]
That's why we have to go outside. 
How do we teach kids they have rights when it comes to stuff like this i understand the dont talk to cops talk but dont talk to teachers geezz
&gt; demonstrations which are simple to understand   I'm with you. Something like this?   Fact: Skyscrapers that catch fire always stay up. Fact: Skyscrapers that are loaded with explosives tend to be  destroyed quickly. Fact: All skyscrapers that are destroyed quickly have been loaded with explosives. Fact: The only known cause of a skyscraper being quickly destroyed is explosives, regardless of design, fire or structural damage.  Fact: The twin towers and WTC7 were skyscrapers that were destroyed quickly. Therefore, they must be assumed to have been destroyed by explosives unless explosives are explicitly ruled out by investigation, or another mechanism of destruction is identified and proven.  Fact: NIST did not rule out the use of explosives. Fact: NIST did not prove that their alternative collapse scenarios actually took place in reality. Therefore, explosives remains the most plausible cause of the destruction of all three buildings.  It's a little rough, but something like that? Somebody can approach and examine each claim. If each is true, the conclusion is valid. Any thoughts? 
Thank you, but seriously look over what this guy has said one more time. Repeated accusations of being a paedophile sympathizer. Truly sickening and it just goes to prove my point about *some* hopelessly confused individuals or groups within this movement who innocently think they are doing good while in reality they are doing a great deal of harm.
I'm talking about the video clip where he specifically denies killing the president and at the end mentions he's patsy. No steno girl required. I'm not denying there is some sort of conspiracy, but i do believe Oswald was the trigger man. On a wild conspiracy side of things, I like Bill Coopers "The Sacrificed King" lecture. 
Where is the rest of the story?
I've read the report.   Scarring does indicate possible sexual abuse. Though the report states it may well have come from other issues as well, for example constipation. Regardless, lets assume it's evidence of sexual abuse.   Who is the abuser?  The children both state on the 17th Sep video that their father didn't sexually abused them. Further, they state that no one else sexually abused them. This contradicts prior statements where they said that the father and others in the school and church had abused them with "plastic willies".   Which is the truth?   That report is indication of possible sexual abuse. I agree. And I think it should be followed up with due diligence. But that doesn't mean it supports the childrens' greater claims of a Satanic Cult and pedophile ring. It's just not enough on its own. 
You can't "[throw things out to cut people off]" in a discussion.  What the fuck are you talking about?  You're also calling me "you people", which is plain bullshit.  You're engaged in some god awful sophistry and are obviously using the tactics of disinformation clods.  Seems like you're doing the same thing in another thread in r/conspiracy right now.  &gt;You're making assertions. You aren't offering any arguments or counter arguments. You aren't lending any credibility to your positions, just throwing them out there. You don't explain your position, you just state that one exists and that everything else is wrong. Then you attack my correct use of terms. What are you playing at?  Made up bullshit.  Use correct terms relevant to the discussion or don't pretend like you're not purposefully trying to subvert any conversation.  &gt;moral weakling ... intellectual imp  All right, whatever.  Might want to look up the word "imp".  You see this account, people?  u/comicland.
Stiffeners and flanges, eh?  Someone's taking the piss in USGov's propaganda department.
No actual Jew with exception to a few obscure orthodox sects would ever call Zionism disgusting. It is literally a central theme of our religion. You can literally set yourself on fire and fuck yourself up the ass with a razer blade. 
Is it possible to remove the downvote option for new posts? If we were to do so, the problem would be that some trollish or poor posts would not get downvoted. Fine, they stay at 1 point continue to remain unseen. Essentially there is no visible difference. Or, if a bad post does somehow get a few upvotes when it really shouldn't, mods can do their job and remove it. Not a very big problem if you ask me.  However, what is the potential problem with leaving the downvote option? It gives trolls, paid shills, government web warriors, and  status-quo defending hobbyists the very easy ability to control our debate. A handful of derailers now has the ability to easily assume direct control over what we all see simply by downvoting anything they don't like in new a few times.   What is the greater danger?
&gt;Why does it matter when this article was written?  I read the article when it was written.   That you come in here on your high horse, trailing your banner that proclaims all in this sub are woefully  ignorant, insane even! Thank you for informing us that we're all illiterate, mouth breathers and our contributions to this sub require your brilliance, substance to correct us!  I myself, didn't call you a pederast and if you were even more informed about said subject you would understand why victims and family victims prefer that term over pedophile.   I'm not here because I know it all! Sure as hell, I'm not here to tell you what to think, what to read, what to believe! I'll be damned if I sit here and let you spout off about my truth, my intellect! Or throw this sub, as whole under the bus!  If you don't like a post, skip over it! If a post offends you, report it! If you want to support a post, vote in it and participate with your thoughts, opinions, helpful links!  If you've never personally known anyone that has endured this fucking nightmare perhaps you should be asking questions, researching, and withholding judgement about those that you think are not credible cases. That's how I lost my baby nieces and my sister.
It honestly doesn't matter what you think, man. 
i am very acquainted with both, neither of which i mentioned by name.
What a wonderful example of a strawman or "barrage of strawmen".  Thank you for your demonstration.
They own about half the brands I normally get boycotting them is not really really a option
This isn't a conspiracy, it's just standard american politician bullshit.
Yeah. We should leave it unmentioned when dishonest people are dishonest. What a motto that would be for this sub.
I like pizza 
smh.  Fucked up world, man.  Fucked up world.
I read that in ownage pranks voice!  BTW this just occurred to me. Is the rabbit hole reference from Alice in wonderland? Does she at some point have to venture down the rabbit hole and its some unending maze!!!?  
Damn. My Jedi Mind trick didn't work on you.   Soon....  But really, I agree. It's so disheartening to see threads of immature name calling and arrogance. No one concedes or even seems to care about the possibly of being wrong -- and the anonymity makes them assholes. 
yeah, that's what brought me to my knees feeling completely helpless. You can't have that kind of evil without the good.  I begged for the truth, and the truth is stranger than fiction, and so much bigger than people think. 
Pretty sure that this is far more intense for those in War Zones, but they do it, fuck all if I know how they do it /r/no1113!   They might have nothing to *unplug* but they seek, they gather, they discuss...  Friend, sometimes they find solitude in the shreds that they have left and they come out the other side because someone offered to walk with them, even electronically!  Dream, reddit! Dream well!  Edit: had to add a #1...
Ok. Yes sir. 
people can work together perfectly well in peaceful agreement when they place their own desires first and voluntarily trade with each other for something they want, its called capitalism. 
or even worse, bumper stickers with George W with the caption "miss me yet?". Americans have no memory over 7 years.
RIP
It probably partially mirrors life expectancy, but with some gains in understanding/treating mental health mixed in.
Believe it or not, the majority of people using TOR will not be using it for darknet (think journalists, etc.).  Also, TOR routes in a predictable way. It prefers faster relays to slower ones.   Even without manipulating the flow of data, there are various timing attacks that can be done, assuming you control enough nodes (and this is ignoring the fact that the-powers-that-be can control the clearnet backbone to an extent).
[deleted]
well how about i say that fucking children is "part of the catholic mindest'? just because catholic priests have been known to molest children. thats a fair judgement isnt it? 
See what happen?
&gt; Is it possible to remove the downvote option for new posts?   Nope.   There are ways to get around subreddits that disable the downvote. 
Fast and Furious Travesty:  http://winteractionables.com/?p=11330
You think Rand Paul is incorruptible?
The American way.
Because Sheldon Adelson owns the Republican party?
That's not really a conspiracy, that's politics.
I'll keep this in mind bot
Considering most aren't actually architects or engineers and some are even openly pushing their books or other scams, and the fact that WAY more than 2300 architects and engineers have confirmed the "official" story...I'd say the answer to the post's title is a resounding "YES!"
This right here is a key statement. 
Eye witness accounts are notoriously inaccurate so I'm just going to pick whichever one confirms the narrative I want to be true... ;)
[deleted]
For a thread in this sub, why all the left/right bullshit? They're two sides of one coin in the palm of the master. Don't fall for it. 
Go back to believing your mainstream media and unverifiable "official stories".
FTA:  *If someone wants to earn money, there are three main ways they can go about it: they can sell something, they can sell a service, or they can sell their labor. The first two options are regulated; the third option is not.*  This is only true if you live in a right to work state.
[deleted]
He lost on a technicality that the courts were not in a position to actually evaluate his arguments.  What is the official story that explains why the bbc could report that WTC7 fell 20 minutes before it actually fell?
Ted Cruz doesn't stand a chance. He has a weak chin and is not good looking. Sounds pretty basic but he just doesn't have the charisma to win. Let them throw their money at the problem, at least they are putting it back into circulation.
I've heard Australia is also in it this year 
Wow this is the best part of the whole story 9/11 story.  Validation.  We can finally stop saying. "the terrorists did it" and we can start saying "the corporation did it."  I think its only fair. Terrorists are getting such a bad rap today. We should start calling them freedom fighters.
He's still running from Boswell!! Too bad for that testimony you pretended didn't exist! Too bad for that ruler!
Oh, you can fuck right off. It's Israel's double standard, I have nothing to do with their state.
Because they have the guns, and if you don't pay them they will come to your house and attempt to kidnap you, lock you in a cage, and make you pay anyway.  If you resist, you will be murdered.  Pretty simple, really...
My family came from Sicily to Chicago in the 1920's.  If any one would know if that organization existed, it would be them.  There is no such thing as the "mafia".  Uncle Vito said so.
NIST never tested for explosives?..and highly engineered enhanced thermite components were found at up to 6 percent in the trade center dust?..with no explaination from anybody? in official documents?
Trillions of dollars missing, missing weapons, accidentally giving weapons to terrorists, the NSA having no security. This is a huge mess!
something something social contract. Good and bad, government isn't perfect...harumph.
Jet fuel doesn't melt steel beams. Which you'd know if you possessed a brain or a high school physics education.   Of course, I don't expect anything less from a gullible faither.
It's imperative for the Tampa Police to know that Jewish suffering is unique and more important than anyone else's.  When the police go after the citizens of Tampa you'll know who's behind it.  It's all about vengeance.
Judging by how the neocons in general react to torture, he probably considers the torture pictures to be equivalent to your average PornHub video. But for psychotic neocons.
This was really good. I had no idea that SS cards were never meant to be ID. It really illustrates the slow progression into what many feel is tyranny.  It's amazing that things that were considered conspiracies not even 50 years ago are so easily accepted today. This is also why there is never likely to be a defining moment where one day we are free and the next we are under a fascist dictator. It's going to happen slowly enough that the average person does not notice (or care).
Because the cold war definitely taught us that if you have two military superpowers in the nuclear age, they just throw planes at each other.  We cannot have a war with China. A war with China is complete nuclear apocalypse. Not on day one, but when either side starts losing the game of human lives on battlefields, the nukes come out, and nobody wins.  That is probably the greatest lie of the military industrial complex - that we need it at all. We just had half a century of conflict proving the opposite.
Student debt topped $1.2 Trillion last year in the US where we spend more on defense already [than the next 14 countries combined](http://www.usnews.com/dims4/USNEWS/728dedb/2147483647/resize/652x%3E/quality/85/?url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.usnews.com%2Fdbimages%2Fmaster%2F23484%2FHP_110930_Ike_Poster.jpg)
Yes it is.
Some (not all, but a lot, in fact) are.  Most definitely.
Again like many others this article doesn't say *why* this happened.  They were *asked* to take them by a fellow engineer who thought his papers might hold some worth. They wouldn't have known / bothered otherwise.  With the way governments handle things, it's very likely his papers were thrown out or shredded to make space for something else a couple of years later.
Dude needs to Lawyer up and sue the PD, the officer, and the state!
Stephen Cohen had been saying that from the very start Good read tough
Oh the old big blithering idiot government excuse, you are there slave so scoff all you want it is your master and they do sick very good things from very great people and the masses just sit there and take it.
no info on opus dei at all. just randomly calls it a cult with no information to back it up. waste of time!
[deleted]
After millionaire John Jacob Astor, Tesla's close friend and financier, died on the Titanic in 1912, Tesla is left with no patrons who are bold enough to stand up to the JP Morgan blackball.  George Westinghouse dies in 1914.  I know it's women and children first, but what about millionaires?!
The only thing that will finally cause a mass meltdown is when cops kill **multiple** white males in a single incident. It's the ONLY thing that will cause this shit to stop.
You definitely shouldn't read rule 2 then. 
Rule number 10 prevents me from stating why I broke rule number 2.
This guy should go pro at irrelevant rambling. 
It's kind of pathetic that the same people who bitch about folks "stealing from them" (i.e. getting government assistance) will applaud the owners of Wal Mart for their "job creation (rofl)"...isn't it?
Plastic and sugar that is all they sell.
Makes sense.
That's a ton of unfounded accusations considering you don't even know what I do, how I do it, or to what degree I'm paid, or why I went into it. For someone who seems to have it all worked out you're not a fan of the objective perspective. Further, if I only cared about profit I wouldn't waste time explaining anything online. Like I said I have no horse in this race I just understand the process and the data through my training.   The guidelines in question go completely against this tirade you're on (they recommend against HFCS, fast food, etc. which flies in the face of your theory there) to the extent that its like you haven't read anything posted or linked. Also regarding healthy life choices - again its like you read nothing. You're massively simplifying a complex issue and you're underselling the degree to which people knowingly routinely make poor life choices. Again I'm not a Family Doc but I sure as hell wouldn't want to be because its nearly impossible to help people change these things. 
No i don't. In my experiences and taking the overall message of said book the idea of achieving that goal at all costs does not jive with the teachings of Judaism.   Especially considering that action was taken more to free the people from slavery than go anywhere in particular. If they wanted to leave, what took so long? Why wait for a new pharaoh? No they left because stuff started to suck. 
For fuck sake how do people not realize this?
Awww, shit. Read an [article](http://www.infowars.com/more-states-added-to-jade-helm-military-exercise/) that says that the Brazos County area will be targeted for a "surgical strike." My money's on Texas A&amp;M University, and if it is a drill-gone-live, there's really no better place to strike than the top military college in the state (and, some would argue, in the nation). This scares the shit out of me; not only did I grow up there, I'm a student there. Last thing I want is a bunch of special forces operatives starting a war in my backyard in the dead of night. Luckily I'll be at home when the drill starts, so I'll at least have the joy of being potentially subjugated with my family. 
There isn't any extreme weather. There have been slight cyclical changes in the weather patterns, and they are well within normal historical ranges. Nothing we've seen has been out of the ordinary.  People get the idea that because a storm is worse than any they have seen in their own lifetime, that means something. It doesn't. The span of  an average human life -- say, 70 years -- is the blink of an eye in terms of the global climate and its natural, cyclical variations.
The CIA is so careless with its cash and weapons.
Australia is the wild card essentially, that's how it was explained, so not sure if it's something they're going to be doing going forward, if it is something they've always done.  Source: Australian news (vagaries) 
Hopefully things will get better once we have more p2p technology.    I'm currently looking into creating a  reddit-like p2p platform using something along the lines of https://syncthing.net/   My hope is to create a truly decentralized, modless community.  Something more usenet/bbs; less facebook.    
They have a project called Rainbow Gravity.  The rainbow is representative of God's throne (rev 4:3) and they're going to attempt to bring it down, much like the tower of babble days.  Additionally, I suspect the plane crash today was a direct result of cern's "short circuit," or vice versa. 
Fukushima radiation reaching the west coast? 
I don't doubt that you are intelligent and I mean no disrespect, but your text always reads like it was written by a pompous asshole.  Have you thought about the way you come across?  I'm only saying this cause I usually agree with you, but feel that your points would get across better if you were a little more human.
The "Ether" is not real. "Energy from atoms" like, nuclear energy? Because we do that. 
I honestly think the answer to why there is no further investigation is that it is so very clear what happened that it would be absurd to spend time and money on it. In a calm objectivity, without the baggage of hate for the man and distrust of the system, the ideas truthers pitch seem ignorant and insensitive.
I thought we were talking ET at first.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Office_of_Alien_Property_Custodian
Saw it on before it's news.com
0-point energy? It's real.
When our solar tech will be efficient enough, prepare to be taxed for sunny days.
They will never stop terrorizing us until we are dead. 
Oh come on it isn't like CERN is going to send assassins after you. I just want to know how you think a bunch of magnets and some protons could take down an aircraft.
Its sockpuppet douchebags using antisemitism to discedit / poison the "conspiracy" community. TPTB created the internet, and it has been their most powerful  Tool of thought control, even surpassing the television.
Living Energies is such an inspiring reading, I encourage everyone to read it. Thanks for mentioning it.
You know I haven't but everyone says he's pretty damn good. 
he stole it:   http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2nhv01/how_reddit_was_destroyed_ver20/
This is so American!
In my opinion he is and all of this "east vs. west" propaganda is little more than theater.  Russia is still a BIS, UN, and IMF member.  I think the point is to bring about the third of the Hegelian world wars, force us all to "pick a side" (notice how there are two and only two sides), and ultimately usher in a one world government.
probably you will be arested for atempting to cause an economic crisiss
Regardless of Mr.Dukes past and his wack hair style (wig?) he makes a totally valid point comparing the protocols to brave new world and 1984. Hell if you combine the three you easily have the blueprint to the dystopian nightmare that has become our reality.   
Not to mention that the guy went into hiding after making that documentary because he received genuine death threats and only resurfaced several years later under a different alias.   I'm putting my money on the fact that he made a deal with certain elements to come out of hiding, in exchange he would modulate his views and be a bit less vocal about them. "This isn't just about you, David, it's about the fate of our people."   So he's a Zionist now who believes millions were gassed in Treblinka (but not Auschwitz). 
That's hilarious, do they think we take them seriously?
Greenpeace was originally established to use ecological principles based around science to make its decisions. After some years of operation political activists of various types flooded into it, with a more... "loony left / hippy" view. I'm not 100% happy with that phrasing, but I think you can see what I mean.  At that point the science went out of the window. Do you know what the falling out with the forestry part was?  Greenpeace wanted all forestry shut down (how realistic does anyone think that option is?), and Patrick Moore thought that as long as they replanted trees (sustainable forestry) then this was acceptable. This did not fly with the new vocal membership.  tldr - Greenpeace were decent until the 1980s, but now they're a bunch of wankers who are more about feelings than any actual ecological philosophy. Basically this continued in this vein with their relationship souring considerably over time.
He's argued the same thing this whole time. 
Can you link that for me?
[deleted]
[deleted]
Not "destroyed" so much as took a tiny bit of power away from users, but all of these ways in which the power of users on reddit is diminished add up. 
You should stop talking because every comment further proves you don't get it.  I am the author of this list and I came up with the original version almost a year ago. 90% of it was pulled directly from own thoughts and conclusions. I have updated it since then, intentionally, with the help of this subreddit.
Yeha but I also feel like all corporate advertising should be relegated to /r/dogshitreddit. Otherwise, there's no differentiation between content and ads. 
They must have some amazing next level technology to get their jets in the air that fast. On 9/11 4 hijacked planes stopped responding for over an hour and the airforce didn't so much as scramble an egg. 
Cool idea, speculate?
The first thing they did was create sub-reddits... reddit without censorship or subreddits is a really neat tool.  The thing is... there is an uncensored version of reddit... but it is not for you.  They can do math to see how fast an article accelerates before they remove it, or +4k it.  And, they keep it for themselves.  Don't vote.
Page number on that Mein Kampf reference?
Ok well there is photo and video evidence of mass graves. This shitty Cole video shows the gas chambers. Just because Coe has an incorrect theory, doesn't change what they actually are. On your third point, of course there is no document stating "we need to kill all the jews." The Nazi's were smarter than that. You don't leave a paper trail on this sort of thing.
This post doesn't make sense.  How can you compare a specific cocktail of highly toxic and radioactive nano-technolgy compounds being sprayed across the world to the exhaust of a combustion engine which is mainly CO2??  Perhaps you need to get a basic knowledge of the chemistry for combustion
&gt;Because that's not been my experience at all.  So you claim to know what "the historical community" talks about yet  &gt;Sorry, but this really feels like a cop out answer. I'll wait until you're not on mobile, I'm interested in what you believe the consensus is.  You don't even know some of its basic points?   Nice try
While not required, I don't give a fuck fite me m8
Yeah, I mean, obviously we still participate. I just don't get surprised or hurt when something is obviously censored or brigaded - its business as usual TBH. It sucks, but the sooner we accept that McReddit is not ours, is not able to be reverted back to the 'golden age,' and that there exists a large amount of 'official interference,' the better off we can be as the posts here will (hopefully) remain intact.  
You can't give the U.S. government that much credit. They actually fail at attempting to control which rebel group takes power a lot more than they succeed. The middle east is a very complicated region and the U.S. is only one player in the area.  
So it's not safe to consume.
Getting deja-vu from this.
I'll give you a brilliant example of how much sellouts this site is. For those not informed about GamerGate and what happened at 4chan here is the short version. Gamers uncovered a lot of corruption ultimately leading towards the discovery of a mailing list. Jewt (Formerly moot) head of 4chan sells out and bans any discussion of this. This results in 2 of main boards there leaving. Several other boards have left as well.  Just as his site should lose all views /r/4chan becomes a main subreddit. Yep to save Jewt's site, reddit made 4chan's subreddit a default. Doesn't seem to be working though, Jewt up and quit his site leaving only his shill moderators in charge.
Since moving to Costa Rica, my strategy for buying food is to avoid anything where I recognize the brand. No cancer yet!
[deleted]
Give up.  Every user in here can see you are JIDF.
&gt;But the murder of millions of innocent Jews happened  &gt;Holocaust 'revisionist' shit is a waste of time.  You keep saying that and yet you refuse to engage with any of the users posting verifiable information in this thread that proves otherwise.     http://www.thejidf.org/
And not a prank call. This shit isn't funny; people are dying. Flip the script. These fuckers literally *are terrorists*.
At least we have her maternity leave to look forward to.
Yea, probably right. Just is weird that all this zombie shit is out. Makes you think of conditioning or programming. Like I said, semi-drunk thought. Cheers!
You don't know as much about the vote fuzzing system as you claim to.  I've been on the site just as long as you if you wana go off that type of 'experience' with the 'system'  the bottom line is they are now hiding numbers that were always incorrect to begin with. Any  "Sense" you used to make out of them was a lie. 
Good point. The central thesis of 1984 is often neglected as well. The way the book is taught in many schools is, in a sense, a form of newspeak: the central themes of the book are either omitted or redefined. Which is why plenty of people think of 1984 as some kind of anti-communist manifesto, when it was nothing of the sort. Animal Farm gets a similar treatment.  In a sense, how the book was taught to me was more informative to me, about the reality of the world/system I was living in, than the contents of the book actually were. 
Please point to me the exact moment I made a threat of physical assault.  Furthermore, you were the one who tried to chastise me for hiding behind my keyboard, and I told you I wouldn't, and havent in the past. How much of a dumbfuck are you that you try to call me out for something, and then when I respond you try to call me an "internet bad ass"? You started this pointless and stupid line in the conversation.  &gt;when your beliefs come into question you resort to furious anger  When was I furious or angry? My choice of words may have been agressive, but they were in response to your dishonest shitalking about me toward another user. I have been remarkably patient toward the attacking of my views, considering the way I've been downvoted and attacked in this thread.
&gt;How social good and causes play a part in the Reddit landscape  I knew social justice was popular among the mods...I wasn't aware it was part of how reddit officially advertises itself.
Hm...from reading it, it sounds like two distinct possibilities:  1) The co-pilot who remained in the cockpit refused to open the door and intentionally crashed the plane; or  2) The co-pilot suffered from some sort of hypoxia/aneurysm/etc., collapsing on the controls, and causing the descent.  
R/Canada was raided by the conservative social media team desperate to make a foot hold for the Harper agenda. I released the mod mail of r/metacanada which basically confirmed that yes they formed vote mobs and swapped user accounts around their people.   Unfortunately they have pull with the mods, so their shit can continue unabated.
&gt; Are there replacement options to try out?  Current recommendation, also point 13 in the OP: https://voat.co/
[deleted]
[Act you must...](http://i.imgur.com/pbHfK.jpg)
You can read the abstract and results for free. Sadly, the whole study is behind a paywall.
http://www.voltairenet.org/article182303.html
Actually, reddit will be destroyed by the publication of an NNTP-like protocol in an RFC that implements every feature of reddit in a decentralised uncontrollable way.
What do you want us to do? Send out the Ghostbusters?
[deleted]
Ah, Metapedia. As a Canadian I found this description of my country to be rather hilarious.  &gt; At present Canada is under a Jewish police state regime, where freedoms are very limited; the regime is backed up by a cadre of Freemasons of British ancestry and Marxists of French ancestry.  and  &gt; Prime Minister Pierre Trudeau pushed through the patriation of the constitution from Britain, enshrining and ruining Modern Canada with the Charter of Rights and Freedoms based on individual rights in the Constitution Act of 1982, which only applies to non-white Canadians.  Nice unbiased "source". 
There isn't actually a mechanism proposed though. Wifi is non ionizing so it's hard to see how exactly this happens.
*As a Canadian* what ?  And the excerpt you cite seems pretty spot on
&gt;  It causes us to censor ourselves out of fear that we might be punished.  Your user name has never been more relevant, but I already covered that. It exists mostly as a paper tiger. It keeps you on your toes when no one is around. 
*In April 2002, israelis massacred 60 Palestinians in Jenin. The United Nations tried to investigate, but both Amnesty International and Human Rights Watch said there had been no massacre. This allowed Bush and Ariel Sharon to prevent any investigation*.   *According to the Marine Corps Times (May 31, 2002) U.S. Marines were in Jenin to watch the massacre. The Marines wanted to study how israelis do urban cleansing. Hence the USA was directly complicit in the Jenin nightmare*.   *Amnesty also refused to investigate the Sabra and Shatila massacres in Lebanon. Philip Habib (then U.S. Envoy to the Middle East) personally promised Arafat that if the PLO fighters abandoned the camps, then the U.S. would guarantee the protection of Palestinians. When the killing began, the U.S. embassy knew about it, but did nothing for 48 hours so the Phalangists, working for the israelis, could complete their massacre. The USA had a CIA agent at Sabra and Shatila – I’m not sure who it was. Anyway the USA knew the massacre was happening, and allowed it to continue. Then Amnesty said there had been no massacre*.   Read more here:  http://wakeupfromyourslumber.com/zionist-control-amnesty-international-wikileak-connection/ 
If it was me I'd use a burner phone bought with cash.
Oman!
Last week:  "Pentagon loses track of $500 million in weapons, equipment given to Yemen"  http://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/pentagon-loses-sight-of-500-million-in-counterterrorism-aid-given-to-yemen/2015/03/17/f4ca25ce-cbf9-11e4-8a46-b1dc9be5a8ff_story.html
I'm over this "Muslims are an evil brotherhood of terrorists" shit that people are selling. I'm not buying it. 
you're new to this planet i presume
said it before - people make a one hell of an effort to complain about reddit. Make a new website or forum away from this place, off this site. And then put your energy in to that. I'm down to help. But I get the feeling that too many just want to complain rather than do anything about the problem. Prove me wrong reddit users. Again, I'm willing to help anyone who wants to make a new place where we can converse freely. @JakeArsenal1 on Twitter 
Be good to get further confirmation of this.   If true, seems to suggest some kind of crazy pilot suicide.  
The bottom caption should read:  US-backed Zionist Terrorists.  Understand yet?
And people freak out when all these commercial come up "DOES YOUR SON OR MALE FAMILY MEMBER SUFFER FROM GYNECOMASTIA?! " Why yes they were taking medications that have been around for MONTHS! I deserve money!
&gt; The real one has the verified check mark beside it.  And the profile picture for this one says "Not Glasgow" on it, and the profile text says "If you think this is real, then you should probably get out more."
I can recall when I was a youth being told that farming is a "waste of life" although everyone needs to eat, no? I was pushed aggressively towards college/university, specifically in my grade 9/10 years (Canadian). It was only after I stated pretty solidly that I didn't want to go because of the debt issue (back then even) was I pushed to the trades. Specifically I was steered towards brick-laying (I believe, because I'm half Italian...but I f'ing hate bricks!). I ended up in the automotive trade.  Trades are the way forward. I'm in my early 40's now, and I can't believe how many people and younger ones particularly, that can't or won't fix or build anything for themselves. I mean many are just not even capable of grasping the fact that they could.
&gt;Perhaps we're growing...  I've noticed this myself. You'll also notice a lot more celebrities mocking conspiracy theories in public lately. Shows that people are waking up at a fast pace if they have to respond en masse like that.
So proud of my city, whether real or not
Exactly.  The american dream is just out of your reach.  Dont take time to enjoy your life now, just keep working and reaching for the future where everything will be ok.
Before I read the content I thought that it was a play on the title.
it was a knee-jerk thing as they sent me letters saying they were "investigating" me because I had not paid it... Im trying to stick to the straight and narrow these days so once I got a letter saying a bailiff would be coming round to collect the fine or whatever, I just paid it and never thought about it again!
Glad I'm not the only one who hates that asshole. 
And titanium dioxide.
They intentionally use vague rule to eliminate discussion of topics they deem taboo.  For instance, r/TIL has a rule saying you can't post about a political topic if it happened in the last 8 years, yet they also say you can't post about something if it's somewhat related to a topic in the last 8 years.  This came to my attention [while debating a mod who has since deleted their comments](http://www.reddit.com/r/undelete/comments/2p6448/139531578_til_that_between_1965_and_1972_the_cia/cmu2uax?context=3).
[deleted]
That is my point, brother.
*The prudent man keeps silent, for the day is evil.*  *Behold, I send you out as sheep in the midst of wolves; so be shrewd as serpents and innocent as doves.*
Ok, all that you mentioned is from the media right? What if Putin is making a new playground, bankars from west coming to east. There were article on reddit, really cant remember where i saw it that there is approx 3billions of metals buried in Sibir, enough to keep economic slavery for more 3.000 years(still from the media)
/r/outside?
I messaged the mods, my guess would be that a sub-section of the mods are performing this censorship, and that if there was a dedicated effort to inform the mods that it was occurring they could make sure it stopped. Maybe I'm wrong and it goes even deeper, but at least for now I'm a look on the sunny side kind of guy.
*dress up as indian*  *steal your tea*  *find a boat*  *throw it off said boat*  fuck your tea.
Also, 3 American Citizens on board. Yvonne Selke (sp?) was a gov't contractor, Selke's daughter, then a third American citizen who has not been identified.  And they should release why the co-pilot's training was halted. That seems pretty important to me
Tell that to Adolf
Told ya the d-bags come out of the woodwork.
This is very serious. Homeland Security cannot be held accountable by Americans. All of this censorship, consolidation of wealth, and all out disastrous foreign policy will turn our country into a totalitarian government. What do Americans do? Nothing. If any of us want to change America, we need to go outside and go full blast during election season. 
&gt; Statins  Statins—a class of drug that includes atorvastatin (Lipitor), simvastatin (Zocor), and others—are among the most effective drugs for lowering cholesterol. They are also among the most widely prescribed drugs of all time.  Like other drugs, however, statins have potentially serious side effects, and there are instances in which they should not be taken. Here is a rundown of things you should look out for if you are taking a statin, and times when you should steer clear of the drugs altogether.
Do we get outraged when cops get shot? Ever?
Sounds like my kind of party!
Limited hangout. Promotes the left vs right illusion while concealing the comprehensive propaganda umbrella TPTB keep us under -- all news, TV, movies, education, church... 
The chocolate and kriek beer doe
&gt; Id love for it to be just a few Jews. But it goes deeper than that.  It really doesn't though.  It's a small percentage of pseudo-Jews at the top of the proverbial pyramid who own the central banks, the majority of our media, Hollywood, etc.  The huge majority aren't involved at all - and many who are or who support these people, such as probably most Israelis, are under mind control from being propagandized by their leaders since the day they were born.  It isn't the black and white issue you're making it.  What about all of the non-Jewish power brokers around the world?  The Vatican/RCC is the largest landowner on Earth, the CIA/NSA/OSS are not Jewish, think tanks and round table groups like the Fabian Society, Tavistock Institute, Rhodes Rountable, the CFR - none of them Jewish.  Northrop Grumman, Lockheed Martin, Monsanto, Dupont, etc. - not Jewish.  The globalist conspiracy goes beyond simply "the Jew".  &gt; If you umbrella it all under Judaism, you'll hate the ones you need to right?  If you umbrella all of your hate under any one general thing, you'll hate everyone underneath it without any regard to if you should or not.  There are millions of Jews around the world who are as much victims of globalists as you and I are.  Most of these "elite" Zionist Jews descend from Eastern European royalty anyway and are about as semitic as I am (which is to say: not at all).
No there's not, there are many intertwining patterns, such as the same anomaly but with stars. 1 is the greatest evil in the universe.
As in there may be a conspiracy to make people think we are changing the climate.
More like a WN ambition I think.
You should go back. The don't block any content 
&gt;On the other hand should we really be sending police to investgate every post like this online?  That's not how bureaucracies work. Someone obviously reported OP, leaving police with the option of assuming that it is nothing and leaving it alone, or following up. If they don't follow up and something bad happens, whoever decided to not bother investigating is well and truly fucked. As a consequence, you need to anticipate interaction with the cops if you're going to post stuff like that online.   &gt;hint I it was credible it wouldnt be posted online  People talk about all kinds of stupid stuff online, even when it presents a potential risk to their future liberty.
Just wait, they'll find on the pilot's phone that his GPS logged him as visiting the kabob place next to a mosque on a weekly basis and spin that as him being a member of ISIS.
I agree with the sentiment behind your comment.
[deleted]
Bill Nye is the kiss ass to go for reddit. Always on damn front page. Together with nasa front Neil deGrasse Tyson they are the go for science canon.  nasa is also a military agency with the role of developing top advanced weapons. when government want to invest in new nuclear vector research they send guy like Neil deGrasse Tyson to sell you the importance of investing billions upon billions on studying some star in a galaxy at the other side of the universe. yes studying that star is important, except the money will go to developing nuclear weapons vectors.  sad, but these sciences propaganda dudes are paid a shitload of money, they are treated as pop stars. what a nice life
daddy boob?
He's a professional entertainer, that spouts BS.  He speaks for profit.  Their is no calculus about him.
They funded the Nazi party as well. The rabbit hole always goes deeper.   What would I want them to do? Where to start...
Anyone who doesn't believe that all 3 trade centers were **controlled demolitions** now, in 2015 then fuck them. The future doesn't need them. 
Post it to /r/CanadaPolitics, watch as it's nuked by /u/Issachar or /u/AmnesiaJune for 'unfounded conspiracy theory'; then wonder in amazement as they continue to ignore the rules themselves while selectively enforcing them against those who are critical of the Tories.
I only come here to check-out this sub every now and then because I don't really know of anywhere else I can go to discuss what's really going on.
if you turn your preach and specualtion into humor backed by facts then it works exceptionally well. &gt;.&gt;
Made me smile:)
&gt;  They don't block any content  Meh, we are just being herded. What better way to isolate and identify the misfits? Just crack down on a popular platform of free expression and take note of where the "trouble makers" flee...  The circle just becomes smaller and smaller. The rest of the masses of people just see a clump of paranoid people leaving the party.
Childish response.
Coca-Cola. Corn Syrup isn't kosher .  Once again it comes down to money. If a brand thinks it can make more money by opening their product to Kosher Jews, they do.   
What are you on about?
I just read this from wherever you sent it from which means its not entirely hopeless. If you had actual info to link or anything of value to say now is the time to say it before it really get shitty. I guess we are as good as the site, but at the same time we cant deny businesses are in on reddit and have accounts, yes even businesses from within the government. 
And also, I think this is intentional provocation of the masses by the government.  A 2 month military occupation is not an exercise.
Quantitative easing, look it up.
;)
Why would people downvote this?
Does anyone notice snopes anymore?   Useless site.
Is this the carmen ortiz from the aaron schwartz case?
So because you have zero proof that it's not a reliable source, you decide to push it on me to try and save face? Good shit.
Preach. My wife suffers from gastritis and cannabis is absolutely the best thing to ease her aching and upset stomach.
Then start something new without the BS.  
I wonder if they are redoing their wiki page to get rid of the "culture of free speech" that is on there.  Or if they are up to date on the current false advertising laws.  Might want to look into that before going all hot and heave on a new marketing campaign.
Currently our species may be devolving. Evolution just works by who can pass their genes on the best. The people who can't figure out birth control are having a lot of kids. Basically watch idiocracy.
You think the Utah facility is just a giant miner?
The number of Jews killed wasn't made up, what is shocking is that [15 to 20 million people](http://www.nytimes.com/2013/03/03/sunday-review/the-holocaust-just-got-more-shocking.html?_r=1) besides the Jews were also killed in concentration camps, although the narrative we are taught still to this day is that Jews alone died in the Holocaust, and this just simply isn't the case.
You must be fun at parties.
but on what grounds could they charge or arrest them
[deleted]
What wouldja blog about? Something like that episode of black mirror with the folks on bikes episode? Who would you audience be/how would you make them aware?
I appreciate the post, WANWO, and you'd be on my list. I just think we need a medium where a few of us NewQueue(tm)s need a place to coalesce away from reddit and develop further and integrate into something more tangible, and let each other feel each other out at our own pace (let's face it - if we're here - we're all paranoid in some fashion - and I'm no different).  But somebody's gotta go first. Why not me?
[deleted]
i don't understand, why do so many people here not like him? how is he authoritarian? what has he said that is wrong?
All you had to do was ask JP Morgan that back in the early 1900's
Genes respond to changes in environmental conditions so saying, "It's genetic," doesn't rule out outside causes entirely. 
whoa. Can you share some links or something so I can read about Russia's saying threatening to arm American militas?
Would be interesting to see a comparison for the families of Scientists from the Oak Ridge, TN area.
Yea, especially since the recent revelation of slick Willy being behind ISIS.   He is the one who asked "it depends on what the meaning of the word IS IS."   Giving them a plug back then.
besides the sidebar right now?
So you forgive the Obama administration for the Sandy Hook hoax? 
One is a matter of religious preference and the other can cause anaphylactic shock and death.
[deleted]
...for manufactured terrorism.  Indeed. 
I stopped listening to Russell Brand for some time because of his esoteric way of saying things, but this was fun to watch and spot on.
 &gt;2:49 p.m.: Explosions at Boston Marathon  &gt;3:31 p.m.: Matanov allegedly calls Tamerlan Tsarnaev and invites him to dinner  &gt;That evening: Matanov allegedly buys Dzhokhar and Tamerlan Tsarnaev dinner  I start becoming suspicious of this timeline because it starts like this. It is almost as if they want the reader to jump to the conclusion that this guy was celebrating with them or rewarding them for the bombing.  When, in reality, he very well could have just called them and said, like any normal friend would do "hey man, you hungry, wanna meet up for a slice of pizza?".  This is why I take the media with a grain of salt. They have every motive to sensationalize everything and they are extremely good at distorting things to create their own narratives. Governments are also great at this, and when they use the media as their mouthpiece, the sensationalism and lies become even bigger.
TL;DR: Guy is banned from /r/skeptic. He's mad about it. 
I dunno man, any chemist worth their NaCl would have realized (as OP did) that they were being solicited to make a lethal compound. He might not have known the ultimate use of it, but Cyanide is not usually manufactured on the sly for agricultural purposes...
They get stupid because they are autistic?   *[triggered]*
[deleted]
They shadowban by IP and also by flash cookies.  They're cunts.
Look at my account. 
I guess writing for Forbes makes you a mad conspiracy theorist though, right?
do you have any proof any of this happened besides we just taking your word?
Yeah, but that's already happening. To everyone. 
Dissenting opinions are shunned here, too.  Confirmation bias is perhaps a little less overt here than in /r/worldnews but it is certainly present.  /r/conspiracy is still pretty much my favorite place on reddit.
The admin/owners of voat are always looking for people to help out, go create an account and offer up your services, i'm sure they'd love it :)
:)  
True fact; remember the propaganda post yesterday? iSIS meat grinder. In that article it said that the U.S. Runs propaganda campaigns every day in the Middle East. Like putting out new pamphlets. Said that it speaks to the "softer side" of the conflict.   Then the article says it has used 1 billion dollars on paper pamphlet propaganda. I guess my point is...dis shit cray
[deleted]
You don't understand. There was dust on WTC7. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Immunity to suicide?
Isn't the charge something along the lines of "Attemption to Destroy or Tamper With Evidence"?
Oh shit
I think it's a good idea, LetsHack, but it has to be presented in a way that it's just not subreddit drama bullshit that non-redditors wouldn't care about - it has to be presented properly. Know what I mean?  Corbett is big on internet and crowd sourced communities and investigations, and actions like this can totally crush those organizations from forming of allowed to continue.  Adam Curry at No Agenda has also been banging the internet censorship hard lately, and this may fit in with his angle as well.  That's two off the top of my head.
We need an alternative that can't be easily compromised. That's the tough part. Maybe something distributed, where nobody could gain too much power. One problem with that would be spam, it would be a magnet for spam. Still, a distributed model would have some advantages, such as not being beholden to any individual owner or host. It could also limit the damage that a bad actor could do. Such a system would allow for anyone to easily clone an existing "sub", which would mean no more than a name change while preserving content. It would be simple to allow anyone to back up data of interest, and republish as necessary.  Obviously, I'm just spitballing here, but I think we need a different *kind* of system than reddit. It's a failed model due to its vulnerability to corruption.
You're allowed to give out your contact information, etc, in a post if it's relevant and unnecessary. That's very different from someone else posting your personal info/webpage/email/anything without your permission. I could see someone get IP banned for doxing before. I've had the admins check multiple accounts' IPs and ban people before for doxing me, so yeah, it's understandable.
Sadly, that is what happens when the mainstream enters. Yes, from an account that a year old too.
Unless you can cite some evidence to back up your claim, you are merely stating your opinion. I suspect that you haven't done enough original research to know much of anything about cancer - you are merely repeating what you have been told your entire life.  Check out the video. Good luck to you friend.  You also might also want to check out this:  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/1107920  &gt;Beard's theory can be restated in a modified form in modern terms in the following way. Cancer represents primarily trophoblastic tissue derived either from an aberrant germ cell or from a somatic cell whose normally repressed 'asexual generation' genes are abnormally reactivated ('derepressed'). The variety of tumors, other than teratomas, may be due to a parallel chance derepression of some genes of somatic ('sexual gneration') characters. This would be a defensive reaction against intramural parasitization by trophoblast and would result in the differentiation and hyperplasia of normally present more primative somatic cells.
Doesn't that just mean they deleted all there past posts?
[deleted]
Jet fuel can't melt steal beams
If you keep creating accounts as you are banned, and keep this information up, its gonna put the shits up them, and enough people will end up seeing it. 
Not if you have a static IP. Just saying
Why does this matter so much to you?
Sure, but when they came for the Socialists, THEY WARNED THEM ALL THEY WERE COMING.  I mean, I get the gist of the poem and its meaning. But seriously, they all were warned to GTFO.
I'd be surprised if it were something so trivial. It's more likely that he's like the 8th consecutive alt account of someone who habitually breaks all the rules "to compensate for CIA vote manipulation" or whatever.
[deleted]
Your source is a conspiracy website that is making up garbage to make money from hits.  My source is the CERN website, so ya know, its probably more accurate.
I wonder if she'll remove all the threads today talking about how she lost on all counts.
If you have no experience/knowledge on servers, please do not respond. If you are running a windows server, running C#, you are asking to be hacked. This right here proves that I will not join voat, sorry. Windows == backdoors and hacking. Windows is a hackers wet dream. This shit should be on a linux server, written in either PHP, Ruby, or Python. Take your pick. Windows is a joke, and this site will be hacked by those who want to shut it down.   edit: not to mention, in order to run this, you must pay windows. Bill Gates is a shit head and should not be funded. Fucking eugenic ass hole that man is. 
We (or at least I) deeply respect places like /r/actualconspiracies but we also require evidence and (preferably proven) good faith, if you have none it is more likely that you are just trolling. 
&gt;I divided 666 by 666. It was exactly one. I'm not sure if it's coincidence.  It goes deeper dude... have you seen [this video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_c6HsiixFS8) yet? 
Sometimes the mega corps aren't the bad guys. Who knew?
Pss I think he is trolling. 
Dank memes 
He asked the mods why he was banned.  &gt;It looks like you got caught up in a vote brigade, but upon further investigation it looks like you were not part of it. Thanks for writing in so promptly. I've unbanned your account.  https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/30hy5r/i_wrote_how_reddit_was_destroyed_and_it_went/
I believe you.
[Guided missile at the WTC.](http://s014.radikal.ru/i329/1102/51/ee7df9707ac5.gif)
Its not changing the fruit that's not the only problem. We cant change our digestive systems that were meant for non GMO food. Perfectly tailored to fit our digestive systems.
Comrades it is not our grandpas army nor is it our grandpas government anymore (was it better then?) be prepared not scared.
I know anonymous doxxed those pedophiles but were they ever brought to justice?
for the time being, it will be deleted within 12 hours i'm sure just like all the other posts. Other posts had many hundreds of comments, 5000+ upvotes and made it to the front page then deleted by mods.
True, we're not quite as batshit crazy here govt-wise and I hope it stays that way. Nothing short of a mass refusal to pay taxes, boycotting voting and a country-wide general strike is going to sort America out any time soon.
[deleted]
Take your pick:  (courtesy of /r/redditalternatives)  [Voat.co](http://voat.co)  [Snapzu.com](http://snapzu.com/list/)  [Hacker News](https://news.ycombinator.com)  [Linkibl](http://www.linkibl.com/)  [Empeopled](http://empeopled.com)  [Hubski.com](http://hubski.com)  [Spreadit](https://spreadit.io)  [3 Tags](http://3tags.org)
[deleted]
Have you ever read the Time magazines article called *The Bitter Pill*? I would bet that you would find it interesting, and possibly infuriating. There are websites that offer a free .PDF for it..
Oh yeah, and they know it.  I was followed into benign subreddits too like cabin porn and cascadia lol.  the best is when you get randomly banned because they message the mods (owned mods i guess) about it.  "you've been banned from /r/xxxxx because you posted elsewhere about the holocaust"
Well yeah, obviously. You use Tor to obtain new usernames, even if IP-shadowbanned.
[deleted]
Thanks, that was a great diversion.  Live long and prosper.  Caught the flavor of the original pretty well.
Hello number 37
Noticed that also, stuff has been getting worse each year
If the earth is flat explain when we can see other planets as round with telescopes...   This might be a dumb question but I'm just curious ( I'm new here)
Posting on Reddit, Bitching about Reddit. Banned from Reddit. Makes new account to bitch about being banned from Reddit. Calls it Conspiracy.
i haven't looked into this at all, still don't see a reason to frankly, plane crashed, big deal
 Chris Rock on the subject.  Follow these tips,  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uj0mtxXEGE8
Serious question here.   If someone told you everything you've ever been told about gravity was wrong and that if you jump off a cliff you wouldn't fall, would you do it, or would you reject it flat-out?
&gt; Why is that? (serious)  Why is criticizing Israel (and/or cheering for Palestine) getting a lot folks nose out of joint? That is a good question. The "useful idiots" that cast the down votes are brain washed to be that way. Why? Money! There are a group of filthy, stinking rich people who are Jewish (the Rothschild Family for example). These people want what the Arabs have - natural resources (Oil, Natural Gas etc). Now the thought of being nice and having to pay for the resources in a civilized manner is an insult to Jewish rich people. This is because of religious pride (false pride) and arrogance. This leads to racism and hatred - both brain diseases. This has been going on for a *very* long time. The Jews want *everything* (to take over the world. Yes, really). Since there is a lot of money at stake here, this has filtered down the channels resulting in a lot of people falsely thinking that Israel is good and Israels enemies are bad. These brain deluded people (down voters) become the "herd" and act as such.
Me too. But we have seen routers etc opened....
Not sure how else I can say it... This guy's PR flop is not evidence that Roundup is toxic. It's evidence of his poor PR handling. There is solid evidence out there thought that Roundup is *indeed* toxic. None of which Time brings into their "article" of course... 
I left that from the title the source used.
We did
Schlomo pls
[deleted]
You're here to tell everyone that you personally doubt the product was messed with and EVEN if it had, you can easily just get it back to original.  Like it never happened!  Trust CSIS and random internet people.  TIL.  See: That's not the point.
Dude - look at it. It's still going. Definitely our new Drytruth.
oh yeah I know of voat, but I mean something less like reddit and more specific to discussion on these topics alone
Awesome work my friend. Keep it up!
I hate the fact that people don't realize *millions* of innocent people were displaced and essentially forced to flee the country with their children and belongings on their back.  I get downvoted in major subreddit for even pointing this out. I get called a liar and receive comments that say "it wasn't millions, stop exaggerating".  I also hate that the only way to find it to google: Iraqi Diaspora. Like the Western powers have purposely hidden the information behind a word that most people do not understand or know.
You're calling a shooting of a cop "Nothing"?!
An alternative to Reddit with no censorship and some RES features built in.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Parable_of_the_broken_window
I know this, but is reddit part of it or just the arena in which those manipulations happen?  Because if it's just the arena, then it makes sense that they cause troubles to reddit's ceo and replace her with their own puppet.  There's of course also the possibility that it's unrelated and she is genuinely a cunt
The US is supporting one country in a war in one place, while fighting against that same country in another place.  Geopolitics don't work like that.  That's just them funding chaos wherever they can.
That's not what I've said, I understand it works both ways.  Though, to make a claim like that as if it is true and the only "logical" answer, is laughable.  He didn't openly admit.  He and his statement were never investigated so you don't know if he misspoke or he said something stupid and it was all lost in a sea of "let's go get the fucking brown people".  Now, you're speaking for people saying that the building would have likely needed to be brought down anyway.  Well, what an armchair statement.  Let us all recognize our place, and that place is not about wonder or hum and haw over what could or maybe should haven been in our VAST experience (see: none at all) and understand that politics is power and when things like this occur, and there is nothing except a band wagon to jump on and ZERO investigation to be sure .......you should know that you're ripe for the pickings.  Instead, we guess and surmise and EXPECT that things are being looked after.  Clearly, we are consistently wrong.  WTC7 didn't have buildings falling down right on top of them.  WTC7, being across the street, was built as a secure place to go in an emergency for NYC.  [Here, you trust him/them, right?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XsqPeqhKJ7Q)  Not a game?  You're not a pawn?  You're confident as well?
**The Hijackers**  * [Did you know that Mohammed Atta liked pork, booze, cocaine and strippers? The official story says he was a fundamentalist Muslim.](http://www.democraticunderground.com/discuss/duboard.php?az=view_all&amp;amp;amp;address=104x1433886)  * [The hijacker of flight 77 could barely fly a cesna](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hani_Hanjour) yet somehow pulled off one of the most complicated maneuvers in boeing 757 history  * [15 of the 19 hijackers failed to fill out visas properly in Saudi Arabia and should have been denied entry](http://www.wanttoknow.info/911/9-11-timeline)  * [Some hijackers trained at secure military facilities](http://www.wanttoknow.info/010916post)  * [15 of 19 hijackers](http://www.trutv.com/conspiracy/government-lies/911-10yrs/part-3.html) were Saudi Arabian. The [House of Saud and the Bush Family are deeply intimate business partners](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/House_of_Bush,_House_of_Saud)  * "Staff members characterized Mr. Hanjour as polite, meek and very quiet. But most of all, the former employee said, they considered him a very bad pilot. I'm still to this day amazed that he could have flown into the Pentagon," the former employee said. "He could not fly at all."- [NYT](http://www.nytimes.com/2002/05/04/national/04ARIZ.html? )   **Operation Able Danger**   * [Operation Able Danger identified Atta and 3 other hijackers in the year 2000](http://www.nytimes.com/2005/08/11/politics/11intel.html?ex=1281412800&amp;amp;amp;en=3c4c0f2346a58391&amp;amp;amp;ei=5090&amp;amp;amp;partner=rssuserland&amp;amp;amp;emc=rss&amp;amp;amp;_r=0)  * "The Able Danger intelligence, if confirmed, is undoubtedly the most relevant fact of the entire post-9/11 inquiry. Yet the 9/11 Commission inexplicably concluded that it "was not historically significant." This astounding conclusion--in combination with the failure to investigate Able Danger and incorporate it into its findings--raises serious challenges to the commission's credibility and, if the facts prove out, might just render the commission historically insignificant itself." -- [Former FBI Director Louis Freeh in the Wall Street Journal, 11/17/05](http://www.wanttoknow.info/911/9-11_summary_articles/051117wsjfreehabledanger.htm )  * Able Danger Key Facts: The Pentagon "ordered five key witnesses not to testify", according to Senate Judiciary Committee Chairman Arlen Specter  * According to statements by Lt. Col. Anthony Shaffer and those of four others, Able Danger had identified 2 of 3 Al Qaeda cells active in the 9/11 attacks... including September 11 attacks leader Mohamed Atta [wiki]  * Speaking on behalf of Lt. Col. Shaffer, attorney Mark Zaid testified "The copies that would have been in the possession of the U.S. Army were apparently destroyed by March 2001. The copies within Lt Col Shaffer's files were destroyed by the DIA in approximately Spring 2004." [wiki]   **Important Quotes**   * [Congresswoman Cynthia McKinney in 2005 at a Congressional Hearing](http://www.wanttoknow.info/050317wargames911): "Mr. Secretary: according to the Comptroller General of the United States, there are serious financial management problems at the Pentagon, to which Mr. Cooper alluded. Fiscal Year 1999: $2.3 trillion missing. Fiscal Year 2000, $1.1 trillion missing. And DoD is the number one reason why the government can't balance its checkbook."  * Airforce General Richard Meyers "The goal has never been to get bin Laden."- [Interview with CNN](http://www.wanttoknow.info/020406dodcnn)  * "I truly am not that concerned about him."- [George Bush in regards to bin Laden, 2002](http://georgewbush-whitehouse.archives.gov/news/releases/2002/03/20020313-8.html)  * "We have not uncovered a single piece of paper that mentioned any aspect of the 9/11 plot. The hijackers had no computers, no laptops, no storage media of any kind."- [FBI Director Robert Mueller, LA Times 2002](http://www.wanttoknow.info/020430latimes911hijackersnolaptops)  * "It is an obscene comparison - you know I am not sure I like it - but you know there was a time in South Africa that people would put flaming tyres around people's necks if they dissented. And in some ways the fear is that you will be necklaced here, you will have a flaming tyre of lack of patriotism put around your neck," he said. "Now it is that fear that keeps journalists from asking the toughest of the tough questions."- [Dan Rather on the pressure for journalists to conform to the official story on 9/11, The Guardian 2002](http://www.theguardian.com/media/2002/may/17/terrorismandthemedia.broadcasting)  * "I have deep concerns that a delicate and subtle shading/skewing of facts by you and others at the highest levels of FBI management has occurred and is occurring."- [FBI agent Coleen Rowley in a memo to the Director](http://www.wanttoknow.info/911/9-11_summary_articles/020521coleenrowleymemofbidirectormueller). The memo linked goes in to lots of details  * "Though he has no vote, (Zelikow) arguably has more sway than any member, including the chairman. Zelikow picks the areas of investigation, the briefing materials, the topics for hearings, the witnesses, and the lines of questioning for witnesses... In effect, he sets the agenda and runs the investigation." - [Paul Sperry discussing the 9/11 commision chairman](http://antiwar.com/sperry/?articleid=2209%29 )  * “As each day goes by, we learn that this government knew a whole lot more about these terrorists before Sept. 11 than it has ever admitted."- [Max Cleland](http://www.nytimes.com/2003/10/26/national/26KEAN.html?ex=1101358800&amp;amp;amp;en=12b0b7aa3a5a2e14&amp;amp;amp;ei=5070&amp;amp;amp;oref=login&amp;amp;amp;pagewanted=print&amp;amp;amp;position= )  * "The two questions that the congress will not ask, because republicans wont allow it, is why did 9/11 happen on George Bush's watch when he had clear warnings that it was going to happen? Why did they allow it to happen? And secondly, when they had Osama Bin Laden cornered why didn't they get him? Had there been an independent congress, one that could ask questions these questions would have been asked years ago." - [Senator Patrick Leahy](http://www.democracynow.org/2006/9/29/a_total_rollback_of_everything_this )  * “You knew they were in the United States. You were warned by the CIA. You knew in July they were inside the United States. You were told again by briefing officers in August that it was a dire threat. And what did you do? Nothing, so far as we could see on the 9/11 Commission." - [9/11 report commissioner Bob Kerrey](http://www.historycommons.org/context.jsp?item=aafter080601noaction#aafter080601noaction )  (http://archives.cnn.com/2001/US/09/11/new.york.terror/  )    **MISC**   * [NASA had the capability to remotely controll airplanes](http://www.hq.nasa.gov/office/pao/History/SP-468/ch13-6.htm ), specifically Boeing 757s and 767s.  * "William Rodriguez worked on the basement level of the north tower and was in the building when the first plane struck his building. We heard a loud rumble, then all of a sudden we heard another rumble like someone moving a whole lot of furniture," Rodriguez said. "And then the elevator opened and a man came into our office and all of his skin was off."  - [CNN]
this article is smeary as fuck. the pot pictures are lol.
I'd feel safer if they didn't exist.
I believe you.
Less laws, more military because, the red-state, $25K republicans will become rich one day, after they're done serving in the army...
Yes. Because he held the mother party (Labour Party/Arbeiderpartiet) responsible for "Islamification" of Norway, and went after the next generation of future Labour Party members through their Youth Organization (AUF) to prevent more Islamification. Spared the youngest cause, in his eyes, they weren't brainwashed yet, still had time to save themselves so he spared them.  (they're all cunts. Was a member of same organization for years and they are about as Democratic as dog shit. I remember I was at that island a few years before this, our Prime Minister was coming (now head of NATO) and all the "higher ups" in AUF (youth org) ran around like groupies telling us that if we didnt clap and smile when he passed on his parade from thr harbor to the main area, we could fuck off and wait in the camping area. Same with questions, no bad questions or antything negative because, and I quote "this is a fun and positive day"  No one on that island deserved that, but AUF is a shitty, shitty organization.  Edit again, Islamification isnt quite correct, but he felt norwegian culture and values were being disintegrated by a careless immigration policy   Possible ninjaedit, words are hard on ipad
I'm hoping he/she forgot the /s, lol.
NOO EVERYONE BELIEVES JET FUEL MELTS STEAL BEAMS
That's the the reason, not even close. 
As a Brit who is seeing the gradual privatisation of the NHS under the guise of efficiency this amount truly sickens me. All that money pumped into nothing. And the republicans hate free health care. It's just so fucked it makes me want to cry. And our government wants to follow that lead. These thuggish cunts listen to nobody. No expert or study can sway then from their greed. If there is not an uprising by the common man soon then the common man will spend the rest of his days with his trousers down and a big fat dildo of gold tickling his prostate.   Edit: I'm aware the democrats  are in power but at least they seem to mildly give a shit about health. 
No, I want *other* people to know.
"I'm gonna go take a piss"  ACTIVATED.  But seriously, the most likely scenario at this point is that he was just a suicidal dropkick.  Lets wait until we figure out whether there were any motivation at all for tptb to bring down this aircraft before starting the rampant conspiracy theories.
Right. And a needle in a haystack is still there, somewhere. The propaganda machine functions through repetition and omission. Here's an example of important information which was reported once, in foreign media, and never mentioned by US mainstream media:  - [Haaretz reported shortly after 9/11 that Netanyahu would call Larry Silverstein every Sunday afternoon. "It made no difference what the subject was or where Netanyahu was, he would always call."](http://www.haaretz.com/up-in-smoke-1.75334)
He who pays the piper calls the tune. This about controlling what the young minds are taught.  It's no surprise most can't see past government schooling since they were taught by government schools.
Yeah but there's no reason to throw around numbers like "billions dead" quite yet. Maybe once WW3 really gets going. 
I get what you mean. Its like, the same thing as that asshole that everybody knows, but he knows hes an asshole and openly admits it. I may dislike him for it, but it still deserves respect.
All very easily faked.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's only gone when people lose their ability to resist and take back their power.  Close, but not there yet.
I would repost this on /r/TIL...if I knwe how...
Why does no one bother to rotate Texas at all?  All the map comparisons I see, it's just lifted straight out of the US and planted on top of some random spot in Europe.    Maybe tilt it a little so it's not covering any ocean or something lol.
Somewhat, but half the time I'm drunk homie, lol. I feel something is off, fill me in. I'm legit.
[deleted]
62/180 from El Paso to Carlsbad is about as empty a highway as you can get, and it's in Texas. 2 hours of nothing aside from the occasional single wide trailer parked a mile off the road. No cell signal for 99% of the drive, and the concrete is literally red. Fucking bizarre area, and I'll never go back if I can help it.
So the big question is does he leave failed predictions up, or is he deleting examples that prove incorrect?  Many of them are very broad and likely to be successful 'hits' within the time period just because they are somewhat common events. It seems the more specific ones have larger windows of time - for instance he gave himself 10 months for the death of a 104-year-old actress, and even then almost missed it.  
I like your enthusiasm, but it seems a good argument can be made that the people should have already woken up a LONG time ago, and that we haven't is a pretty bad and foreboding  sign of the fact that we may not fare so well when the country finally does realize that things are *really* bad.  By the time that happens, we'll already be locked up and it'll all be too late.  We should have been acting by now, and that we haven't indicates to me that it *might* be fast approaching the "too late" time for us citizens.
[deleted]
It doesn't appear to be specifically true.  [There is a whole process](http://www.faa.gov/about/office_org/headquarters_offices/avs/offices/aam/ame/guide/app_process/exam_tech/item47/amd/antidepressants/) by which airmen being treated with SSRI medications are evaluated on an individual basis, but it's definitely not the case that they are universally not allowed to fly.  The concerns connected to the use of antidepressant medication are also related to the underlying mental health issue they are treating. Pilots diagnosed with depression and related mental health issues but *not* receiving medication are not allowed to fly.
Someone somewhere recorded it, just need to find them now. Probably be on youtube at some point. 
[deleted]
if I recall correctly the U.S.was supposed to give China their hold back on 9/12/01, I think something happened the day before.
Nobody cares anymore, man. We're not stopping her election. She could be caught on camera sacrificing a child and she'd still be elected. Have you seen the female SJW's who support this nutty warmonger? They're literally only concerned about the fact that she's female, she's not running on a platform of anything other than that, so why would this scandal even be pertinent to what she espouses?  The best we can do at this point, is realise that we have no control over the puppets who are put into office, and begin protecting ourselves by pulling our money out of banks and going off the grid.
Good question, I'm going to go with the one who said 'thou shalt not kill'.
5 year old testimony from redditors claiming impact to their sexuality from the conditioning:    http://np.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/bc8xa/weird_sexual_fetishes_i_know_you_have_them_i_do/c0m192k
What's the conspiracy? 
It's kind of interesting that the apologists attack the comparison with the police, when that's all it is, is a comparison to another low risk event.  I'm not safe from having to pay my share of 791 billion in taxes when my risk of death is far greater at the hands of the police (while still very small as you say) and nothing is being spent to discipline the police.   If 75% of the money went to keep pyschos and cowards off force, we would all be safer.  The 791 billion is just a waste of money. 
No. you're acting like you're some great world traveler showing us the "truth" by posting links on the internet. You seem like a very arrogant narcissist.
[deleted]
So the president should be leading the army. Like the good ol days.   Edit: Word
&gt; you the real mvp!  My God I can't wait till people stop saying this   Worst circlejerk on reddit
&gt;Universal Declaration of Human Rights: Article 12  &gt;No one shall be subjected to arbitrary interference with his privacy, family, home or correspondence, nor to attacks upon his honour and reputation. Everyone has the right to the protection of the law against such interference or attacks.  http://www.un.org/en/documents/udhr/index.shtml#a12
In the States that would mean a 150 million person military..  Damn.
every one has an opinion, thx for sharing  
This late to be acknowledged/ or revealed, damage to all of humanity is being "measured " in healthcare costs or "Dollars". There is another scale of or set of values that cannot be ignored or replaced.
Or what about when the issue of equal pay regardless of gender made it to the supreme court.. and they voted against it.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ledbetter_v._Goodyear_Tire_%26_Rubber_Co.
What the article doesn't cover is that after the emergency code is entered an alarm goes off in the cockpit for approximately 20-30 seconds. During that time the pilot can override the emergency code, thus barring entry into the cockpit. Here is a link to the wired article explaining the details...  http://www.wired.com/2015/03/remarkably-easy-lock-pilot-cockpit/?mbid=social_twitter  Edit: Changed polot to pilot and baring to barring
That's the problem with leaks. They come out and then someone (you) needs to verify them  Get to it.
If you're looking to solve this, your first step is to patiently follow his FB/Twitter account.    Are you saying the first page of FB has all confirmed predictions? Does he not have any pending predictions that have yet to be tested?   You've got yourself worked up prematurely.  Follow the accounts.  Track the predictions - see which ones come true and which don't and how much time occurs between the prediction and the confirmation.  It's within your ability to test the veracity of his claims yourself.    If you witness yourself that prediction after prediction is coming true in real time, you may proceed to have your mind blown. ;)
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Heh. And his huge Oedipus complex sometimes got a bit much. Also the nudism. 
Reason will prevail!
Do you believe in God? 
Just trying to get him to flesh out his theory.  If it's bullshit I can figure that out for myself, thanks.   It's a 4 day old account,  I've read all his comments.  Don't need your bullshit about Tron and "levelling up" either.
Should have been done.
The best thing you can do is live your life, not the life they wish to define for you. You know in your heart what your direction and purpose is, maybe not in such a tanglable way to define even, but you do know. So long as you remain free, that you don't let the shakles of darkness rest upon you, that's how you do something to help the situation. It sets an example, and only through showing ppl how to be free will they ever be able to free themselves, because this is a unquie type of imprisionment. It is one of belief and thought, and many, many ppl, will never look at it. And that's actually a good thing. But once you have, do the best you can, and you know what that is, and that let's the lil light of you shine through the darkness. There is no greater victory.
Go live in Lala land. I'm fine where I'm at. 
Truth in history is important, no matter who's feelings get hurt.
https://youtu.be/CROB5p-1GjE
Telemarketers were the only people who called me on it.  You'd think the phone companies would figure this out.. they where shooting themselves in the foot.  That do no call list was a joke.
They probably did, and the evidence was destroyed. Why do you think the NSA wants to spy on everyone? Because it will give them the power to make one thing look like another, like making a planned plane crash look like some sort of accident or some loon managed to get into the cock pit alone. I'm not saying it's true, but the NSA having access to everyone's shit gives them the power to manipulate the world. It's frightening, as implausible as it may be. 
C-SPAN brought on over 2,200 Architects and Engineers to discuss the 3 building collapses on 9/11.   It aired August 2014 and has 315,000 views: http://www.c-span.org/video/?320748-5/washington-journal-architects-engineers-911-truth  
So,didnt you see the comments ?Only from soccer and india.i use it when I m in toilet and reply to notifications there.
I don't mind! I can make up my own opinion and have always more to learn. Don't really care wether people care to discuss a fringe topic. This sub should discuss anything though, I believe. But there's a lot that doesn't fit into it's very own "political correctness". Something I like to keep in mind. &gt;  &gt; "I'm not going to sit and discuss this you"  I value everybody's opinion. And I personally think that the last word hasn't been spoken on this matter.
Im wondering what happened to the op that he took hours to solve it. 
wcgw?
Let's just make that subreddit them? I'm down to play with it. 
"The global market for vaccines may only comprise about 2% to 3% of the total pharmaceuticals market but this sector has, and continues to experience a stellar growth rate of 10% to 15% per year versus the 5% to 7% seen in the overall market, according the World Health Organization (WHO). Totaling just US$5 billion in 2000, today the global vaccine market is worth an estimated $24 billion and is projected to rise to $100 billion by 2025."    You think $100 billion dollars is nothing?  Wall Street is salivating over growth like this.    Source: http://lifescienceinvestingnews.com/1866-global-vaccine-market-experiencing-substantial-growth.html
Not even dumb Americans believe it.
That makes too much sense.  Let's make it happen.
[deleted]
Spoooooooky
Whatever floats your boat. 
I don't know where you get your information, but archaeology has proven that Israel has been around at least since the Iron Age. 
[deleted]
Yup, because that's the kind of people they are.  
why cant you just be like everyone else huh? what are you hiding huh? dont you know the terrorists buy all their stuff in cash?! why would you wanna be like a turrurist!
they DO think.  They think *every* citizen is a potential threat to be dispatched because that's how they are trained.  Because you notice how not even ONE officer on the scene says, "Whoa, what the fuck did you bodyslam him for?!?!?!"
It's not "a parent" it's at least 5,000.
Still relevant. U.S. is still trying to control Iraq. 
That is exactly how DNA works. American? 
well yea, i had a bad experience with lsd back in 07, so &gt;_&gt;
&gt; Their charter of kill all jews and destroy Israel is pretty resistancy.   I hear a lot of whining about the "Hamas Charter" and how it supposedly shows that they are dedicated to "killing all Jews"... but no one ever talks about the **Israel Charter**, which is MUCH older, is an integral part of the Torah, and is **100% genocidal**.  **[Deuteronomy 20:](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=deuteronomy+20&amp;version=KJV)**  &gt; 16 But of the cities of these people, **which the Lord thy God doth give thee for an inheritance, thou shalt save alive nothing that breatheth:**  &gt; 17 **But thou shalt utterly destroy them**; namely, the Hittites, and the Amorites, the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites; as the Lord thy God hath commanded thee:  &gt; 18 That they teach you not to do after all their abominations, which they have done unto their gods; so should ye sin against the Lord your God.  Hint: The land *"which the Lord thy God doth give thee for an inheritance"* would include ALL of Palestine (and more). God ordered TOTAL GENOCIDE.   Can you show me where "God" ever rescinded this order? Because as far as I can tell, the hard-core religious Jews STILL believe this commandment to be valid, and the only reason they haven't acted on it is that doing so *at this time* would be politically inexpedient, and kind of a BAD IDEA in general.  Biding their time?  Tell us more about the Hamas Charter. 
Orwell was part of the beast. He worked for many years in Burma as an imperial police officer, then later in life informed on communists and homosexuals to the british spy agencies. Spy agencies would pay for foreign translations of Animal Farm for example to attack labour movements internationally. Orwell was an insider and his writing is certainly no threat to power.
Fort Lauderdale here, the video isn't working for me.
"See, in my line of work you got to keep repeating things over and over and over again for the truth to sink in, to kind of catapult the propaganda."— George Bush - Greece, N.Y. May 24, 2005
........ See , Putin isn't all bad !  ........ Just a pity he didn't make any effort in the Syrian War, to make Peace !
This subreddit doesn't seem to have any issues in thriving. I dunno things seem fine in /r/conspiracy.  There is good discussion and content here consistently. 
Should be less seats to show the real diversity of the press. 
&gt;One of these diplomats **said Iran had "more or less" agreed to slash the number of its centrifuge machines by more than two-thirds** and to ship abroad most of its stockpile of nuclear material.  Anyone know how many centrifuges they have now? How much will 2/3 end up being?  Bonus points if you know both answers, and then can figure out how many centrifuges it that is necessary to develop a weapon anyway.  Oh, and also understand that this is 6 countries telling another country how they have develop their energy programs...
They were operating behind pan am expressway in San Antonio a few nights ago. Across from splashtown near the ft. Sam houston base. South of the medical center. They were very good, had some -very- interesting tech as well. Just glad they are on our side. One of the things they were practicing was small forward mobile stations in shipping trucks.  I don't recommend anyone spend too much time watching them.
Couple this with their proposed plan to allow users to share financial I formation and pay for each other - Facebook will be an actual marketplace where those targeted adds finally have meaning and may actually work.  And of they get hacked, and you lose your email/pictures/bank card, *oh well*...
Has anyone seen this story anywhere online except for conservative sites like Daily Caller? The way this story makes it sound there is an epidemic of false "hate crimes" in American colleges. Is this really happening so frequently?   I understand being frustrated at liberal hypersensitivity on campus and I think hate crime legislation is in danger of being mis-applied. That said, judging by the comments section on the Daily Caller story and those on this thread, it seems a lot of you think this is more than just this one asshole playing a prank.   I'm not going to dignify with mention those comments that revel in minimizing/denying/trivializing one of the worst events in human history. Those who trade in that filth are clear in their bias. What is more insidious is those that would refuse to believe true acts of violence or terror against Jewish people in today's world because of the actions of this one stupid student. I do not judge Muslims living in the western world based on the rantings of a few radical clerics. They may shower accusations against the West and praise the violent excesses of Islam but their evil does not prevent me from believing a Muslim who says the US/Israel/the West has killed innocents.   It saddens me that an online forum who praises free-thinking and objective analysis will err on the side of bigoted generalization. 
Just reposted this elsewhere.   Absolutely insane. 
[deleted]
Very good.  It is obvious what they're up to, but I didn't know it had a name and a current pusher.  Thanks for that.
The top 10 or so posts this week have nothing to do with Jews. Below that there comes some Israel stuff. Not until this posting on page 2 is there any "the Jews did it" types of posts. Maybe in the comments, but I don't read all the comments. I really don't understand how that's all you see in the sub. Do you search the sub for "Jew"?
I hope you're joking
Yup and also the VIPR groups that are some weird extension of the TSA but they were doing random searches of bags at bus stops! People made a big stink about it being unconstitutional (as they should) and they ended the VIPR program in Houston, at least for now. They're pushing on so many fronts to expand the police state. 
The melting point of aluminium is 2/3 of that of the maximum temperature jet fuel burns... 
i've never come across the site before--which doesn't mean anything--but many of us "conspiracists" think the government puts out disinfo to make the truthers look wacky.   i didn't have time to watch the whole interview--that's just my gut reaction. did the architect provide any documents or a photo of him with one of the bin Ladens? the bin Ladens are a huge family and do have a construction company in Saudi Arabia--so there is a chance they may have crossed paths.   i would also hope the architect would have contacted the authorities at the time if this had actually happened...  glad you like some of my posts--i definitely try to bring some interesting points up...
The OP was putting forward a hypothesis - an interpretation (or extrapolation) which might shed some light on the news story that he linked. The Bolivian President's plane was forced to land because the US (which had been given false information about Snowden being on the plane) ordered various European countries to prohibit the Presidential plane from entering their airspace. Many of them (notably France) complied, and it caused a huge diplomatic storm in Latin America. This demonstrates that the US will go to considerable lengths to catch whistleblowers. 
I feel like Snowden is small potatoes compared to the rela issues though. I think he is a "limited hangout" for this reason. Why doesn't Snowden address the other issues that people like us talk about? He has the platform to do it.
Except for me and my monkey. 
I have never seen those two clips.  What are they from?  Would like higher resolution versions.
Big Pharma and private prisons need their fix, yo. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
In what possible way does it not?
That was his half-niece you're referring to, which isn't that bad considering that period of history. And their relationship being anything more than platonic is nothing more than rumour.
k
Jim Willie has given me great deal to think about.
And in spite of the Governor's ban on the term "global warming," Florida prepares for sea level rise and its consequences:  [It’s now, not later, for sea level rise in South Florida.](http://sealevel.climatecentral.org/news/floria-and-the-rising-sea)
I appreciate what you're doing there, but sorry I don't agree. Treating the people like the enemy with their money makes government the largest cartel in power and has nothing to do with the benefit of the people. 
&gt; *admin should go fuck a rake*  I see it right there!  Hey!  This guy hates the admins!
LOL. What a fucking joke. Why would you choose to defend someone who can't even express the concepts they are trying to espouse? His words are utter nonsense, and so are yours.  What an asshole.
&gt;the front page of /all  The FrontPage displays the subs that you're subscribed to, /r/all displays all subreddits and posts according to score. 
nice video, also Frontline's documentary on Iraq showed that the night of 9/11 the decision to go to Iraq was made. 
**[Flashback Wednesday, Mar 4, 2015](http://www.nbcwashington.com/news/local/Shots-Fired-Near-NSA-Headquarters-294909111.html):**  &gt; A police spokesperson said the NSA was investigating damage to one of its buildings that appeared to be from gunshots. No one was injured. U.S. Park Police closed down sections of the Baltimore-Washington Parkway for their investigation Tuesday evening.  &gt; After the ICC shooting, all investigating police agencies decided all forensics would go to Prince George's County Police, Prince George's Police Chief Mark Magaw said. Police linked the cases at Costco, Columbia Mall, ICC and NSA.  &gt; "My investigators worked all night to link these cases forensically," Magaw said. &gt; They believe the Walmart incident is related.  &gt; About 10:30 p.m. Tuesday, two Anne Arundel County Police officers on supplemental patrol in response to the shots fired incidents saw a car that fit the description of the suspect vehicle from Feb. 24. They stopped it near the Costco on Arundel Mills Circle, near the site of the original shooting. Officers found .380-caliber shell casings and a .380-caliber semi-automatic handgun in the car and took Young, the lone occupant of the car, into custody. The handgun was registered to Young.  [.](/r/conspiracy/comments/2xvh7k/report_of_shots_fired_near_nsa_headquarters/?submit_url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.nbcwashington.com%2Fnews%2Flocal%2FShots-Fired-Near-NSA-Headquarters-294909111.html&amp;already_submitted=true)   -------------------------------  Side Note: The dates are screwy on the news [page](http://i.imgur.com/SbMr2CW.png). -----------------------  Notice the post date and the update time and date.... --------------------------------------------
Aaaand you were given gold!
It was only a matter of time before someone attempted to take matters into their own hands in an extreme fashion. 
Of course I get called a shill for questioning things in /r/conspiracy the sub about questioning things. Way to be open minded bud.  
She had the most legit Karma
its corrected now. 
[deleted]
This is past the point for protests. They need to fight.
I didn't use a logical fallacy. If i used one you can say which one specifically or I'm just going to assume you don't know what a logical fallacy is. Here's a list knock yourself out or don't.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_fallacies  My first source was very specific. I just found it hilarious one of your sources contradicted your claims and showed and an obvious confirmation bias.
Add this to your investigation.  http://www.911myths.com/index.php/Odigo  I can agree that there appears to have been some Israeli involvement in the events of 9/11. That helicopter bit feels outrageous, perhaps like firefighters at WTC7 he was ordered to stand down?  I remain unconvinced that cruise missiles alone could have brought down all three WTC towers.   I'll admit I can find zero evidence corroborating Laffoley's story. That said, I can find zero evidence that suggests he was sowing disinfo either.  Besides finding his amazingly visionary art works and hearing about him cheerfully discussing the alien implant in his noggin.  Tis the season to love conspiracy wackiness, trolololllol trololl lol lol.  Not that I doubt he has an alien implant in his head, just, damn. Keep on rocking in the crazy world.
I didn't say the final product, I said the actual shit.
&gt;Die größte Verwechslung des tragischen Germanwings-Unglücks  &gt;Ein Bild geht um die Welt. Es zeigt Andreas Günter Lubitz. Den Mann, der den Germanwings-Airbus vorsätzlich abstürzen ließ. Fälschlicherweise wurde aber von vielen Medien auch ein anderes Foto gezeigt, das einen vollkommen Unschuldigen zeigt. Auch dieses Foto ging um die Welt. Er heißt Andreas Günter, ist 38 Jahre alt und sieht auf den ersten Blick dem Co-Piloten nicht unähnlich.  &gt;Andreas ist wie der Todes-Pilot Deutscher, wohnt aber in der Schweiz. Offenbar wurde er durch seinen ähnlich klingenden Namen in die Katastrophe mit hineingezogen. Er ist weder Pilot, noch hat er irgendwas mit Germanwings zu tun. Und das Missverständnis klärt er in einer unglaublich souveränen Art und Weise persönlich auf.  The biggest mix-up in the tragic Germanwings crash.   A photo is circulating the world. It shows Andreas Gunter Lubitz. The man who let the Germanwings-Airbus crash. However a different photo of a completely innocent man was also published by some in the media. This photo is circulating the world, too. His name is Andreas Gunter, 38 years old, who at first sight looks similar to the co-pilot.   Andreas is German, like the dead co-pilot, but lives in Switzerland. Ostensibly his similar name caused him to be associated with the catastrophe. He's not a pilot, nor does he have anything to do with Germanwings. And he's personally clearing up the misunderstanding in a unbelievably sovereign (?) way.   ...There's a rough translation for you. Looks like it was just a mix up by the press.  
Non-mobile: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vril  ^That's ^why ^I'm ^here, ^I ^don't ^judge ^you. ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble. [^WUT?](https://github.com/xl0/LittleHelperRobot/wiki/What's-this-all-about%3F)
whats with this?
"Most people think the Puritans immigrated to America to be free from persecution; but it was really so they would be free to persecute." ~ Gore Vidal
Interesting thoughts.
&gt;"I don't think people here are intimidated by military operations in our community **although it will raise some eyebrows**" says Charlie Amos, a Bastrop resident.   What a chill thing for you to say, Charlie, considering your membership in the [Ministry Of Nuts](http://ministryofnuts.com/ministry-nuts/charlie-amos/). A great person to interview for this.  &gt;Operation Jade Helm is expected to launch in at least 20 cities across seven states in the South Western US. With more than twelve hundred participants, in Texas alone, ranging from members of the Navy Seals to Army Special Forces, and Marine Special Operations.   "As long as people know what's going on **they will be accepting of it**" exclaims Joan Armstrong, a Bastrop resident.  "Part of me I get it but at the same time part of me with what goes on in the world today is **just a little Leary" says Tracy Stamper**.
It's all good. I just really dislike the guy. I used to be a fan until I actually came across the dude in person. He is Such an asshole. 
This is doesn't make any sense. If you wanted to use this as a pretext to invade Afghanistan and Iraq why say the hijackers are from Saudi Arabia? You can literally pick any country in the world because you are making it up. Why Saudi Arabia?  Are these supposed planners simultaneously criminal masterminds and stupid rubes who picked the wrong country? This is what you would have to believe. 
No proof needs to be offered.  It is simply a well worded educated guess of how things work.
Making it illegal to question the government sounds like a fantastic idea!  /s
Not to be a contrarian, but it seems to me that the proper decision was reached: I was (and still am) under the impression that, especially when it comes to public figures, libel ex vi termini excludes opinions as actionable statements.  It seems like a lot of the comments regard this as a bad legal decision. I'm surprised that users of this subreddit would be in favor of this case going in the opposite direction (i.e., where the newspaper was found to have committed libel), considering that any cases that have a chilling effect on subjective speech should be anathema to a group of people who wish to express non-mainstream opinions, e.g., those who argue for theories of events considered "fringe" ideas by the average person.  Edit: fixed misspelling that changed the meaning of a statement.
lol hell never be allowed back.
You totally missed the point. Put yourself in the shoes of a person making up the cover up story. Why say the hijackers came from Saudi Arabia if the goal is to get into Iraq and Afghanistan? If it's made up you can pick any country you want. Why not pick the country/countries you actually want to invade?
If you wanna run some tests, I'm all for it. Truth is, I also have never heard a plane crash into a building so I have no other option than taking an educated guess. If you can get your hands on a couple 767's, I'll start looking for some skyscrapers and we can get an accurate reading on what it *really* sounds like.  &gt;In fact, I bet a 767 hitting a skyscraper does sound like an explosion, since that's what people reported hearing when a 767 hit a skyscraper.  I bet thermite, in the volume required to level a 100+ story building, sounds like an explosion too. 
First off, Dr. Frank Greening (the guy in the video "missing evidence) Has never called himself a metallurgist, he calls himself a research scientist dealing with nuclear spectroscopy . Please show me where he is described as a metallurgist.   Please give me a reference that supports you claim. I'm calling BS unless you can give me a source.  Dr Greening is more a truther than not.   He is now collaborating with Dr. David Ray Griffin (you know who Dr. David Ray Griffin is, right?) on Dr. Griffin’s forthcoming book about WTC-7, due out September 1st, "The Mysterious Collapse of World Trade Center 7".  [source](http://noliesradio.org/archives/3717)  Here's a few quotes from him:    "NIST’s collapse hypothesis is not physically realistic and is not well supported by observations of the behavior of Building 7 during its collapse. I certainly believe that an alternative collapse initiation and propagation hypothesis is called for; an hypothesis that more accurately reflects the reality of what happened to WTC 7 on September 11th 2001."    "This leads to a predicted heating rate of 7.46 °C/min and a maximum temperature for the floor framing beams and girders near the critical column 79 of about 300 °C, or barely half the temperatures estimated for these structural members in the NIST WTC 7 Draft Report."    "Other aspects of NIST’s simulation also appear to be quite arbitrary and unphysical. Thus the fire on floor 12 was prescribed to start “near the center of the south face at an assigned time of 12:00 noon.” This is a strange choice of ignition time given that the WTC 7 fires were supposedly started by flaming debris from the collapse of WTC 1 at 10:29 a.m. It implies that some of the flaming material in the WTC 1 debris that settled near WTC 7 remained dormant for about an hour and a half before spontaneously igniting fires that were subsequently observed on floor 12."    "I would therefore ask NIST to explain how and why all lateral supports acting on column 79, from more than 30 upper floors, were simply ripped out or otherwise detached from their very secure connections in only 0.2 seconds?"  [source](http://the911forum.freeforums.org/withering-critique-of-the-new-wtc7-report-t44.html) 
&gt; **regularly** find themselves operating in   I guess it will make it easier for them. Kind of like the Boston police [regularly operated in terrain such as Watertown, MA](http://www.theblaze.com/stories/2013/04/23/ready-how-watertown-door-to-door-search-for-bombing-suspects-did-not-violate-the-fourth-amendment/) 
We can still blame the child nazi mudslimes for everything though right your emminences?
The Chinese also say this in Sun Tsu's Art of War, which is required reading for the CIA. It's almost like any group willing to slaughter in warfair would also be willing to protray deceptions. As the old saying goes, "All is fair in love and war" and those fart sounds love thier war.
Ha! There were two. Fixed 'em both. Time for a new phone/uncracked screen.
You are playing into the game, it's not her but the controllers. Why are we fighting Clinton, and not the people behind it? James speaks truth, I don't know the dude, but he contributes. Why you so hell bent on dis-railing this community? 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I still get goosebumps when I remember that spontaneous groundswell of patriotism... Well, [gerseberms, actually](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=57oUeO_OJMg). And that's what's really important, isn't it?
yes an they were pretty much for the same reasons listed in the picture
Especially if you're Pro-vaccine.  You'd want to know if the crap you have such confidence is is actually doing damage or not.  Instead, just trust them.  No one said anything about banning vaccines entirely, talk about putting words into one's mouth.  They just want them to be risk free.  I don't think that's too much to ask.  And if that can't be done, well maybe there are alternatives.  Maybe mankind needs to work on that instead of accepting that things are A-OK when they clearly do damage.
then who was phone!?
There you go
I would say Israel and Saudi and the gulf states are extremely close. There's a good chance Israel knew 9/11 was going to happen. Saudi Arabia was created by England. Mi5 gave the thumbs up for 9/11. Israel has every single radical Islamic terrorist group infiltrated. We deported 200 Israelis spys for a reason. Our "allies" attacked us so we take out their enemies while everybody wonders why sunnis are crazy were donating billions to the people who fund radical sunnies.  edit: lol Israel is allowed to fly over Saudi territory to bomb Iran. And get refueled and search helicopters incase they eject. Keep the downvotes coming 
The bad war is when you are fighting someone else's enemy.  The good war is when you are fighting your actual enemy.   Most of the action going on in the world is not even war. It's systematic slaughter of unarmed people.   The world will be a better place once the war starts.
I still haven't seen any links to anything rebutting what I have to say.  Just down votes because thats all you can do.  When you are out of legitimate points to argue, I guess that is the only thing you have left to do.    I provided several links for interviews and footage from the clean up at ground zero.  The only things you have done is attack the messenger.   Which is the only thing you can do.  The message is solid.
&gt; I understand why the admins implemented the timer, to some extent; I believe that they were trying to stop people who spam single letter/word replies across multiple threads. But there are so many active moderators at the moment that having such a site wide limit based on downvotes is determinantal and the admins should alter this setting to allow users with controversial karma scores to be able to comment as they wish  Thank you for this. As I have stated previously, this only happens to me when i criticize Israel in r/worldnews. I am 4 years in. I do not make untoward remarks. It is a known fact that Israel pays people to attend social media and skew the discussions. When word of this happening spreads on Reddit, I believe it will be the start of the end of this once grand site. The free flow of ideas is what made this site great. The lack of it will make it less than mediocre and spell its demise. 
http://imgur.com/68fNspP
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's sort of amazing how the Secret Government keeps showing who it is over &amp; over but people just want to create strawmen/women.  People thought Obama was some Marxist who was going to overthrow the Pentagon.  Now people think Hillary is Hitler.  Maybe the Pentagon is stacking the comments section.  The assassination ring was JSOC and Cheney.  Michael Canavan, former head of JSOC, was noted to have been the one to "identify" Ron Brown's dead body.  Google Michael Canavan + 9/11.  It's the same people over &amp; over:  the military &amp; intel, not some Arkansas hick.  Hillary is a patsy and a useful idiot.  If you think Hillary's going to overthrow the Pentagon, you deserve what's coming from the Pentagon.
[deleted]
[deleted]
As opposed to you, who goes around calling people jerks. 
[deleted]
Nice try North Korea!  Joking :p We both know it's way more complicated than some conventionally organized shadow government. 
 Can someone please point out one of these whitehouse petitions that actually changed policy or did something tangible?  Thanks. 
They called a flimsy bunch of cloth and sticks ridden by two brothers  in North Carolina an airplane...  Gotta start somewhere.
Also. Capitalism is a system based on greed and control. It values $ over people. The system itself it corrupt, hence the rampant corruption. There are better ways to go about living on this planet. Check out The Venus Project.
&gt; Why are YOU trying to twist my words to make it look like I said that I have a problem in r/worldnews with other posts that aren't critical of Israel?  How is your original post critical of Israel?
[A Discussion of "Analysis of Structural Response of WTC 7 to Fire and Sequential Failures Leading to Collapse"](http://web.archive.org/web/20150320161559/http://www.htmlpublish.com/newTestDocStorage/DocStorage/13fd705cf5944cdb9b8870f3ff14293f/Brookman-Vol-33-Oct2012.htm)     &gt;the paper lacks references to public sources of information sufficient to verify the authors' assumptions and conclusions. For example, structural calculations demonstrating the "walk-off" failure mechanism that hypothetically triggered the progressive collapse are unavailable.   
Aren't roasts supposed to be funny because the target is so well accomplished that its obvious its all in jest?  Hannibal's joke was on the money - Biber's advisors thought it would work over well for "everyone to get their laugh in" and move on. Won't work though...
We do not need a "God" to "give" us morality. Take responsibility for you. Accept responsibility for the results of what you do. If you need to be led can only do as you are told you are lost, even to yourself.
You aren't immune.  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2014/10/01/dillon-taylor-shooting-justified_n_5912976.html 
looks like that mod got wild and made the money on the side instead of how getting through reddit admins.  now is out and maybe it will start talking
[deleted]
This psychopathic personalities must be kept from power if the Republic is to breath the free air again. 
and do not want hillary, i want ron paul or the ext seal/wrestler... forgot his name.
You know if a FedEx driver gets into a minor accident they will probably lose their job, even if it's not their fault, FedEx knows how important a safe driver is to their operation and public image.  Why are cops held to lower standards than DELIVERY DRIVERS.  If a cop is involved in any kind of bullshit, you know the exact definition of bullshit too, he should be fined, fired and banned from any form of law enforcement permanently.  
The title says "I can prove it wasn't an airplane" 
Meta posts are actually explicitly allowed, as stated by both the rules and the moderator, so that's a bit of a poor argument.  Please go read the /r/news rules sidebar.  Or do you mean strict list of banned sites?
or Hopi tradition where their ant-friends (check what their word for this is for a laugh)  took them down underground to survive a cataclysm
anu-nakki [antfriends]
You're putting words in my mouth. I didn't say to post any documents to Reddit.
Please zombies, please zombies, please zombies.  I'm hoping it's zombies.
Well you still can't post so in the meantime post at /r/Videos_V2   What do you make of them blaming /r/conspiracy though?
&gt;  was 3 US soldiers acting ON THEIR OWN who abducted a 12 year old Japanese girl.  I don't want to burst your bubble, but rape case's like the ones in Columbia are very common.  If you think this most visible case in Okinawa is somehow isolated.  You are wrong.
A rose by any other name.
Yep. I admit I don't have the balls to do what he does. But if everyone was willing to give up the basic comforts in life like he has the system would change overnight.
The economy sucks and people are not building things. Tons of tradesmen are out of work and much of the work is going to the guys with the most seniority. 
http://www.veteranstoday.com/2013/08/08/i-can-prove-that-it-was-not-an-airplane-that-hit-the-pentagon-major-general-albert-n-stubblebine/  I tend to believe a retired Major General over a bunch of lying politicians and corporate owned propaganda news outlets. 
Aside from having explosive residue in the van, they failed lie detectors, and lied to a police officer.  Last time I checked that was against the law.  Cops can lie to you, you cant lie to them.  They will usually be dicks about that to and give you obstruction charges
There is evidence that the US brought in Nazi scientists and others during Operation: Paperclip. But there is no evidence - whatsoever - that the Nazis ever experimented with advanced forms of mind control (i.e., beyond propaganda).   Not saying I would doubt the claim if presented with information, but there just isn't any evidence that the Nazis were experimenting with programs like MK ULTRA. I could be wrong. 
Doesn't stop people from going full retard.
That‘s putting it mildly. Lol
The human mind was hijacked a very long 'time' ago by a foreign installation. Our idea of an independent 'self' or 'identity' is the by-product of this thing.
I will say this with regard to light poles. They're designed to snap off at the base in the event of a collision with a car, which significantly reduces the impact to the vehicle. So, the light poles in this case look like light poles hit by any object. 
This isn't unusual actually. I work for the largest staffing company in the country (who happens to employ most of Amazon's temp workers), and I can tell you that this type of agreement usually applies to anyone working in a temp-staff environment. I could not just quit my job and automatically get hired at Amazon.  Most of the rules that Amazon has in place are completely legitimate and merely there to ensure privacy of their warehouse procedures, etc. 
You haven't rebutted the fact that at distance... after it appears that the bottom of a ship has gone below the horizon... we can zoom in and see the bottom of the ship still. There is no curvature.
Are you newly awake? let me see if I can find something that explains it better then I could. You've got a lot of recent history to catch up on.
this really is the funniest conspiracy theory of all time. 
Important to note that this is used mainly for advertising purposes. I'm not saying I'm ok with it, because it really is irritating. I just don't believe there is anything overtly malicious about it, just Facebook selling your information to advertisers.
Watch this video and keep all of this new information in mind:  [26 Year Border Patrol agent interview regarding the state of our border](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZnkSXosZhic&amp;feature=player_detailpage#t=375)  Key points:  * Russian mafia is the most influential organized crime in Mexico City * Tuscon border agents were told they would not receive additonal ammo until Oct 2015 * The govt is intentionally overloading the Border Patrol with immigration issues to distract 
Let's all save up and go on a boat trip.
[deleted]
In need  of,one might say. Yes. Yes of course.
lol you really are off the wall .... Its really really sad you did that, i thought that grammer habbit ended on youtube when i was 16 .. You understood what i said, to the point in being able to correct my grammer. Yet you ignorantly went to attack... I got on you for claiming someone wasnt thinking, because they're  thinking about something you dont agree with, while claiming a title yourself that denotes thinking about everything possible. Its sad youll go and spout bs at someone without legitimizing your attack.... 
[deleted]
Dont forget your space blanket either.
That would be ambiguously ironic if it were the later!
The thought that you believe this is making my head explode.
Nope. War begins and ends with the existence of the state. End the state, end the wars. 
I like how the artist managed a boob even in the T-Rex's jaw.
everything is backwards for these people.  religion = destroys spirituality. slavery = freedom. science (scientific method) = not science. education = destroys spirituality,knowledge. global cooling = global warming. priests, police = pedophiles, pedophile protectors. healthcare = destroys health. media = mis/dis-informs, etc ....   I had a conversation with a statistical analyst of a firm hired by pharmaceutical companies.. He said if they study conducted yielded the less desired outcome, pharmaceutical company will have analysis firm use a different statistical equation/analysis (though "less accurate") -- which will yield them their preferred outcome. science = sellable.  .. statistical studies = random information.   .. etc etc
April fools?
I have seen the article or a similar one.  They said the more intelligent officer tended to get bored with police work.
/r/therealconspiracy here we come!
the [last paragraph](http://www.bibliotecapleyades.net/esp_orionzone_8h.htm) mentions my original statement
That sounds like a nasty video I saw one time.
http://www.jewishhistory.org/julius-caesar-and-the-jews/  Looks like they backed him into power there son.  
I think we can agree on the likely time frame as well unfortunately :(.  I think it can/could/should happen sooner, but as you've pointed out, it is certainly an uphill battle.    It may not happen for 500 years.  History is full of surprises though, so I try and keep working towards a closer goal, as I hope you will as well.
Wow I didn't even think to compare the students today to what they were 100 years ago! There's so much more knowledge out there!
Pentagon is surrounded by hyper advanced antimissile battery. Why was something allowed to hit it?
The Dutch were probably like   "When have you *ever* seen flowers or perfume in Israel?"  "Yeah, we should probably look into that"
Symbolic gesture, my guess... but yeah, unenforceable in reality.
Please bother to read your own links. It in no way supports your repeated and implied claim. 
This was was also on the front page of r/libertarian.
It demonstrates how many people feel uneasy having their suppositions challenged.
I guess you missed how an entire major US city was locked down for days, while police randomly walked in houses, confiscated things they didn't like etc.  Dry run for martial law anyone?
Great point,  I watched wrestling in several years myself,  but will think about watching it now to see what they're hyping. 
At 14? 
And nobody bats an eye.
Bans are becoming a trend. It's the cool thing to do instead of addressing your own state's problems. 
Unless some people are carpooling and making some profit en mass...such as uber?  
You get downvoted for suggesting that this may actually be a harmless evac exercise which to me, very well looks like it. This entire sub has turned into a collection of fear mongering tinfoil hat conspiracy theories and forcing fear of the worst in every situation.  I fully expect some jackoff to say some shit like "Wake up". Well you know what? You wake up. Not everything is a conspiracy, not everything is bad, and the government isn't out to get us and put us in prison camps. America isn't some experimental land of crossbred races and brainwashing.   These people say they want a revolution, you people say you want to take to the streets and make their voices heard. Stop complaining on the Internet and fucking do it! You won't, because you're too comfortable sitting in your computer chair or thumbing around on your phones and don't wanna get locked up in prison. You say you would fight for your ideals, but apparently your personal comfort is more important than what you think is going wrong.
Dzhokhar Tsarnaev isn't denying that he was the bomber, he's going with a "my brother made me do it" testimony 
Iran has shown INCREDIBLE restraint so far, and I don't see them changing that stance until the rest of the world joins Iran's side against the blatant warmongering of Zionist-Jews.
Why is it that we have still shots of Tsarnaev near the "bomb" that allegedly killed Martin Richard, but we cant see the video that the pic was taken from? 
Do you believe everything you hear in the media?  Dzhokhar Tsarnaev has been a willing participant in this Urban Shield drill since it happened. That he would stick to whatever the script says is hardly surprising.  Its a shame to watch the government and media still pretending like they got away with another false flag while the public has already figured it out.  Shaggy Defense
His posts are full of (almost intentional) misinformation.    I honestly cant tell if he is troll or not. 
Because it takes rocket science to point out the obvious.
Mainstream black culture is interesting. I was having a conversation with my black friend a few days ago and we were agreeing that it's so stereotypically low-brow in terms of how childish and vulgar it is, especially over the last 20 years. It has morphed in to a commercialized commercialized thing, BET and black radio and so on. It's no longer underground, raw, and communicative of the black experience like it was in the 80s and early 90s. It's like the most simplistic and lowest-common-denomentator artists are featured nowadays, by extremely commercialized record labels run by white guys.   I think that's just because it's the easiest way to sell products; it keeps black people buying those sneakers or those cars or those clothes or that jewelry or whatever, and wearing it as a status symbol, instead of building wealth in a more lasting and meaningful way, like paying off debt. Prioritizing the short-term over the long-term.  This is a result of consumerism, not multiculturalism. To say it's a result of multiculturism makes the false assumption that blacks just _are_ like MSM black culture, and that it accurately represents them. Yet if you talk to many black people, they often do not feel this way, they feel mischaracterized and that it showcases a false image of black people to white america, who then comes away with racist opinions about how terrible blacks are. But also they don't like it because it teaches _black america_ bad values that actually become a part of the culture. Many elderly black men talk about this.   Divide and conquer, my friend. It keeps black people who buy in to this MSM culture in a consumerist, statist, pro-"status quo", anti-intellectual mindset, and it keeps white people hating black people (or this cartoonish corporate mischaracterization of them that they are confusing with the actual black people who live in America). It's a win/win from a political/corporate viewpoint to push things like BET. It's like inception in to the mind of black America, planting ideas about their culture from the inside, and they think they thought of them, but they're really just corporate ideas. It's a false mask. Divide and conquer.    This is a subtle conversation that's hard to have because of immediate cries of "racism" from people who are offended because that's how they've been programmed to feel, it's a way of cordoning off certain topics in the public conversation.  When I scanned your post the first time, my immediate reaction was to consider you a potential racist, and I'm sure many here did the same (judging by your vote count) even though what you said wasn't particularly overtly racist or anything. It just "sounds" racist. It's just programmed in to us by our culture in this era to respond that way to anything even remotely regarding anything important related to race, so that people don't wake up to this whole divide and conquer thing they've got going on in regards to black America. Another way to maintain the status quo.   On the next topic, I also agree with what you've said with the democrats dragging people from other countries in to America. That ALSO serves corporate interests, because those people can get work visas, like the H1-B visa, and then they will take jobs below minimum wage, where they cannot quit because their visa depends on it! They are basically slaves. This obviously serves corporate interests because it lowers the price of labor, and it hurts everyone else who already lives in America and is looking for a decent-paying job. The democrat party post-Carter is owned by corporations, just like the republican party has been since Reagan (at least). So of course the democrats are going to serve corporate interests. And they can conveniently hide behind the shield of "well that's racism!" if anyone says that maybe bringing in a million immigrants all at once to do jobs for super cheap is a bad idea. So it works out well for the corporations, which works out well for the democrats.   So you see... this twisted multiculturalism you bemoan is actually a side effect of corporatism! A side effect of our corporatocracy, and our media being controlled by corporations. So do not bemoan the multitude of cultures blending in to one, instead bemoan the corporations who have ruined our culture, media, and government, and used the idea of the blending of cultures as an shield to hide behind as they commit bad deeds.   That ended up being extremely long, but it's a delicate point and I wanted to make it correctly.   tl;dr - Multicultralism isn't bad, corporations and corrupt governments running everything is bad, which gives multiculturalism the appearance of being bad because it gets used and abused by them. 
[deleted]
In a large crowd? I don't think so.
I honestly would not be surprised if you were to attack me if we were sitting across a table from each other.  Take a few breathes man, you're very emotional and aggressive right now.
startpage is great, so is ixquick - its also startpage but a little more secure.  Duck duck go isn't so great, maybe I'm paranoid but I just don't feel safe using it, plus startpage uses google anonymously so you still get the "relevant" results  One more thing:  How the hell do you get away from GoogleTube - YouTube
Thanks and you're right about the run-on sentence structure or wordiness. Thanks. Sorry.
Yeah, it appears that Einstein and e = mc^2 were limited hangout to prevent holofractal theory from being popularized. Wrap your brain around that.
the [KRSone](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j0jonG_SA3M) aint too bad neither  also [prof griff](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PV_wN-kqwaQ)
If i may play devils advocate, look at the grey straps on his shoulder and under the detonated photo, are those the same?
I'm a resident in Indiana and I can tell anyone commenting here that this law goes far beyond what the federal law provided for. The "religious freedom" being protected is the "right" to deny fellow Americans service based on their sexual orientation since Indiana has no such protections in our State Constitution.   Gov. Pence was asked 6 times on national television a simple yes or no question. "Does this law allow people in Indiana to be openly discriminated against based on if they are gay?"  Six times he refused to answer because the answer is "yes".    Its no secret here.   People have the religious freedom to pray how they want, where they want to whoever they want. Religious freedom does not include the right to make other people live by those choices. Many of us here find it ironic that people would be up in arms if we enacted sharia law but if its biblical law, its all fine and dandy.   This law doesn't protect any religious freedoms. It codifies intolerance based on Christian teachings. 
There isn't one. Just stills and implications. And assholes.
Not dismissing that 
Playing devil's advocate here, but have you ever been prosecuted and had a lawyer tell you exactly what case angle to run with?? Neither have I, but I've seen Gone Girl... They want the easiest, safest option for you and mostly for them.
such as?
Her resumes on Wall Street probably got rejected. 
[deleted]
Reddit kinda looks at its freedom of speech culture and main rules when you sign up the way the government, police and judicial system look at their rules in the constitution.  Just at an accelerated pace.    If you ever wonder where they got it from, wonder no more.  They just had to look in their own back yard.
duh an egyptian researcher said that. meanwhile, moses's name is literally on buildings, just as the bible said, he was head builder. Moses brought alot of mason teachings with him, because that knowledge can be used for both good and evil. It's ultimate incarnation was in Soloman. They're still just mad Israel pwned em 50 years ago. and 4000(? think that's about right) years ago as well. Egypt's record vs. Israel is the Generals vs. the Globetrotters
[It may be based on the Kenites theory](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kenite#Kenite_hypothesis)
I'm lost for words; I can't even grasp the concept of the communication your trying to convey
[deleted]
“First they ignore you, then they ridicule you, then they fight you, and then you win.”   ~~Mahatma Gandhi~~ -George W. Bush 
[deleted]
Spoken like a true open minded Scientist, keep up the good work Shredder.
And so am I, technically, through ancestors descended form King Edward, the grandson of King John of England, which I believe is who the aforementioned individuals are descended from as well. Statistically, it's fairly insignificant, for anyone of European descent (of which I am half).
Havent been. Are /r/worldpolitics mods frequent users of the the old "US news isn't world news" tactic?
“There’s little that we dispute. It was him.”  Dzhokhar Tsanaev's defense attorney Judy Clarke
The sad truth is, fascism looks like it did win.
Yes, plant a few acres of corn and wheat and soybeans and you're all set !
The people who say that are probably not interested in any rebuttal of the subject. That meme has been used in jest in stupid, completely unrelated threads that weren't meant for a serious conversation to begin with. You could engage them, but it's set up to be a waste of time.  I started to noticed them a couple weeks ago.
Bicks would be shat as the banhammer smokes from wind friction. 
[deleted]
He would certainly be amused.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Scientology has *big* bucks, maybe a "donation" was given? then again, at the time, CoS getting away with murder (i mean that literally).
Don't you think a group like this would be more aware of surveillance? As in, they'd know where cameras were? 
George Carlin is the shit,  that entire standup is worth watching and rewatching. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I only FOUND this post because it was in the TOP page.  It's on r/conspiracy *front page*, bro. You're fine. It's not 'new', it's *top*.
No, you are incorrect, it has been deleted https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7lGWaQ8BMAI
Please, give me your version of what happened. I am curious what your explanation is. Since you see so much room for doubt.  Also please show me your evidence for why US agencies are definitively involved.    
Link the supposed video or fuck off.
Neither, address the video. how is it not proof ? Please explain your reasoning.
People today seem really confused as to what the definition of spam is.  Honestly, its not just you. I see this confusion all the time.
I'd like to add [inoculation theory.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inoculation_theory)
Where was this posted? 
The connection is a clear as crystal.  Just because something is a joke doesn't mean it doesn't have sinister intentions. And as history has taught us, sinister intentions are many times DELIBERATELY hidden behind the disguise of a joke.
# [Proof of removal](http://www.reddit.com/r/RemovedComments/comments/310ly2/6_comment_by_ucarottus_maximus_removed_from/)  Don't delete your original comment please. :)
Yes deleted. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7lGWaQ8BMAI Please see the video and explain how it is not deleted.
Everything is connected.
If you read Marty Weiss' accounts on Auschwitz, you will find that the numbers mentioned were only about 400 thousand Jews. Not in millions. Also there is no mention of Gas Chambers by him.
Thanks for your message Bloodwillow, I managed to catch (and screenshot) it before you deleted it, bad timing eh bud. Your knowledge of basic Javascript is all very impressive, but I know, as do you that you're talking crap. Stop trolling.
You screenshot the comment I reposted.  Man you're good.
In old western parlance, our government is one bought son of a bitch.
[deleted]
You guys think there will be another huge disastrous event at the jade helm drills, because there have been drills going on side by side since pretty much every "event" including 9/11. Wonder what they will pull off this time
&gt;Forcing door to door searches is martial law plain and simple.  Sorry, a door-to-door search is not martial law. 
Yah that Bush stuff is all true...
If I took a screenshot of that and used it in 6 months to illustrate how kooky you are no one would stick around to listen that it was an April fools css gag.  If perception is reality, manipulating perception alters reality.
One of them was wearing a hat that either looked like Craft International, or the Punisher logo.
These People Who claim to be Jews, Have No genetic Ties to the true Semites, whom are Dark skinned. Please Research The Empire of the Khazars, One of the most Powerful Countries To have Ever Stood, They converted to Judaism For POLITICAL PURPOSES. These people Have been behind And Profitted off of every major war in history, namely the Rothschilds.  
[deleted]
If you were to apply Occam's razor to the Watergate, there would have been no Watergate.
Who hurt you?
Blackwater I guess
Wow! Interesting find. How convenient for the cops that now need to get rid of incriminating evidence. 
bingo. remember kids, *"if it an't broke, dont fix it"*. This system isn't designed to counter a threat anymore, it's designed to make money. they aren't worried that there are no more hot days left summer, they just want to find a way to sell their lemonade
It wasn't just fighting communism, but promoting capitalism. It has done so well that most people won't even consider any alternative ways to allocate resources. 
[deleted]
I know, didn't you hear her panting?
I bought his book and have read that.  It's very clear what is going on now.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Vulcans  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reality-based_community  They are creating "the story of your life" for you and making that your reality.
Now this has to be April 1st related 
That's a good question - and I *don't* know for sure if it's fake and lies.  Matter of fact, I wouldn't doubt that at least *some* of the information is possibly based on actual factual material.  However, I think it's important to have a good foundation of logic and critical thinking for the information one gives any credence to.  I'd almost rather someone have a good, sound argument for standing behind something that ultimately ends up being proven false than for someone to jump willy nilly forward on something saying "It's true!  It's true!  I believe!" based on no real factual basis, evidence, or rational thinking.  Now, I'm, again, not saying that the information in the OP is "definitely flat out false and lies".  No.  I just think people should be careful with a lot of the information that's out there is all.
/u/trollabot all-ur-booby-r-2-me  
^ And this, people, is the 1 month account that /u/Douche_Nuts meant to post from when he replied to himself... read [the thread (np)](https://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3109zc/the_holocaust_in_three_images/) yourself, and it's fairly obvious. They were tag-team-trolling starting at exactly the same time (about 2hrs and +20 votes.)
Can you watch a video titled "Sofia Smallstorm Unravelling Sandy Hook" because it can show you how the Mainstream Media is used to make a drill look like the real thing occurred. We call it manufactured terrorism or a staged event when that occurs.  There have been many lately.    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m1yfJDCMU64
/u/trollabot The_Free_Marketeer
&gt;Yes, they were. You know it, and I know it. The state just has to charge them with other crimes to make it seem like they're not using the judicial system to censor free speech.  Thus "None of those people were arrested or charged in any capacity for simply discussing the holocaust"  Exaggeration, insinuation and dishonesty are tools used to push a narrative. All I've seen so far is people exaggerated the claims of legal action, insinuating it was for some "other" reason and being dishonest about the reasons it occurred.  
I've only been able to get my nuts fully inserted into one vagina. Do you have any nutdouche tips?
Lies that are taught as common knowledge isn't funny. 
It's like organizing an effort to ridicule people who like surfing.  Who the fuck cares if anyone likes surfing!?  The reason they put so much effort into it is that it hurts them. They don't like the uncomfortable feeling of uncertainty and so they attack it.  Same as people who vehemently defend their ridiculous religious stories. 
Again, more attacks on conspiracy theorists under the guise of April fools.  This makes several publications and an entire Reddit Sub all with the same idea this year.    My, what a coincidence!
&gt;its an april fools joke. But yes, we can now see if they really wanted they can do it whenever. **Who cares though?** This is plebbit... I suck reddit administrators cocks in real life.  Do you care now if a reddit admins did that to your words?  
/u/trollabot tyrion9
[Don't take my word for it. **Read it for yourself**](http://www.come-and-hear.com/gittin/gittin_57.html#PARTb)
[deleted]
If you use RES you can tag him yourself.
Fuck no, I just googled what holocaust revisionism is. You cant just throw articles at people. Just give a simple definition of what holocaust revisionism is.
I'm pretty sure the Rothschilds assassinated JFK. Well probably got the CIA to carry it out
It doesn't defy Newtonian physics.... Engineers every where would be calling it out... Yet they aren't. There is a very big difference from free fall and very close to free fall that can easily be achieved with those types of forces at play
It really fucking annoys me that dude keeps calling him 'Poppy.'  Use a fucking name, this aint a childrens book.  
/u/trollabot b_mack15
You two should get a room.
I second he recommendation of this book. It was very eye opening for me.
&gt;It's an excellent point, and one I'm fully aware of.  &gt;I was just having fun. I was actually going to spend a half hour debunking their lame shit but I got too caught up in replying to all their provoking comments... I know, it's a problem I have.  But you never did debunk it....  &gt;But the thing is, they are posting nothing of any substance to debunk. All their "sources" are so obviously terrible it almost seems a waste of time to do anything about it.  So you don't, so... [can you actually contribute anything of substance to any sort of conversation?](http://imgur.com/FIxKV4Q)   
***Analyzing reputable_opinion***  * comments per month: 8.3  * posts per month: 0.1 *^lurker* * favorite sub [conspiracy](http://NP.reddit.com/r/conspiracy) * favorite words: wealth, expect, respect * age 1 years 7 months  * profanity score 0.7% *^Gosh ^darnet ^gee ^wiz* * trust score 117% *^tell ^them ^your ^secrets!*  * Fun facts about reputable_opinion     * *"I've never seen the promo clips before, only the poster and the event."*     * *"I've seen the video you linked before."*     * *"I'm a fucking debunker, a scientist."*     * *"I'm a scientist, and a really nice person without any criminal record."*     * *"I've demonstrated enough times that I am decent, trustworthy and good natured."*     * *"I've been vetted countless times, and I rarely even get questions at borders."*     * *"I am perfectly fine with cops investigating conspiracy theorists claiming they have a dirty bomb."*     * *"I've tried to ascertain that myself, and besides trying to contact relatives that don't exist, or any of her 'friends' - I'm out of ideas."* 
And governments were the leading cause of non-natural death in the 20th century, responsible for killing over **263 Million** people; Democide.
Lim it id hang out. They're getting desperate.
Then post your 3.5MB pic if you are so positive mine is wrong.  It sounds like you're just afraid.  [And yeah, you can see the "pixel" in the youtube video.](https://youtu.be/FrUixFDW3Ws?t=343)  Oh, and I know you're just going to keep on ignoring this but [here's another angle of her running](http://i.imgur.com/5YvQOdM.jpg) (Oh! And it's in your precious 3888x2592 dimensions! Yay!)  I took the liberty putting a circle around her leg.  If you zoom in, and use a color picker (please feel free to use your copy of the pic so you know I didn't alter it), you'll see the dark spots in the area I encircled...are dark red.  Weird, eh?  
&gt; There is no way think is a honest representation of the WTC 7 collapse without major cognitive dissonance. &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; And for those of you who do think that NIST model above genuinely depicts the collapse seen on video, let us have the input data for peer review if there's nothing to hide. &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; Declaring "national security" to hide the model data is cause for major concern because the model looks nothing like reality, especially considering the model omitted shear studs and stiffeners on girder A2001 / floor 13 where the collapse sequence initiated in said model. Steel Structures don't completely and symmetrically collapse, yet alone achieve free fall acceleration, without the aid of demolition devices...  You've said it all. Great comment.
You, /u/Douche_Nuts -- a confirmed sockpuppeteer -- have accused me of using alts, accused me of being a neo-nazi, accused me of being a racist, etc, **all without offering a single shred of evidence.**  Whether it's intentional or not, you're engaging in hasbara thread-derailment tactics [i.e. avoid, at all costs, the topic of conversation, and just make repetitive personal attacks]
Perception was a huge part of our jobs when I worked security.  We'd received complaints of guards standing around fraternizing, when in actuality the one being relieved from post was being briefed.  It was crazy to me because it was the exact scenario we had been warned about in orientation.
You'll need to provide some evidence for your paranoid accusations. And remember, /u/Douche_Nuts -- **you're** the one who has been caught using alts.  If you're so sure about your position, why not use evidence to argue it, rather than simply making personal attacks?  Anybody can see your only intention in this thread has been to derail, disrupt, and ensure that any conversation about the subject of the post is buried amidst your bullshit.
Nice straw man assumption.
***Analyzing OnSpeakerCrab***  * comments per month: 100 *^I ^have ^an ^opinion ^on ^everything* * posts per month: 100 *^reddit ^is ^my ^personal ^facebook* * favorite sub [conspiracy](http://NP.reddit.com/r/conspiracy) * favorite words: government, never, really * age 0 years 10 months  * profanity score 1% *^Gosh ^darnet ^gee ^wiz* * trust score 95.7% *^tell ^them ^your ^secrets!*  * Fun facts about OnSpeakerCrab     * *"I am looking for follow ups now."*     * *"I'm a fan."*     * *"I've seen them legitimately go after are ex-members and journalists."*     * *"I've had success so far."*     * *"I've heard theories for different worldwide power outages- and by power, of course, we mean electricity."*     * *"I've also experienced what I'd call "warnings" about this year."*     * *"i am doing something myself) and they are downplaying his motives to not make him a martyr."*     * *"I'm a curious individual."*     * *"I am so glad flights are so safe and the TSA is non-invasive or else I'd be panicky before getting on a plane!"*     * *"I've had with it myself."*     * *"I am vehemently opposed to it."* 
It only comes out of one side of my headphones for some reason, so maybe if you're using speakers it just sucks.   But here you go: https://youtu.be/1fM-yfymMe4?t=7m49s  if it doesn't start at the right time, starts at 7m 49s.
&gt;I dont have the time either, but didnt we warn the shit out of Japan? like really really really warn them?   That's not really what happened at all, and I don't know why you would believe this, unless you are far more patriotic than you've said. Please, take a look at that Tansill book -- or if books are "too hard" for you, listen to [this guy's short explanation](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E4T5U4zTbJ8).  &gt;the holocaust survivors are just employees of some PR firm?  Only a handful claimed knowledge of the "gas chambers", and their testimonies are characterized by their inconsistency with each other and with the physical limitations of this universe.  Holocaust stories are not held in high regard by professional historians or those who deal with this material, e.g.  &gt;"...most of the memoirs and reports [of 'Holocaust survivors'] are full of preposterous verbosity, graphomanic exaggeration, dramatic effects, overestimated self-inflation, dilettante philosophizing, would-be lyricism, unchecked rumors, bias, partisan attacks..." --  &gt;-Samuel Gringauz, 'Jewish Social Studies' (New York), January 1950, Vol. 12, p. 65.  ...  &gt;Sigh... when you say shit like Anglo American Warmongers. You might as well be saying illuminati.   That's a painfully stupid comparison to make.
Not sure what kind of sociopath seeks out folks to ridicule.
alternate theories, critical thinking, non-gullible.
Even if he did, there's no way we'll hear it as it was.
ISIS are Israeli Zionist led, so its the same.
You don't need the news to tell you that torturing people is wrong.  Either you have a moral compass or you don't.  And the latter people tend to be psychopaths.    
Here's the story of a Zionist Jew that would pretend to be an "anti-semitic Nazi" - then switch handles and complain about all the "neo-nazis" and "anti-semites" and demand everyone stop criticizing the Israeli genocide against the Palestinian people.  "It's a trick, we always use it."  "The Double Identity of an 'Anti-Semitic' Commenter"  http://commondreams.org/hambaconeggs  Ask yourself this: if fewer Jewish people were killed in World War II than commonly thought, wouldn't that be a **good** thing?  Oh, no, they want as many people killed in the "Holocaust" as possible. When I was a kid, they were trying to up the number from "Six Million" to "Twelve Million" but it didn't work. 
hey, do you know there are approx. 322 million people in the USA?  there are just under 64 million people in the UK.  that's about 5x more people. statistics will be skewed because of this.  but hey, dur hur hurr USA sux, right?  
I'm not posting from suspicious alts though
Frankly, I simply don't trust anything about space for the simply fact of that I cannot directly substantiate what is told to me. Nothing exists when I'm not observing it. Only memories hold my soul to the physical world.
our current goverment are nothing more than us lapdogs  So imho the PTB told them to do this
/u/trollabot smashsenpai
I only insist on facts, facts, facts. You insist on lies, lies, lies, because you're a ridiculous conspiritard, and there's no way to support the lies you tell without additional lies.
Pretty sure the Fed is panicking behind closed doors. Bond yields at record lows, Baltic Dry Index at record lows, growth forecasts being lowered constantly, equity bubble, housing bubble, strong dollar hurting exports, constant market manipulation, QE doesn't work etc etc etc.  All major economies are up shit creek.
Well, 5 times the population is a bit irrelevant considering the numbers of deaths and timeframe presented by the article  --- HOWEVER  --- The article seems to be basing its information off this wiki page http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_killings_by_law_enforcement_officers_in_the_United_Kingdom  I find it a little unreal to believe there were no deaths by police between 1920 and 1977...   Here is some better info: https://www.ipcc.gov.uk/page/deaths-during-or-following-police-contact https://www.ipcc.gov.uk/page/deaths-during-or-following-police-contact  Here are 2 articles that give some other insight -- and note that the deaths are NOT necessarily the fault of the police, AND the fact that the metric is one that is tracked and publicly scrutinized):  [1433 related deaths between 1990 and 2011](http://www.theguardian.com/news/datablog/2012/jul/19/deaths-police-custody-data) = 65/year (though the rate is lower in the later half per the next article)  [333 deaths between 1998-2009](http://www.theguardian.com/uk/2010/dec/03/deaths-police-custody-officers-convicted) = 30/year  So it seems that the number per year is even decreasing. And again, these are including deaths that aren't even directly the fault of the police.
I think it's a little from column a and a little from column b. Haven't had Aya, but had some solid times on dmt. It more or less told me that there's a galactic war going on and earth is the focal point and that a lot of the conspiracy theories I'd been reading about were true. That gave me a lot more conviction to go and investigate things further. But, I wouldn't have been inclined to try dmt in the first place were I not already questioning the program.
/r/im40andyourdad
No ISIS? Here in Canada our great leaders voted to continue fighting in Iraq and to start fighting ISIS in Syria. Pretty big deal here, since we normally don't engage in this nonsense.
&gt;North Korea: 100%  lol
Must be why cultures that eat a lot of pineapple never get cancer. 
"State Secret"
George is that you?
[deleted]
A civilization that loves one another instead of fearing every little thing.
I think they are on the right track. I am reading Mark Lane's Plausible Denial next. I started it years ago, but never finished.   It's interesting that a lot of the same CIA players were surrounding the JFK assassination and the Watergate scandal - like Hunt.   I think in the end, JFK wasn't playing along with the oil industry, the sugar industry, the CIA. He pissed off a lot of people in power and had to be removed.   Which is scary, because we dream of someone being elected that could be a "true game changer" and fight the powers that be in favor of the people - but the truth is, IF someone ever got elected like that and didn't play along - they would be disposed of.   I think Nixon knew something was up with the Kennedy assassination and the Bay of Pigs. He was super paranoid about the CIA and for good reason, and ultimately was forced to resign due to Watergate - which he (and I) believed was a setup to get him out.  I found this - haven't listened to it yet, but it's Russ Baker interviewing about Family of Secrets. There are like 5 parts, so i am going to dig in today.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K2UuTNXUFp8  
Its free to use :)  But it wasn't mine - I remember seeing it and expressing the same. 
The JFK Assassination is my first childhood memory. I could tell you the address of the house I was in to this day.   I remember the neighbors and friends coming over - men holding their hats in their hands - women crying. People filling up our sofa and then more standing behind it, 'grown-ups' sitting on the floor (!) around our small television screen.   I remember going out onto the porch and seeing clusters of people gathered here and there on the street, and on other porches, so much emotion.  I remember later going into my dads room and he was lying on the bed crying.   No one who was alive that day in America could 'forget' where they were.
Breaking: Canada declares copyright infringement of Justin Bieber songs a National Security Threat.
Fuck yeah!
Where does it say he didn't know how the door operated?
The statistic is a rate/percentage... Overall number is irrelevant, that's the whole point of converting the number to a standardised 0-100% scale.
The USA does it.  Israel does it.  and now Saudi Arabia does it.  All of these attacks upon other countries are violations of the U.N. Charter and of International Law.  Innocent civilians are dying, critical infrastructure is being destroyed, people are suffering, and all for what?  Such behavior needs to not only be condemned and stopped.  It must also be punished.  These are conspiracies by the people who run the governments of these nations and are war crimes of the most serious order.
The ones that are sealing the records are the ones perpetrating the crimes.
Your the assumer here.
And you've convinced yourself that homeopathy is real.
so, is it possible that CERN caused the pulse?? if not, wth did?  edit: whether or not CERN is a "gateway" for time travel or to invite an "evil" entity, i'm concerned that they know what they're doing.
I just watched this again and was going to post it.  http://newsfeed.time.com/2013/12/10/meet-the-robot-telemarketer-who-denies-shes-a-robot/  There it is. It's a trip.  "Can you say I'm not a robot?"  " I'm a real person"  " can you just say that your not a robot though"  " robotic laugh" " I Of course I'm a real person.  
I think the talk in the picture is what I would tell my kids if I was black....as  white and clean cut looking person then ya the "know your rights" message is good....but actually I still lean towards the "yes sir no sir" no-matter-what is the best safety policy.  If you get safely to a lawyer then go to town with "know your rights"
Thanks TWSmith's other account.  You are still a shill.
"the massive influx of impressions is so great; surprising, barbaric, and violent things press so overpoweringly-'balled up into hideous clumps'-in the youthful soul; that it can save itself only by taking recourse in premeditated stupidity."  - Nietzsche 
&gt; Martin McGuiness and Gerry Adams were British Intelligence Officers  That is nonsense. Do you have a single shred of evidence?
I don't think he's trying to "cover up" a conspiracy behind the Boston bombings as much as he's "not allowed" to give the impression that conspiracies exist in general, out of fear the word could lose some of its power when they use it to discredit a story.
Capitalism is the greatest empower the world has ever known. More people have prospered from Capitalism then any other system ever in the history of the world,  the issue is crony capitalism which we all are being subjected to which is predatory, not free market capitalism.
Cause facts are optional when dealing with blacks!!   Am I right???
Same here...haven't seen any for a few days.....now it's like a Checkerboard. 
According to Sibel Edmonds, it's not just that the US military is "looking the other way" - it's that heroin is transported to America on US military planes, onto US military bases, by uniformed US military personnel.  We know that the English fought the Opium War against China for the "right" to import opium.  So, considering we know that military forces have dealt drugs historically, if you think they have stopped - what year did they stop? 1900? 1950? 2000? 2015?
As we've seen in MANY of your other posts here, I'm glad you learned a new term to use.  Don't overuse it now, okay buddy.  Would you like to see exactly what I'm talking about? Browse to /New and count the number or submissions per user.  Now tally up the topic of said garbage posts.  See for yourself what other, less than intelligent shills are busy flooding /r/conspiracy with.  Nah, not transparent at all.  
Probably. Just ignore it. 
I'm not sure how they found *13* gay bakeries...  
When I posted a report on this last week, it was downvoted by a 2:1 majority, I was told, [and I quote](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2zuq54/inside_the_kremlins_troll_army/cpmghin), to "Get this disinfo out of here."  There is cognitive dissonance here, certainly. It's those in this sub who refer to JTRIG, Hasbara, Eglin, etc. yet refuse to acknowledge Russia plays exactly the same game.
I haven't seen anyone not acknowledge that Russia has shills. But we are not really exposed to them on any meaningful level because very few of us speak Russian.  People are probably calling your link "disinfo" because it is presented in the context of the Western media saying "Hey everyone, the Russians are spreading disinformation!!!" and the reality is that 90% of the disinformation *we* are exposed to is coming directly from the same Western media.  
Things they hear strike true to them, and it completely conflicts with what they are told on the outside world. This inner conflict results in confusion and frustration, which turns into anger. Most people don't like to get angry at themselves, so they project their anger onto the object they think is the source of it.
&gt; And look no further than this very website to see how effective our own propaganda is on our own people.  And look no further than this very subreddit to see how effective Putin's propaganda is. 
I've done a lot of personal work. I can trust myself with more power. When it rains, I'll seek out mushrooms and add them to the ayahuasca. I just started yoga (I'll move beyond hatha when I can), I know a bit about Kabbalah and holofractal theory -- still a beginner, but it's a start.  What I was looking for from you, if I may be so bold, is an example of the "living God" aspect in your own life. Can you give some examples of superhuman abilities or qualities in your own life? Feel free to PM. Really interested in this.
But but but science! Trust the government and big pharmacy!
Zionism is huge, but the bigger picture is, people are starting to wake up to the lies they have been fed all their lives.
Dude argue another case please. The guy was a thug who attacked a cop and got exactly what he deserved. There are numerous examples of police brutality people like you could be talking about that hold much more water than this case. Did you know two LAPD cops beat to death a handcuffed man last year? He was white and the cops were latino so I guess nobody on the I hate cops brigade gives a shit because it doesn't fit your white cops are all secret kkkers narrative. 
What the fuck are you talking about? There are multiple huge threads about it on the front page.
I see your point about the collapsing happening after 200 comments. And I was not aware of that prior.  But the main question is still valid. What decides which comments are collapsed?
/u/TrollaBot duckvimes_  
I did. History is not all facts. It is an interpretation or someone's version of the past. It is not necessarily the "truth". Don't be so quick to believe just about anything just because it is "history". Cheers.
That's not it either. I'm fairly certain it's from this year or last year. Looks like I have 2 new docs to watch anyway so thank you good sir. 
You're very welcome. If I think of any others, I will come post them up. cheers
I understand the point you're making. But you have to consider that homicide is not something most people will ever deal with. USA doesn't even hit the world average for homicide per 100k population.  However... when you only look at the murder data, black on white homicide is alarmingly high when compared to every other [race] on [race] homicide.  
she got the run-around, no answers.
This country is a pile of vile. Just get used to it, sadly.
You have never driven over the speed limit, occupied a handicap spot or even just parked adjacent a building for more than five minutes, you have never consumed alcohol under the age of 21, you never loitered or raised your voice in public, you have never violated anyone elses copyright and you always do your taxes on time and correctly and have never missed a payment on anything ever.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Imaginative, sure.  Reality? Far from it.
We've long passed the point of absurdity. Up is down and black is white. The Joker would be proud.
For context, the first quote was in response to a 'spam' accusation by adamwho (ironically). With the exception of the 'trust score' the rest seems about right I guess.
It's pretty obvious he's a troll, a forum user with poor grammar and idiotic replies pretending to be someone he's clearly not. And yet, people here will still upvote this garbage, not bothering to give any thought to one of the best researched books on the Skull &amp; Bones and Committee of 300 yet written, which I happen to have posted here only to see them ignored and downvoted because these people would rather upvote posts about Justin Beiber or a painfully obvious troll on GLP.
Future prediction time:   Golden Dawn (Sun? the greek nazis, you all know who I mean) resurgence. NATO intervention in Greece deemed needed asap.   Results: Welcome to being post ww1 germany, greece. Those satan worshippers can not wait for thier antichrist and you're just not baking fast enough. 
Not destroy, but at least have the power to do so? It's like having a key that unlocks the door at your will.
How does garbage like this get so many up-votes on a sub full of people who claim to be immune to media brainwashing?   Mike Brown was a violent thug who got what was coming to him. Trayvon Martin was a violent thug who got what was coming to him. In the US, most people who get shot by police are white. Blacks commit a wildly disproportionate percentage of violent crime. 
Yes, I want to know. I am trying to create a relationship between what's going wrong right now in American, and it's future.
Contrails at sunset, here is a picture I've taken that shows what it would look like if photographed with a longer focal length.  You can see them very often in high traffic flight routes and can confirm which flights they were using Flightradar24 or a variety of Android and iPhone applications.  http://i.imgur.com/whJe4kF.jpg
We need distrubuted organization. We know that the powers that be will target any individual that stands up like MLK or even JFK. But, they cannot target all of us easily. If we all take small actions in our own lives and move toward some sort of alternative struture to what we have now socially, things might get interesting.
Who's to say it was his kid? 
The George Polk award is received by journalists, not news organisations.  If you're gonna try to be clever at least get your facts straight.  Besides, I was only responding to a question about a particular subreddit not in favor of Mother Jones;  I never offered my opinion on the matter.  Don't be so quick to conclude what you assume.  And the "lol" thing has got to go.  It's so outdated, and only makes the person using it seem dumb.    Edit type
There's a good possibility
I know about the issue where you are redirected to http://45.55.146.67/wiki/doku.php?id=start instead of the site's domain. I am working to fix this today. I want to get an idea of how much strain traffic will put on the server so I can decide if we need a better hosting company before I put a lot of work into ironing out the kinks.
Enforcing totalitarianism is the goal.
shit's on fire, yo
You can't expect the CDC to know the answers yet.  You have to vote for the mandatory vaccines before you can know whats in them.
In a discussion with some Romanian zealots about aggression and annexation of [Transnistria](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Transnistria) they first called me a *Putin bot* and then after reading through my history they declared that I'm just a *conspiritard*.  Its difficult for them to comprehend how a person could have a different opinion unless Russia was paying them.  There is a deep resentment against Russia for historical crimes and they are propagandized today to be used as ideological weapons against Russia.  They are frothing mad.  [edit] The backstory is that I have an American friend who lives in Transnistria and these days with tourism being down he is making a living by meeting foreign news reporters.  Transnistria is a fairly normal place but needs support from Russia to keep going.  Now that Russia is mired down with economic difficulties and has a bad reputation some zealots believe that its now the time to strike against Transnistria.  They might choose to embargo the place unless they submit to Moldovan controls.  They will be putting enormous pressure on the place because they view the Russian supported government as an aberration.
Don't forget the third amendment, too! Instrumental in the fight for privacy. 
"I'll get you my pretty, and your little Internet too!"
In gonna take a wild guess that it's because two skyscrapers collapsed around it
/r/hiphopheads full of weak mods like this.
Yahweh has said "My thoughts are not your thoughts". I don't want  TACOS and neither should you. Theorys, Assumptions, Conceptions, Opinions, Suppositions.
[WTC 7 - An Epic Fairy Tale](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nc9Xad6ooPo)  [Fast and Furious - World Trade Center 7](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nIrdRWYHiss)  [WTC7 - This Is An Orange](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Zv7BImVvEyk)  [Shear Ignorance NIST and WTC7](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YQI6gOw9y-c)
I agree, that's the eternal cycle of destruction and creation.
That picture is from 9/11. There are many more just like it.
[Wild guesses arent based on data.](http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/7_World_Trade_Center#Design_and_layout )
Great excerpt, the entire book (and pretty much all of Orwell's works) are extremely relevant today. 
So jet fuel didnt leap hundreds of yards from one building to another making the whole thing fall down? /S  
How many adults died as a result of the sanctions?
[deleted]
Lol, I couldn't get through all that without laughing.  You should write Adam Sandler movies, you'd be great
wow
&gt; You understand that even the official reports admit freefall right? and you also understand that it was a steel framed building and the fact that the collapse was complete in 6.5 seconds. Free-fall time in a vacuum, from Building 7's roof is 5.96 seconds, the building was in literal freefall for 2.25 seconds.  This is not true.  Official reports say only the *north section* of the building feel at free fall.  You're also ignoring the approximate 8 second internal collapse that occurred prior to the building finally collapsing.  &gt; For any object to fall at gravitational acceleration, there can be nothing below it that would tend to impede its progress or offer any resistance. If there is anything below it that would tend to impede its progress or offer any resistance, then not all of the potential energy of the object would be converted to motion and so would not be found falling at gravitational acceleration.  &gt; There's no exception to that rule, those are the conditions that must exist for gravitational acceleration to occur for the entirety of the duration of the time it occurs, this is basic Newtonian physical principles.  Again, the entire building did not collapse at free fall.  It has only been confirmed that a section fell at free fall, and it was only for 2 seconds.  You're ignoring the fact that wtc7 started an internal collapse well before the building actually came down.  So no, it was not entirely at free fall as theorists argue.
Flight 93 was heading to the White house AFAIK
She's a really, really reactionary Democrat--holds views consistently against the first amendment; it reminds me of Lieberman.  She's incredibly rich from having held office in California for decades, and she fools millions of liberals into voting for her every election.  She is absolutely despicable.
 &gt;The video evidence completely disproves this claim  Actually the video evidence corroborates it completely.   https://youtu.be/KkKgLKyhqHk  18 second collapse, not 6.5   
The research cost compared to discovering an actual new compound is little to none, this was well know before hand, people had been taking this combination for 20 years before someone decided to patent that. The research would be looking at data already available. Not the same as running an expensive laboratory for years before you get something that may work.  Invokana-350 Crestor-215 Novolog-303 Lantus-396 Nameda-655 Spiriva-308 Cialis-489 Xarelto-325 Cymbalta-228 Welchol-482   Duexis-1400   Why does this cost 5x as much as a drug that took years to develop and no one was even sure it would work or be safe in humans? Say what you want about the research, everyone knew 1. That is was safe in people. 2. That is works. Why is it as much as a specialty drug?  Why does this cost 5x as much as a drug that took years to develop and no one was even sure it would work or be safe in humans?
One could say we all are.
Yes, but you equated skepticism about GMO benefits with a strawman - a Luddite desire to halt all human efforts to improve food productivity.  There are a thousand and one ways to feed the world that don't involve GMOs, and this article is clearly in favor of many of them. I, personally, am a big fan of Permaculture and other biomimicry methodologies, among other things.  If your beliefs or arguments require you to fundamentally distort the field, then don't be surprised if they don't get very far.
[deleted]
I support their right to cut off their own balls. Free will and freedom of though can be slightly dangerous in some extreme isolated cases.  Concepts trying to tell people that conspiracy theorists are dangerous are common in the hate group r/conspiratard. They use small groups of isolated extremest skeptics, like anti-vaxxers, to try to make larger groups who are just skeptical and seeking information or in many times in no way believe such things out to be a large group of generalized dangerous people. One or two extremest people vandalized or harassed people over Sandy Hook, therefore all Sandy Hook skeptics are dangerous. These types of generalizations are being used against /r/conspiracy as a whole. They are propaganda techniques. 
These scum bags are parasites! 
 http://whatreallyhappened.com/radio
Ooh we are nice people, we're just really impatient with boneheaded rednecks.
Thats how empires fall.
[deleted]
Agreed.  Government is a tool, it's neither good nor evil.  It entirely depends on who has control.  Getting money out of politics needs to be the #1 agenda for anyone seeking reform of any kind.
[deleted]
[deleted]
More shenanigans from the Chosenites
Germany is still a colony without a proper constitution and without proper borders. They are still under allied control and still using the Russian's name for their borders under a corporation. Their leader is the CEO of Germany. They aren't a nation.
It's too bad you're all being forced to be here.
One of my favorites. The dude definitely sounds as if he trying to sell the official story way before it made it to the TV.
overall psychedelics are very eye opening, and a culture surrounded with psychedelics is not a culture ideal to be controlled.
[sure...](http://www.reactiongifs.us/wp-content/uploads/2013/03/pile_of_shit.gif)
I called her office and told them that she should resign. I urge others to do the same:  (415) 393-0707
&gt;mongoloid  &gt;Jesus fuck are you guys delusional?  &gt;the shit you believe  &gt;"the jews"  Criticize the apartheid regime of Jew bigotry in Zionist-occupied Palestine and these racist settlers start ranting like hysterics.  I guess the bad publicity is getting to them. They thought they could genocide an entire population and no one would say anything about it?
This is why the stronger the media support something real bad, with independent investigative journalism being crushed and hunted down, its always someone (high up) who control the narrative. Sometimes even governments can't stop this, they both with the media are owned by the same pimp.
That's Looney.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I will link the podcast here in the comments section as well.  You'll need a google account to ask questions directly in the podcast, or join the IRC and communicate there.  It should be a wild ride.  https://kiwiirc.com/client/irc.rizon.net/#/r/conspiracy
TIL what a "paleoconservative" is, just another shade of hate.
Regardless, your title here reads "SPLC"and that is misleading because SPLC is the Southern Poverty Law Center. 
You shouldn't think in platitudes. "Hate" is just an empty buzzword.
The advice in the picture is good advice that really isn't controversial to me... everyone should act that way around police.  If I had a kid I'd tell him exactly the same shit because I know cops have to constantly be on edge to protect themselves from the Micheal Browns of the world.
The conversation is going wonderfully so far.
[deleted]
and it's run by a bunch of people who don't even tried to hide their agenda
This is a really poorly done infographic.  It's hard to tell what it means.  Also, it's extremely biased in the opposite direction, as Iran is not completely innocent either.  It's easy to argue that the US has committed countless atrocities and is on no higher moral ground than Iran without having to resort to such distortions.
I'm a reality and evidence based conspiracy theorist.   You are not going to convince anyone of our cause by spouting garbage. You are harming our cause. 
It's too late for U.S.A. , every time some kind of minor demonstration for a valid cause is set in motion it never goes far. You see how the police is brought in to keep control and disperse people, even get violent and nothing happens to the police and just maybe a super minor gesture with no meaning or significance is shown for the people that demonstrated and suddenly everyone forgets and keep on moving on with their lifes. They have learned how to guard them selves against an so cakled revolution, it never gets to be that big of a deal no matter how big a problem or issue is in america, it gets tied down pretty quickly. Not to mention how much power corporations also have in your country,  thousands of companies nade to make you believe you have a choice, but they are all own by a few corporations.  They steal water and other resources while people suffer, polute the land and make people die of pollution and only get fined with sums of no significant amoufnt to them, they destroy homes, communities,  lives and cites to profit and yet they manage to get tax exemptions every year for millions for the cost of some small donations to some senator's wife's "charity".   One could go on for ages to mention why it won't change in U.S.A. it's not just the banks that are screwing you over, it's the companies that are protected by poleticans and the poleticans themselves,  the military grind machine that send people out and have made this propaganda machine to make your people so happy to accept it. U.S.A. is like ancient Rome, mighty, corrupt, ment for the rich, uses it's people like they where chess pieces and it's starting to crack at the seems now. And not in the way that it will have a change, but more in a way that it will collapse like Rome did, disappear and maybe split up in minor unio s ir countries in the end. There is no hapoy ending for you.
You didn't even explain why you feel this way. But    a few billion of us would like to have a word with you outside.
Of course the power's still on at 10:30 on Thursday morning
If i understand the 1st Amendment correctly, it just protects you from censoring through the government. Private corporations can handle and delete stuff how they want. Thats something everyone has to deal with. 
Got to get those bombs dropped man, have to get those share prices up and the keep the shareholders happy. 'murica
Glad this was said. Peace
;)
That link doesnt work.
I always wondered how "natural flavors" could be it's own ingredient. What's natural about that?
I was unable to breastfeed my daughter so I had her on formula, knowing what I know now I feel bad and wish I hadn't. I also fed her Gerber baby food, now I wish I hadn't. I switched to better, organic foods when she was 2 and still do today.   I plan on having another child and before I get pregnant I want my body to be "clean" and plan on making my own baby foods so I know what's going into my baby's body. 
If you want to know more about our foreign policy, this is a great book:  http://williamblum.org/books/americas-deadliest-export
[deleted]
"In the event of a revolution, or some form of large-scale uprising against TPTB, or an exercise of martial law, would there exist the mental infrastructure, capacity, and will to follow orders and attack American citizens, trumping values and morals to commit such acts?"  Yes.  All you have to do is dehumanize the other side. It's been done countless times through history.
He's been here for 7 fucking years. A shill? Really? This entire sub has downs.
[It's so broadly worded it probably applies to you.](http://www.cnn.com/2015/04/01/politics/obama-cyber-hackers-executive-order/)
It would help if Edmund "Jerry" Brown was a republican.  Then people would focus on who's allowing this, instead of blaming some vague, amorphous "the state."
It's like they're using reverse psychology instead of just saying China is gunna try some shit. I keep thinking maybe the Obama administration or the  next administration is going to do something risky and they need the general pop to be armed just in case. Or maybe they know about some bull shit the Chinese, North Koreans, or Russians are gunna try'n pull and instead of just coming right out and saying and possibly causing a panic, they're using reverse psychology.
twenty years, thats how long the writing on the wall has been on open display.
Don't forget about planting provocateurs in the peaceful crowd.
[deleted]
Claiming it... 3 seperate incidents they cited?  Wikipedia may be a "terrible" source, but you realize that its actual sources are at the bottom of every page?   Im still waitng for you to cite some of your accusatons with even a basement YouTube rant.
Didn't prevent his murder or stop any conspiracies. Back then the Govt was still run by racists and I bet the decision to do nothing wasn't a difficult choice.
It would of you donate to causes that could be considered contrary to the government's interests. 
So we save the James Bond shit to laser heart attacks into people, got it.
He's going to run on 'change'? Really? That word should be omitted from every DNC event for the next 8 years.
You've clearly never lived around black people.  You are right though; the others are the ones stealing the truly valuable, big-time shit.
me too. You have no idea how much I've suffered just thinking about the state of the world. I mean.. I cried after watching Cosmos, that's pretty bad right? It made me so sad to see the dreams of so many scientists, so many people that dreamed about a world led by knowledge and peace, an equal world... will never be, at least not before the collapse of our society. They gave their life, working tirelessly and in the end they took their work and profit from it. I've thought things through for years. Look, the only real chance we have is energy. Tesla and so many others knew this. They've suppressed every single attempt and they will keep doing it until they can't anymore. Now.. if they haven't killed us yet, (which is a very real possibility to be honest) then energy will make everyone's life better. Go be a scientist and if you are smart enough to solve the problem, hope your work doesn't end up in the wrong hands. 
Not talking about the military subreddit, I'm talking about various military forums*
*  MOST IMPORTANTLY:  *There exist NO peer-reviewed papers supporting controlled demolition, anywhere.*  * If it were a controlled demolition, how come NONE OF THE VIDEOS HAVE AUDIO CONFIRMING TRADEMARK CONSECUTIVE DEMOLITION BLASTS PRIOR TO COLLAPSE?  Usually there are 8-15 consecutive blasts in a controlled demolition. WTC7 HAD NONE.  * WTC7 in it's entirety did not collapse at free fall. WTC7 underwent a slow, internal progressive collapse (8 seconds) before the facade came down, plainly observable in videos and is rarely brought up by conspiracy believers.  Theorists love to only show the 6-7 second "free fall" of the facade and then declare demolition.  Hell if clouds look like cotton, I guess they're made of cotton!  *  The NIST study was done in cooperation with the SEI/ASCE, SFPE, AISC, and SEAoNY -- actual engineering experts in the field, all of whom would have to be in on this conspiracy, even to this day.  Surely at least one person of the thousands working in coordination would have a guilty conscience.  *  "NIST changed its story several times so there was a cover up." Science refines its position over time. This is a strength, not a weakness. Alternatively we can start with a story, stick to that story, and look only for evidence that supports that story. The latter is what creationists and conspiracy believers do.    * **"In 2007 a tanker truck crashed and ignited under a steel construction overpass built to support fully loaded 18 wheelers. When exposed to fire, the overpass collapsed under its own weight on top of the tanker, before the flames could be extinguished. Last I checked, no claims it fell as a result of controlled demolition"**  By all means.  Please address these points.   Edit:  Ohhhhh look at that. Instead of addressing my points, I get a downvote.  How cowardly of you.
So...?
More like flytape made this account to create the illusion that he is being targeted.   Lol.
Maybe when everyone goes out and buys all at once the government finds out a rough estimate on how many people are out there responding to them.
I'm thinking they're being killed to tie up loose ends.
Quit your whining.
***Analyzing TomK00***  * comments per month: 66 *^I ^have ^an ^opinion ^on ^everything* * posts per month: 3  * favorite sub [subredditcancer](http://NP.reddit.com/r/subredditcancer) * favorite words: you're, loser, You're * age 0 years 1 months  * profanity score 3.2% *^I'm ^13 ^and ^bad ^words ^are ^cool* * trust score 117.8% *^tell ^them ^your ^secrets!*
Why is it always really old rich guys with great ideas wealthy people could use to help?
I quit one time.    And the one time I did quit I came bad because of the SWS takeover attempt.  So is a season like 3-4 years?  that's a long season.
This is one of my favorite topics; humans don't know what they are and they are not as special or perceptive as they think they are. This would be great material for a short video. The guy is kind of mumbling and the slides could be more developed. 
Similarly, politicians don't care about people who don't vote for them. And both the elites and the politicians use force to get their way. I do not think it wise to ally myself with either of these groups.
I don't know about the amount, but from what I have read about the Soviet Union, food and an apartment were so subsidized they were basically free as was education and medical care. People's earned income was almost entirely disposable income that they could spend on better food and clothes, entertainment etc. Going back to Roman times, every free Roman citizen was given enough grain to survive. What he earned went for additional food, clothes, entertainment,etc. That's one of the reasons Rome lasted so long, because the people had free bread and circuses, ie, entertainment. It worked against revolution for a long time.   &gt;Later emperors all used free or greatly subsidized grain to keep the populace fed. The political use of the grain supply along with gladiatorial games and other entertainments gave rise to the saying "Bread and circuses". As the empire continued, the annona became more complex. During the reign of Septimius Severus, olive oil was added to the distribution. During the reign of Aurelian, however, a major reorganization of the alimenta took place. It appears that he ceased to distribute free grain; instead, he issued free bread, and added salt, pork and wine to the dole, which was provided free or at a reduced cost. These measures were continued by successive emperors. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Grain_supply_to_the_city_of_Rome#Politics_and_the_grain_supply
[deleted]
Agreed.
Lets see. People are not weeds. But the wealthy think nothing of killing them to increase their profits. And are never punished for it. At the very least we need progressive income and estate taxes that keep them from accumulating so much unearned money and power. If they act against the people there should be laws to control them.   You know the director Mike Nichols. When his grandparents left the Soviet Union after the revolution in 1917, they had 40 pieces of luggage with 75 gold bars smuggled inside. These days a gold bar is 400 Troy ounces worth about half a million dollars. So they smuggled out about $30-40 million in gold at today's prices. Might have been smaller bars but they had enough to live lives of affluence and comfort till they died and set up their kids. But two of his uncles stayed in the Soviet Union to work against the revolution. They were eventually arrested and executed as counterrevolutionaries. Should be laws here as well for such as them. 
Asking questions makes you suspicious
Oh, so basically you are jealous of those born into wealth.  Maybe you should start a Kickstarter or something?
&gt;You sound like nonsense  How so? That personal attack is pathetic and has zero support, I can easily link you plenty of comments from a plethora of users all calling out /u/flytape for the infiltrator that he is.  &gt;and trying to infiltrate yourself.  You can trawl through my 4 years of comments here and you will find absolutely nothing to back up that completely false claim.  All you've done so far is take my claims, and "turn them around" on me alleging that I am what I am claiming /u/flytape to be.  Yeah, that "turn the tables" garbage doesn't work, but nice try.  &gt;Its easy to make accusations without backing them up.  [Boom, here's evidence](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2ooful/david_colestein_holocaust_revisionist_filmmaker/cmq7o9j), how is /u/flytape fit to be mod?
Haha!  You fool.  I have upgraded my keywords to the almighty *BUZZWORDS*!  You're powerless!  Mwahahaha. 
Fairness goes out the window when it comes to defending one's religion! Also (FYI), 'et al' is used when referring to people, otherwise it's 'et cetera' :)
axolotl had nothing to do with this. Don't let that interrupt your campaign though.
We both know the rules are selectively applied.
Psychopath does not mean what you think it means.
Who is he talking about? Suffering how? What's the context?
Brilliant idea, people should do that everywhere.
Ah, one single offhand mention. itshappening.gif
&gt; So then why would you dress like an insane person?  A plague doctor?   You should ask him. Maybe he wanted to have some fun whilst hiding his face, but didn't know how to use a blur filter. It was a bit too le-Fawkes for my liking.    &gt; intentionally dressed and acted as crazy as possible   Dress? Sure.   Acted? What stuck out as being really crazy to you?   &gt;all you do is come to the defense of the subversion that occurs in this sub.  Surely I do more than that :/  &gt;We all know who you are, and why you are here.  Spooky!  Looks like you're creating a fiction about those who happen to disagree with you. 
And as stated: The bombing of Laos and Cambodia during the Vietnam conflict was a known fact well before 2000.     
This is the best tl;dr I could make, [original](http://www.theweek.co.uk/63188/germanwings-conspiracy-theories-cover-up-claims-emerge) reduced by 75%. (I'm a bot) ***** &gt; A Facebook page called &amp;quot;Andreas Lubitz A320, we are against the hunt&amp;quot; offers a range of alternative theories for why the Germanwings plane crashed, including the suggestions that Lufthansa, the parent company of Germanwings, has sought to pin the blame on Lubitz to hide mechanical problems with the plane.  &gt; They said the black box voice recorder, found at the site of the crash, showed that Lubitz had locked the plane&amp;#039;s captain out of the cockpit and intentionally crashed the aircraft.  &gt; Some commenters on the Facebook page suggest the cockpit voice recorder was tampered with to make Lubitz the &amp;quot;Fall guy&amp;quot; and to hide mechanical problems with the plane.   ***** [**Extended Summary**](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31he0w/supporters_of_pilot_andreas_lubitz_suggest_he_is/) | [FAQ](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31b9fm/faq_autotldr_bot/ "Version 1.5, ~3605 tl;drs so far.") | [Theory](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31bfht/theory_autotldr_concept/) | [Feedback](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23autotldr "PMs and comment replies are read by the bot admin, constructive feedback is welcome.") | *Top* *five* *keywords*: **Lubitz**^#1 **plane**^#2 **crash**^#3 **Facebook**^#4 **recorder**^#5
[deleted]
Nailed it, as usual.
[deleted]
When has mandatory vaccination harmed someone?
[deleted]
Lol what? Subliminal messages aren't real. They don't even work
They're thicker than cockroaches on this thread.
[deleted]
Its not. Multiple studies have shown it to be worthless.
Who were the successful ones?  The athletes don't make shit.  The successful ones are all behind the scenes.
Absolutely! Just a couple months ago, he was behind on cost of supervision (paying your oppressors) because he got his hours cut at work. She threatened to send him back and he said "I thought you couldn't put me back for money?" So she says "I'll find a reason".  They don't even hide it anymore.  But the worst was when she said we couldn't reside together anymore or have any contact.  Setting him up for failure.  
Next you'll invoke Hitler.  The US has guns, you against that when other countries don't have it?  Or how about the US banning drugs while other countries have them?  The point is it is a stupid argument.  Same as yours.    Don't use simple arguments, it's really pointless.  Same as this thread.
The government would be soooooo much better if we just elect the *right* people!   Lol 
I think you got it right on the head - everybody's got ADHD, depression, anxiety, panic attacks - but I think there's more to it. I mean, everybody's got a mental disorder according to a health professional (psychiatrist's I'm looking in your direction) that could be cured by persistence and exercise which we just prescribe medication for.   But shit man, take television for an example. Got damn addictive isn't it? And these assclown marketing professionals (of which I am one) do research and campaigns to make it more addictive. "What makes these people NEED to watch it and how can we do MORE of it?" They all say. Well, fuck that. I mean shit, we've had decades of time to spend cashola on finding out how to get the general public roped in for the season premiere of Big Brother, yea? And they're goddam good at it, aren't they.   So while mental health professionals (of which I'm a serious fan) try to get to the root of all problems and create a healthy solution, you're fighting against the addiction of the internet, television, sex, medication, harmful drug use, video games, and general douchebagery that have all been imbued with horrible, effective, marketing research that fucking works better than Albert Ellis's CBT can. So who wins? Money! Woot! Fuck.....  So these people when faced are faced with a serious life dilemma (who really need someone to talk out their problems) they are going to turn to the above (sex, Big Brother, American Idol, the internet, Porn) before they resort to any therapy, because it just works faster.  As crazy as it (I) sound, you're fighting a fucking losing battle, and that's some sad shit.   Edit: I meant therapy, not 'medication'. 
Well i guess it would have crashed, and come up short. Even if it managed to pull out of the harrowing dive without losing control and crashing, it would certainly not have been able to accelerate or precision maneuver, so it wouldn't have been able to stay on target and hit the small sliver of a target at such a speed.   A learner/novice pilot would have a hard enough time just navigating to the target area via horizontal and lateral nagivation mgmt systems, let alone fly the plane through that dive, but the final minute (during which Vd was exceeded by a large margin) would have resulted in a loss of control and a crash, unless highly modified to perform, as observed.   Re: discussion of flight control at/over speed limits  http://np.reddit.com/r/aviation/comments/30ntu5/a_question_for_pilots_can_a_commercial_jet/cq1bqyp?context=3
nailed it.  (though... your username is a bit ... meh... a bit broad.  for example, as an american. i'd hate to think that me country is judged by the actions of G. Bush and Dick Cheney.  food for thought.)
Nope, but I did see half a dozen different users get labeled as "Dusty" and subsequently harassed as a "holocaust denier" by a flock of assholes. They had doxxed some guy and were using his name to threaten him. Then they kept doing it to anyone else they didn't like.
Only in the collider; if It does rip a hole, it will be a small one. But, that being said, the shield has been weakening for decades; and scientists think it might fail as the poles flip. The upside is that the resulting influx of cosmic radiation might be what causes the evolution of life on Earth.
There are more people like "us" than people who "arent" only the media makes it look like its all good in the hood. I have been talking to people in my country and the sentiment over here is the sane "not happy with government and capitalism itself" and we need unhappy people! The more the merrier, it only will give more incentive to revolt (or if it could be solved nicely at least political change)
You do know that Austria was once a part of Germany. So was Hungary, Romania and Poland. The Austrians are genetically as far removed from Germans as Scots are from the English, which is in the grand scale of things not even noteworthy. Of course this is propaganda but why is it BS and Neo Nazi stuff.   Whatever the other side is spewing out [Hitler eats babies /sarc] is also propaganda.  What I suggest you do is educate yourself that the truth is somewhere in between. 
Yeas a few hundred years ago, muslims lived happily together with all other religions. However times move on, people read different things into the preachings of a book and as much as islam may once have been 'beautiful', do't be so naive and think it still is.  At best it isn't compatible with western beliefs and those that make it so is muslims themselves by trying so hard to change what is our heritage and beliefs.   When did the West lose its right to have a culture that needs protecting?  I don't like islam, I don't like any religion but I know that I am happy accepting others to have one...as long as they don't try and change my life/belief/freedom as it is.  If they do, they are not wanted. How difficult is that to understand?  How about starting to be a bit more accepting of our culture? We   are human too. 
Why do I get the feeling that most if not all of the entities targeted by this new law will, in  fact, be US Citizens labeled as 'Homegrown Terrorists?"
Yea. The "natural news" real scientific journal you have there. Go put your foil hat back on. 
I'm not a DR but I've been in your same place.    I kicked the Lexapro and it was hard...physically hard to stop.  This really bothered me because I was only on it for a few months but I know others who have been on it for years.     It makes me angry because of this quote:  &gt;my family was begging me to take it again because my unhappiness was affecting everyone else  Your unhappiness is most likely the reality of the world we live in.  The others don't want the truth or to pull back the curtain to find the wizard is just a man.  The illusion is far easier to live with than the reality and so they need you drugged up so they can live easier.     This is why I believe my people were pushing for me to get on these powerful meds.  And once I made the realization I stopped taking them and learned to keep some of my unhappiness to myself or only share with those of like minds.   Feel free to PM if you need anyone to talk to.  
Can anyone verify this judge is real?
"We want to bring in Mark Walsh who is, a, uh, uh, a freelancer for Fox"  Ok guys. You finally convinced me crisis actors exist. I mean I saw some weird coincidences in the Sandy Hook interviews, but mostly I just thought you guys were batshit insane. This seems to be the real deal - this guy is a direct line to the truth. Someone really needs to find him and find out who told him to say "fires/structural damage" etc.  What kind of freelancer is he? Where was his apartment?  Edit: Here he is trying to get a regular up and up pundit job with Fox a few years later.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kjiuPXVERYE  Edit 2: Some people already did the legwork to DOX this creep.  http://911-harley-shirt-guy.blogspot.com/2009/05/mark-adrian-humphrey-actor-is-harley.html
Before electricity peoples sleep cycles weren't as messed up. And the whole Tesla Edison debate....
snort
I don't think so. I think it gives us authority to sanction NK if they hack us, or Iran if they do whatever. It's basically just expanding reactionary power that already existed to cyber security. Progressive and good IMO. Frankly all the tech laws regarding US Citizens are already signed into law. 
This is going to be an epic civil rights raping. 10 years later the UN still can't define 'terrorism'  as any def would include presiding governments, LOL!!! Cuba is hilariously labeled a state sponsor of terrorism, whereas Saudi Arabia isn't, even though they're likely named as our attackers in the 9/11 Commish Report and they funded ISIS.  I wonder which 'terrorist' they're going to target?
[deleted]
Im losing track of what threads these replies are coming from.  As I refresh after replying to you, there is another notification for another comment to reply to lol.
At some point individual agency becomes a duty instead of a privilege that was taken away through programming. If someone is *happy* to waste their lives or waste their time/money on seeking things externally, that's great. But the vast majority of people are not *happy* doing that, they're doing it precisely because they are miserable. And at that point it becomes their duty to bootstrap their souls or keep stumbling in circles. It's hard and uncomfortable, but it is an ability built into humans standard issue. 
Or maybe he got banned for violating your white-supremacist BS views? You are one to support holocaust revisionism and protect white genocide criers.
Yeah, I was wrong on this point
&gt; LOL, are you really trying to compare an alien to Hitler?  I'm having a hard time beleiving that you're really this dense. Satire is ***NOT*** supportive. Why do you keep pretending that he supports Hitler?  &gt; This sub will surely be a lot better off without FlyTape  This sub will be a trollfest, like it was when he left briefly a while ago.  &gt; again I would refer you to the overwhelmingly positive support ... from this community  You seem to have no idea how public perception manipulation works.  - https://firstlook.org/theintercept/2014/02/24/jtrig-manipulation/  &gt; How Covert Agents Infiltrate the Internet to Manipulate, Deceive, and Destroy Reputations By Glenn Greenwald  - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z6QR_w_QnaQ
HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA!!!!!!
It's not the safe limit, Vmo is, at 360 knots.   the limits are measured in CAS. Vmo = 360 kts and Vd = 420 knots.   It exceeded the max operating limit by 145 knots and the ultimate aeroelastic load limit, to be held for at least 10 seconds, by about 80+ knots.   It's not possible, because when expressed as an EAS or equivalent airspeed, it blows past the outmost boundaries of the ultimate, aeroelastic load limit which is bound by Mach 1.0 (or EAS) at all altitudes, by a very wide margin and for a sustained perior of time.
ITT: Meditation.
Agreed. I'm disappointed my post created division but it had to be done. 
I can agree on your post, really.. i like every part of it. But to what extend can "we" be able to empower ourselves without the use of violence or a revolution. I know this is old world use and it should be avoided at all cost. Be TPTB need to be aware they are not getting away with this anymore. And if the internet goes offline (which some of us are expecting to happen) we have got nothing of our information left. 3D printing is awesome. It can help thousands of individuals to rise out of poverty. But we are not yet at that point we can print electrical circuits and build our own machines.  About de decentralised energy : ZPR "could" be the solution (Zero Point Radiation) wikipedia calls it "vacuüm" energy [ZPR](http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vacuum_energy) there are nummerous of sites which offer all kinds of different views onto the subject.   I believe just like you, that a humane solution would be the best.  But if the shit hits the fan, i'll stand up, band toghether with the ones who are likeminded (and they are in more numbers than one would guess at first hand) and wil survive by any means. For now, in the semi peace we live in, ill go for the forner over the latter.
Maybe the media was owned predominately by jews who used it to drive us into war with Germany because we were standing by while the fucking holocaust was happening? 
That doesn't really fit as an answer to my previous comment.
Yep. It was all just a witchhunt and taking everything out of context for disinfo. 
No I wouldn't. 
Do you see what I see?  A bullshit video to sell masks.
[But how?](http://i.imgur.com/F9lJFn7.jpg)
So then not all people are equally valuable. If what you're contributing to the community is not needed, and you have to take on skills that are needed, then what you are doing at the moment is less valuable to the community.   Not all people are equal and some are more valuable to the community than others. You just agreed with that. You're not going to tell someone growing food they need to work in a nail salon. Therefore the person growing food is more valuable than the person with a 90 IQ painting nails and talking about soap operas.
"A lot of evidence out here, a lot of work to be done" - sounds like a slip to me. Lots of evidence that this was not what we say, so we have a lot of work to shove the story down your throats.
I meant the health care company, considering how much information was taken by hackers.   Sorry for the confusion.
"...economic health or financial stability of the United States."  so that means that all Wall Street bankers will be arrested and charged with treason. right?
Today they are "Saudi extremist" - because that is what the media told him.  When it happened they were "Saddam's guys" - because that is what the media told him back then.  Do you have any original thoughts?
[deleted]
It's a suicided epidemic! Time to close our borders.
It's definitely true to a certain extent, but to create a deadly platoon?  They're certainly adding Veterans with extreme problems to the police, and when they exhibit symptoms and cross the line, it is covered up.  It helps allow others to do the same and is used as an excuse in many cases that what they do out of emotional distress from their experiences, is ok behavior.  Realize this though, over 22 Veterans a day are committing suicide.  I think for the most part, if they can't be manipulated to be the way you suggest, that there may actually be a program out there that is somehow targeting Veterans and wiping them out, and I'd say the quota is 22 a day.  People say wait, this is nuts.  Ever hear of the Emotiv?  Came out in 2003.  I tried to warn people that this device could be made into a remote device, to directly interact with people's brains, however you choose.  Been saying this for years.  A few months after I started telling people this, Wired.com came out with an article showing that anyone using the device could have their personal information, credit cards, social security numbers, etc., hacked directly from their brain.  Tell me why this device can't be wireless?  Tell me why it wouldn't be used for experimentation.  Tell me if you could, that you wouldn't use it to attack your enemies.  Tell me someone else isn't doing this right now, not necessarily our own country, but I'd put money, it was every country, including many in our own.  It's game over folks.
I believe the pyramids are alot older that they have told us, I dont think they were tombs, I wish I could have seen them in their prime.   They reportedly had white casing stones polished to an almost mirror finish, with a gold cap stone.  In the sun they must have looked like stars in them middle of the desert, and they are laid out in the configuration of Orions belt, with the brightness of the star, a proportion to the size of the pyramid.  The layout is for a reason, its too precise for it not to mean something, just what is the question.  Why on the center of the land mass of the planet, did they put those buildings in the configuration of Orions belt?   It seems like the answer should be obvious, but I cant figure it out.  Also, how did they light the insides?  Thats another thinker.
Americans willingly gave up their freedoms, so they'll reap what they sow.  The people who say  "doesn't bother me because I don't have anything to hide"  will learn the value of privacy the hard way -- by living in a totalitarian police state.
May be you should pull up the studies 2 yeas later where 100% of the tuna being caught were irradiated from the Pacific.  The life of those afflicted with normalcy bias, sea life melting everywhere in the pacific, massive die offs.  Sure, 'skeptical' conspiracist, everything is fine, go back to bed your government is in control and raised the safe exposure limits to different isotopes from a couple hundred times to thousands of times the previously 'safe' levels.  No studies, just raise the limits, everything is fine.
Hey OP, I honestly think we are born into unconsciousness on a variety of levels, social, global, but also physical and mental. The human body is so weak and tired all the time, the ego's lack any critical thinking skills, the food and water supplies are filled with poisons that make u sick and eventually kill you.  It's very difficult to stay conscious in this modern world, but I think eventually, maybe after WW III it will change for the better
Yes. Don't call people names, especially "shill." If they act like one, or are posting disinfo, or whatever- question them about their information. If they can't or won't answer, well, you know.
This is the best tl;dr I could make, [original](http://www.bloombergview.com/articles/2015-04-05/how-criminals-built-capitalism) reduced by 90%. (I'm a bot) ***** &gt; It&amp;#039;s a history of financial crimes in the 19th and early 20th centuries that traces a recurring sequence: new markets, new ways to cheat, new ways to transact and secure trust.  &gt; These new kinds of transaction required new ways of securing trust.  &gt; My other objection is to the book&amp;#039;s repeated suggestion that Adam Smith and other classical proponents of market economics naively underestimated the human propensity to deceive and over-credited the market&amp;#039;s ability to promote good behavior.   ***** [**Extended Summary**](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31kl7z/how_criminals_built_capitalism/) | [FAQ](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31b9fm/faq_autotldr_bot/ "Version 1.5, ~4154 tl;drs so far.") | [Theory](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31bfht/theory_autotldr_concept/) | [Feedback](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23autotldr "PMs and comment replies are read by the bot admin, constructive feedback is welcome.") | *Top* *five* *keywords*: **market**^#1 **new**^#2 **way**^#3 **trust**^#4 **story**^#5  Post found in [/r/occupywallstreet](/r/occupywallstreet/comments/31jbyf/how_criminals_built_capitalism/), [/r/BasicIncome](/r/BasicIncome/comments/31jrqd/how_criminals_built_capitalism/), [/r/Anarchism](/r/Anarchism/comments/31jc16/how_criminals_built_capitalism/), [/r/POLITIC](/r/POLITIC/comments/31jgrl/how_criminals_built_capitalism/) and [/r/conspiracy](/r/conspiracy/comments/31jc1n/how_criminals_built_capitalism/).
Its kind of shitty that you can get the most important job in our society with just a GED...
Ahhhhhhhh.  Wasn't sure what you were driving at. 
I was making a point about the scale of affect. But you're still standing behind calling me a neo-nazi, so I won't be talking to you further.
here let me google something else for you:  http://lmgtfy.com/?q=the+iron+dome+is+fake
You animals should love this. Great documentary. 
[deleted]
bro. I don't think Africans were bringing their brothers to the Americas in their own ships.   Although they were selling people to the English for them to take across. 
&gt;I don't think Africans were bringing their brothers to the Americas in their own ships.   1. Of course not, they never invented ships. Or much of anything.   2. If they had been smart enough to create ocean-going vessels, there is no doubt they WOULD have been bringing their "brothers" to the international market. Africa has always been a Slave Culture since long before any Whitey ever showed his face.  3. "Brothers" - LOL. Perhaps he gets his cultural understanding from Black sit-coms in America. Africans do not consider each other "brothers" - how silly. 
Lol this is the only video I've ever seen debunkers post.
88675 4456 821 454-454
They cling to Auschwitz because it's the exterminationists claim to fame, when the Auschwitz myth falls apart, the whole Holocaust narrative comes into question.  As you can see here, when it is questioned there are people actively rushing to defend it, along with mass downvotes. 
[deleted]
Lmao this is what I'm talking about. Who in their right mind would drink weed killer? It's not logical. Just stop. 
Why the fuck are you upvoted? That's not at all what he said. 
Nah they would just play disk golf haha. 
Have not seen it since the early-mid 1980's; it went to hell pretty fast, once it got worth big money.
Want to cause some serious shit?  Try handing out copies of the US Constitution on campus.  That *really* pisses them off. 
&gt;A world power is something we will need if we want to last as a planet  You can't just say something like that as if it were a fact.  You've never experienced a world that isn't stuck in the paradigm of governments, so you have a hard time envisioning one where there are not.
He doesnt look unconscious in the video. 
I mean Easter is a pagan holiday.  Just like Christmas.  Jesus probably wasn't crucified on the first Sunday after the first full moon after the equinox, and he probably wasn't born during the winter solstice.    Pretty sure that the dates were changed to prevent Rome from tearing itself apart when Emperor Constantine adopted Christianity while a large number of the population was still 'pagan'.   
I actually just saw this yesterday. something about Oesterhare, the Easter Hare. Some spring equinox situation. The spring hares get all horned up and become a fertility sign. Since they're the god's hares, logic doesn't need to apply and one of them laid an egg.  And then on top of that, if Jesus was God, how is Jesus at God's right hand? Why not pull a Bleach and make Jesus LITERALLY God's right hand and then have Aizen say that he's hypnotized the world? :D
Golden rice is even bullshit as well. 
Hopefully people realize that the stakes are too high this time to allow that.
Uhh pics? Willing to believe but need some evidence first
Lol first I thought you said sorry you missed the disco. Never miss the disco, that would be a tragedy!  I don't usually ask my pharmacist since most don't know anything about natural, I usually run things by my I guess you'd call her herbalist since she's done both, I've been going to her for years and she hasn't done me wrong yet.   And even though you're just a random dude on the interwebz I'm more willing to take what you say into consideration more so than others.  
$2 Trillion went missing from pentagon prior to 9-11 and you're worried about measly $35 billion.  Tens of billions go missing each day on Wall Street and no one seems to care.
Was it me what?
&gt; The reason it doesn't happen is because people overproducing corn in the US for e.g. have no incentive to use it to feed people in Africa.   Well the majority of the corn grown in the US is animal feed, biofuel or for making other ingredients. They are not suitable for human consumption.  Not to mention, even if they were edible, what do you think would happen to the farming infrastructure in countries that we send free food to? They'll collapse (as no one will buy food if they get it for free) and suddenly, they have absolutely zero capacity to feed themselves and will have to 100% rely on the west to feed themselves, which would be a disaster.
upvoted for visibility i hope you find a cure
&gt;  fighting to keep their products secret.  Not strictly true. They're fine with the current existing "Verified non-GMO" label.  They're against the push for a mandatory label, but that's because those pushing for it have been very open that they are doing so in an effort to demonise GM crops and push them out of the market. So it's not that surprising that they are against a marketing gimmick that dis specifically designed to damage their business.
Not sure conclusions like that can be made off a single 8 minutes videos...
It's long been restored on /r/worldnews.  Currently the #2 and the #18 story on /r/all  Here's the /r/technology submission about it:  http://np.reddit.com/r/technology/comments/31m4sd/snowden_the_good_news_is_that_theres_no_program/
Yes, because nothing Edward Snowden related is allowed on Reddit /s
I assume you mean his investment firm [Cascade Investments](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cascade_Investment)  The only maker of vaccines i can verify them using is Merck, the maker of Gardasil.  I don't see Merck on Cascade nor Bill and Melinda Gates Trust list of investments.
What else is he doing in Russia right now? Why not just keep reading? Sounded like he doesnt even still have the data, which I personally think is either a lie or extremely short sighted. 
What a horrible thing this is.  Maybe Morgellon's is more than one thing manifesting itself in people's bodies but introduced at the same time, or the seed/infection can produce varied forms.
Randall Carlson was on Joe Rogan's podcast two months ago talking these same Ancient Units of Measure, this is the relevant point, unfortunately it was at the end of the podcast: https://youtu.be/G0Cp7DrvNLQ?t=2h46m10s 
[deleted]
"for the first time"
This was sarcasm.
&gt; If it were the same thing, why are there no "non-organic", "non-kosher", "non-vegetarian", "non-halal" labels?  Do you not see the obvious difference there?  One is a lable, one is a non-label.  You're essentially saying that GMOs are labeled because some non-GMOs are labeled, which is just nonsense.  Because food without meat is called "vegetarian", food grown using non-synthetic pesticides/herbicides/fertilisers are called "organic". Food prepared according to Jewish rules is called "Kosher". There's currently not a word for food specifically made without GMO ingredients, but if there were the "Verified non-GMO label" would be called "Verified X" with X being the word for it. That's semantics and somewhat irrelevant.  The point is that lifestyle labels (of which GMO is one) are designed to appeal only to those looking for that type of food and is printed on the food that those who follow that lifestyle can eat. Mandatory labels are reserved only for essential health or nutrition information that the public *needs* to know. While I get that you would *like* to know if food contains GMO ingredients, there isn't a pressing need for you to know so you can make essential health or nutrition decisions. To grant the GMO label the elevated status of being the same as an essential health or nutrition label will not only give the public the mistaken belief that this must therefore be something to be concerned about, but if the only reason you can give is "because you want to know", and that's good enough to warrant a mandatory label, then there's no conceivable end to the list of mandatory labels that could be created on the basis that some groups want to know.  &gt;Come on now man, now you're just being silly. You're comparing the harvesting equipment to the content of the food itself and the actual genes it's comprised of?  You stated that one of the reasons for wanting a label is some people might have something against the seed manufacturer and want to avoid that food on that basis. If we are granting labels because of political reasons or because of some perceived wrongdoing by a company, then my example stands.  &gt;That a consumer has the right to know what they're consuming, period.  That's not a specific rule though. That's just your view, and your view is not the same as an established rule.  
[deleted]
That's not free
It's truly amazing. Even the article from 2007:  &gt;new insights into the accelerated rates at which the rivers of ice have been shrinking due to human-aided global warming  Then in the next sentence refers to the glacial formation covering trees 7,000 years ago.  I wonder how that "previous global warming period" was aided?  
That's what all of your type does. If they don't go along with what you believe is the best for everyone they "must need a doctor"  The single most preventive action to combat COMMON sickness was proper hygiene and living conditions. Polio Vaccine, small pox, Ebola, yes I do agree with you about. Flu? Not so much. I don't trust it much either, and don't agree with how it's been getting pushed onto people aggressively. Working in the healthcare field myself I've witnessed a ridiculous amount of patients that had the Flu vaccine getting hit hard with the flu which sometimes leads to other complications such as respiratory problems. 
Just for the record, when I inevitably become a whistleblower, $9 billion is indeed the exact sum required to buy my silence.
To be fair, you would expect he has a lot of well-rehearsed talking points by now. At the beginning of the interview, he seemed genuinely flustered when Oliver pressed him about whether or not he leaked the information responsibly. That being said, the first time I watched the interview I could barely focus on what was being said, so struck was I by Snowden's similarities with Obama.
THANK YOU. I was starting to worry this was a pro-Nazi sub. 
You obviously didn't watch the video
Thanks for the link, I'll check it out.  I stumbled across a youtube presentation on Morgellon's about a year ago and it was clear within minutes that something more is going on.  I haven't looked much more deeply into it either though until today.
I mean, I didn't mean it as fact, but as an opinion that I can't see a way out of. Anarchy always gives way to government and power centers. In any system of human interaction, people will find a way to get power from the people, and people will always be willing to give it up. To me its a fact of human nature. And with that in mind, I don't think the human race will last in this "warring states" period that we find ourselves in and a unified earth is the only way I can see our race surviving. 
They have.  It's been this way for years now.  There are a huge number of shill accounts exclusively working this issue.  There used to be a list of around 20 usernames confirmed for Monsanto/GMO shilling that was going around but the admins would ban any account that posted it.  The sub /r/gmomyths is dedicated to brigading agri-bussiness/GMO threads on Reddit and sites outside Reddit.
I loathe people who fawn over Buffett as if he's some sort of testament to the way rich people should behave.  He's s greedy motherfucking scumbag. 
someone needs to kung pao this bitch
Oh man I just ran across this article today. Been out of the loop in some of my research. I have discussed the possibility of Russia arming the Civil Defense Groups in Mexico. Never thought about the reasons, just a possibility based on past actions by the US and Russia.   Dick waving time.
I was unaware that rejecting GMOs would somehow remove all technological advances made in the past 95 years...  I hate the "People agree with me because they're smart" attitude. You didn't make a point. You were just being an arrogant snot.  Being anti-GMO is not "not understanding farming." Farming != GMO. Being from Minnesota and having tons of farmers in my family, you can go jump off a cliff.
&gt;You know what's actually racist? To think that making people equal on paper will magically solve everything  You mean the exact point I was just making?  That affirmative action is a racist Marxist leveling program?  Are you this stupid? You can't even follow an argument?  The truth is you don't really even have a view, you just want to have a fight and feel like you are enlightened and a great person and other people are racist and bad.  Go fuck yourself you trans-fae-multiracial-helicopter-kin. The world doesn't need people like you and your social politics cult is rapidly becoming the most hated group in western society.
Your obsession with Snowden as a limited hangout almost smells of a type of controlled opposition. But, this is pretty damn interesting, and I hate to say it but to believe they have the game locked down this hard is to quit the game.
You have a very transparent, manipulative style of posting. The shifts are pretty easy to identify.   My original comment was about the nature of users on this sub to question authority, therefore, i said pointing to an arbitrary, controversial rule is not in of itself an argument. It's literally just saying 'rules are rules' as if that makes any further discussion idiotically superfluous.   Not a strange point to make at all. You can defend the merit of the 'rules are rules' argument if you want, but you instead have tried to mock even the concept of discussing the rule, claiming it isn't appropriate for the conspiracy subreddit.   That seems a bit daft in my opinion. You have now claimed my perspective is anarchy, based on the general concept of questioning authority. I know that our language is fluid, but words do have meaning, and that is a completely unsupported jump.   Then the condescending "yes, there are crossovers between anarchy and conspiracy..." as if that has anything at all to do with what I said.   You mocked the notion of conspiracy theorists being unsatisfied with an answer of 'rules are rules' regarding a controversial, arbitrary rule on r/videos. One that has been discussed and meta-discussed across this and many other subs.    Which you then pretend is the counterargument to my claim. That I didn't specify what the plan was. What, on earth, does that have to do with me arguing 'rules are rules' is an unsatisfying claim, especially in this sub?   Maybe there is no plan, you're right. I didn't claim there is one. That doesn't magically somehow make the original comment I responded to a good argument.   Your style of argument isn't uncommon here, but I still don't really understand the purpose.   It's pervasive with the whole top minds of reddit group (I have no idea if you post there, just that it's a similar style of condescending dismissiveness). It seems kind of sad to me.   Outside of going for the low hanging fruit that's safe to mock (any sub has extremes, this one's can admittedly be uglier), the mocking is usually so intellectually disingenuous. I don't think there's some nefarious reason for it though.   I think it's generally a bunch of pathetic dudes who know they're so much smarter than everyone, but never get the credit for it. So they come here, latch onto things that are easy to mock, bring it back to their little nest and circlejerk over how much smarter they are.   Even the concept itself is a bit sad to me. There's a lot of lying going on in this world. You go for such a cliché; marginalized (read: marginalized, not oppressed) group to prove your intellect.   Do some good with those big ol brains of yours. People face real problems every day, in every country. Top minds, or your posting style generally, usually just *happens* to laugh at the little guy against the powerful (I am not at all saying that all or most posts on that sub are like this, but there's definitely a theme).   Forget conspiracy, doesn't that strike you as a little obsequious? Wouldn't you rather use that *actual* (not like those morons you mock!) top mind in a way that doesn't make you need a subreddit literally just make fun of people? It's weird to me.   PS - if you don't frequent that sub, check it out, you'll love it. 
r/videos mods are paid off chills. Investigate them.   That's a lot of mods up to no good.   S2S2S2S2S2 (7816)  	 doug3465 (142096)  	 lukemcr (27452) 	 	 DrJulianBashir (911107) 	 	 relic2279 (7839) 	 	 GuitarFreak027 (26672) 	 	 roger_ (141413) 	 	 roger_bot (6) 	 	 mocotazo (80268) 	 	 PabstyLoudmouth (79034) 	 	 NeedAGoodUsername (13948) 	 	 SomethingIntangible (520) 	 	 Flaccid_Moose (2041) 	 	 Azberg (5502) 	 	 xlnqeniuz (9997) 	 	 acslaytaa (5846) 	 	 Baraka_Bama (2144) 	 	 OBLIVIATER (17778) 	 	 AdamDaze (6594) 	 	 csapdani (62739) 	 	 jesuspunk (82386) 	 	 sanalalemci (189) 	 	 ThisIsMyFloor (7617)  	 Starayo (1100) 	 	 ryansoper (1453) 	 	 rockinghard (9794) 	 	 PhoneySoprano (8752) 	 	 videos_mod (51) 	 	 AutoModerator (532) 	 	 fritzly (15860) 	 	 bacondev (1319) 	 	 Meepster23 (3630) 	 	 TheMentalist10 (751) 	 	 MuggyFuzzball (3945) 	 S1lv3rSmith (3099) 	 	 IsNotFritzly (1) 	 	
I'm betting them going down and not coming back up after the first deployment if they can barely make shit that doesn't break how in the heck they gonna make world class subs.
&gt; No, it's a method for directly modifying the genes of the seed and thus changing the end product.  The end result is functionally indistinguishable from non-GMO.  &gt;How can it be sufficient when not all non-GMO foods are labeled and it only applies to North America?  it's sufficient because the purpose of lifestyle labels are to identify to those who are interested what foods they *can* eat, not to highlight the vast majority of the foods they *cannot* eat. Vegetarian labels show vegetarians what foods they can eat. Kosher labels show Jews what foods they can eat. Halal labels show Muslims what foods they can eat. Vegan labels show vegans what foods they can eat. "Non-GMO" foods show those who want to avoid GMO what foods they can eat. Therefore a non-GMO label is sufficient as it shows you what foods you can eat. The only reason it's a "non" label is because there's not a generally accepted term for people who avoid GMOs or food that *specifically* caters to those who avoid GMOs.  &gt;"Ripping up regulations" wouldn't be required at all (perhaps you can elaborate on what you even mean by this)  Sure thing. Currently as things stand, lifestyle labels (GMO, vegetarian, kosher etc) have a voluntary labelling system, and essential health or nutrition information (calories, fat content etc) has a mandatory labelling system.  GMO foods pose zero health problems to humans and are functionally identical to non-GMO foods. Therefore since they aren't a health or nutrition concern, they qualify as a lifestyle label and are voluntary.  The recent push has been to try and make the GMO label mandatory, which would put them in the "essential health or nutrition information" category, but those pushing for it have been completely unable to give any reason *why* it needs to have this status, instead only saying that some people want to know". While it is understandable that some people want to know if their food contains ingredients derived from GMOs, it doesn't fit the criteria of a mandatory label. Therefore to make it a mandatory label, you would need to rescind all the rules surrounding labelling and make "some people want to know" a fitting criteria for mandatory labelling. The problem with this is that there is a seemingly endless list of things that would fall under the "some people want to know" criteria, and with the precedent of the GMO label, there would be no reason not to entertain any combination of crazy mandatory labels.  Look; it's not that I'm against your desire to know. What I'm saying is that you'd be best pushing for the expansion of the current label rather than demand a second label that defies all the current regulations surrounding labels that *will* lead to the public mistaking it for a warning label and *will* lead to lobby groups purposely misleading the public so they can grow the turnover of their respective industry. That doesn't suddenly become OK because it lines up with your politics.
[deleted]
Yes favoritism and nepotism do not exist in the workplace and especially in relation to hirings or promotions
I totally believe it. There is a wasteland dump that was basically unregulated at all out here where I live until maybe a decade ago, and all sorts just kind of dumped whatever they wanted out there. You can trace our water system based on some oddball isotopes that come off of that area. But it has leached out through the whole area. So, if you had some bad industries doing almost anything, it surely contaminated the water table for a huge area.
This gives you away:  &gt; Kind of like this place until it was buried in jew hatred  If you actually spent time here and were being honest, you'd know that there is pretty much no "jew hatred". Racist comments are against the rules and are deleted by the mods.  You are either disingenuous in stating that you spend time here or are deliberately trolling. 
http://www.iatp.org/blog/201309/agroecosystem-study-implies-genetic-modification-neither-helpful-nor-necessary-for-yield  But yeah, the rest of your comment is right on.
&gt; Does anyone know why my links aren't showing up after I enter them in the URL spot this seems to be happening to me lately?  Because you try to add comments and then it becomes a text post.
But if I were unable to account for $100 of the tax money I owed I would be probably have my house and car seized by the IRS.  Absurdity.
This is the best tl;dr I could make, [original](http://www.chomsky.info/books/power01.htm) reduced by 93%. (I'm a bot) ***** &gt; See, there&amp;#039;s like a routine that you go throughif a book gets blown out of the water in England in places people here will see, or if a book gets praised in England, you have to react.  &gt; So after the Peters book got blown out of the water in England, the New York Review assigned it to a good person actually, in fact Israel&amp;#039;s leading specialist on Palestinian nationalism , someone who knows a lot about the subject.  &gt; Actually, the Israeli reviews in general were extremely critical: the reaction of the Israeli press was that they hoped the book would not be widely read, because ultimately it would be harmful to the Jewssooner or later it would get exposed, and then it would just look like a fraud and a hoax, and it would reflect badly on Israel.   ***** [**Extended Summary**](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31ou2x/the_fate_of_an_honest_intellectual_a_first_hand/) | [FAQ](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31b9fm/faq_autotldr_bot/ "Version 1.5, ~4578 tl;drs so far.") | [Theory](http://np.reddit.com/r/autotldr/comments/31bfht/theory_autotldr_concept/) | [Feedback](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23autotldr "PMs and comment replies are read by the bot admin, constructive feedback is welcome.") | *Top* *five* *keywords*: **book**^#1 **Review**^#2 **out**^#3 **going**^#4 **Well**^#5  Post found in [/r/conspiracy](/r/conspiracy/comments/31o77x/the_fate_of_an_honest_intellectual_a_first_hand/), [/r/chomsky](/r/chomsky/comments/2q2qsa/the_fate_of_an_honest_intellectual/), [/r/Palestine](/r/Palestine/comments/228ab3/the_fate_of_an_honest_intellectual_noam_chomskys/), [/r/deathbyelevator](/r/deathbyelevator/comments/1f3iio/chomsky_kicks_ass_finklestein/), [/r/politics](/r/politics/comments/6rc1f/noam_chomsky_the_fate_of_an_honest_intellectual/) and [/r/reddit.com](/r/reddit.com/comments/13088/the_fate_of_an_honest_intellectual_by_noam/).
what happened was a "conspiracy" as well as a "conspiracy theory" and is now a "proven conspiracy theory". Even though most people take the word "theory" to mean "unproven" it does not.
I can't plead ignorance and get away with it. It's like different rules apply to civilians.
Good point.
You should check it out. By all MSM accounts, immediately after standing trial and being sentenced, he declared himself transgender and now goes by the name *Chelsea Manning.* Impeccable timing if you want my opinion. 
can you, please, when you get home?
lame comment dude
Physical evidence of a fiber existing? Color me shocked. 
So where do we sign? It's a pretty cool toy, but it does go directly against the spirit of the sub to let an algorithm do the thinking for people.
No you really aren't saying anything... you are just responding to stuff I'm saying without really saying anything at all so I have to assume you are criticizing my posts because you believe the opposite of what I'm saying... the opposite of what I'm saying would be believing this bombing event was a hoax with actors.  
I'm just refuting your bullshit that the video shows things **that aren't there**.   The beauty if this is I don't need an elaborate crisis actors theory to support the "this video is bullshit" argument.  All I need is the video. Because it doesn't show what you say it does.  I don't have to make a theory up to make it fit. Not my job. Get it?  And stop False Equivalencing me. We both know that doesn't work.   Whenever you start typing   &gt;The only other logical conclusion then is  Just stop and hit cancel. Because it doesn't work on me. Maybe others. But not me. This will be the last post from you I respond to. Not because I am tired, but because I am now bored. I thought this would have been more challenging.
I am about a day late, but I'll share here.  I think about 90% of the stuff that is discussed in conspiracy theory forums like this falls in the [class-1 to class-2 range of the conspiracy theory rating scale](http://conspiraciesthatweretrue.blogspot.com/2007/03/conspiracy-theory-rating-scale.html).  I think that there are indeed people who are paid to post and discuss things on the internet to control the public perception of events, groups, brands, countries, and public figures.  I think that 9/11 was something that really demonstrated the media complicity in some seriously shady stuff. I don't think all people working for news companies are *in on it*, but that the people who make the final call on what goes in to the broadcast are to some degree complicit in the practice of manipulation of public opinion and perceptions.  So yes, I believe that propaganda and mass mind control via propaganda and public relations etc. does exist and is used to manipulate the public into a desired line of behavior and conduct. The details are not well established, but it does exist.  I believe that the large banks do indeed have much more influence than most people suspect. I believe especially the federal reserve has a tremendous amount of influence. Who controls the fed? Who knows. I don't. But by looking at the evidence, it's apparent that they are pulling a good number of the strings.  I think Israel gets a weird amount of support that doesn't make logical sense. This suggests to me that there is some level of control that they have over those supporting them.  I think that the president does not really have much of a say in how things go. I think he is well tended to by the oligarchic group that brought him into the position he is in. I think that he is not evil, but just a politician.  I think that a good number of the fear-inducing conspiracy theories are created and fed by propagandists. I think that the illusion of control can often be cheaper than actually controlling people or their environments.  I think that the term conspiracy theory has been intentionally given a negative connotation via propaganda to reduce the ability or likelihood of normal people investigating collusion and crime.  I think jfk's assassination was another big event that the media was complicit in covering up the conspiracy over.  I think that a lot of the ufo stuff is psyops. I used to be an advocate of all of that, but it's one of those things that is so murky, and when you have the rockefellers financing the disclosure project, it really doesn't look too good. It's hard to say what's going on there. I think it deserves some real evidence, beyond just witnesses saying shit. I think a lot of ufologists are sincere in their beliefs and interests, and i think there are some real deceivers out there.  I think the rose cross stuff that Bill Cooper talked about merits investigation, as does the UFO/alien stuff he talked about, but i don't think we should take his word for anything.  I think alex jones is either a COINTELPRO mouthpiece or a heavily manipulated person. Same for David Icke - i strongly suspect that in Icke's case that he believes what he says, and he says some real and inspiring things, but the details are where he is manipulated. Credit where credit is due, both have done great things for waking people up. But there is a real problem with being too comfortable with the ideas they share just because they seem sincere.  I think Ron Paul really did get shat on by the media. I think that his success really educated the powers that be on the dangers of social media, and prompted a more dominant approach to control over the internet.  I think net neutrality was a big manipulated trick in order to give government control over all methods of communication. It sets a precedent that you are no longer allowed to have a computer network to share whatever you want however you want, because the FCC is in charge of that.  I think that a lot of the feminist movement has been taken over by people who really do intend on making everyone incapable of speaking their minds or even having opinions for fear of offending someone.  I think that people who know which way the wind is blowing sign on with these plans even if they don't agree with them from a moral stance, but because it is profitable to do so - and it means they are not left in the dust.  I believe that there are people in positions of power and influence who believe the majority of people really *are* sheep, and *need* to have rulers. I think that these ideas have caused society to behave in this manner, to form a sort of self-fulfilling prophecy. I also believe that humanity, with the right steps, can become much more than it is. I believe that most people have the capacity to think for themselves, to understand the same things that these rulers do.  I am also optimistic. I think that we can work together to give the people in positions of power what they want and to ensure that everyone else has what they want. But it's going to take some work.  oh also, the wars are in order for the US and NATO to establish control over the middle east. Why? I don't know. lots of possibilities. oh and monsanto is literally run by evil fucking scumbags who want to control the world's food supplies, they're intentionally killing pollinators and non-terminator crops.  thats a good bulk of some of my conspiracy theory beliefs/suspicions. hope you enjoyed reading. if not, sorry.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xIJSw3Mhyd8  Tell me how fake this explosion is?  So fake that clothes gets blown off of people as they stand there?  Also bear in mind that you are saying that everyone in this video standing around Tsarnaev (and including Tsarnaev apparently since he is right where the bomb is about to go off and runs away from it) are a bunch of actors.  Those are some pretty god damn impressive effects.  That sure as hell is something more than just a smoke bomb.
[Patriarchy!](https://33.media.tumblr.com/6ddd54f55404c5000e156b0542cc12e3/tumblr_mzk2rrNT5g1sek2a3o1_500.gif)
&gt;*"Evidence" is so hetero-normatively white-centric.*  Yeah, so is truth, proof, logic and reason.
Matt Talibi is a pretty decent investigative journalist who specializes in the banking community
&gt; he revealed that he was a huge, oversized brain (he said 27 times the mass of an ordinary human brain) that was being held at Redmond. Trapped there and plugged into the internet, he had all the time in the world to learn how to hack every system, basically just watch the world through the eyes of webcams and security cameras. But, he was lonely and had a strange affection for me.  **O_o**  Um…escu’me?
I didn't consider you anything, I address my comments to the readers of Reddit as a group. Christianity has been under a deliberate, sustained propaganda attack for half a century. Recently that anti-Christian campaign has begun to bear fruit for those who continue it -- the Jews in control of our mass media. They are the only ones with the power to mount such a campaign.   The consequence is that former Christians are now renouncing Christianity, defaming Christianity, reviling Christianity, and so on. My point is that when a vacuum is created, something will fill it. A vacuum in organized religion will be filled by another organized religion. It's no good as an atheist to say this should not be so ... it will be so, because that's the way reality works. Right now, it looks very probable that the decline of Christianity in Christian countries will be countered by a rapid increase in Islam in those countries -- that Islam will begin to supplant Christianity.  It doesn't matter if we like it, or don't like it, or what we think of Christianity, or Islam, or the Jews for that matter. This is what is happening in the anti-Christian climate that has been created and fostered for decades in Western nations.
Here is a non-mobile link: http://animalnewyork.com/2015/theres-a-massive-illicit-bust-of-edward-snowden-stuck-to-a-war-monument-in-brooklyn/?utm_source=dlvr.it&amp;amp;utm_medium=twitter   ^[Sourcecode](https://github.com/Kharms/untouchedURL) ^| ^[Feedback?](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=untouchedURL&amp;amp;subject=untouchedURL%20feedback)
[deleted]
This is exactly the type of person I admire most.
Kill her!
Theres a link in the bottom right corner, enter the URL of the site you want to save and if its allowed the web page will be archieved in all its glory so you can reference back to it later.
I think I've managed touch on some of the batshit crazy already. Some is like news fan-fiction! I find the reddit minipulatation most interesting though. UK military is open about creating a social media wing. Came here looking for hints on how to spot the redditors on the payroll. It's clear that it's happening but seems difficult to conclusively prove on a case by case process.
VOTE THIS UP!!! DO NOT STOP SHARING OR TALKING ABOUT THIS!!!   we must take back our lives and our society now... or they truly have won. 
Good point
JP Morgan died in 1913?
Everyone let's all laugh about how we're paying the NSA to spy on us!  It's funny right?
[link](http://losangeles.cbslocal.com/2015/04/04/amid-severe-drought-la-county-waterworks-facilities-lose-82k-gallons-after-water-pump-malfunction/)
I strongly suggest broadening your vocabulary.  You look like a douche.
Certainly. 
[deleted]
If you are comfortable knowing everyone in public office in your Country can be legally lying about who they are then feel free to give no shits
Let's get Americans to agree that the towers weren't brought down by airplanes and jetfuel and then we can get an honest discussion going about how it was actually done.   Until conspiracy is the consensus, arguing over improvable hypothesis is just muddying the waters. 
I think the point here is not that vaccinations lead to a higher mortality rate, but that early vaccinations do not help lower the rate. That's what I take away from this at least.
Snowden's statue was removed by thousands upon thousands outraged [citizens](http://pds.exblog.jp/pds/1/201003/24/75/c0139575_2315542.jpg).
or maybe people just dont care. Here I downvotted you and I am not a bot. Just an American on lunch time. At least you know its not just shills :D
r/conspiracy subscribers are "Misguided fools"?      &gt;[–]OoogaOoogaYoink[S] 2 points 1 year ago*  &gt;I did, they weren't as thrilled about it as the users around here. But, hey, it did get a few lonely up votes. Also, when some ass-clown said the BBC was just part of their scam it immediately got down voted into oblivion. So, maybe there's hope for some of those misguided fools.   http://np.reddit.com/r/skeptic/comments/1nt816/wtc_7_bbc_the_third_tower_conspiracy_files_i_love/ccm4e0t  
Interesting article. Too bad it's riddled with clickbait. Makes it so you can't send it to certain people.
generally, i agree with you.  but i don't think the iran deal will fail.  and SoCo_cpp's argument only stands if the deal fails because the republicans block it.  if not, obama has a sack w/ boulders. we'll see ;)
&gt; Believing themselves to have a ‘**divine right**’ to rule, these Old Testament fundamentalists apparently want us to know we are nothing more than serfs and cotton-pickers on a global Zionist slave plantation.  &gt; As one of Israel’s chief religious leaders Ovadia Yosef put it, “Goyim [non-Jews] were born only to serve us. Without that, they have no place in the world – only to serve the People of Israel.”  Where do these age-old fantasies of "divine right to rule" spring from?  Their holy books, and thousands of years of belief and tradition.  Take **[Isaiah 60](https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=isaiah+60&amp;version=KJV)**, for example:  [Verses selected for brevity - read them all at the above link!]  &gt; 3 And the Gentiles shall come to thy light, and kings to the brightness of thy rising.  &gt; 4 Lift up thine eyes round about, and see: all they gather themselves together, they come to thee: thy sons shall come from far, and thy daughters shall be nursed at thy side.  &gt; 5 Then thou shalt see, and flow together, and thine heart shall fear, and be enlarged; because the abundance of the sea shall be converted unto thee, **the forces of the Gentiles shall come unto thee**.  [...]  &gt; 10 And **the sons of strangers shall build up thy walls**, and **their kings shall minister unto thee**: for in my wrath I smote thee, but in my favour have I had mercy on thee.  &gt; 11 Therefore **thy gates shall be open continually; they shall not be shut day nor night; that men may bring unto thee the forces of the Gentiles, and that their kings may be brought**.  &gt; 12** For the nation and kingdom that will not serve thee shall perish; yea, those nations shall be utterly wasted**.  &gt; 13 The glory of Lebanon [the Gentiles] shall come unto thee, the fir tree, the pine tree, and the box together, to beautify the place of my sanctuary; and I will make the place of my feet glorious.  &gt; 14 **The sons also of them that afflicted thee shall come bending unto thee; and all they that despised thee shall bow themselves down at the soles of thy feet**; and they shall call thee; The city of the Lord, The Zion of the Holy One of Israel.  &gt; 15 Whereas thou has been forsaken and hated, so that no man went through thee, I will make thee an eternal excellency, a joy of many generations.  &gt; 16 **Thou shalt also suck the milk of the Gentiles, and shalt suck the breast of kings**: and thou shalt know that I the Lord am thy Saviour and thy Redeemer, the mighty One of Jacob.  &gt; 17 For brass I will bring gold, and for iron I will bring silver, and for wood brass, and for stones iron: I will also make thy officers peace, and thine exactors righteousness.  Do some people actually BELIEVE this shit?  Damn right they do, it has been a cornerstone of the Jewish identity for centuries.
No.   There were plenty of gay people before agribusiness. Some species of frog can change gender, Common Reed Frog is the one most people are familiar with, its the frog from Jurassic park that caused gender changes allowing fertile dinos.   The issue here is that it wasnt happening naturally. Chemicals in the environment were triggering this change. 
There have been posts made detailing vote brigades, deleted posts, comments , etc. I would just do a search for "censorship" and limit your search to r/conspiracy. The fact that my comment is getting downvoted is proof that schills are trying to manipulate this and other subs.
Because sometimes "retarded" is the right word. Arguing with someone about their vocabulary is pretty retarded imo.
Makes me think of Brave New World a bit but a more radical form of population control. From a summary I found: The fetuses undergo different treatments depending on their castes. Oxygen deprivation and alcohol treatment ensure the lower intelligence and smaller size of members of the three lower castes.
[deleted]
I see no reason why anyone would doubt anthropogenic climate change. The real debate is about the nature of that change. Are increased CO2 emissions causing global warming? No. Does draining lakes, ponds have an affect? Of course. Ozone depletion, rainforest destruction, destroying mountains for mining operations that can and do affect global wind currents - all anthropogenic sources for climate change. All topics of legitimate concern and discussion - and a foundation for action. CO2 Global warming alarmists are retarded morons however and can not be expected to engage in rational discussions regarding nature, the environment, meteorology, or science in general.  Edit: damn you autocorrect
I think you're being a little to cynical about this. "target practice"? Seriously? You realize if they fired live ammunition at a peaceful protest it would likely spark a national protest against police power. 
[deleted]
That's great, here is the guy they got released: http://heavy.com/news/2014/08/ramsey-orta-chrissie-ortiz-eric-garner-arrested/  26 previous adult arrests, rape, assault, robbery with a boxcutter, multiple felonies, and a previous gun conviction. I guess he didn't learn his lesson the first time....    By the way, when he was arrested, he had just sold marijuana to a 17 year old girl. Then booked a hotel room so they could 'go get high', then as they were leaving the hotel, he sees the cops and quickly tucks the gun into her waistband. Tells her to 'be quiet and take it'....  Way to go Reddit, get this guy out of jail!!!!
[deleted]
I'm not saying they are faked I just think it is puzzling how you can't imagine faking photos but you can imagine faking an entire bombing which would require keeping hundreds-thousands of people quiet.  Also I see nothing in these photos you just sent me that would indicate a hoax... And you keep talking about this amputee "actor."  There were 17 people who lost limbs.. you need 17 amputee actors.. but they have to actually be people with legs the day of the marathon and without legs after the marathon.  
It's not a blanket dismissal, it's a statement requiring more evidence to prove a claim based solely on unclear correlation. America's infant mortality rate is REALLY bad compared to many countries - [last year we were ranked 55th in the world.](https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/rankorder/2091rank.html)  If someone did the research to see if all 54 countries above us administered vaccinations later, then there'd be a strong correlation that might have to do with causation. Japan is just one country.
Which is still markedly less than the US schedule of 7 by two months (including dtap/tripedia - which contains Thiomersal ^1 ).  Vaccinating pregnant women was also insane up until the last decade.  But in the US it's a crap shoot.  If you get the dtap infanrix from GSK, you're cool.  If you get Tripedia dtap from Sanofi Pasteure, you're getting the mercury too. It also doesn't help that the manufacturers aren't consistent with their usage. Save for, GSK - which appears to have completely phased out usage.  see fda page [here](http://www.fda.gov/BiologicsBloodVaccines/SafetyAvailability/VaccineSafety/UCM096228#t3)   ^1 &gt;The [Immunization Safety Review] Committee believed that the effort to remove thimerosal from vaccines was "a prudent measure in support of the public health goal to reduce mercury exposure of infants and children as much as possible....full consideration be given to removing thimerosal from any biological product to which infants, children, and pregnant women are exposed."  http://www.fda.gov/BiologicsBloodVaccines/SafetyAvailability/VaccineSafety/UCM096228#saf   Edited link fix and stuff
Ideally, you would think everyone as equally pragmatic. Planetary catastrophe events can only be survived by people with rockets and self sufficient space ships.
Police are now and always have been best friends with prostitutes, brothels, and pimps, who are mostly female by all analyses. The pimps I mean.   Anyone can google pimps are mostly female, to see the definitive research. 
I agree man, I've been there. i think we all get to a point in the rabbit hole where we begin to see how f'd up things really are and we get discouraged. i believe the [good will prevail](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vdrOueZ3g2c). it always does... [dont lose heart, man](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FmqHPwb09dw). :)
[deleted]
This has SRD/TopMinds witchhunt written all over it. They're already circling the wagons. Fuck you drama queens. 
Yes it does. 
[deleted]
These people are about 2 years behind lol this is definitely not the first time its reached NA shores
&gt;HE WORE A MASK  *GASP!*  How dare he!  He must have done it to discredit /r/conspiracy!  Seriously?  He just wanted to conceal his identity and bring a little levity to the podcast.  Much ado about nothing as far as I'm concerned.   &gt;Stop harassing me.  Yeah, OK.  You'll notice my first post in this thread wasn't even a reply to you specifically.  I purposefully avoided talking to you, son.  
[deleted]
What would you call resolving disagreements where the more powerful party puts the smaller party in a cage, using gun-toting uniformed goons with shiny badges?
Sorry. not sure where i was going with that line...  Maybe i was thinking "there is no way to carry a gun for protection that won't  result in violence ". 
As a dyslexic, both parties are partially wrong. One is a bit of an arsehole, as if he was really about the betterment of another poster, he would be more tactful. The dyslexic for not making effort. I had to make an effort as I wanted a good job. There was way to much wrong with that sentience to blame it on dyslexia. 
says 3 day redditor /u/ganjadon75    You guys are pathetic. The sub you undoubtedly crawled out of is the worst about banning dissenting users. Typical of you people, everyone else should have rules you can abuse.
/u/goldfister has been caught lying/plagiarizing:  https://www.np.reddit.com/r/911truth/comments/2avb5u/jim_miegs_gets_his_hypothetical_handed_to_him_in/ciz8flf
Coward.  You wouldn't know the difference between rape and potential murder.  Kill your apathy.
[deleted]
+1, I've been a gym rat for the last 17 years.  The males have always made up about 80% of the people.  Girls just seem to be lazy.
Good, literally every post I read that bashed the podcast was about the mask and background, not the discussion.
And what would you suggest we do? Suck his dick like the rest of you?   He abuses his powers and bans people based on his feelings. This isn't the kind of person who should be a moderator. He's been demodded multiple times and reinstated every time.  Hey, doesn't that sound an awful lot like cops who do shady shit on the job, get paid vacation, and come back? 
Have a word with yourself, it is a subreddit, go start you own if this one scares you 
&gt;And yet Rikers is a maximum security prison.   Firstly you must understand that Ryker's Island is run by the NYC DOC but is also a county jail, not just a maximum security prison. He is not in "prison", he is in "jail".  You do not go to prison until you are convicted of said crimes.   &gt;How'd they get the rat poison? How did 19 people end up with rat poison in his food?  Yeah, that is why they would have rat poison on premises. I am not sure you really understand how available these kinds of things are in a jail or prison enviorment, especially in general population. It would be nothing to stick a handful of pellets in a sock while on work detail. It could be anything from a sadistic prank by a kitchen worker to payback or retribution by someone with access to the food.  &gt; And why does this man fear eating food to the point he's on a self-imposed hunger strike?   For publicity and its working btw. He has had his defense for a crime he plead guilty for paid for. I think the real question would be, "Why would he go on a hunger strike when no poison was found in his food and only 19 inmates in a facility that houses the equivalent of an average town's population reported the incident?"  &gt;...and I support getting him out...  Based on what? He was clearly guilty of having the weapon. It was a valid charge he is on trial for. Recording police brutality does not give you free reign to commit crimes.
&gt; I would love to see a poll on how many Americans actually know about building 7. I would be astonished if more than 5% of Americans know.  Exactly, this is the firestarter.  People will learn. 
I believe that, while they are similar and intertwined, the synagogue of Satan is distinct from mystery Babylon.
You mean the CIA.
&gt;Understood. Every prisoner there is at risk of eating poisoned food, whether they're in jail or prison.   Or anywhere else for that matter, however, considering the type of people in said prisons I would suggest your chances are much higher there.  &gt;http://www.nytimes.com/2015/02/22/nyregion/even-as-many-eyes-watch-brutality-at-rikers-island-persists.html?_r=0  You mean people abuse power? Wow. However this has little to nothing to do with the said circumstances, nor Ramsey Orta's innocence.  &gt;I'm aware. And I'm also aware of the fact that because of these conditions, there shouldn't BE any rat poison on the premises.   What? Rats spread MRSA which is rampant in these institutions. Of course they need to have rat poison.   &gt;There's only one way it can come in, and that's through the guards themselves.   Uh, no, its ordered by procurement and delivered like all their other supplies. Are you really suggesting it must be smuggled in by a guard? I don't even know how to respond to that.  &gt;Based on the fact that his family is asking for bail. You read OP's original link, right?   His family asking for bail makes him innocent? His family (or him) posted a $75,000 bail back in August for other charges. No wonder they couldn't afford it....  &gt;You read OP's original link, right?   Right, and it was some of the worst journalism ever, that simple fact checking debunks. Just because it was on the internet doesn't make it right.   
He just made a really shitty, 3 hour long podcast along with another mod and now trolls from /r/subredditdrama are capitalizing on the (admittedly embarassing) event to fracture the community and possibly even the mod team.  It should be noted that /u/flytape and /u/AssuredlyAThrowAway pursued this project unilaterally, and did not ask for feedback from community members or mods before posting their shitty podcast as a sticky. That's what's alleged, anyway. I could be wrong.   All I know is that podcast was shit, and SRD trolls are also shit. Combine the two and it's no surprise that this whole drama is just a big pile of stinking shit. 
He should do the right thing and step down. Be honorable /u/flytape
I used to work as a proof reader/editor/linguistic advisor in the capacity where someone like you would give me something like this and pay me to give it the best shot at publication.  If this is what I received, I probably wouldn't even take on the job because it's so profoundly bad. It's not to say I don't admire your spirit, nor is it to say the story you have in mind isn't a good one. However, the way you have expressed it here is not going to interest people. There's something so awkward and confusing about the way you've written this that it's actually painful to plod from one sentence to the next.  First of all, don't write the thoughts of your protagonist. Don't even write in first person – that's considered quite a challenge. Don't *explain* anything. Don't tell; *show*, they say. Which is to say, make the narrator so astute and insightful in his observations and selections of what to include in the story that even without ever being given privileged information about the mind of the protagonist (or any other characters) we can construct for ourselves an accurate and comprehensive picture of their inner world, character and motivations.  You need a lot of practice – why not find a novel that you really like, analyze the writing style in detail and try to copy that style and structure. See if you can make it recognizably an attempt to mimic that author.  Good luck. 
Doesn't change anything.
Wrong not drunk again but dealing with the likes of you highly probable. 
Sorry addendum : hell in this very post there are comments from accounts oriented to portraying this sub as a racist hell hole.   So ya. Nice argument.
890. Germanwings airliner crash was a plot (3/29/2015)  I think Germanwings airline crash was similar to recent airplane accidents – MH370, MH17. It was done by a big black hand. The purpose is to intimidate German to join war against Russia in Ukraine. France was warned too – that was Paris Hebdo “terror attack”. Now it’s German’s turn.  	 In disappearance case of MH370, I allege they used Uninterruptible autopilot system. (see #825, 826, 830, 832, 835, 851) In this case, they used EM sleep wave.   Co-pilot Lubitz was in forced asleep and couldn’t react to any outside world’s noise.   [quote] Who was Andreas Lubitz, Germanwings co-pilot blamed for crash?  By Diana Magnay, Ashley Fantz and Catherine E. Shoichet, CNN , Fri March 27, 2015  The only sound the recorder picked up from Lubitz as the Airbus A320 went down, Marseille prosecutor Brice Robin said, was the co-pilot's steady breathing.  http://www.cnn.com/2015/03/26/europe/germanwings-plane-crash-pilots/ [/quote]  I had a lot of experience with that mandated sleep wave. It was a “sudden, irresistible sleepiness”. I couldn’t wake up even if there was a severe headache. (Headache was caused by a separate EM microwave ray shooting, sleep wave only force people to go asleep) I wrote about this 13 years ago. See “12. Mind control EM sleep wave (1)” to # 16. http://katsung.forumotion.com/t4-em-sleep-wave#77  “Steady breathing” may well explain Rubitz was in deep sleep. Air-controller’s communication, knock at cabinet door, passengers’ scream, none could interrupt him. As for the locked door, if someone could install sleep device in cockpit, they could do similar work as well.    891. Time table of huge payment to China (4/2/2015)  4/1/2001  EP-3 spy plane landed in Hainan Island.  4/11      Crew of EP-3 were released. Skolnick posted an article article "RED CHINESE GET BIG BUCKS IN SECRET HOSTAGE DEALS".   4/26/2001  Silverstein was given the lease of WTC.   That was an interest exchange. D.o.D. created a case so that D.o.J. could made a secret deal with China secret police to create a drug smuggling case. D.o.J. helped D.o.D. to get the 911 bombing case.   5/11/2001 Timothy McVeigh’s first planned execution date but delayed 30 days. 6/11/    Timothy McVeigh executed.  These two days were originally planned for the breakup of the framed drug case and the murder of Kat Sung. The attempt failed. I’ll tell the story later.  9/11     WTC bombing  7/13/2001  China awarded to host 2008 Summer Olympic Game.  9/7        China was affirmed the entry of WTO.  China got its payment of the secret deal.   Skolnick never mentioned that the payment was Olympic hosting and membership of WTO. But one sentence revealed something. “The principal financial terms of the hostage release are not to be publicized for at least until after Red China successfully arranges hosting the International Olympics…… according to European and non-European intelligence sources.”  Until 4/11/2001, China had never had chance to host Olympic Game, let alone to be member of WTO. Why Skolnick used that event as a reference? Unless he knew it’s a deal had to pay.   [quote] Eight years after a narrow and unexpected defeat to Sydney, Australia, in its attempt to be host to the 2000 Olympics, Beijing more than doubled the votes Toronto received as the runner-up. [/quote]    [quote] WTO Working Party Finally Approves Chinese Membership  18 September 2001 The "long and painful" talks, as the EC's chief negotiator Karl Falkenberg called them, eased when, on 13 September, Mexico announced the achievement of a bilateral deal with China. http://www.ictsd.org/bridges-news/bridges/news/wto-working-party-finally-approves-chinese-membership [/quote]  Now we know why China could get that “narrow and unexpected” Olympic Game hosting in July and didn’t have to wait “long and painful” procedure to the WTO any longer in September that year.   
Wee! Off the rails we go. What the actual fuck are you talking about? Nevermind, don't explain. sometimes I like to bask in authentic crazy.   
You guys set up one of these brigades on snoonet every month or two to discredit all the mods.  They made a mistake.  Get over it and go back to SRD.
I understand. However, I am concerned about all tyranny, majority and minority. I do not think it wonderful that the M-party reuses the current political system, because this system is fundamentally unstable and *a priori* tyrannical. In any system of coercive resource extraction (mercantilism, taxation, colonialism, slavery), the most financially interested parties will end up dominating, because they are shielded from the direct responsibility of their actions via the political process.   I agree that it would be ever-so-slightly better to have a tyranny of majority than that of a supraminority. But I am looking further down the road -- to a world *without any sanctioned tyranny*, and I believe investing time and resources in reform of the current system from the inside is a waste of effort.  Look into agorism if you have the time and interest. It offers a completely different set of solutions where majority support is not a prerequisite, and which can result in a thoroughly stable, decentralized system of tyranny minimization, all without the use of coercion or force. The majority can do as it pleases, and the minority can disagree and go their way, so long as they do not aggress upon each other.  
He ought to come on out to California; all our lawns are dead, and lord knows we can use an extra person.
There's never been any doubt -- for me, at least -- that Israel is heavily involved in supporting the murderous efforts of ISIS.
Somewhere a DUCK POND is missing an amphibian.  Go home, /u/derptwo
If anyone cares what's actually being said in that thread: https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=iw&amp;tl=en&amp;js=y&amp;prev=_t&amp;hl=en&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;u=https%3A%2F%2Fnp.reddit.com%2Fr%2FIsrael%2Fcomments%2F31rzsb%2F%25D7%2596%25D7%2594_%25D7%2590%25D7%25A0%25D7%2597%25D7%25A0%25D7%2595_%25D7%2590%25D7%2595_%25D7%2594%25D7%259D%2F&amp;edit-text=
[deleted]
You may also enjoy /r/Syngenta.
Article from 2008, but surprisingly, nothing has changed, really.
Everyone knows a good point is only a good point if said by someone who had the foresight to complete a sign-up form an arbitrary amount of time ago.
&gt; Wouldn't call that a right,  How do you mean?
[deleted]
Remember - ask for Protective Custody there officer. The inmates don't take too kindly to your kind.
In recent years, it would appear to have devolved into a haven for trolls and astroturfing.
Because they would make for pretty garish posters.
Ooh, low blow. Going straight for the ad hominem!  [Here's some misogyny!] (https://www.reddit.com/r/Libertarian/comments/31nu4l/artists_secretly_install_100pound_edward_snowden/cq47piz)  [And more misogyny...] (https://www.reddit.com/r/cringepics/comments/30diqn/youre_picture_isnt_very_clear_do_you_have_another/cps4nxm)  [Nice! Found some misandry too!] (https://www.reddit.com/r/cringepics/comments/2yk98k/your_sunglasses_have_determined_that_to_be_a_lie/cpbpsgr)  [Got some hate for mental disabilities going on here.] (https://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/2xrgf1/this_happening_now_missoula_montana_police_baffled/cp2xiyl)  Need I continue? Oh, feel free to delete those comments to make me look like the villain, you hypocrite.
You can't make this shit up.
There is no way you aren't lazy
I am sure a lot of you may have come across the Corbett Report but I wanted to post the link incase there are some that may not have.  An excellent source of alternative news in my opinion. Please have a look through the video uploads on the youtube channel as there will be something of interest to you!
He was carrying a stolen Norton 25acp that happened to be unloaded.  Do you really think that was for self-defense?  If you know anything about guns, you know that isn't the case.  He's lucky a cop didn't see him with it and kill his ass because the piece of shit police officer would actually have a legit self-defense case in that scenario....  
I still see it
Not at all.  The point I was trying to make is that the current level *should* be sufficient to put a stop to some of these crimes if the NSA was actually using any of what it has for good.
Or it's a business move to make Reddit's hiring practices more employer-centric by divesting a prospective employee of their traditional ability to shoot for a better wage, cloaked in a politically-favorable veneer of gender equality.
They put a smart meter on my gas line recently.  I think I'll go break it.
What are you implying?
Nope. Atheists say we should practice our religion behind closed doors, but apparently it's okay to prance your sexuality around (with no clothes on basically) in gay pride parades on the streets. Do you see the bigotry yet? Do you see it?
it's still in /r/news and /r/Bad_Cop_No_Donut. As for politics, the post your referenced violated the rules for submissions that are plainly posted on the sidebar.   http://imgur.com/QU8fBaa  http://imgur.com/YIvzKij  http://imgur.com/THfuMxx  http://imgur.com/Wtso4qX  http://imgur.com/S47mPjL
The interesting thing here is that he's stated before that he doesn't even really believe in most conspiracy theories - so you gotta wonder about both his motives *and* the motives/reasons behind the contortions and fellation we're seeing here from the 80-percenters.
I'm talking about the other guy.  You got my upvotes 
It doesn't really seem banned. I mean we are able to watch it. In what way is it banned?
What does being a Freemason have to do with it?
How exactly is a serial rapist not an "immediate danger to society" though?  Actually, it seems he was initially released on bail, then rearrested after more accusations surfaced: http://www.nydailynews.com/news/national/arizona-teen-tyler-kost-faces-29-charges-sexually-abusing-18-girls-article-1.1777714
I'm not refuting anything. I am questioning assumptions. Shouldn't that be encouraged on this sub?  Why does the age of my account matter? Does that make me a shill?
Yes.  There's no money in healthy people. 
Who says there is no physical evidence? The rearrest happend after only one week.
I love how they tell you there are no dangers from the scanners and yet very quickly jump to ensure a little kid doesn't actually walk through it. I mean, good on them for watching out for the kids, but stop lying, jeesh.
"he said he didn't do anything, why don't you talk to him?" I guess that girl never heard of lying.  he broke the law and then dug himself deeper by resisting arrest. 
That's pretty sexist. Have you SEEN some of the books air marshalls carry around? I'm pretty sure I saw a vampire book in there somewhere.
There's really no proof that anyone has ever died, or ever existed, in the history of the world. It's all a giant hoax. Probably a Mossad plot.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ssdLzA9-kNs
And I agree. That's why I don't ask women to cover up, I have no issue, heck I really don't mind if you know what I mean. But guess what....... then the same goes for Christianity. This is America, founded on God. Have a problem? Don't live here, leave, or just don't partake. Don't ask us to change.  And if you try to reply in the way I think you will and you still don't see the bigotry, then you may want to consider visiting other subs because this is about freedom for all.
Lol, bro you're crazy. Calm down. 
That's what I thought! I had a picture of my girlfriend at the time stuffed in my wallet so I produced that and it was fine. The only thing I could think of was that they had nothing on me (as always), so they were just grasping at straws to catch me in a random lie for some reason. They did hilariously say they were going to CALL MY GIRLFRIEND to ask her about the purpose of my visit to the US. I said sure go for it. They said "Okay we're going to go dooo iiiiiiit!" and I was like "k." and they left the room pretending to go call her, forgetting that they didn't know her name or phone number. Ahhhh good times.
Defeat the Washington machine.
Can't they just dig a bigass crater with some remote control bulldozers?
The 2nd amendment is not what most of its fans wish it were...
Yup. Also, men and women *both* discriminate. It's human nature, plus, in a business context, you get your low wage "wins" where you can get them. If John's going to throw a royal shitfit &amp; Susie will roll with it without balking, guess what? John gets the bigger raise, Susie gets a consolation prize fancier title.
The real terrorists is israel. 
Complete and utter speculation
I spent literally 4 days finding this link and traveled back in time to provide it to you.  http://www.theguardian.com/technology/2014/aug/18/reddit-imgur-twitch-derp-social-data  The title is the tl;dr. Meta reddit conspiracy. 
[deleted]
there is massive amounts of radiation leaking from the Japanese Nuclear plants in Fukushima after their massive 9.0 earthquake devastated the coast line, where the Nuke plant is.  This created a melt down on epic proportion, and no one has a clue on how to stop it because technology doesnt exist to fix the problem.   Since then massive amounts of radioactive poison is leaking into the air and into the Ocean which has already hit the Western Coast of the North American continent. Its also in the air so it comes down via rain and enters the ground water supplies and food chain, and eventually into your body.  So tons of Cancer should be starting across the U.S. and Cananda right about now
Yeah I agree.  As a white guy that never understood racism, I had an odd time growing up.  I didn't understand why my parents were that way, then friends, etc..  As we all have, I would imagine, I have had a strange life.
Your original question was as to why the trials haven't received much attention. If your question had been "why haven't this situations/people gotten much attention" I would tell you you were wrong.  Both the alleged perpetrators and the events have been covered extensively by the media.  Again, for the trials, there is very little question among the general public, right or wrong, about whether or not these people are guilty or whether or not they deserve to be punished. The media can definitely magnify controversy where there is little, but creating controversy out of nothing is not something worth their while.
Netanyahu is figuring out a way to bill the Palestinians for this.
It's obvious because r/stormfront is nowhere near as popular or influential as this sub.
wow this guy is a real fucking scumbag. this subreddit needs to be abandoned, these racist pieces of shits have completely infiltrated it. 
I demand to be made a mod of this sub because I have a very large penis and my farts smell like fresh baked bread. I will assume that any disapproval of this request means that all of the mods are being paid by Obama to keep me from my rightful place as overlord of this sub.  My large penis demands immediate and swift action.
There are dozens of cameras in an around that theater. Either the footage of how he got into the theater will come out during trial or it's gonna be burried. Either way people should train themselves to ask 'why' when major national cases are missing huge pieces of evidence.   I'd also like to point out that was saw the BB body but not Osamas. And there is literally no reason for this. 
Probably because between the [other documentaries nominated](http://oscar.go.com/nominees) it was just a better film. It really was a great doc at face value, especially paired with the [Terms...](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt2084953/) documentary.
dafuq?
[deleted]
Fine by us.
[deleted]
That's why you need clearance and security checks when you work back there.  As someone who used to work in security and airlines at the airport myself.  Of course there are bad apples like in any other job, but for the most part people won't be going terrorist mode when they want to make money, and if they were fob the security checks will most likely stop them from getting clearance if they are even able to get that far in the hiring process.
Haha, that's funny. You came here to defend the original narrative and now you're realizing all the holes in it. Good job.
[deleted]
What you seem to be missing is we see the suspect with a bag, then the suspect without a bag.   I'm quite sure he's not an illusionist capable of rendering his bag invisible whilst on his person. 
basically it didn't.   one thing i want to say about this issue is Area 51. it is not open public and it will not be open. why? because area 51 is where apollo movie is set. if we see landform of area 51 we can understand us didnt  go to moon. (of course people of usa wont believe it even if there is strong evidences just like 911)  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Apollo_1
Probably going to guess that this was taken at Louisville International Airport
I was wrong about it being 50 feet. It is more like 100 feet:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OmuzyWC60eE#t=71  http://911research.wtc7.net/essays/thermite/docs/cameraplanet_orangespout.png  Any chance you noticed that strange explosive ejection at 1 minute 11 seconds of the first video?  Here's a stabilized close up of it. Is that also airplane aluminum?  http://femr2.ucoz.com/_ph/5/2/373812155.gif   
People who make grand claims should be held accountable for providing some semblance of evidence. This sub sucks
[deleted]
Good catch. Do you know if any scientists have disputed the thermite claim or offered explanations for how it got there? It sucks the study wasn't peer-reviewed.
The government's official 9/11 conspiracy theory is not defendable.
[deleted]
I think its quite misleading to think the bullet wounds in the guys back wouldn't tell the same story as the video. Forensics is pretty damning
&gt;normally people are exposed to millions of times more pathogens daily than they are exposed to in a vaccine  It's completely disingenuous to compare something injected directly into the bloodstream with outside pathogens that still have to pass through the defenses of the body's immune system.  &gt;and the chemicals found in vaccine are well below any harmful threshold and amount that would be encountered just in the environment anyways  Again, there's an important distinction when you bypass all natural immune response through injection.  You may have a quantity of studies, but not the gold standard quality. You don't have any studies comparing any of these vaccines with placebo controls. 
Well if you can post a link I would appreshiate it, I havent seen it. And it still leaves a lot of questions, especially with the FBI contact. I am not arguing that they did it, but I doubt that these two guys planned this themselves.   Even if they did there is no way the government couldnt have known about it. Russia warned us that these guys were dangerous, then the FBI came in and tried to turn one of them into an informant. In the age of the NSA you would think 2 people labeled as dangerous wouldnt be able to learn how to make a pressure cooker bomb without raising a couple flags.  It is also pretty weird having the Craft mercenaries their, this is the first time that that has happend.
Millions of people were there.  Maybe close to 100 million.  They were all watching.  They all saw the bomb.  They all saw the dead.  They had a Michelob Ultra with their paramedic friends afterwards.  They all hate the conspiracy theorists.  They all want them dead.  They all saw the carnage.  They all felt the shockwave.  They all heard the screams.  On TV.
I like how gullible you are in believing the horse shit fed by Mainstream Media but then I like a lot of stuff. 
I think there is a possibility that the pack we see might not be the only pack.  Just because he has one on, doesn't mean Craft Intl. wasn't in on shenanigans and multiple packs were not present.  It's just very, very odd that they were there with all their kit and the same backpacks......but it was nothing??  Not positive about that one.  They brought martial law to their streets, there was shenanigans afoot.  Something else was going down and it's not as simple as a picture to prove otherwise.
&gt; It's not him anyway.  The fingerprints may match, the DNA may match, but is it "him"?  This poor fucker may well have been so doped up on anti psychotics and other (unknown) drugs that he bears no psychological semblance to the person bearing his name at the time he was arrested.  The science of pharmacology may be mediocre at *treating* mental disease, but when it comes to CREATING, they're fucking aces.
Im very sorry to hear about your daughter. I hope the adverse reaction was a minor one. Good call on the Dr's part to not innoculate an immunocompromised patient.    I'm not really sure what you are trying to say here though in regards to my statement. My original point was that it would be unethical to just commandeer the necessary population for the study.  
I would imagine their would have been plenty of screams after the first bomb went off, and if I heard a BOOM then a shit ton of screaming, I would probably get the fuck out of there
what's the evidence for tying the blown up back pack to any of them. Plenty of people around the bomb could have had a back pack. also i'm not seeing the connection between the white part on the back pack and the khaki guys back pack.  It all seems like a reach:\ like starting with a conclusion and trying to make a premise
[deleted]
I almost never comment here because of the crazy shit being spewed, but there is some blatant paid shilling going on in these threads. You guys must have hit a nerve here recently. 
Which will be violently put down like occupy was.  Sorry Gandhi, but peaceful protesting in an authoritarian, inflexible police state does not work.
http://s752.photobucket.com/user/dreamslaughter/media/WTC%20Structure.jpg.html?sort=3&amp;o=0
One picture of a blown up backpack is enough for it to be a conspiracy? I see a shredded backpack so mangled it's hard to tell which parts are which.   All he had to do was profess his innocence in court, stand up and say he was framed. But he didn't. Because he's guilty.
I see a black backpack while the tsarnaevs had what looks like a white and a grey backpack. I also see two guys dressed the same, at the scene, with backpacks. And then one running away without. They look like agents of some sort. Then I see a whole bunch of stuff that looks like a scene being set up, people smiling, chilling, seemingly spreading blood, running the backpack to the scene in a white box, etc. Open your eyes, or your mind.  You're basing everything on a ruling by a court system that we know for a fact can be flawed sometimes. It's foolish to believe so blindly in it.   I'm just asking questions 'cause I'm a curious guy. And it's clear that the tsarnaev story doesn't really add up.
90% of internet traffic goes through US servers...
Explain more, please. 
Maybe because this is how the fuckin' vaccines work according science??? ☺   I post about a lot of others stuff that I am interested in (you can check my history), and actually I would be pretty happy if someone would even pay me for writing internet posts. Also, I do not think that someone wrote exactly the same, but feel free to link it.  However a lot of stupid people think that vaccines are some kind of satanic rituals. Are bacterial and viral epidemics made-up dangers too? How shall we fight them instead, shall we sacrifice goats to Belzebub or what?  There are conspiracies (I post here frequently about other topics), and medical companies and professionals make a lot of mistakes too. But saying that all vaccines are unnecessary is just dumb.  *edit: clarification
There is no link. We are just developing better ways to diagnose.   Junk science is a waste.
Agreed, though I wouldn't dismiss the notion entirely. It was more of a component, than singular cause or motive.
Its okay to shoot down drones, right?  Because stalking is illegal. 
So many uninformed comments.. Oh well
[deleted]
It doesn't have anything to do with that.  [Here you go; The great philosopher Eminem will clue you in.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RZIzD0ZfTFg)
When you're in high altitude you are subject to much higher radiation than normal (and more than a simple scan). That's all I'm saying
Jim, you like the Light of Galadriel are our light when all others have gone out. Dark times loom. They are out in hordes like the Orcs on their dark mounts. Spewing the evil lies of Sauron. Only the few, the Samwise, have the ability to see reality as it happens. By your side I will gladly face the true incarnation of evil. Until it's demise or my own. 
she's absolutely mad, like when she claims america was settled by people who came and assimilated into the local culture - [this is not how you assimilate into a local culture](http://s3.timetoast.com/public/uploads/photos/2154881/Wounded%20Knee%203.jpg?1328031422) 
[deleted]
&gt;We allow Americans, Australians, Canadians, and Europeans to exist because they serve Jews and they serve Israel – and, when they get out of line, we attack them, like we did to the Americans when we sunk their USS Liberty. In the words of former Israeli Knesset member Yossi Sarid, “We control US politicians like marionettes.”
To what extent? You're just agreeing with me &amp; making implications. 
Color only matters because the Media knows polarization gets the people who still trust network news to tune in. 
&gt; There's nothing wrong with that.  Scrutiny is a major part of the scientific process.   I'm not even sure if this is worth discussing since it sounds like the title is misleading, but the title says they discredit "scientists", not science. Discrediting a person's work is one thing but trying to discredit them personally in order to make people doubt their work is not part of science.
Account 13 days old and your comment history prove your agenda......  if it was a hacked account shouldn't there still be an apology?  Just asking questions.
&gt; Some racist arsehole guessed this guys password, posts a Nazi's wet dream and you lap it up because of confirmation bias. &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; Gimme a fucking break, it's so obvious. You have to be an idiot not to see that very clearly. It's actually a good article for demonstrating historical antisemetic tropes. If I were to teach a class on antisemitism, I would use this faked article.   You can't hack the Talmud, /u/starknoks.
So? 
[deleted]
I'm amazed at the number of people who think "published"  or "peer reviewed" means "infallible." That's literally the purpose: to get your findings out there for others to see, scrutinize, and use. 
Exactly what's needed, eli5 for all, cheers!
There are whole subs dedicated to bashing us,and I could care less. If you posted something here that offended people I would not want the stupidity deleted. Downvote and move on. Banning people for silly RULE infractions is one of the main reasons why I can't wait until reddit eats it digg style. He broke an arbitrary rule that could be applied to any statement. I think people who correct grammer are assholes. Take your sub private if you can't stand up to criticism. And I get it they are the mods. Fall in line or else. Muslims bad,USA #1,take your vaccines,etc.
There won't be another official conspiracy podcast if that's what you're going for.  There is no way to fairly and officially represent such a diverse group of people.  But we could easily do some Google hangout chat where you and I debate live and invite people to witness/comment on it.
&gt; There won't be another official conspiracy podcast of that's what you're going for. There is no way to fairly and officially represent such a diverse group of people.  Wow.  Are you being serious right now after the stunt you pulled?  
&gt;One student asked what Monsanto was doing to counter the “bad science” around their work. Dr. Moar, perhaps forgetting that this was a public event, then revealed that Monsanto indeed had “an entire department” (waving his arm for emphasis) dedicated to “debunking” science which disagreed with theirs. As far as I know this is the first time that a Monsanto functionary has publically admitted that they have such an entity which brings their immense political and financial weight to bear on scientists who dare to publish against them. The Discredit Bureau will not be found on their official website.    Looks like people are flat out lying to make the "employee" look bad.
&gt; Do you realize how many hundreds of such exercises are taking place every day?  Wait, hundreds of multi-agency drills involving crisis actors every single day, you say!? Oh, my god I had no idea...anyone was so dumb. LOL
Bingo
The point is, our "current reality" is skewed towards big business.  You're going out of your way to make it seem impossible because there are only thousands of us?    Your bias is showing.  You're doing nothing but telling yourself and anyone who will listen that, even though you would love to see this happen, you're not willing to stray for the norm, resolve the issues and hurdles and resolve the problem.  The "norm" is the problem.  There are lots of people out there who can only tell others what the *CURRENT* way of things is.....and they cannot seem to break free from what is already in front of them.  Claiming the current reality is the only option because  Nothing is written in stone.  You've dragged this on quite a long time and saying not much except that it can't be done.  When can/will you break from your mold?  I don't have the easy answers on how to hurdle the current bullshit, I just know it doesn't have to be this way.  Humans made this happen....not the supreme forces of the universe.  I'm sorry you're stuck.  If you can see no other options, I don't know why you're here in the first place.
not sure why this is being downvoted when its blatantly factually true....
whats his name?
Here we go again.. The holocaust was western propaganda. Prove me wrong. 
SRD's tactics are sanctioned by the admins, that's why.   
"I was happy to see he had some pain"
How is it ironic?  
Yes he should 
Thank you for the link, I hadn't checked back on his youtube page yet because work.  Thanks for doing the interview also!  Didn't think I'd see you show up in my post!
To me, this only raises more questions.
Fantastic post, thanks for contributing here.
[deleted]
[deleted]
He just a profiteering off of our free product...
And you sir. Are an idiot. They dropped the backpacks but didn't have explosives. How stupid can you be? He admitted her dropped the backpack so why are you spouting off dis information. You should be ashamed of yourself for the lack of iq you hold in your noggin.
okay, great. that was the second 'shootout', on Franklin Street in the boat, when he was arrested the next day amidst all the media attention:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l7ETJJr4eH4  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_ReWEoxXxhI  he was doing the shooting the night before, with his older brother, before he ran him over, on Laurel St: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iL6wI7T8MPo  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RITYJAXpqig  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_2d83kq2GhI  http://www.wsj.com/video/video-footage-from-watertown-shootout/FD6C2EB3-9901-4A60-8EE3-B359F0DE01D3.html   http://www.bostonglobe.com/metro/2015/04/03/watertown-neighbors-react-marathon-bombing-report-about-lack-weapons-discipline/nGTSDjubbtS3Z5t1iDdBNN/story.html#  i can't find the original video shot from the second story of a house on Laurel. but what is it you are trying to say exactly?
Yep. The protestors said repeatedly that people were coming in from all over to do damage, expressly because those people knew the media would blame 'the blacks'.   And lots of Americans ate it up with two spoons. 
Like I said to someone else, this post wasn't about you specifically and I think some of the criticism was valid too, the criticism I knew was coming from conspiracy regs.
I should have read the comments before working myself into a frothy rage. 
Absolutely.  I love science, and agree with the *premise* of GMOs. But it can be trivially shown that unethical shit companies like Monsanto are handling it in the *worst possible way*.  Unfortunately, the Monsantards on Reddit have successfully conflated pseudoscience paid for by Monsanto with all of GMO science, so speaking up against the blatantly unethical shit Monsanto does gets you labelled "anti-science".  Honestly rather hilarious, considering the Monsantards go around spewing Monsanto-funded pseudoscience all day long.  
Cannibalism and a spiritual assault, very shameful.
Hes smarter than you
I really disagree. If anything the TPP empowers corporations over governments. And besides the whole point of the TPP is to maintain America's dominance and isolate rivals (China, Russia).
Let's not get into a metadata debate. It's not exactly easy doing CT/AT screening
Has anyone noticed that the worst conspiracy theorists of all are those who dont consider themselves conspiracy theorists?   Ask them what happened on 9/11 and they might tell you about 19 muslims and hijacked planes... but they will never acknowledge that what they believe is itself a conspiracy theory...  You see, when they believe something, its because facts, reason, evidence, logic, and pleading to the majority... and anyone who believes anything different is just a crazy conspiracy theorist.
The truth makes you sick?  I'm sorry. That sounds difficult.  Educate yourself.  [The Sandy Hook event is so suspicious in so many ways it's ridiculous to believe the mainstream narrative.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IxTafqejV6k)  Downvotes for providing information?  Just trying to help people educate themselves.  Before getting mad and downvoting, try watching the doc first.  If you're so convinced that you're right and I'm crazy, the doc must be really easy to dismiss after all. What's the harm in looking at some information?  Edit: there's a bot brigade operating on /r/conspiracy right now because of all the false flags being exposed.  Worse than I've ever seen it. There's no way this comment would be negative on any normal day.  Keep posting info on false flags, ignore downvotes, repost downvoted comments and posts if they are informative and accurate.
You're right!  Heroes are scripted at the Boston Marathon Bombing. 
[But why do you think it started in 1913?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Federal_Reserve_System)
You can always check the way back machine.  Many of the front pages have been indexed over the years...
So, the trick would be to distract and discourage activity...
[deleted]
It's JIDF.  Flytape is anti-zionist (as everyone would be if they took a bit of time to look into the issue) and this is the only place on reddit where you can post that kind of information.
[deleted]
/u/WideAwakeNWO , PAY UP NIGGA
I like how these haters down vote you thinking its makes them feel good! LOL
I'm still waiting on the Mad Fold-in, so I can just skip to the end and get the joke.
[the al ighty ollar?](http://imgur.com/r/TheSimpsons/FUqEM)
"Alright, fair enough - One state got it's laws changed."  Do you have any knowledge of that which you're making repeated incorrect references to?  It's more than one state, for example: New York Secure Ammunition and Firearms Enforcement Act.  "The New York Secure Ammunition and Firearms Enforcement Act of 2013 commonly known as the NY SAFE Act is a gun control law in the state of New York. The law passed without a required debate period by the New York State Legislature on January 15, 2013, in the middle of the night under a "message of necessity", and was signed into law by Governor of New York Andrew Cuomo on the same day."  Can you conduct like, I don't know, maybe 5 minutes of research so you don't look like a *complete* shill please?  Links:   ( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/NY_SAFE_Act )  ( http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/york-state-passes-toughest-gun-control-law-nation/story?id=18224091)  ( http://www.cbsnews.com/news/new-york-passes-first-us-gun-control-bill-since-newtown-massacre/ )
&gt; They were drilling the exact scenarios in the exact places they happened.  I have not seen anything that shows this. There were similarities, but that's to be expected. For instance, if you're going to commit a terrorist attack in London, the transit network is the obvious place. The IRA used to do it all the time. The 7/7 training scenario was different in a number of significant area, and the same goes for the 9/11 ones: I have not seen any credible documentation they involved hijacked planes or targets in New York, for example: without that, the "exact scenarios" claim is unsustainable.
Reminds me of that movie "Thankyou for Smoking" XD  ["This is the man they rely on, Erhardt Von Grupten Mundt. They found him in Germany. I won't go into the details. He's been testing the link between nicotine and lung cancer for thirty years, and hasn't found any conclusive results. The man's a genius, he could disprove gravity."](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fvkAGrrHdIo&amp;t=1m49s)
Jews have been perpetrating these hate-crime hoaxes ever since the general Western public gave a damn about them, and would pay attention to such propaganda -- i.e., since 1945.
False flag.
Who gives a fuck about some internet points on a website which is mainly full of reposts. Even when there is something interesting on here the top comments are just puns which then carries on for too long. 
may not be anything to come back to this time. Pretty sure there is going to be an EMP involved this time for the southwest US
Democracy, the regime just before Tyranny. See [Plato.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Plato's_five_regimes)
Trolls and shills hitting the Boston threads hard.   Gotta cover that truth, boys. 
I'm guessing he/she isn't indestructible and has had cuts before.
Can you first of all explain why none of the actors have come forward?  Secondly are you accusing people of having no morality? I mean lets do a quick roleplay:  Shady government man: "Hey, want to get paid to be an actor in a  street bombing?"  Actor: "For real? What network?"  Shady government man: "None, we will be doing it public, blowing up a bomb and you just pretend to be hurt. But we'll give you a million dollars"  Actor: "What the fuck man, thats messed up, No!"  Is how it would go.  This theory is bullshit.
[deleted]
I wrote it from my tiny phone.
Yes! I thought the same thing watching it. Looked fake. Although I have zero proof, just a thought that popped into my head. could be an attempt to silence dissidents on the subject of convicting murderer cops.
&gt;see? we put cops behind bars when they do wrong".  Seems like it's sending the opposite message. People are saying this is why you need video: because cops always lie.
I get some of the earlier arguments, but not really arguing mercury.  Certainly a large quantity of mercury is deadly but comparing ethyl and methyl mercury is like comparing ethyl and methyl alcohol.  The first I can consume in limited quantities and my body can remove it... the second will kill you.  All of this is kind of irrelevant in the US though since thimerosal isn't in child vaccines anymore.  The only place you still find it here is in flu vaccines and you can always find a single dose option of that without it.
cheers 
Sprinkle some tasers on him
I say get rid of FlyTape because Im getting pretty sick of seeing this bullshit all the time.   
I'll bet you can't show even one actual quote from the Talmud saying what you claim, can you?
If not for the video footage, this would had been just another statistic. "Unarmed black man decides to assault an armed police officer, helpless officer heroically defends himself." It's depressing that we need partisan journalism to bring these thugs with badges to justice.
Christopher Bollyn's book is excellent.
Listen to Michael Shermer talk about his early hominid "belief" test. 
It is now literally impossible to find a news source that just tells me the news. I dont want to know youre political leaning or who isnt reporting the news, just tell me what happened today
Meh...  Possibly.  Keep in mind that the autopsy would have showed that the guy was shot in the back from a distance.  The cop would have had a hard time explaining that with his "scenario".   He would have been in trouble with his superiors at the least.  Whether it would have ended up with him getting charged with murder, though, is a whole other matter.  
Glad to har that, thanks
http://www.ibtimes.com/toxic-radon-levels-are-rising-pennsylvania-natural-gas-fracking-booms-1876147
Autopsies can be faked and information can be fudged or lost, hell so can bodies.
[deleted]
It was an exaggeration ever heard of it?
No they don't. They do however keep people accountable. If a cop knows there will be trial, he's more likely to temper his fear.
The article you linked to is by a pretend smart person whose attempts to critique science are childish.  &gt;I’m told that 97 percent of climatologists agree on the anthropogenic theory. What about the other 3 percent? In a true science that would be a pretty big group of dissenters.  A) The other 3 percent are being paid by big oil B) There is no real reason to accept the statement that 3% would be a big deal in a branch of science other than atmospheric science.  Actually, study of historical change in scientific thought, such as Thomas Kuhn's work, don't indicate that little groups of dissenters have any particular signicance, other than being wrong.  Every thing else stated in this article is counterfactual, i.e., wrong, i.e., stupid.   It says something about you, something negative, that you posted this link, Flytape. 
The authors of these articles should come to Boston and do some sort of presentation at a bookstore or at one of the colleges or something. The people need to hear it firsthand, in person.   The Marathon's in 10 days. Come down.
My point is with all of the corruption that is in place within our political sphere it would not surprise me if a coroner could be paid off or ordered by someone above them to cover things up or they could even be threatened or blackmailed. I'm not saying this is the case but I am saying that I would not be surprised if it was.
Now that's a conspiracy!  Well done. Have an upvote.
I agree with you about this. Most of the time the posts that cause the worst reaction in people are upvoted while the posts that do the most good by making people aware of what is going on in the world are downvoted.   I feel like there should be some limits as to the amount of duplicates these emotional posts get because its almost like their are people in this sub who are trying to get people emotional so they dont focus on the real topics that are happening right under their noses. Same thing happening in mainstream news, do we want that happening here?
I like it. Unfortunately you can't sort comments by worst. 
Oh yea, I've seen huge debates about it on neogaff. General consensus is no takesy backsy. 
I want to see the whole story, show me an article. If they were involved in a struggle, it may be his fault. Either way, the item dropped didn't look like a taser, and the GIF is so low quality. Also, I am surprised the cops didn't see the guy behind the chain link fence, especially since one of them pretty much looked directly at him. This may be staged.
the backpack doesn't even come close to looking like either of the ones they were wearing.  And there are pictures of the younger "bomber" running away after the blast....still wearing his
Except it was never proved that Manning's leaks had any detrimental effects on people or "methods," and Greenwald made a strong case to this effect, that is until 2013, when the Snowden revelations came out. They "just happened" to go public the same week that Manning was sentenced. They hammered home over and over again the point that, unlike Manning, Snowden's leaks weren't indiscriminate. That certainly didn't do Manning any favors, considering she was sentenced to 35 years. And now, the question has finally been put to Snowden by John Oliver: did he actually read every document, as he claimed to have done, all 2 million of them or whatever? Of course, he claimed that he *understood* everything that he leaked, but no, he did not actually read every one of them, which makes him "just as bad" as Manning, who he Greenwald and Laura Poitras all derided as irresponsible.  Here's the thing though, is that while I'm glad Oliver put Snowden on the spot, he was still coming from the same reactionary mainstream perspective as you, the perspective that leaking is bad unless it is responsible because we don't want the leaking of state secrets to harm anyone or damage the methods used to collect intel. And I don't buy that perspective, and I would hope no one in this subreddit does either. I mean, this is r/conspiracy, we don't trust these people, we don't believe that they should have secrets, and we believe that the best possible path to a democratic society is to release every secret held by the CIA, NSA, and other bastards. Right??
Some of these soldiers work directly under oil companies.
Well you can, but they are typically dystopian apocalypse type movies. ...I enjoy watching them but I've never wanted to live in one!
That's not a stretch at all.. You're reaching.. LOL
Because there is a vaccine for pox.   Edit. [Chicken poxs killed 100- 150 people a year before the vaccine ]( http://www.cdc.gov/chickenpox/surveillance.html)  [Shingles kills around 96 people a year]( http://www.cdc.gov/shingles/surveillance.html)  Reguardless its still around 100 people a year. Its a very minor risk when there is 330 million people in the country. That is about .0000003 % of the population.  On top of that most deaths are either previously sick people or elderly people. Both of these sicknesses are very much under control. Partially thanks to the vaccine. 
I can see where you're coming from, and you may be right that it may not be because of paid shills. But I think it's odd that this particular documentary is singled out to be suppressed over all the other posts on NoFap, especially given it's very warm initial reception (100+ upvotes on NoFap is a lot).  I agree that most people don't like the premise of this documentary. I'd ask them to examine why though. NoFap isn't asking anyone to believe anything that they can't validate by their own experience-- and [it's currently growing at 1.5x total subscribers per year](http://redditmetrics.com/r/NoFap).
Being disingenuous again? It is only mandatory for public schooling which is reasonable. I can't teach you chemistry, you should have learned it in school. The amounts are readily available and you would find that tuna sandwich you had for breakfast is far more "harmful". It was changed due to the out cry from ignorant anti vaxxers so thank yourself for that. Vaccine ingredients are available to be seen despite what you say. Vaccines are tested. I assume you don't buy anything without reverse engineering it yourself?
By claiming you answered it.
Posted it in /r/news. Let's see what happens.
I agree it doesn't matter, but it's good to have context anyway.
I am as sure that they were events that were utilized to manipulate the public in some way, or to try out new things, on an international, regional, and online scale.  I am sure that there are so many holes on the Official Versions™ of them that at this point we'll likely never know the Truth about any of them, although some are close I feel.   And I am fairly sure that those blamed for the attacks were either set up as patsies or set up and enabled to do what they did because the effects would benefit the State.  So there.
No cameras allowed in the courtroom at all.  That is why they have sketch artists.  However there has been video of him outside of the court.    https://www.google.com/search?safe=off&amp;hl=en&amp;site=imghp&amp;tbm=isch&amp;source=hp&amp;biw=1920&amp;bih=963&amp;q=dzhokhar+tsarnaev+outside+court&amp;oq=dzhokhar+tsarnaev+outside+court&amp;gs_l=img.3...1214.8877.0.9000.33.9.1.23.24.0.124.861.6j3.9.0.msedr...0...1ac.1.64.img..12.21.1140.AoFnslSjulw#q=dzhokhar%20tsarnaev%20leaving%20court&amp;safe=off&amp;hl=en&amp;tbm=isch&amp;tbs=simg%3ACAQSpwEJDbgd-RAx0-AakgELELCMpwgaiAEKOggCEhTGD7kJyg_1ED88ZtA_1nGcwP7xniGRoguPtLdfGOWEfmWrV3J9CnROwClSHvLaJinTxO3SpdOkYKSggDEhS5Dq0ZxQ6bDqQZghiuGesEmg6VDhowEHs8guOv5Sto9OPS3s5Roczk3uL72cgbn5QnHrFZ0RZb5hRp88jN52NOE49OkQ51DCEFVOh8pks7ZA
These images are still proof of nothing. He could be wearing fake legs under the jeans.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=O034FqrTqrc
people have been creating new strains for centurys. its called cross pollination. there is a difference between that and genetic tampering of crossing differrent species for a desired result. look in to genetically modified salmon. if you can,... find pictures of these things you will be horrified. 
Y
*My* approval?  Every one of your comments is downvoted by dozens of people because you're attacking everyone in the thread. There has to be a point where you have to start wondering if you're the problem.  
Mine. The ones attached to my head. Have you watched the video? In the very beginning we see the suspect wrestling with the cop, grab something and take off. Apparently it was a taser. If he had turned around or just pointed it behind him and hit the officer then that cop knows he is done for. I would have shot his dumb ass to. 
I have a pretty firm grasp of what conspiracy means, champ. Your problem is you(disingenuously?) misinterpreted my post.  If you don't think part of uncovering conspiracies is to prevent radical authoritarianism then I have to ask you, where do you come from?  
We shall see.
No he didn't his lawyer did...  As far as I'm concerned this kid hasn't been heard from since he's been taken. I wouldn't be remotely surprised if the whole thing was a kangaroo court. 
I completely agree that they should all be labelled, people deserve to be informed. What the poster above wrote is idiotic and hyperbole. GMOs  are not inherently evil. And starvation kills much faster then *suspected* health risks from GMO corn.  Like you said, I agree that there should be studies on this so we know the risks.   In the other hand Mansanto has some horrible business practices and I understand why countries would ban their products. But the business practices are what is evil not their corn, not GMOs
I'm 90-% sure Snowden is a false flag 
I think it's consistent with my original assertion that Tsarnaev died before his 'arrest'. 
I wonder how much of a stake Ted Turner has in Monsanto.... hmmm...
It's horrifying how fucked up he is in the footage...  jeeezus.
[deleted]
You're absolutely right.  Edit - [Some more ideas here.](http://www.globalresearch.ca/my-creeping-concern-that-the-nsa-leaker-edward-snowden-is-not-who-he-purports-to-be/5339161)
&gt; Also, I'm just noticing now that there are no longer vote totals in the top right   The number of votes is visible when the total is positive. If the vote total goes negative, reddit hides how many voted. This is a "feature" that is open to manipulation, in my view.
Yes I absolutely do, what happened to the sandy hook killer did he even go to court? I've not seen him tried or heard about him.   All these alleged false flag events coincided with a social push to deny these people publicity as "it's what they want" that convientiely removed people from looking to hear from them and conditioned society into not asking to hear their words, handy for whoever is pulling the strings. 
No, FEMA camps have been stood up and staffed, but never filled.  If we get our way, they'll be stuffed with politicians and high class criminals soon.
Pretty sure they weren't killed. IIRC the police offered to buy them a new truck as compensation for their attempted murder.
Yeah... You're right. Lately I think the reason why I'm so grumpy &amp; crusty all the time is because I haven't laughed in ages. But how can I laugh &amp; enjoy life when all I see is so many people suffering and in pain and cryin out for hope &amp; change? I really hate this police state that this has turned into. Anyways, I guess I should chill and watch a comedy or something. Sorry, and thanks. :)
You are hilarious. Ah the race card, you wouldn't understand eh? Pathetic. 
But if he was an actor, then he was already chosen because he was already missing his legs. So why would his friends think he lost them again at the marathon? 
You should answer his question.
[deleted]
I understand everything you are saying 
I don't watch that shit, every now and then I will watch a dumb ass film. Helps, you know. The shit we know, sometimes I watch chapelle sometimes I watch MSM bullshit.
And I think that was the appropriate response on the part of the civilians, by the way.  Unfortunately, the only thing like reality in that scene was the police shooting the civilian...not the civilians standing up to the police.
Pointing out that detail makes me completely forget that our government is so fucking inept and criminal that it conveniently lost trillions of dollars the day before the event that led to the patriot act and trillion dollar wars that might never end. Thank you for your wisdom.
Just letting you know what I could link to.    
My god, the propaganda… 
They lived near Sandy hook, I saw a shared facebook status about a colleague who lost a child. 
[deleted]
And with Kevin Spacey of all people.
Afaik, source refers to the belief that consciousness and awareness have one source, and you are but one part of it.  The best way I've heard it described is it's like a river, and you are but one droplet from that river. This also leads to the idea that all are one.  We are all connected, every single living creature.  Which is completely true when it comes to DNA. Every living creature on this planet shares some part of their DNA with us and all other creatures.
[deleted]
Those officers still work for LAPD.  The police tried to pull a hit on what they thought was Doerner.  We the people let this happen. 
&gt;about a week ago
It'd be cool if just once the people reporting this were able to deliver. This is never gonna happen guys. Sorry.
Gotta fuel that muslim hate, people.....
Yes he is a conspiratard low brow. http://snoopsnoo.com/u/thinkmorebetterer
Isis gets a lot of blame for things they did not do.
I don't need anything else. You've provided a venn diagram which has been shown to be false - Even if partially. 
What middle class? There will be no jobs, no income. People will lose their homes due to foreclosure. A complete reset of the American way of life will be begun. Those with real skills, gardening, canning, hunting, will do better than those college educated insurance salesmen. community will be more important than social class. Skills more important than money. Many who think they couldn't survive without their iPhones will learn what really matters.
nah it was good for a while, i want a truly democratic reddit like site with complete transparency to avoid the issues we are seeing of corporate corruption, also tie account to facebook or something to help with trolls.
Rulers of America being McDonalds, Apple, and Starbucks?
full vid?
Its really depressing to see that the same government organization that is **supposed to** "protect the people" buries harmful data from the public!
http://www.thekingcenter.org/assassination-conspiracy-trial another http://www.globalresearch.ca/court-decision-u-s-government-agencies-found-guilty-in-martin-luther-kings-assassination/5320024
Considering the way they're dressed, armed and trained these days I think it is the correct word. 
Vaccines are the most inexpensive way of preventing life threatening diseases.  The last thing taxpayers want is poor decisions draining our public funds.   Good riddance!  The only thing sad about this article is that it isn't taking place in the US.
The article is about the damage caused by glyphosate, not glyphosate-resistant GMO plants. GMOs are only mentioned once in the entire article and it's in the sources. The source that mentioned GMOs is only being referenced for the toxic effects of glyphosates. If GMOs were in anyway relevant, you'd think that (if anything) a group called "GM-Free Cymru" would be playing up the link between the two but they aren't. Probably 'cause it's not relevant.
Hehe he released the motherload of data! Have you been living on a island without Internet? 
It has to do with GMOs because by creating glyphosate-resistant food crops, they are also assuring that the same crop is sprayed with lots of glyphosate. Then we eat it with the glyphosate in it.
Why didn't you link to the real article on daily planet?
ok, so let me get this straight, you're PAID by cern, you claim that someone's interpretation of the charts and graphs is wrong, offer no correct interpretation; call me pathetic and anyone who questions whether cern is safe a lunatic.  correct?
Right because everyone wants to eat foot designed by the company that knowingly used a cancer causing pesticide on fucking everything for decades.  What could possibly go wrong?
There's nothing wrong with the Constitution. It's as valid today as it was the year it was written. The wrong is in the people, and in their leaders. The Constitution shows how badly wrong they are.
these two need to just fight and get it over with
why not post David Icke for that matter, lol
As a man on the inside (0-1, USN) I love you for posting this. 
Also what have you done mr high and mighty?
This was entertaining!  Congrats to you two.  Moon landing was fake,  I agree. 
[deleted]
Any evidence they also have money in cancer treatment?
Must have been too much of a challenge then.
Are fucking retarded or full blown illiterate? why do you keep talking about little green men as if I ever made that claim at any point.  And If I talked about the moon landing nearly everyone would agree it happened, because even at the moon landing hoax peak it was some 2% of people if that believed it to be fake.  I am the majority, you are the minority. I'm not sure what "little green men" have to do with the moon landing but I'm guessing it's part of your crazy.  You're not intelligent, you're not in the know. Nothing you have said is in anyway accurate or correct.  As for I'm making shit up? what the fuck are you talking about mate.  This is what you fucking said.  "The actual footage was lost, remember? All that is on the internet is the TV show - not the actual raw footage. Keep on whackin' it to TV shows, Moon Boy"  Let's go over this comment in detail.  "the actual footage was lost" this implies the video on the internet is less credible than the tapes correct? ok.  You then implied it was a TV show to make it seem even less credible.  This is literally implying the video on the internet doesn't count because it's on the internet.  You're either 70+ years old and senile or just flat out retarded, those are the 2 choices.
Yea maybe or not. Who the fuck really knows. No one. Dude this is some serious *speculation*
Aren't they planning a movie as well? I think it was all in the works.
Can someone with a law degree explain what [this](http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/PLAW-106publ185/pdf/PLAW-106publ185.pdf) means?  I thought it was supposed to fix this issue but apparently not
&gt;voting   Just as productive as praying.
You are a colossal moron. Vaccines give your body a dead version of a bad virus, your body then fights and kills that virus. It now knows how to fight said virus when it actually attacks. If your conclusion is correct. Wheres that super polio that should have come around?  Answer: it's almost wiped out in the world. The only reason it's still around is because people either a) can't get access to it, or b)  they are anti-vaxers and are one of the scums of the universe.  
Well said. Always good to remember there are people out there cut from the same cloth. 
It really depends on how you define intelligence. Technically, you are correct, heat-seeking missiles are a very poor form of AI, but they are certainly AI. They are autonomous robots which receive information from the outside world, process it, make decisions on how to react to changes and they can adapt to some significant changes.  On a more practical note, we have completely autonomous robots which can be sent in after natural disasters to look for survivors and potentially help them. There's a very small step from sending those robots down a hole to help people trapped after an earthquake to sending them in the battle field with guns. As I said before, the only issue stopping us is the moral dilemma, because no matter how hard we try we will never make them perfect. People shoot civilians by mistake. What would happen if a robot did that? What if we could program robots to only shoot when they're very confident that the target is a threat, preferring suicide to killing civilians? What if this halved collateral damage and made us constantly *expect* that from warbots? What if there was still a very obscure bug that made it go "crazy" at one point? Or if someone somehow reprogrammed it for malice?  The most important question of all: if the number of innocent victims dropped to 1% of what it is now, would it still not be considered cowardice to send machines to do the dirty work?  There are so many more questions...
I've got some more, too:    The government isn't a bunch of reptiles, the world is circular and the moon landing was real.
I have trouble with wheat. When I eat it I get symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis - pain in my joints and long bones so bad it feels like someone's taken a nutcracker to them. I get ataxia and slurring of my speech, and migraines. It comes on within an hour of eating anything with wheat from certain countries, even in very small amounts.   I can eat wheat grown in Italy without a problem, though. Wheat grown in Canada, the US, or Germany will have me aching and suffering within an hour of exposure. Wheat grown in Argentina, Italy or Kenya won't. (Note: these are the only countries I've had opportunity to test this on.) I don't know what those guys are doing different from over here, but the results for me are marked. I used to think I was celiac. Now I suspect it's either a genetically modified variant I'm sensitive to or a routine farm practice. I only react to wheat, not barley or rye. I've started to wonder if it's the roundup but I can have corn without a noticeable problem (yes, I know, corn is the devil but it tastes so good).
I used to feel this way. Still do in some ways sometimes. The US justice is functionally morally bankrupt. The US model of government seems like a chimera of totalitarianism, corporatocracy, and kleptocracy.  The US people seem largely brain dead and soulless.  But then there's folks like you and me and hundreds of millions others who, if not illuminated, at least have enough of a nightlight turned on to see that there indeed are monsters in this world and they don't hide under the bed.   My best advice is to grab a shovel and plant some trees. Build soil. Get involved in the survivalist, natchy, back to Earth, monistic mindset and find local groups that meet.   MeetUp is a sweet resource. Lotsa survival/transition groups as well as permaculture, natural building, what have you.  These folk are pretty awake for the most part and besides reminding you that you're not alone, they'll provide you with a peace of mind as they help you build your shtf plan.  Never underestimate the value of community. 
This is the second time you have said this 'Adman', are you the clean-up crew? 
Please stop talking like voting matters. It doesn't. Stop propagating the bullshit.
No, my name is Adam. Just an old nickname from childhood. I have no relation to Monsanto other than living in the corn belt and actually understanding how farming works. 
I wish there were more whites with this perspective.
Lol yeah, I pulled up a strident SJW on calling me a "nothing but a white boy", saying that it was a little racist, and she's like "wtf? how is that racist? It's like, better to be white anyway so how can it be an insult to be singled out as one?"  Shakin' me head.
Or maybe everyone just thinks you're a whack job? 
Do people not realize GMOs are already labelled?   Look for the foods not labelled "organic," "Free range," and "grass fed."    Ta dah! You've found your GMO, and rbst foods!   This fucking sub sometimes I swear... 
OP pls
thanks for lumping everyone together to try and discredit the content, and without using any evidence. you win superior person. 
[deleted]
So what happened to the 'scoop' theory they were parading around?   
Controlled demolitions always take seven hours of unchecked fire, and bulging walls, loud crashing / creaking noises noted by firemen hours earlier? They thought it was going to collapse, and they were actually there.  Claiming that it was fine one minute and was a pile of rubble the next is **simply wrong**.
https://www.metabunk.org/attachments/wtc7swd-jpg.1244/
denial, that's how
&gt;close to 17 floors were missing on the bottom of one corner  OMG who the hell made up that bullshit? That picture shows smoke obscuring part of the building - that doesn't mean the entire floors were missing.  I mean, not even NIST claims that! Holy shit!
[deleted]
How convenient. That's probably just a coincidence. Just like  the insurance policy revisions the day before. Or the $2.3 trillion USD in unaccounted spending announced by Rumsfled the day before (funny how the room was practically empty and his report got little to no coverage by the media due to the attacks the very next day)  But ya know, nothing going on here! Just a bunch of honest, heroic wall street guys with nothing to hide.
Please don't get vaccinated and make the gene pool slightly cleaner when you pass away at 25 from a completely preventable disease    http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Andrew_Wakefield
With 15 hour working days, seven days a week? I doubt it!  The conditions aren't remotely similar.
So you consider yourself being able to scrutinize scientific data at a higher standard than millions of health professionals and scientists? that is a pretty bold claim.
Wouldn't *structural* engineer be a more appropriate rebuttal?
he has to prove there are no reptilians when reptilians themselves have not been proven to exist? I claim we're all pink ants from space, if you claim otherwise bring your evidence, otherwise you are talking nonsense.
It was a plane, I saw it from my school. It's something that il never forget.
[deleted]
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
While I (personally) consider reptillians to be a product of disinformation, I am a reasonably open minded person. I know it's possible, technically, however extremely unlikely. I have read articles and books claiming certain bloodlines to be "reptillian" in nature, and seen the countless YouTube videos of mundane video artifacts portrayed as "evidence" of "shape-shifting" and so forth . If you have any evidence you find more convincing, I would like to see it. 
This thread is being slid so hard
How many "uncontrolled" collapses of &gt;billion dollar buildings do you think happen every century? 
Fire was the inevitable cause, as it weakened the structure. They didn't mention the structural damage as a cause because it wasn't enough to bring it down.
Rule 1. Love Wins
A controlled demolition of a 47 story skyscraper 
Thanks for the great collection of info Greg, as always.
&gt; **According to NIST** the building damage did not have anything to do with why the building collapsed. **The building collapsed due to fire. Not structural damage**. See question 21.  **[Here it is:](http://www.nist.gov/el/disasterstudies/wtc/faqs_wtc7.cfm)**  &gt; 21. Did debris from the collapse of WTC 1 cause damage to WTC 7's structure in a way that contributed to the building's collapse?  &gt; The debris from WTC 1 caused structural damage to the southwest region of WTC 7—severing seven exterior columns—**but this structural damage did not initiate the collapse. The fires initiated by the debris, rather than the structural damage that resulted from the impacts, initiated the building's collapse** after the fires grew and spread to the northeast region after several hours. **The debris impact caused no damage to the spray-applied fire-resistive material that was applied to the steel columns, girders, and beams except in the immediate vicinity of the severed columns.** The debris impact damage did play a secondary role in the last stages of the collapse sequence, where the exterior façade buckled at the lower floors where the impact damage was located. A separate analysis showed that **even without the structural damage due to debris impact, WTC 7 would have collapsed in fires similar to those that occurred on Sept. 11, 2001.** None of the large pieces of debris from WTC 2 hit WTC 7 because of the large distance between the two buildings.  So says NIST.  
Paper cant melt steel beams
Hence the "/s" It would be laughable if it caused a actual outcry that changed *anything* 
If you think I'm a troll because I'm using reasonable logic and not paranoid bullshit the subscribers of this sub are more stupid then I thought.
Completely agree, but also clean water had something to do with it too. 
every country has it's own laws. However, good for them.  Government has no business taxing behavior they don't like.  If they can do it to them, they can do it to you.  You protect yourself by protecting others, even the ones you don't like.
Oh yeah people will totally think youre sane now. 
Its an explosive that doesnt make a sound and leaves behind no trace of its existence.  And this is the explanation that truthers are going with. 
Also curious...can anyone chime in on my theory that the government realists, or those exposing national issues, like....everyone...who has either done it....assange/snowden/manning - submit....or those about to expose...like Aaron..or various Anonymous members etc... are either jailed or killed?   Because those who refuse conformity, die.   Imho, there's a deal with the devils for anyone still living. The rest "disappear" - Aaron...or "get cancer"- jobs.  Also, I found it extremely interesting that I was told...off record by a family member of an anonymous member who was extremely active in wiki etc....that he was cia before Anonymous. Any thoughts/verification/correction?
You realise you just called yourself a dick sucker, right ?
WTF,     Police would not investigate the death unless the sheriff’s office asked them to, and they have not asked us to. ???
[deleted]
&gt;     I mean if it collapsed due to fire, it would topple over sideways &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; Why? Fire doesn't add a sideways force.   Uh, logic? The fires would have had to weaken every support column simultaneously and equally for a symmetrical collapse at the acceleration of gravity. Otherwise the collapse would be in the direction of the weakened column(s). It is such simple physics and yet people can't get their head around it. Cognitive dissonance. Edit - stuff
&gt; That isn't NIST's explanation at all. NIST claims that a **single column** initially collapsed which then spread.  Ah yes, the "[Single Bullet Theory](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Single-bullet_theory)".  Oh, wait, that was the JFK assassination...  
Haha, if a misspelling gets you're panties up in a tizzy, then I can't imagine the terrible life you must have, let alone what psychiatric pills your on, let alone how many more months it will take until you suicide yourself over much more serious things.
Sure always open to info but aslong as its convenient for you of course. 
&gt;  Forgetting the fact of course that steel columns have only yielded to office fires once in human history...  When was that?
Right, and then it would be obvious that three high rises, falling at free fall, symmetrically, in their respective footprints, on the same morning, without demolition is more miraculous than turning water into wine.
I don't think you can build that high with un-reinforced concrete.  Concrete doesn't have tensile strength and would crack and fail from lateral pressure.    A quick googling shows that these towers are made of reinforced concrete.  http://skyscraperpage.com/cities/?buildingID=50  http://www.unfinishedbuildings.org/ryugyong.html  I did see sites that said they are not "steel structures" but that just means they are not made with I-beams as the primary supports. 
When children play cops and robbers, the roles are interchangeable.  So too with adults, it seems.
**Here is another side of a story!**  [Explain this](http://www.iklimnet.com/hotelfires/imagesfire/slide0008_image013.jpg) Mr. Debunker!  [Dubai Skyscraper Burns, Doesn't Collapse](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g47pYydDSX8)
Exposing steel to 7 hours of fire on a set of floors would cause this kind of collapse, which is what happened. Read the facts.    http://failures.wikispaces.com/World+Trade+Center+-+WTC+7
This reads like a copy and paste you trot out every so often.
&gt; And the worst part? I didn't recognize any of those users. I know there are like 300,000 subbed here, but I can always tell when a post is fishy when I don't see any New Queue posters (like you and me), or they are there buried in downvotes.   It has 2000+ upvotes and so is prominent in /r/all for the general reddit audience to cast their views on.  /r/conspiracy could opt out of /r/all [as many other subreddits like /r/gonewild and /r/morbidreality already have](http://np.reddit.com/r/undelete/comments/2aibza/list_of_most_active_subreddits_that_have_opted/) .  However, /r/conspiracy  chooses to be part of the shittyness of /r/all.   So you have to expect hit and run comments from casuals who don't even realise what sub they are commenting in half the time.           
it's about 5 million gallons per well, which they frack repeatedly, and the waste water is highly toxic/radioactive so it can never be used again.  we need food to live, but we've already found several alternatives to oil, why are we wasting all this water during a drought again?
http://www.epa.gov/iris/subst/0057.htm  The part where it's not a human carcinogen, section D?   Or the discredited study that used rats known to develop cancer with a tiny sample sizehttp://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/S%C3%A9ralini_affair who was then later found to have been paid off to do a damaging study?  By all means eat organic, the organic human waste they make into a slurry and spread on crops to fertilizer, filled with "organic drugs" http://modernfarmer.com/2014/07/stink-human-poop-fertilizer/  That will give you some good organic ecoli  http://www.foodsafetynews.com/2012/11/salad-makings-blamed-for-5-state-stec-o157h7-outbreak/
###HE A GUH BOI! HE DINDU NUFFIN!
Your second link wouldn't work for me, idk why. It seems down or inaccessible to me.
Ah you're right. They said that the collapse of towers 1/2 caused many fires in the building to burn out of control, and this is what caused the collapse.  http://www.nist.gov/el/disasterstudies/wtc/faqs_wtc7.cfm
why wouldn't they? 
Would Marvin bush show you the demolition crew, or would his job be to hide it?   You're telling me that two children of the head of the CIA, George HW Bush, are in position as President, and newly appointed Head of Security at the country's largest symbolic office complex, that happens to get destroyed in a day that "changes everything" about our country, and we go to war against two countries who didn't do it, and foster wars or revolutions in more countries on a big lest we landed for a decade, and we keep trying to get to the last two countries on our list, and you suggest that there is no relevant connection??   You've been LIVING this for the last 14 years, and you want me to prove that there's "something fishy going on here"?   Take a step back from it all and think for a second, about the last 14 years. 
I have no problem with this type of discussion. You stated your ideas in a clear manner and backed it up with pretty decent reasoning. I am not arguing for anything on this matter to be true or false, I am just simply explaining that people on this subreddit tend to be looked down upon because they don't do what you just did. You also didn't use an attacking tone which helps people actually process and consider your opinion instead of brushing it off immediately. 
Use any tape, the part that covers your lens you can use paper to prevent residue. 
Theres that darned top comment contradicting OP again. 
[Here's the evidence that proves that "iron rich microspheres" can be made through non-thermetic means](https://www.metabunk.org/threads/debunked-iron-microspheres-in-9-11-wtc-dust-as-evidence-for-thermite.2523/)  Why hasn't Jones and Harrit released the dust sample they used to other scientists who could support or refute their findings?   Why did Jones use a dust sample that had been in the personal collection of someone for 6 years before it was handed over for testing?   How do we know that during that 6 year time, the dust sample wasnt tampered with? The answer is that this is a huge violation of the chain of custody and no scientific body in the world would support a finding that included that kind of unscrupulous behavior from its scientists.   Why did the editor in chief of the scientific journal resign over the posting of this paper and stated that it was published without her consent?  I look forward to reading your reply. 
I see it on the subreddit but never saw it on my frontpage or /r/all. It's possbile, with subreddits rotating on the frontpage, that I missed it there, but I use /r/all way more than my frontpage. Some people in the thread say they were from /r/all, but in the spirit of this subreddit it's very possible they didn't really see it there.  This kind of fits, if you look for it you will find it but they're betting on most not looking.
First, I can't know what /u/Puffy_Ghost considers to be an "inane theory" without a link or two. Help a brother out:  - https://startpage.com/do/search?query=Richard+Hoagland&amp;cat=web&amp;pl=chrome&amp;language=english  Second, if he's legit, I would be very surprised *not* to see a bunch of "debunks" to steer us away.  Third, as a litmus test, tell us what you think happened on 9/11.
You're a small group of conspiracy theorists. Most people laugh at you. This is what happens when normal people are exposed to the hilarious shit that gets posted here. Keep fighting the good fight! 
"To learn who rules over you simply, find who you are not allowed to criticize." Voltaire. The opposite applications is appropriate here. Our empire good. Their empire bad. Jingoism 101. 
Oookay then.
Thats because you are callous towards the plight of anyone not Jewish apparently since a fraud six million is nothing to what communists did
&gt; stupidist  
If people are dumb enough to refuse to vaccinate their kids, then they should be forced to do so. This is no different then forcing parents to put food into their children's bodies. 
Nope, not implying that. Measles for example, there was an outbreak in the 50's. We made it out of it, just fine. 
Black holes don't exist? What? Source please?
Why is why modern skyscrapers hold at least double their own weight.  So removing 50% of the support columns means it's still standing.
then what did? Dont tell me that 7 would fall at that speed and consistency from just one side of the building being damaged. Your defense is really making you look like a fool...
Someone should tell the FBI that this seems fishy.  Oh, wait.......
I'm not sure if you noticed but this is /r/conspiracy. Y'know, about conspiracies. So if you don't want to hear about conspiracies, what exactly are you doing here?
[deleted]
Maybe that's the problem, in this world, the world we live in you believe that bombs can be planted without witnesses, survive 6 hour fires undamaged, only to go off at some arbitrary time after firefighters decided it was already a collapse threat and pulled out.  Yet structural engineers who have modeled exactly how WTC 7 collapsed and have demonstrated that it is possible are the "idiots".  You are free to post your own model that *proves* what you claim is true, submit it to a peer reviewed journal on structural engineering, and go forward from there.  Or you can be the very model of a Dunning-Kreuger subject, not knowledgable enough to know how unknowledgable you are.
its too bad in terms of what happened, but i feel that the real agenda here is to seed dissent against the police force.  that may be the actual conspiracy. 
it was a joke bro do u even my posting history
because favorable flight paths shift due to storms, movement of the jetstream, etc.  it's pretty fluid, and not rigid at all - you could look at flight path animations for different dates, and you'll see the change. Sure, the hubs remain the same, but the longer paths can shift by a couple hundred miles sometimes. (not that much if its a trans-continental flight-path, really)
I think, therefore I can't even
And perpetrated by them.
Never noticed any in South America.
If I recall correctly, there were a fair bit of clapping from the Democrats as well after Netanyahu's speech.  
Expert difficulty: Symmetrical collapse, freefall speed, into its own footprint. GO!
Jokes on you; get vaccinated &amp; become sterile. Either way, Agenda 21 is on its way.
youtube.com/watch?v=5IJeemTQ7Vk http://topdocumentaryfilms.com/the-globalization-tapes/
The torn backpack was not recovered from the dorm room, it was recovered from the scene of the bombing. And it does not match the backpack in your "video".  http://www.reviewjournal.com/news/nation-and-world/boston-marathon-jury-sees-pieces-bomb-backpack-used-attack 
Look at the High Altitude of these beauties!  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CKjsuxhVqP4
You pulled that straight out of your behind.
[deleted]
&gt; Also the first day of work in that building he had missed in 3 years.   Hardly. He only owned the lease on the twin towers for 7 weeks. He had been there every weekday since then to meet the tenants. So, 7 weeks, not 3 years. 
Speaking of front page, [Hillary Clinton would just brush all those kids off as "unstable", "promiscuous", and having "falsely accused other adult men of rape" - and then go on to betray her criminal clients by making fun of it all with her friends.](http://www.forbes.com/sites/michaelkrauss/2014/06/26/hillary-rodham-clinton-and-the-ethics-of-a-rape-defense/)
[deleted]
Well, the top was hit by planes. The bottom was undamaged. The video shows that even if one part of a building is completely destroyed by explosives, the undamaged section will still be fine.   NIST says the damage from debris to WTC7 had nothing to do with the collapse, so it remains the only steel framed skycraper in history to collapse due to fire. 
Not my job. Worry about the prosecution.  Or, actually, worry more about members of the surviving families that are just now learning what happened and putting the pieces together, realizing they will never have justice through the system. If it was me, and say my son had been killed, I'd legit be on a hunt for everybody involved, shills included. Dunno if I'd make it quick or make it slow..  Like think about the shills covering for the US coup in Ukraine. I hear those poor bastards are being hunted by some pretty hardcore Ukrainian and Russian family members right now. Probably not your concern, but damn.
I think you're underscoring my point. It's like you've never even heard of chaos theory. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chaos_theory  Or are you denying that 3 high rises collapsed at free fall, symmetrically, and in their respective footprints on the same day?
The article says the wire was in his arm, so he showed his leg? Maybe you're both wrong, and the wire is resting across his shoulder attached to the taser gun behind him on the ground?
The real world.
[deleted]
This works
No matter what, no matter if the official story is exactly what happened... the real issue with me was how 9/11 propaganda was used as carte blanche for many different entities in the US government to do damn near whatever the hell they wanted. Trillions funneled to certain pockets that could have rebuilt our infrastructure, improved education, put a freakin' base on the moon, etc. The way this country has changed since 9/11 is the most concerning thing to me. 
project jew wife. no offense but, its a thing
Yup. It's amazing how much of our culture is based on making you sit down and watch other people do shit. Go to work - stare at a computer. Come home - stare at the TV. Weekend - go to the ball game and watch others play. We need more doers..
Yes. The supports entirely collapse. That's not new information. 
There is a massive amount of debris. What are you talking about? 
You believe that thousands of silent, invisible explosions went off simultaneously after being planted magically with no one noticing them? Then we're doomed as a society. 
What? You do realize all of those factors existed on 9/11 right?
Can't argue with that. More is better than less. 
Hugs not drugs. Feels do the heals. 
&gt; I never made such a claim.   Then how do you know nukes are an absolute impossibility? Can you open your mind to the possibility that there are nuclear devices developed that we are not in the loop about? 
Funny how "reddit" is responsible for the witch hunt that occurred after the Boston Marathon Bombing, even though no reddit staff was actually involved...
This is what happens Larry. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PztgWdMEJdg
I agree with you by the way. I am simply saying that the Armenian genocide is widely known about but lots of people don't question the official narrative for 9/11 and plenty refuse to think that e government COULD do it as they have some fath in them
Domino theory IS NOT supported by NIST! Stop with the alternative conspiracy theories. I understand you guys want to believe the government because it makes you feel better about things but please at least look up what they've said themselves.
Love and light to you, we burn all contracts to illusion if you ever want. 
Just to be clear, are you implying that the 1% (or probably more like the .01%) are these behind the scenes manipulators? The handful at the very top of the financial pyramid? 
Because it's worth a new conversation in itself
Haha you believers always find ways around suspicious claims. "Pull it" meaning get the firefighters out? Come on, be realistic. At least he would have said "pull out" if anything.   I also doubt Larry has any say once the fire department is involved or given the authority to direct the operation, seeing that he was not on-site nor is he an experienced fireman. I would be surprised if the department sat around and waited for some finance banker to tell them what to do or when to "pull out." Larry us just one lucky, lucky fellow.
Did you know ~~cartels~~ the US government are actively working with known terror cells?
if you are subscribed, and arent an asshole, you are a community member. throwing your hands up like that is a self fulfilling prophecy. 
[deleted]
.. Where have you been? 
If it's the same people, what's the point in them setting it up?
Government is soooooo awesome! Perhaps more government is the solution to this problem? 
... and you're basing this on what exactly?
I'M HERE ON BUSINESS!!!
Gets suicided in 3...
I don't doubt that they stole from him, but it looks like there's not a lot of direct evidence that he did anything about it.
The sidebar here or at /r/DocHopper?  EDIT: [Never mind, found it.](http://i.imgur.com/u3D7C9n.png)
http://www.cdc.gov/vaccines/pubs/pinkbook/images/varicella_fig_03.jpg apparently you didn't read it. So here it is again. Remember the date they started using the vaccine?
Jew.  The word you're looking for is Jew.
Copy pasta but always a good one.   WTC 7  [WTC 7 went into free-fall \(click for a compilation\)](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xxl06jxfgRk), literally gravitational acceleration [(the official reports even admit this)](http://i.imgur.com/N23Y89K.png) which is impossible in a steel framed building (without the use of explosives)    This violates basic Newtonian physics, IF, you choose to believe the official report that fires caused the collapse, obviously it is impossible for a building to go into freefall in any other scenario, this explains why NIST refuse to release there data for independent validation, the only relevant documents that support their theory that fire brought down a steel framed building (first time in history, still to this day) [are classified for public safety](http://cryptome.org/nist070709.pdf), they will not even release them to a [licensed NYC architect in regards a FOIA request](http://cryptome.org/wtc-nist-wtc7-no.pdf)  What and why are they hiding this? Likely because it is not based on any known science and engineering principles, if we have to go on what they have released so far, [a collapse model that bores no resemblance to the observed collapse](http://rememberbuilding7.org/wp-content/uploads/2010/08/NIST-collapse-model-building-7.jpg)   [Page 3 and the architect's appeal over the remaining 3370 files](http://i.imgur.com/QyTbq5P)  The acceleration of gravity in New York City is 32.159 ft/s2. WTC7 had 2.25 seconds of literal freefall, this is equivalent to approximately 8 stories of fall in which the falling section of the building encountered zero resistance. The collapse was complete in 6.5 seconds. Free-fall time in a vacuum, from Building 7's roof is 5.96 seconds  For any object to fall at gravitational acceleration, there can be nothing below it that would tend to impede its progress or offer any resistance. If there is anything below it that would tend to impede its progress or offer any resistance, then not all of the potential energy of the object would be converted to motion and so would not be found falling at gravitational acceleration (where did every single structural supporting columns go, instantly, at the exact same time?)  There's no exception to that rule, those are the conditions that must exist for gravitational acceleration to occur for the entirety of the duration of the time it occurs, this is basic Newtonian physical principles.  You either agree with this very basic concept, or you need to start making a case for a new realm of science that has never been witnessed before.  [Remember also that the BBC even reported that the building had collapsed 20minutes before it had](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ltP2t9nq9fI), remarkable.
All the videos, all the people in new york who saw maybe not the first but the second
&gt;They [Palestinians] are all enemy combatants, and their blood shall be on all their heads. Now this also includes the mothers of the martyrs, who send them to hell with flowers and kisses.  -Shaked 7/14  Really anything this woman says, she is an Israeli Politician that strongly feels Palestine should be ethnically cleansed.   Copy of a Times of Israel article title "When Genocide is permissible"  https://archive.today/RPf3M#selection-1087.359-1095.36  Different article from the times of Israel  &gt;Any Jew who speaks of “Palestinian land” clearly has a very deep misunderstanding of Jewish law. The Talmud makes it very clear that all land belongs to Jews, and that Jews may seize any land that they so desire. Schulchan Aruch, Choszen Hamiszpat 348: “All property of other nations belongs to the Jewish nation, which, consequently, is entitled to seize upon it without any scruples.” This is directly from the Talmud. Why, then, should the “Palestinians” be entitled to any land? Why should they even be allowed to exist?   Sephardic Chief Rabbi Mordechai Eliyahu — one of the most senior theocrats in the Jewish State “ruled that there was absolutely no moral prohibition against the indiscriminate killing of civilians during a potential massive military offensive on Gaza aimed at stopping the rocket launchings”       
Why does Israel want to have Iran attacked? Are they expecting us to do it for them? What exactly will that achieve for them? Even if they can't make their own bomb, what's to stop them from buying some from Russia or China?
My guess is no, but it's a good question.
This
The logic behind a government keeping a cure hidden for profit is full of holes though. Why would someone like the British government (who pay billions in cancer related treatment each year) want to keep doing this whilst also facing austerity cuts and lack of funds for basic things like beds?
That doesn't make any sense. If what? If Russia invades? If North Korea invades? Who poses any threat to the American military other than armed American citizens? 
If you are the lady in the video I apologize for calling you a wackjob, although I think it is not reasonable I do not want to make anyone feel bad.
Vote Rand Paul. I am.
I'm so friggin dissapointed.  I thought you had actually calculated the odds... I would like to know those odds.  EDIT: After having thought about it I'm convinced that the odds are incalculatable (is that a word?). 
I'm not shy about negative karma.
Do you understand how the Federal reserve works? Do you understand that you and your children and your children's children are all in perpetual debt to private bankers? Do you understand if you fail to pay back your portion of the sum for any reason, they have the right to seize all of your material comforts that you work so hard for and haul you away to a cage. You okay with that? Does that sound fair for all parties involved?
Give a Cowardly Cop a Gun and he becomes Brave, give a Cowardly Cop a Tank and he becomes Superman.
I dont follow.... What did the NIST have to say about MLK's assassination?  Edit : downvotes for this... This sub is fucked 
Cointelpro.  Fbi also wrote a letter pressuring him to Commit suicide 
There is also allot of interesting stuff in the movie Lucy. 
We really need to stop calling these sociopaths elite. It feeds their ego's, and it is a lie.   Remember, We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty and the Pursuit of Happiness.  None truer words were ever spoken.  Instead of calling them elite, call them what they really are, liars
So at this point, if you sell drugs, you are destroying the blight that is cancer?
eventually everything will be owned by ONE company -- i knew about the eyeglass manufacturer, oh well . . .
The Voidz
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
What actions have been taken against them?
Sadly, you're actually right, someone or some people are not happy with this subreddit.  They're afraid.
In case you're not a troll:  It wouldn't matter if 100 floors were engulfed in jetfuel flames, it doesn't burn hot enough to melt steel.
[deleted]
No prob.
I'm not surprised the FBI knew who did it, they had probably been following them and listening in on their calls for months.
Lets say this is true, as in totally 100% legit truth.  It kinda blows a hole in the 9/11 theory as well. Or well, partially. The one where "they" claimed that "the goverment had nothing to do with 9/11". If the mossad were the one orchestrating the attack and the american goverment merely playing their part. They "technically" didn't have anything to do with it. Its like, accidentally driving the "to-be" get away vehicle that gets carjacked after a robbery. They aren't guilty per-say. Merely at the wrong place a the wrong time.  Oh well, might be late and my mind is rumbling. Just a though.
[Heres way more sources on how many times he claimed responsibility and what he said.](http://www.911myths.com/index.php/Responsibility)
He's made at least 2 comments elsewhere after you provided what he asked for. Yet, I see no response to your comment. I hope he at least thanked you in a PM.
Stop posting this crap. We have been through this like 5 times in the last year. It's not a conspiracy. 
I'd like sources on all of those claims to be presented alongside the claims, but oh well.
This is true...
According to Susan Lindauer, she and CIA agent Richard Fuisz watched security camera footage of unknown "work crews" going in and out of the WTC complex between 3:00 and 5:00 am in August of 2001 - the month before 9/11.  Right afterward, there were highly unusual "power downs" where all the electricity - including back up power - was cut off in the weekends before - in both towers.
Ever seen a cloud? If it's a high level cloud like cirrus then it will get thicker if there's enough water vapour to cause deposition. 
&gt; It's admitted  By who? 
yea wtf is going on here, this misleading post shot straight to the top for lots of people to see
This huan Yauk is right about the radiation.
Gmos are the future. It's amazing-  bigger crop yields, less land - perhaps hunger could be solved. 
Lol, idk why you're trying to argument with me. The guy asked a question, I answered it with the source *he* provided.   You guys can all go argue with the ACLU if you want, but its a wasted effort on me considering I merely attempted to answer his question with his own source. I genuinely believe I'm the only one here who actually read the ACLU's piece.
Democracy is meaningless when a small cabal controls the mass media.
I completely agree with the guy in the video.  If  someone makes fun it may be a way to open a door.
And then, when the lower crime rate leads to the possibility of receiving less money for the next contract the crime rate will skyrocket as every little infraction results in jail time.  Leading to higher court costs.  Thousands of people sold into financial slavery to private court fine handlers.  And countless more citizens sent to the private prisons to keep these altruistic companies in the black.  The publicly elected judges receiving generous campaign donations in return.  Its all bullshit.
[Here's a pic](http://i.imgur.com/5tIrE12.jpg) I took about a week ago.  April 4th, to be exact.  It's pretty damn obvious (to me at least) these aren't normal contrails.
[deleted]
I think it may be an issue of communication.  I'm not sure if you frequent here often.  What I initially asked was rather tongue-in-cheek; most regulars know what I was driving at.  Ie., the letter of the law is not holding true to the spirit of the law.  In this case I am referring to the rights provided through constitutional law; I refer to the rights and freedoms as the founding fathers designed them.  Within this context I think it's plain to see that this zone, while not technically being a constitution-free-zone, sure has quite a few parallels.  We see impositions and restrictions added where previously there were not.    Edit: We get so many trolls and shit stirrers that it normally saves me time by commenting as I do here.  Sometimes people like you get caught in that net; I apologize for that.  Additionally, I think you have had problems in this thread because you assumed intellectual superiority.  And, if I'm not wrong, it appears as though you still may be operating under that assumption.
Non-mobile: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dunning%E2%80%93Kruger_effect  ^That's ^why ^I'm ^here, ^I ^don't ^judge ^you. ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble. [^WUT?](https://github.com/xl0/LittleHelperRobot/wiki/What's-this-all-about%3F)
&gt; if you dropped the upper 1/3rd of the entire building on itself from 5 or even 30 feet above, it wouldn't have fallen, the top would simply have slid over the side and fallen off after damaging the bottom portion leaving the rest of the building in tact.  What's your basis for claiming that? Are you familiar with WTC 1/2's design?
Wow...that was a lot of words. So if we are able to so easily pass through the Van Allen belt, then we would have had to do it to reach the moon right?  I mean, passing through the Van Allen belt is something we did in the 1960's, why would we need to act like it's something that's never been done before?  [Then why is NASA still acting like it's nothing we've done before?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NlXG0REiVzE&amp;t=3m4s)  EDIT: Grammer
investigation herewith: https://wikispooks.com/wiki/9-11/Israel_did_it which is technically incorrect, as there were rogue elements of other countries involved  
OP should delete their account.
Yeah man, I gotta think about how I'm going to crack that egg. He's a busy man, but I'm kind of disappointed he couldn't trust my interpretation of stuff I've been studying for almost four years, over "the news". Plane + building, QED. Of course the sun revolves around the Earth! Any dummy can tell!   Have you seen that ep of futurama where Fry is going nuts from the schwacked-out music from outer space, but nobody else cares until the Earth starts ripping apart? Everything is so precarious right now, it feels like anything could happen. I like to think everything will be ok for the short term, but sooner or later this is all going to come to a climax. The first reason I check the news in the morning is to make sure it's not another 9/11 today. Or a stock market crash. Damn.   What if everybody boycotted the 2016 election, and they still took office with a 20% or 10% turnout?   What if plenty of people vote, but it's as f-ed up as 2000?  Will we figure things out...or submit...or three sided civil war?   Heh bedtime gnite
The "JIDF" hasn't existed for years. Don't let that fact keep you from parroting that meme though. ;)
There are varying sizes of graphene, it's just a name for nano-carbon, they can make the holes whatever size they want. Just like how we do with strainers and stuff.
[deleted]
Only posts that criticize reddit ceos.
well the meat industry is part of agriculture. They are raised on cattle farms, or whatever you wanna call them really, and they use tons of land to hold large numbers of them, and grow food for them to eat. That's all part of agriculture, same industry, really. Just that meat products get subsidized more than produce.  And I agree, many americans consume too much meat, and the meat farming sector of agriculture does use up lots of land and water, and add to the pollution. Not to mention lots of cattle are fed so many antibiotics and shit. I don't believe our mass produced cattle are good for us to eat. We'd be safer going to some small family farm, or another country, where cattle isn't so mass produced and fed antibiotics up the ass. As long as it's cooked thoroughly we shouldn't have to worry about catching foreign diseases from foreign meat.  Me personally, I prefer to eat mostly produce, just as a health choice, my family sucks at dealing with cholesterol, all the guys have had heart attacks while they were young. I love my milk and pizza though.
you do understand what future means right?
https://soundcloud.com/redose/andgod
[deleted]
Well, if you take the literal standpoint it is not. Supply and demand actually quite easy. But the amount of lobbying for the sake of that profit is quite evil imho. Bloods cheap but an ah-64 apache is not :p
Plenty if people saw/heard a missile too. Guess which story the media went with?
Hm, I'm going to need some sources for your assertion that lizard people cannot melt steel beams.
That's not why.  It's because of a concerted effort to ostracize critics.  The effects of this pervasive CIA measure have taken root in our culture.    So that even if the content were good all of the time (a standard expected of no other sub) it would still be laughed at.
&gt;You people crack me up.  Thanks! The idea of you glaring suspiciously at clouds make me laugh. Glad we can entertain eachother.  &gt;First of all, it's good to see you again. Denier of all things conspiracy.  *Challenger* of all things conspiracy. For a sub of people supposedly dedicated to questioning everything, folks here sure hate being questioned.  &gt;Second, of course I don't have whatever bullshit you need to hear or read to believe this.  If you are going to connect a daily phenomenon (contrails) with established scientific theories and practice (cloud-seeding), don't you think you should make the effort to prove their connection in even the most basic way?   &gt;It's called conspiracy for a reason. It isn't something they want people to know or talk about.  You made an assertion in your title and have made assertions in this thread. Don't get pissy when someone challenges that assertion.  &gt;Which makes it particularly curious that accounts like yours spend so much time arguing to the contrary.  First of all, I post a few times a day, sometimes more, often less. Not exactly eating up my schedule.  &gt;If it's common knowledge and there isn't anything to worry about...what the fuck are you doing here?   Same reason you are supposed to be here. I am questioning things and challenging assertions. The idea that your theories should be exempt from this questioning is absurd.  
[deleted]
Not to burst anyone's bubble, but Hillary Clinton wasn't "in the administration" during the 2008 election because their was no Obama administration during the 2008 election.
The video starts after the taser went off according to the videomaker. Who was on the receiving end of that taser shot?
[deleted]
And it wasn't a "freakout". It was a "truthout". And about time too. 
This is a gross misinterpretation of abstract-negative-concrete, the actual dialectic that Hegel discussed.  It doesn't even fit in with the common representation of thesis-&gt;antithesis-&gt;synthesis.  I often see "[Hegelian dialectic](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dialectic#Hegelian_dialectic)" inappropriately maligned on this subreddit as if it were something other than a tool.  It appears similar to mocking the scientific method.
[deleted]
So... he gave the cops an "improper hand signal" in the form of a middle finger and they had to pull him over to show him the correct way to say "fuck you" 
They pulled him over for an improper hand signal as well as possibly engaging in a sexual act whilst driving.   Get your title correct next time. It changes it from a trivial offence to a more serious one. 
But Hillary Clinton's braggadacio at knowingly getting a client off for putting a 12 year old girl in a coma from violent rape and chuckling about it says much about her character.   Not for for any public office.
i believe this to be true; which is why many think "the matrix" is crashing, people are *waking up*,  TPTB are panicking (imho) that's why the shtf : false flags, GMO foods, crazy cops, etc.
Alex Jones is a fraud, can we stop posting infowars
Ya ironically the "Pro-Isriel Crowd" is mostly the American right wing.  
Oddly, I'm not convinced!
The [Source](https://eksgroup.csod.com/ats/careersite/JobDetails.aspx?id=149) doesn't mention Jade helm 15 like the chriswick article suggests. Also requires a 12 hour surveillance course. Strange but the role players requested seem to be role playing a surveillance role not a detainee role. 
turn over implies it hasn't already been in their control for years
Their brains are wired like their phones now. They never retain information either since it can be looked up almost instantaneously.
Were you paid to say that?
Yeah, ISIL...go after the Texans...they're the, uhhh, weakest, yeah...the weakest of Americans...and they're the least likely to use the second amendment...yeah...
I could go into greater detail if you'd like. About how everything would work. But it would take a minute. Money talks though. When it comes to that stuff it would be too easy to sneak anything by, honestly. Also check out tiptopers reply below. It starts there. Vaccines are wonderful, they are. But that's the catch they're so good that there COULD be a catch on them. Just some wild thinking..
Well based on the last few replies here it seems like it might be illegal for the defense to either 1) resign as counsel, or 2) argue against their client's wishes.  From what I've read Dzhokhar never changed his plea from "not guilty" yet **his** *defense* lawyer stated he was in fact, guilty.  With those facts I'm equipped to answer "No he did not receive a fair trial."
she got rid of that years ago
[deleted]
Buy seeds! Buy gold!
It won't matter who you vote for... Hillary will win and the military industrial complex along with the corporate lobbyists will run the show.
&gt;If it was disallowed from showing on /r/all  &gt;Your post proves my point. You are spouting misinformation and it gets upvoted.  When and where did I claim that the sub is disallowed from /r/all?
"Johnson, I'm gonna need you to stay a bit longer to refute this guy's comments."  "Yes sir!"
I thought they did extend the drill to Bama and FL? I don't have a link but there were posts here stating it. But I don't think it's connected either way.
my gf got followed by a road raged off duty cop because she flipped him off for texting at a stop sign hold up traffic.  His feeling got hurt so he followed her for few miles over 100mps with his 5 yr old son in his truck.  Total steroid prick, I told her to press charges, he gave her a careless driving ticket, but he was the asshole that escalated the situation.  He got disrespect and became enraged, good cop material, no self control.
It depends on what the domestic population does. If the opinion of people on the opposite side of the world matter then probably panic. If not, then inflation and then stabilization. Like what happened in 1971.   The thing is, the US can go isolationist and be ok. It has its own natural resources. The environment here is excellent and we live on prime real estate. That's why everyone wants to control the US.  The reason why we don't extract our own is due to the WTO agreements and the desire to have a one world govt. 
Flip a coin
&gt; I guess I'm supposed to believe that commercial jet traffic varies widely from day to day!  The weather changes every day, especially at 25,000 feet in the jetstream. Some days there are contrails, some days there aren't. And you can't hear an aircraft at 40,000 feet. If you think there are no planes flying, check flightradar. 
Look up at what? Chemtrails are a paranoid conspiracy fantasy and those white lines in the sky are really just ice crystals.
[deleted]
Has this what english has come to? 
It's not even the 0.1%. Bill gates, for instance, is the 0.0001%, and he got there by making a product that changed the way the entire world lives. It is specifically the banking and finance sector that is robbing people blind, and people in that sector make up what is by far the largest portion of the wealth gap. Go ahead, tax the 1% at 99.9%. It won't make the tiniest bit of difference to the people who control the money and are responsible for its very creation from thin air.
[deleted]
By expropriating the worker's surplus value, to be exact.    https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/236x/09/24/3a/09243a7711d6bee9d5f47a0e982d18cc.jpg
http://www.arkancide.com/#hillary
Tax the 1% rolls off the tongue better than tax the tenth of a percent
[deleted]
the 1% of the 1% then
You have the causal relationship backward: the dependency is diametrically opposed to what you just described. People in your town have needs and, in the modern world, logistical possibilities abound such that new local opportunities would thrive in the absence of the behemoth that is Wal-Mart. You do not depend on Wal-Mart, nor should you. It would be a struggle to transition to a post-corporate America, but we'd come out of it with stronger communities and better-paying jobs.
8 hour Reddit days? Me too!
Harangue the police/DA/local politicans/media.
&gt;  comes from conditioning implanted by the media over decades of  &gt;television and movie watching. You can't break that conditioning for  &gt;another person,  You do realize you're coming off as condescending and patronizing right now, right? You just need to add a "sheeple" in ther for the crowning touch.     
Maybe the judge will give him an "excusable 20 to life".
Well isn't this why lots of videos get stuck at 301plus I think YouTube views just lag
Letters go out after May Day and will test their ability to recall reservist along with updating their personal info; according to the article. It mentions nothing about 'war in May'.
Vaccinations is the most cost effective method of disease prevention. Pediatric hospitals are extremely expensive.   The anti-vax movement keeps sickness alive, and keeps fear alive,  which makes the 1% more wealthy by incurring additional medical costs that are easily avoided.  By posting this article you have become tool to make the rich and powerful more rich and more powerful. 
Somebody probably did, but that doesn't mean it is the same person who profits.   Capitalists earn the returns of labor on capital as the privilege of owning capital. This is not earned and is functionally similar to feudalism.
&gt;Nathan Allen, ... mod for r/science and r/askscience ... and ... a Ph.D. chemist who works for the Dow Chemical Company  Good fucking night.
Sociopath is the correct term.  Although I believe that the powers that be are sociopaths who demonstrate their mental illness at the psychopathic level. http://depressiond.org/sociopath-sociopathic-personality-disorder/     https://refresh.duckduckgo.com/?q=sociopaths+in+business
Yogurt is all the rage these days.  Everybody's doing it.
The problem is with the coverage of this right now we cant even be certain that the sign actually said what we are being told. I doubt anyone can show the actual sign at this point too as it likely vanished. Tax the 1% doesn't really even make sense let alone be a message someone would say before killing himself.
[deleted]
&gt; Of course, a CHL pistol is no match for rifles,  Doesn't matter what weapon it is if the guy holding it has a hole in his head. A CHL with the drop on someone can stop their little shooting spree in an instant.  Although you are very right, if there's a shootout the rifle is going to wreck shop.
not quite, WW is when everybody cuts the shit and just punches each other directly. This stuff has been going on since Rome vs Persia
TIL: "free range children"  as opposed to robo-kids.
Maybe they shouldn't have children if they can't feed them? Where is the self accountability? I don't buy the "oh the children" nonsense. Considering most tax dollars goes to fund military adventurism overseas, I would rather keep my money and donate it to charities I believe in.   That is like saying you should give up free speech because someone might get offended. My life shouldn't be dictated by someone's thin skin. Same with the hungry baby argument. There are things I want that I find more valuable than helping some baby that shouldn't have been born.   Almost time for the season finale of justified. Be back later. 
:(
    *serial  [EDIT]  Nevermind, I got the joke.
Their army isn't big enough to fight Iran.  There are millions of potential Israelis in America. It's time for them to step up, make aliyah, and go help their country, Israel.  We'll keep things going here, don't worry about us.
This is an absolute true story.  There is some much evidence and so many victims that corroborate the events.  Please do your research and do not rely the Wikipedia articles.  
&gt; Maybe neither side is "nice"...perhaps Iran does in fact want to destroy Israel, and perhaps the US is manipulating the narrative. Its not a binary equation. Its entirely possible, likely even, that both sides are the "bad guys."  And who wants to attack whom? Literally, not rhetorically.
Wasn't this one theories of why Huey p long was killed?
&gt; Start small. Don't involve money, just volunteerism. Maybe start a FB page, put together memes, short animated videos. Education is the key.  Do you want to start it?  
No it hasn't. 
should have been spelled "duuuuuude"
Anyone have info on who the man was??
I took from the article that terrorism isn't a concern.  Are some deaths by police wrong? Yea sure. But we're at war with terrorism, and they aren't killing us in any great numbers.
Here    http://www.reddit.com/tb/32njyz
Then
[deleted]
Well this is the situation.  So now what?  Lay down and like it? Or bury the hatchet with every one in this sub, politics, world news, and try and organize a None of the above section on the ballot.  This whole thing reminds me of the Simpsons where the two alien imposters we the presidential candaites and got exposed before hand and said, fuck you anyway, you have to vote for one of us.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Tv5CT7r3Txo
So the war on drugs is going about as well as the war on terror  well done
It's a good series for sure, but I totally agree. They could've cut that down a lot. I remember thinking to myself "Oh crap, this is actually gonna take a while" haha. 
Well, sure, that does sound silly. However, there is a case for the epigenetic transmission of such an effect. For example, it's been shown that stress in the mother during pregnancy can program the genome of the fetus such that it is more prone to anxiety throughout its life.  [This study](http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/25464029) says:  &gt;Research efforts during the past decades have provided intriguing evidence suggesting that stressful experiences during pregnancy exert long-term consequences on the future mental wellbeing of both the mother and her baby.  Now, I don't know much about african americans, being white and Australian, but I've heard there is the stereotype that they have a tendency for fearfulness.  Might that not be a state of mind transmitted hereditarily from mother to child since the slave days?  It's not PTSD as such, but I wouldn't be surprised if that really does happen.
Times have changed and the circumstances are very different.  The bombing of Pearl Harbor was the event that got the US actively involved in the WWII.  Unless Iran attacks the US there's no excuse for the US to attack Iran though here's always the possibility of a false flag event that will be used to justify it.  Even if the people of the US finally wake up to the bullshit that the majority of us have believed we don't have much say in what happens regarding Iran.
Is that where the Lizard People come from?
Terrorists don't exist in real life. Only the news. Funny how the US police don't like being filmed. You'd almost think they were trained to do things they wouldn't want to be seen doing on video. 
The moon is 1.3 seconds away. So it's a 2.6 second round trip.   The astronauts counted down 3-2-1-Ignition.   The countdown is about 3 seconds on the clip, so if NASA started moving the camera close to the start of the countdown, that would compensate for the 1.3 second lag of NASA receiving the signal, and also compensate for the additional 1.3 seconds to send the signal to move the camera.   It's not a precise method of counting, but neither is the video. The shuttle almost escapes the camera view.
&gt;The man on the scene indicated it was explosives.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eem7d58gjno  Listen good. In every blast you will hear the initial explosion and then you hear the "thump thump thump". That thumping the man heard on the scene was floors collapsing. It is the sound of rock and granite being pulverized under extreme pressure.  Explosions are very sharp sounds. You hear none of that in any of the WTC videos. Only the softer banging of stone being crushed instantly.   &gt;It's a big debate. The official investigation assured that would happen.   That tower wasn't a target. It was collateral damage. That makes any investigation into it arbitrary (excepting for future construction method improvements). Excepting for safety, there was no logical reason to want to bring it down for anyone. It was a nothing office building. However, I must admit that it going down has kept peoples eyes off the real show all this time. If the idea of taking out WTC7 was to keep eyes off the real evidence, it has done its job well.  &gt;Deny evidence. Why?  Because there is none. The towers fell like they did because that was exactly how skyscrapers are designed. Good thing, too, because otherwise the tops of those buildings would have fallen to the side instead of straight down, causing even more death and damage then they did. Or, they might have snapped at the base when the planes hit them, thus falling across some 20 blocks of downtown NYC streets and businesses. What a lot of people don't realize about building design is that each floor only has a couple of square feet of contact between the floor and support. The fires didn't have to melt an entire floor to bring down the towers. They only had to weaken what amounted to a few inches of steel. Think of the buildings of like a human body. You can break a humans bones (his frame) to bring him down, but you can bring him down with less effort by ripping out the tendons and muscles (the nails and screws holding him together). The steel beams didn't give way, The bolts holding them together gave way. What held those together? A slot in the bolt maybe 1/8th" thick at best where you would screw the nut on. In the end that slot is all that is needed to melt to take down the towers. It melts enough to become pliable and the nut sheers off...Goodbye support. Goodbye tower.  See, I could tell you the story about what actually happened but it is far better if you learn it for yourself. They did not need to rig any buildings.  If you want to know what really happened with the WTC [this is the first article you should read](http://www.cato.org/publications/commentary/how-washington-funded-taliban).  http://www.thenation.com/article/bushs-faustian-deal-taliban  http://blogs.reuters.com/global/2009/08/13/who-is-funding-the-afghan-taliban-you-dont-want-to-know/   9/11 - The American taxpayers most successful venture (after the moon shot). No rigging of buildings needed. (Take close note of the dates and who is running the Taliban at the time.)  
Seriously? You don't think it matters if a criminal entity took over the highest office in your country? Wow... shows the kind of culture you've been exposed to.
Context? 
Thats what gets me. Talk to anyone one on one and you can get them to admit that people in positions of power do bad things all the time. In fact politicians are charactarized as liars and cons in every aspect of popular culture. Yet these subs literally NEVER post anything that goes against the official narrative.   How can they be so consistent with this on every single topic? It's almost as if they have an agenda /s
It would have to depend on the individual case, diagnosis is a bunch of baloney, what started as schizophrenia branched into many different disorders. There are plenty with schizophrenia who are very much aware of reality.
[deleted]
What does that have to do with my views on taxes and redistribution?  Nothing. 
why are you badgering me about it? 
14 especially...
4:20 on 4/20 by the sounds of it
Good job ignoring the whole point of my post.  &gt;for his book, which I'm sure will have sources attached  Because using those sources in the article would have been so hard.  "Hey guys...here's a bunch of "facts".  But don't worry...I'm writing a book about it later...*I'll source my information there*.  Just believe what I'm saying here because it will help my book sales."  How about you actually take the time to understand what my post was saying before dismissing it because you were too brainwashed to think about facts.
This sounds like an episode of Will and Grace.
This.  While it's easy to just downplay and discredit OWS, which shared much the same message, it would come off as extremely callous to do the same to a man who killed himself.  It would be much better for them to just let it pass and hope people would forget about it.
Why? They are both police. Other European states have the same low kill rate
I have already noticed this shift happening. Colors are brighter, I'm happier, people have been nicer. I am a 30 year meditator and the planet feels better than ever before. 
I love how religious people are towards the moon landing. Its not a strong theory but i wouldn't bat a fucking eye lash if we found out, oops, we never went to the moon. You know why? Because that is what the government does, they lie for propaganda purposes. Watch the film Capricorn One, I believe it is really the story of the moon landing.
When I was locked up there were two guys in my "pod" that had mental illness. The guard was cool and he explained that he sees this happen a lot because the parents no longer wish to care for their sons and then make up elaborate stories to get their kids locked up so they don't have to deal with them anymore. He said in his twenty years of being a C.O. he has seen it happen way too often.
Because a citizen with a gun doesn't eliminate identity theft, robberies, rape, hit and runs, fraud, spousal abuse, child molestation, etc...
Well you know that lately we keep seeing news stories about, well, bad police. Sometimes shit gets done about it and sometimes it doesn't. If some kind of zero tolerance type policy were in place, things would change. Look at police in other countries. Britain. France. You always see the statistic "officer x fired more rounds in that moment than country y's entire police force that year." It's as easy as not letting that go unaddressed. People will learn to care, and hopefully soon, we'll see change. The officer in South Carolina who shot the black guy six times in the back and planted a tazer immediately got fired and jailed. That's what we need to see more of.
You don't have to have an "active interest in politics" to realize that Hillary Clinton is a Democrat who is married to a former Democrat president. You only need a pulse.  I think I know why you're so upset with my characterization, though: You're one of the idiots. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Not necessarily. Terrorists kill, in most cases, because of their religiously extremist views. However, though their killings are of malicious intent, they kill so few people in comparison to the police. Hitler killed 11 million people, but only 6 million were not P.O.W.s or citizens. So we care less. Terrorists kill only a few thousand, of other peoples, so we actually care, abd it gets televised. Police kill much more, either on accident, or in over reactions, or mistrials. But because it's their own citizens, abd they are in a government payroll, it's not widely televised. Nor do they account the innocent as such. If you sincerely believe the US government is honest about police killing innocents, then you are on the wrong sub reddit, abd you need to wake up.  Edit: To add, the picture depicts tazers as a factor of killing innocents, as in innocent until proven guilty. So these people were killed, by the police, for possibly nothing abd absolutely nothing that they took the time to prove before killing them.
Then why weren't the terrorist ISIS or something...I would think the risk of being exposed, especially with the dozens of "crisis actors" seems pretty likely. For what, to test the populations reaction???
[*$76 billion increase.](http://time.com/3759378/rand-paul-defense-spending/)
That's true. That's why these news stories are needed. Hot tip: Climate denial is being set up to be portrayed as a conspiracy theory. 
&gt; As is naturally distrusting someone because they're an expert.  That's not what was said though. The person who wrote that distrusted them because of the particular company they work for.
Link the studies. Or don't they actually exist?
&gt; Gravity gets wierd if the earth is flat and can't make any sense in a newtonian framework. could it be ether?  My current understanding is that there is no such thing as "gravity".  Simply put if something is more dense than the surrounding medium it falls, if it's lighter it rises.  The sun moon and stars are "luminaries" or lights and not Terra firma physical objects. 
Yep, he openly displays a deep interest in finding the perfect synthetic  recreational drugs. Which... I don't know if that makes him crazy necessarily, but the whole thing where he murdered that guy probably does.
cause he flipped a table and attacked an FBI agent with a broomstick
When OPs are made here that are obviously just noise, shouldn't the mods remove them? They may not violate any rules but they have null content.
Nobody hears about it?  This is like the 5th time I have heard about it this week. 
[deleted]
How do I get a job with the DEA?
"See something, say something" Just edited it a bit. Gotta snitch on your friends for flying a 'drone'.
I think this sub is finally an actual joke.
On Tax Day...as a protest of government corruption.
Now youre going to make up bs about Lt Col Anthony Masse? Really?   What craziness makes you think your word alone on these distracting accusations enough?   Just face it. You had no idea how FDR was the lifeline for Stalin and in turn Mao  You tried to narrow it to lend lease but got rekt 
Is the title insinuating that we are bad Americans for admiring one of the few world leaders who can stand up to the runaway train we are currently on?
I'm just asking why you are here if you're not one of us. 
I see your point, but people making $500,000 a year use a lot of that to live. Their take home after taxes, housing, food, leisure, etc. Is no where near $500k. They don't have the kind of savings to throw around $20k donations left and right
I should have been more specific.  "The facts are very clear. The "information" in the op is bull shit and misleading anti scientific crap that been debunked many times. No virologist would take anyone seriously that showed this to them."  That is what I was referring to.
Why would it matter? Just live your life.
It is selfish to ignore future generations,  i am willing to sacrifice squalene and a lot more to end this madness.  You sir are evil. 
Interesting stuff.
I'm pretty sure that's not part of AA77
Looks like you guys kinda censored yourself on this one 
I have read enough about vaccinations, the history, and the manufacturers to understand that making them mandatory is not logical. 
They want to do a lot of things. Everything they do isn't bad and plenty of the government is entirely against it so it's a wash if you're trying to base anything on the governments opinion.
This should be cross-posted on TIL.
ya but what about israil event denying israil right ot exist. zionist radicals rose up against it and it got cancelled. now theres no event?? this was a top story on r / conspiracy
[deleted]
Yes. What's your point?
Not intrinsically related to the official story, but also a very weird circumstance surrounding that day  http://whatreallyhappened.com/WRHARTICLES/fiveisraelis.html
LOL or Crystalinks if you are old enough to remember.
Maybe he wants to check back later to see what people say and this is his way of bookmarking it.
Jade Helm is a military training exercise slated to take place in some Southwestern states.   Jade Helm is also an infowars/conspiracy circlejerk about some nefarious psyop/mindcontrol/trickery
They slept in different beds.  Deviance?  Nah.
If there is one thing I have learned from being a student of history it is we have a completely unfounded sense of superiority, largely based on the computer we carry around in our pocket all day long.   Great movie btw
LOL
It was literally on the front page of reddit a few days ago.
Sad, but not surprising. Ever since I experienced a similar incident downtown near 201 (shame on me for even getting gas in that area), I avoid gas stations with a handful of loiterers outside. 
Someone should make an anonymous tip to the police about this.
I miss tribe.net.
A philosophy student actually backing their truths instead of just bitching then doing nothing. "The corporations are screwing you, man. Yeah, we just finished our first year college, man."
Dishonest gave you a technical rebuttal, I'll give you a simple one. NIST says the debris did not play a role in its collapse. Modern towers do NOT collapse from small office fires. The CCTV building in China burned for 5 hours in a MUCH larger fire and it did not collapse.          &gt;The initial images of the blaze suggested that the tower might be nearly destroyed. However Rem Koolhaas said that "they are simply rebuilding it as it was, because there was no structural damage."         [Dramatic image of CCTV fire](http://f00.inventorspot.com/images/cctv-fire17.img_assist_custom.jpg)
If we are vaccinating more then they won't be losing it. The solution certainly isn't to infect everyone. That's some medieval level tech. I vote for no itchy swollen brain kids and no dead adults.
What makes you think he was mentally ill?
The vast majority of people who die by suicide are mentally ill.  http://depts.washington.edu/mhreport/facts_suicide.php
No, I have shot with a Hasselblad on the moon. I do know that  a temperature variation of 250 degrees in the sun to -240 in the shade on the moon is going to effect the viscosity of the lubricants in the gears  and mechanics of any camera placed there.  I've been on many a film shoot when we had to stop shooting because the multi-million dollar Panavision cameras froze-up due to cold exposure and this is just working in freezing LA nights NYC streets in the winter. Those conditions are hardly anywhere near the temperature beating a moon camera would be exposed to. It's a serious consideration for anyone who would have to engineer and successfully operate such a thing-no matter your snarky question.
So who's to blame?
Families never suspect their little boy could be capable of such a thing, but without evidence their claims don't amount to much.
It sounds like the family might be able to get what they want but the biological mother is blocking them from it.
you're one of the people they're talking about enjoying 'safety'
How dare you try to tell me how to think! I'm guessing you are in league with the controllers of the world.  :P
Why not do this with all manhunts?  Whenever there's a murderer on the lose, why don't we tell everyone to stay inside and then search everyone's house one by one?  We'd find more murderers.    In fact why don't we just search everyone's house every night?  We'd find all the criminals pretty quickly.  Imagine how safe we'd all be.
I initially found it somewhat surprising to see that video associated with the title appended to it, considering the countless other artist's with more meaningful lyrics, generally less prosaic in that regard. I see your point though, as pointed out in my previous response. My apologies if I came of as condescending. That was not my intent.
Got any science for me?
[deleted]
They were members of a National Guard Civil Support Team.  The backpacks carried WMD detection equipment.
[deleted]
“[A] quotation is a handy thing to have about, saving one the trouble of thinking for oneself, always a laborious business."  I am a soldier. I am a proud soldier. It took me going to a war to realize the madness of it. However I feel that I can do more good from within than if I just said fuck it and left. It is easy for those on the outside to say we are mindless drones and say we dont have courage because we arent "standing up", what are you doing?. America would still be a British colony if it wasn't for soldiers. Dwight Eisenhower was a soldier. Oathkeepers are soldiers. Yes, there are ignorant, violent men who are in the military but most are thoughtful people who love their country and genuinely want to make a difference however misguided they may have become. So in short i think your comment is ignorant, and if you have a better way of identifying soldiers by all means let the government know. RFID perhaps? /s
[deleted]
If they want to get even with you, they will simply invent infractions. You cannot win. Unless you keep your mouth shut.  Then you might.  MIGHT.
&gt; With quotas, these scumbag Neanderthals CREATE crimes. They are fishing. You are their target.  And if you do what I wrote, they are going to stop you, write you a ticket, and leave.  If you do what the video or PDF says they're going to really fuck with you.  But on that creating crimes thing, I have been pulled over exactly once when I knew I was doing nothing wrong. It was very late at night and I was coming home from my job, which let me out at something like 2:00 in the morning.  When the cop came up to my car, he asked me why I thought he pulled me over. I answered honestly, "I don't know.". He told me I was speeding. I told him there was no way that was possible, because I saw where he was hiding before I passed him, I checked my speedo at that moment, I watched him pull out and follow me for 2 miles, and I stayed at 5 under the whole time until he pulled me over. (Which was all true.)  He asked me where I was coming from and going, which I again answered honestly, work and home.  Then he told me to go. No request for license, no nothing.  I assume based on how all that went down - the time of day, going 5 under, etc., that he probably pulled me over to see if he could tell whether or not I was intoxicated. I clearly wasn't, so he went back to waiting in his little hiding spot for someone who was speeding or intoxicated or whatever.  Yeah, some might fabricate. But if you go looking for trouble - if you try to be a dick to cops - you're going to have a bad time.
The FBI has quite a few high profile cases of setting up would-be terrorists in the US.  http://www.businessinsider.com/the-fbi-hatched-some-crazy-terror-plots-2013-3  It doesn't take any effort at all to find stories about how the FBI entraps extremists.
RT and Putin are both sacred cows here. Commenting for later.
&gt;The blown up bag appears to be 100% black exterior, making you mistaken  Nope, I am 100% correct.   &gt;The white parts you see are, to me,the foam in the arm straps/back padding area. It doesn't look like a thin canvas material, it looks like a pad.  Nope, the foam in the center of the bag, is CLEARLY not the same color as the off white color on the straps, where the red arrows point.   &gt;Tear down a backpack yourself and you'll see. The destroyed bag in that picture appears to be dark green/black. Not white  Dark Green? No offense but are you color blind by chance?   EDIT: don't forget the bomb exploded from the inside of the bag, which would naturally as a result turn the bag inside out from the explosive force.
Homan Square begs to differ with you.
What's the point of NATO, which was supposed to counter the former Warsaw Pact?   EDIT: I've got it! Since NATO 'forgot' to disband at the collapse of the Warsaw Pact, we obviously need another 'balancing' entity; Russia, China &amp; Iran can have a "Tehran Pact" or maybe it can be BRICS-based, kicking the Monroe Doctrine and the Brits in the ass in the process. 
I hope you have a nice regular day also.
The videos which were released during the trial do not at any time show him placing a bomb, or a backpack down.  It does show him leave without his backpack, but it doesnt show him actually dropping the backpack down.
Mental gymnastics and psychological warfare go hand in hand.
She seems to be the go-to defense lawyer for protecting the establishment damaging secrets.
to bad the app doesn't work offline 
ok im done, you're not too bright... lost cause.  
[Pepsi vs. Coke](https://youtu.be/8hJeWp-59_I)
Do you think Snowden is a cia limited hangout?
Well there are two sides, their side and ours. Our side will never voluntarily give that information up. Too much hubris and human greed involved. Certainly I would not look to official institutions. I could tell you for hours about NASA and others spending our money on things we will never see. The visitors on the other hand...
Well Johnson's involvement is seeing the light of day almost fifty years later. He was clearly involved but perhaps not as a sole architect but part of a coalescence of interests...
I think it should be a capital crime (for real). 
I'm 99% convinced he thinks archive.org links to live content and not cached copies of old sites.  He certainly doesn't seem to understand how websites work.
What are you most excited about in your current lines of investigation?
It's the same evidence that has been posted everywhere. Whether one finds it "meaningful" is up to the individual.  FBI been tracking/corresponding with at least one of them for years, the drills going on, National Guard CST guys there with earpieces, the murder of Tamerlan after custody, the different colored backback, etc etc.   The only evidence against him is a video of him coming to marathon with a very light backpack and leaving without it. Then the "confession note," which is likely a scam.
That man with missing legs most definitely had his legs blown off. 
LOL of course she did
We could virtually eliminate crime if instead of any other type of education or training, we first trained and certified every child as a policeman by high school graduation age. In this fashion, the whole of the US would at the same time be heroes, and incapable of committing any type of true crime. Imagine an ENTIRE country of heroes!
there are no "forms" of capitalism. Capitalism is the use of work, goods or services to acquire other goods or services that one deems more valuable. The word capitalism is derived from capitalize, or to take advantage of a situation for ones benefit. whether you trade a sheep for a goat or a barrel of oil for a blood diamond, you are engaging in capitalist practices.
The photo in that article was lifted from a Guardian [article](http://www.theguardian.com/society/2013/nov/09/sick-prisoners-handcuffing-terminally-ill) from November 9, 2013. If they're misattributing photographs, the article is probably bullshit as well. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
You know... maybe the official narrative about the dismal Air Force interception performance during 9/11 is actually *right?* 
I like how pictures can give us doctorates in engineering. 
Do you see 2016 as a tipping point for this activity? Or still TBD ha.
I received the Humanitarian Service ribbon for helping rescue and feed over 500,000 Pakistanis during the flooding in 2010.  I personally helped vaccinate over five thousand Pakistani and Afghani children against polio and other diseases.  I worked opening up schools for children in the alAnbar province of Iraq.  I protected thousands of Iraqis during their first democratic voting process.  I worked with former Sunni insurgents in al Anbar to further the peace process and end violence in the area.  I helped kill fanatically violent religious fascists who casually torture and kill mass quantities of civilians.  I don't know. I feel like I accomplished quite a bit.  But what can I say to you that would change your skewed view of recent history? Im just a mindless barbarian in riot gear pushing around brown people in your eyes.
Technically it's rescuing the banks Ukraine and Iraq owe money to, but can't afford to pay; so it isn't communism or socialism or anything bad like that.
That's the problem.
As I said, my credential is the truth. No worries on your story, good luck with it...
Ah, I was wondering when the Fox News Faithers would show up. 
Well, given the difference in poses, it seems that the first group is tending to her injuries, while the man in the second photo is consoling/grieving over his loved one. That this thought  apparently hadn't entered your mind (that these people may have a different relationship to the victim) is a sign that maybe you don't "get" people all that well, and you may have trouble judging scenes like this which feature other human beings. And there is such a thing called "triage," where first responders judge the severity of injury and treat victims accordingly - this woman may have been judged a lost cause, or after applying treatment to her leg, they may have moved on. Yes, you might very well liken triage to a game of medical musical chairs, because there isn't enough treatment to go around.  The "American flags" are actually bunting and a bag containing something (notice the strap). Are you asking how a bag got there? I imagine someone dropped it there. It looks like it would have been outside the frame of the first shot anyway. Given that a man is clearly stepping on the bunting, maybe that's how it got there? Maybe it wasn't visible in the first shot, being outside of the arc of blood that bounds the left side of the first shot? Are you surprised to see so much red, white and blue regalia at the Boston Marathon? You shouldn't be - it's everywhere.  Again, if this is your best evidence, it's very sorry indeed. But I understand - your mind is made up that the photos were manipulated, and nothing will convince you otherwise. Notice how not a single one of your claims has stood up to close scrutiny? No tear in the poster, no different font. But rather than admit it and reexamine your assumptions, you find new evidence, equally divorced from reality. Again, you are only distracting from the real conspiracies at play here, and in doing so aiding those who are responsible for them.  EDIT: originally I thought the injured woman was Kaitlynn Cates, who almost died, but I'm not certain. There is a [list of victims](http://www.boston.com/news/local/massachusetts/specials/boston_marathon_bombing_victim_list/) here.
We don't have money to vote with. We have people, tired, restless, numerous people.
That reminds me, what do you think of Benjamin Fulford and his increasingly outlandish claims?
Looks like the War on Terror should be redirected into a War on the CIA.
[deleted]
That's a nice belief you have there about morons.
Hypocrisy.  Great work...don't be dissuaded. 
Ah I missed this earlier, interesting questions here. I think the chain of conspiracy events is what's most interesting. So if we go from the JFK Assassination to Watergate, to Iran Contra, to 9/11 and the Financial coup we can see a steady process building. When we combine the worlds of UFO secrecy and secret finance to these events they become more transparent. I think at this time in history it is particularly important to establish what the truth of our world is. That's why I'm a Dark Journalist now.
Perhaps they are testing the waters of our collective ignorance and willingness to forgo critically analyzing the proclamations of authority. 
It'd be yours, that never has an apostrophe. And nice one-liner meme, I agree though.
well, as i say elsewhere in this thread, there are plenty of non-combat jobs. the vast majority of jobs in the military are not directly combat related. getting paid great money to drive a forklift in a warehouse or something like that is a good deal, who gives a shit if you wear camo while doing it. for every combat personnel and combat vehicle there are dozens and dozens of people doing logistics. a lot of people dont realize that.
It's a /r/conspiracyconspiracy !!!
Lizards, aliens, inner earth, "them", survivalists, ghosts, Bigfoot, natural news, before its news, rt, holocaust never happened, sandy hook
r/world news, r/politics, r/united kingdom, r/pics, r/entertainment, r/drawing, etc.   Some pretty big subs. Don't the majority of these subs have 10+ moderators because of the work/effort it takes to moderate them?, being a moderator for all the above (let alone 100+ more) seems ludicrous, let alone more than one.   I thought reddit was a community, created by the community and moderated by the community for the sake of the community.      ALL USERS ARE EQUAL.   BUT SOME USERS ARE MORE EQUAL THAN OTHERS.  
Not true.  I was flying my drone taking pictures of monuments and was told flat out that they were alerted to it on their radar.  They saw him coming from miles away,  abs likely didn't shoot him down because they knew his intentions and knew he didn't pose a threat,  and the possible collateral damage was too great to try and take him out. 
&gt;and if there were more engineers that believed the contrary would you believe them?    That depends on them studying what ae911truth.org have to offer.
i would guess the one that looks nothing like the others because apparently fire doesn't collapse buildings so there must have been some other cause
Hey it's nice to have an inside source admitting to it when arguing with people.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
That it want even him in the courtroom.  C'mon man.
I'm saying, since you haven't provided a source, I can't judge its quality. "Yahoo News" doesn't strike me off the bat as a particularly credible source, no.  I don't know what that has to do with your intelligence, but I didn't mention it. But sure, tons of people on this sub are very poor at critical thinking. Why does that surprise you? Having an interest or believing in conspiracy theories doesn't automatically make you smart or good at evaluating news sources.
Fair enough, but it's still not even remotely representative of a demolition.
I'm AMAZING. There are long periods where I'm not very active on reddit.  Maybe you might explain what you mean in a convincing way? Again, "this looks staged!" does not an argument make. Claiming yourself as an objective observer while implying I am not is likewise, nothing more than empty rhetoric. You and many others seems to be in the vast minority on this post, if my upvotes above are any indication, so I'm not sure the appeal to numbers here is very convincing either.
to my understanding you would need a seperate antidote for each gas. Which makes me wonder what you actually carry with you. Only poisonous gas that comes to mind is carbon-monoxide but that's just treated with an oxygen-mask.
Top comment supports government narrative...  Is today opposite day?
That sounds very 20th century.
or the mods deleted it because it was against the status quo of /r/conspiracy. 
But Chris Kyle sniped all those dudes cause he loves freedom, and they made a Hollywood mass-murderer blockbuster about him so that's how I know he's a hero.
&gt;Sheinbein was sentenced to 24 years in prison by an Israeli court in 1999. In 2014, he was killed by police in a prison standoff, after he shot six officials and another prisoner.  Is that your definition of a "safe haven"?
That much gold melting can only move down and eventually pocket and pool, so even if dispersed over a mile, it would be worth salvage.  Think of the money invested in mining operations, and they already know where the gold is. 
This doesn't make any sense. Vader died due to exposure to electricity from the Emperor's force lightning, not from fire.  Durasteel (one word, mind you) is certainly a conductive material, and would not have protected Vader from the discharge.  When Luke later sets fire to his father's dead body, you can clearly see that the parts of Vader's armor that are made of durasteel remain completely intact.  Regardless, you've completely failed at trolling. Have a nice day.
the biggest crime is what we did to the native americans. 9/11 doesn't come close
yep .....fuck...indeed .... stop .... leme off !
Richard Serino did it http://google.com/search?q=Richard+Serino+Urban+Shield
It didn't even collapse after the explosion...
Don't be fooled. 
Have you ever looked at the damage other buildings have sustained but still remain standing? Just saying.
You're the troll, if you look at the contact information on the site you posted the article, the doctors all have debunk type Internet sites, it's completely biased, I guarantee further investigating would show their specific ties to Merk or someone similar. If you type debunk into google this is the type of garbage you get. 
Thanks for clearing that up Joe.
Perhaps, but thermite is incredibly loud and incredibly bright. On top of that, even if quieter or smaller explosives were used, they would still need to be on the outer supports, where there clearly were none.
[deleted]
Ah, the ol' reddit conspir-aroo
4 doctors say he isn't fit to stand? They're going further and further toward being one of the most corrupt professions in the world.
I always thought the assumption was Bush was an idiot and Cheny was the evil mastermind. 
What would you expect people to be able to achieve at those more distant orbits that would require humans to travel there?  To see if going beyond low eart orbit is possible without causing harm to humans? No, fuck that, we'll just go the moon.
[deleted]
I'm right there with you but my stance isn't against the vaccines themselves (I think they are tools that could greatly increase the quality of life for all humans) but instead against the profiteering corporations who are pushing them without oversight or transparency as to what is being injected into us and our families.  Until these corporations can be honest about their product **and** people are responsibly educated as to all aspects of vaccines, we really should not be mandating compulsory jabs for everyone.  edit: grammar
You don't know all aspects of the events that took place. He could have threatened the guy and girl with his gun.   Before you say anything I want you to think of this on the district attorneys position. He has to rely on police to do his job as a prosecutor. Its a give and take relationship he has.   The system sucks I will give you that. Its easy to be all for the right thing, but in today's world it isn't that easy. 
Thank you! I appreciate that.
Right. Who's generalizing our beliefs now?
Imagine our surprise! Yet another top comment in complete opposition to OP suspiciously voted 3X over the next top comment. Better still, this one is alleging that there is a conspiracy in /r/conspiracy related to the deletion of dissenting opinion.   Is this the fucking twilight zone or what? 
Here you go  http://theantimedia.org/wp-content/uploads/2015/04/cop-sexually-assaults-teen.jpg
I think the possibility is there, but I agree; the improvement you mentioned are far more important and effective at improving the quality of life than just vaccines.  But I'm not quite ready to give up on vaccines.  While they are no guarantee against sickness, they could be quite helpful in some situations of by reducing the spread of contagions.  But as they are pushed now, we should set them aside and focus on what can really make a difference.
Man, I haven't racked up this many downvotes in an age, kid.  Interesting.
The shilling is strong in this thread. Every one of em is an accessory to mass murder and an enemy of the people. At some point, it's Game On.
People not person, and the 14th amendment says the word AND subject to the jurisdiction.  AND, meaning plus. Not OR subject to... meaning one or the other.  Regarding birh certificate. I dont know how it falls into making me part of rhe jurisdiction but im trying to find out information on that.  
Interesting, I had not considered the military/oppressive value of tunnels and underground bases. They will be able to move troops and equipment around the country without the public having any idea.
Proponents declare that vaccines have saved millions of lives. Critics claim that the success is overstated and that vaccines may even be dangerous. Many consider mandatory vaccinations a violation of individual rights or religious principles. Many in public health argue that vaccine mandates are critical and justified and that antivaccination sentiment has resulted in outbreaks of preventable childhood illnesses. Vaccine critics point to mainstream medicine’s denial of and underreporting of vaccine injury.  Vaccine injuries have happened in the past and continue to happen today, and neither the mainstream medical establishment nor the government has ever fully and transparently addressed the issue of vaccine injury. In the 1980s, the United States addressed individual cases of vaccine injury by establishing the NVICP—the National Vaccine Injury Compensation Program—a controversial Department of Health and Human Services program. The NVICP was intended to be “non-adversarial, compassionate, and generous” to vaccine-injury victims. However, many vaccine-injury victims and safety advocates believe that the program is not functioning as intended. There are also concerns that the program is keeping the reality of vaccine injury from public inspection.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5d5iIoCiI8g But thermite can cut sideways.
Not strange at all. He's been kidnapped and will soon be murdered. This is what fascist regimes do.
This post is pointless and stupid.  You basically made as many claims as possible and asserted that anyone who may show up to contend any of the points is a shill. Why? Do you really think that anyone who shows up and disagrees with you on any of these topics is paid to do so? That seems seems excessively arrogant and misguided.  Let me guess... you have decided I am a shill now haven't you?
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I agree.
poor baby.  (actually, he is probably fucking rich bitch - which is why he has been able to avoid prosecution.)
~Bill Nye
That's a ridiculous caricature. R/911truth is a research hub, not a place for people like you to come in and spew debunked nonsense in order to derail actual information sharing. If you have compelling evidence, you should by all means post it there for discussion.
Sorry got a phone call and missed this message.   We need war and conflict to assert our dominance its a primal thing. Physical superiority is going to be dominated in all cultures. Intelligence is never rewarded the same as physical.   Its because people don't see what smart does. A example is a microwave. I mean do you really know how it works? Like could you make one with shit you have laying around?  Most likely you can't if you can then I assure most can't. They accept it as a staple to life like many other bits of technologies. We don't know who made it off the top of our head. We know who won the Superbowl last year.  We know the lucky charms jingle. Its weird and I have only noticed these things within the past few months.   Its just a fact man I promise we need war. We just do. 
[deleted]
prosecutors generally suck
Paul Jay is legit. 
The Palestinians learned long ago that Israel will never be defeated in a conventional war, so now they resort to playing the victim whenever a camera is around so they can show the world what a big fat meany face the Jews are.   As a proud Zionist, these Palestinians can save their crocodiles tears for somehow who cares. If the safety of their children was really of such concern, they wouldn't be using them as human shields and telling them to climb on top of roofs when Israel is about to bomb them. Don't let them fool you, they hate Israel more than they love their own children -- militant Islam in a nutshell. 
&gt; On the right, John Cardinal O'Connor in Catholic New York suggested that the singer had employed "voodoo" or "sympathetic magic" to physically destroy her enemy in the Vatican—an extraordinarily poor choice of imagery for a Church authority attempting to silence an outspoken female.  I can imagine Vigilant Citizen saying the exact same thing.
[deleted]
Is actually plausible, unlike the pure religious fiction story that Fox News Faither idiots (like NIST) try to spread.
I dont watch MSM...LOL
It can't be redefined if there wasn't already an official definition that everyone agreed on. Maybe you should watch "What in the World Are They Spraying" if you're interested in the finer points of the theory. Also, if you read the [article](http://www.theguardian.com/environment/2012/jul/17/us-geoengineers-spray-sun-balloon) I linked earlier, it specifically says, "Two Harvard engineers are to spray sun-reflecting chemical particles into the atmosphere to artificially cool the planet..." What happens when the air beneath the sulfates cool? The water in the air cools down and condenses. We don't need to be told explicitly to infer this. 
How about Japan, for example?  Also, I'd be curious to look at IQ data (always questionable anyway), but I bet you get lower lifespan for fluoridated versus non-fluoridated. Why? Same reason as lower IQ. Non-fluoridated places have much better food and tend to walk more. All that and their teeth are still awful.
http://www.globalresearch.ca/fukushima-fallout-emergency-closure-of-fishery-along-entire-west-coast-alarming-die-offs-mass-reproductive-failures-strange-diseases/5443410
Don't take the bait. This has gotta be a ... not sure "false flag" is right. What do you call it when you put out a really shitty video in hopes that people will spread it around, but it's wrong about everything and paints your cause in a negative light? ("The bitch bringing you the drama"? "Polishing knobs daily"? "Stupid but fuckable"??) I know there's a name for it.. Poison Pill? Dark propaganda?  Yes, TV news is scripted drama. But this video will convince people otherwise. Anybody know more about their YouTube channel?
Ouch. Three insults in one snide comment. Didn't cho mama raise you better?
Fortunately nobody is stupid enough to inject children with tuna sandwiches, however many are naive enough to accept dodgy injections
None of this makes any sense.   You're a collection of particles that react based on electrostatic, nuclear and gravitation forces.  You will die one day, collection of particles. Feel free to learn more about reality before then.
Amen.
Those blast marks were too accurate for sand people. Only Imperial troops are that precise. 
For me, the why is that this is all part of a divine plan. The negativity that has been generated by the powers that be is most certainly to allow them to control us, but on a higher level, it's also to bestow us the opportunity to transcend those vibrations.   If you want to build muscle, you have to tear it. If you want to evolve spirit, you must suffer and then learn that you can overcome that suffering by not getting attached to this illusion.   At any point it's really just a choice between fear or love.  There's a lot more to it but in essence it's that simple. 
I ain't dead, and I have bigger fish to fry than to make THAT particular idiot dead.  It's on my "to do" list.
Look for lines, cuts, scars, texture changes.  Look at over 20-30 different high res photos...   Look at other examples of faces like plastic surgery, face transplants, facial reconstruction experiments.  Examine and imagine the what ifs.  Start looking at all the other celebs, look at their top teeth, look at their bottom teeth.  Look at them from 2005, look at them in 2015.  Hell, look at historical figures.  Look at civil rights pioneers from the 60's as well.  Watch some historical videos...  Learn to see the things that have been touched and altered.  I can't give you the information, you won't perceive it and won't believe it.  You must see, imagine it, and know it yourself.  “There's an old saying in Tennessee — I know it's in Texas, probably in Tennessee — that says, fool me once, shame on — shame on you. Fool me — you can't get fooled again.”
"NO."  
This video doesn't show anything.  It shows allegations of violence by Palestinian children and western monitors, but no actual images of violence.  The headline is misleading, at best.  At worst, it's something else altogether.  
Young nigga got it bad cause I'm brown
Eventually.... Boston bombing was a test. 
There are plenty of prominent users here who engage in these tactics and remain liked in this community and unassaulted by shill accusations. Again, seems like you are just making excuses to ignore people you disagree with. 
I think that guy has been dead for a while.
[deleted]
That won't stop until the boys running the show have trouble finding ignorant and gullible enough recruits. Education and awareness is key, and harping on the benefits they offer is counterproductive to regaining the honor of the institution.
Its really hard to say, maybe they are testing certain surveillance aircraft in your city. Maybe someone else will have some insight on more details. Depending on what shit you have been around I guess its possible they could have aircraft watching you, seems pretty damn unlikely though.
They sure seem to make a huge deal about how Israel is a home for the Jewish religion, seems like religion plays a big factor in that.
There are still glaring questions that everyone should consider, do you believe that those guys are actors?  If so, do you believe they all had time to cut and poke holes in everyone's clothing in a matter of seconds after the explosion?  Do you think they would actually blow up their own people?  When those people made it to hospital, do you think they ran into doctors who were actually going to go ahead and work on prosthetic limbs as if all was normal?  Would they all be in on it as well?    I have a big problem with this idea.  It could be by far the biggest distraction from the real potential evidence.  To draw skeptics into trap of sorts that can never be proven by pictures alone.  To further marginalize the movement.  I'm 99% positive the Boston event was staged to take advantage of D&amp;T and the situation to bring a form of martial law.  A test run.  This is absolute crap though.  
I follow the science. But thanks.
People claim anti-semitism because people insist on calling them jews rather than Israelis. We don't do it with any other nation, we don't label the citizens of a country by their religion. These acts are carried out by the state of Israel. Don't mention Jews and you soon find the only people conflating Judaism and the state of Israel are the zionists. The zionists want others to consider Jew/Israel to be the same thing so they can play the anti semitism card when you criticise Israel.
It's always worth the fight, regardless of the outcome
Paid government shill here:    Just wanted to say that, "no we didn't"   
Right there with you. I've developed a dry sense of humor while in the rabbit hole. I kinda like it, keeps me from ranting I've found. 
Crickets.
Small Pox was eradicated through quarantine, Polio was renamed, vaccines are used to spread diseases, such as HIV, Cancer and autoimmunity.  Without vaccines there would be less than 25% of the disease that we see in the world today
Tell that to the Reddit admins after members from this sub started taking photos of the kiddy daycare centre. 
Thanks for the reply!   I'm even more interested in my first question in this thread, although it certainly got buried.  You can find it [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/32ud1r/im_dark_journalist_ama/cqewbrx).  Thanks for hanging around! And I'll certainly check out her stuff when I get some free time this weekend.
[deleted]
during the late 19th century and the beginning of the 20th century, many successful land purchases were made through organizations such as the Palestine Jewish Colonization Association (PJCA), Palestine Land Development Company and the Jewish National Fund. Jewish buyers who were looking for large tracts of land found it favorable to purchase from the wealthy owners. As well many small farmers became in debt to rich families which lead to the transfer of land to the new owners and then eventually to the Jewish buyers.
Any American tax payer who votes for Democrats and Republicans, who has any sort of dream other than a nightmare is a fool.   And just to clarify, the Israelis don't receive a dime. All of the tax payers money goes to the American MIC to produce arms for Israel.  And in reality the Americans pay even more, as many MIC research projects are joint (Washington- Tel Aviv) and are all paid for by the Americans.  Also expect that much of the Mossads budget is embedded in the CIA's budget as the Mossad and the CIA do endless joint operations, which of course Americans pay for.
They submit them and the da files them officially. 
[deleted]
They can't use those stringent methodologies because it would be unethical to do so. Reactions to vaccines can be deadly, but that is for an extremely small percentage of the population. Things are similar for almost every medication, there's always a risk your body will react badly.    Lastly, yes, there are circumstances in which vaccines will not work. Some people cannot take them for health reasons, some are allergic to the carrying solution used for our bodies to properly absorb them (usually an egg derivate), and other such examples.    But these circumstances are minimal. The horrors of smallpox, and polio and rubella are real, and quick to spend given the chance. You and those you love have a much higher chance of dying or being disfigured or disabled from these diseases than of ever having an adverse reactions to a vaccine.    It's like being injured from wearing a seatbelt. Yes, it happens, and it's terrible. But it's still far better than the alternative.    It is not a personal decision  when it comes to vaccines, because by making the irrational decision not to vaccinate (I.e. Removing the risk of adverse reactions but vastly increasing you vulnerability to disease and ability to spread the disease to others) you are putting those who cannot be vaccinated at risk. Those who cannot be vaccinated (babies, those with allergies, those who have immune systems that are compromise) rely on those around them to be vaccinated so that they cannot pass these terrible diseases onto them.    In most cases, I support the freedom to choose. But if you are so terrified of the minuscule chance of an adverse reaction that you cannot bring yourself to eliminate your potential as a carrier of disease, then society has the right to isolate you from the rest of us.  
[deleted]
That's not what r/medicine sub rules are about. You're tone makes it sound like a personal attack. Let me reference my comment to you again:  "I think the tone of "Obama not being a doctor" in your post makes it sound personal. It sounds like you think Obama is doing it to push an agenda because he's the President. "
The brigading going on in this thread is intense.  Thank you for posting, OP.
[deleted]
May I ask your ethnicity? I have a small (and call me crazy) theory that you are not white. Also what are they doing?  I don't know about a camera. However you want a back up for sound, old fashioned tape recorders work well, as do smart phones. Question what they are doing and make them confess they are violating you.   Also good luck and be sure to update us!
Do you even know what fluorosis can do? It isn't some mind control thing. 
Guys they weren't beating him. They were trying to put the blood back in.
Pakistan's people have thought this for a while now. Sad to see our fears proven 
Who the hell said they want an upvote so bad?   Move on. 
[deleted]
LOL, I will leave the age part out, so as not to embarrass you. But you are assuming US presidents are powerful. That is not how I view the real world to be.  Policy is made by Planners within Deep State and controlled by the families of elites. Presidents are essentially publicists, hired to sell these policies to the sheeple. They are aided of course by the controlled media and "educational" institutions.   Relative to families like the Bush's the Clinton's are trailer trash, good for People Magazine covers and political talk in the media aimed to sell to a personality driven market place, which Americans always seem to love.  They even care about the personalities who read the news to them.    Don't confuse any of this with the realities of real power in the world.
Sorry I'm on my phone writing this, but when I say I have better things to devote my time to, I mean im a full time college student who lives at home while also working 32 hours a week, I prefer to spend the little free time I have spending time with my friends, going to concerts, or having other fun. I just think that is a happier way to live my life than thinking about how fucked up the world is, when I can do virtually nothing about it. As for your other points, you are right in that I should be more understanding of her, and I agree it's not all bad that she is changing her lifestyle. I'm just a little worried because my mom is the type to fall for things easily. She bought those garcinia cambogia pills she saw on Dr. Oz, she once believed an Indian guy on the phone that her PC has a virus and let him remotely control the computer and put a ton of adware on it and then charged her for over $100. I don't know if she will take this conspiracy thing a little too far. As of right now it's fine. I was just looming for some other opinions about this situation. And thanks for taking the time to reply to my post. I'll talk more with my family about this when I have more time.
Yes i'm aware carbon dioxide makes the drinks fizzy, but they're putting way too much of it in the drinks. And well obviously i can't give you any evidence because it's a theory. But there's a video of a man explaining how the sweeteners in diet coke are cancerous. They use the same sweeteners in coca-cola life. 
Isn't 91 gallons a day almost nothing?
&gt; I'm not racist, I'm just speaking the truth.  Words that have spilled from the mouths of every racist. Seriously, make an account at stormfront (assuming you don't already have one of course). Around there, you don't even have to use the word "Zionist" in place of Jew. 
Halperin = Asshole. 
Explain what's criminal about it.
What is the trans pacific partnership in reality? 
But they're legal.
Me and my ancestors have thrived in the cold. IMO, the south is the worst place to be.
Agree. The stats on how animal agriculture is adding to environmental degradation are terrifying. All of those antibiotic resistant bacteria that the industry is creating is also massively problematic.
Oh lovely a tautology. Once again, you have said nothing to contradict that capitalism leads directly and inevitably to cronyism. 
[I assume it was on purpose?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lG_OezlTZ1A)
You think any police station gets to play with the NSA's toy? 
I would FF through #9 the DeBeers segement.  The narrator is kinda hard to listen to imo, and that one kinda drags on.
I find no intellectual thought in your statement. Please offer some insights, or just go back to tard land.
What is the conspiracy in this case? It seems someone stole some money (a great deal of money) and now people are arguing over who is responsible for paying it back. Is there something more sinister I'm missing?
Dude, if your caged, your mental submission means nothing.
&gt; monopoly   The name says it all.  Having a monopoly in America is actually illegal. 
No underwater base, just Google mapping part of the ocean floor around the islands. Zoom in.  https://www.google.com/maps/@37.6920149,-122.9912039,3636m/data=!3m1!1e3?hl=en  
Best 911 doc by far 
funny how there are people on r/conspiracy who are pro state/government when the CIA, FBI, NSA, DEA etc are all state agencies..
[deleted]
Right... So just like the well researched vaccines cause autism paper?   You should provide links and evidence otherwise you just look crazy
I didn't read any fine print, but I have to admit that the pictures of the older people look a *lot* like the pictures of the younger people...Down to the specific eyebrow, nose, teeth, and mouth details.  I'm an artist, have been drawing for many years, and am pretty darn good at being able to discern facial idiosyncrasies...and those look like they could be older pictures of those younger people.  The black dude has a gap in his teeth that isn't present in the younger version, but there are other similarities that parallel nonetheless.  Weird.
Who did they get to move the shelves/structures if they fired everyone?  There has to be a pharmacy tech on reddit that is working in one of these stores, I'd love to talk to them. We should flood these stores with prescriptions/refills. 
Well that is irrelevant to me because I live in the UK. And the shops I go to are ethical
From what I understand on it, your mind enters a fusion of "hyper awareness" (similar to the experience directly preceding the fight-or-flight response) and unconscious dream state. Sort of the inverse of lucid dreaming. In this condition, the emotional effects of physical paralysis feed the into the mind's hallucinations. The "presence" constitutes the brain, as a whole, attempting to rectify the various stimuli, and translating them into powerful, surrealistic visions.
Kansas - Kansas.
Yes, no doubt that is the case.    I believe that you won this battle.  I just can't think of a thing I could possibly rebut that with.  I concede.
/r/Op_Jade_Helm_15  I feel 100% confident in agreeing with /u/DragonGT   This is a massive psy-op. And according to /u/kit8642 by looking at the sources and information coming out of info wars, reporter Joe Biggs has received txt messages from SOF members telling him to "shut up" and "you don't know what you're talking about it, it's just a psy-op".   So imo it is most definitely a psychological operation in order to condition the public to seeing a higher than normal military presence on the streets.   According to the current information that has been leaked, the 1200+ special forces members taking part in the exercise may be wearing civilian clothes or 'mixed uniforms' like fatigue bottoms and a t-shirt. They will also be driving around in civilian vehicles, or getting rides in the back of civilian driven vehicles.   The biggest concern I believe is the unprecedented amount of military presence already occurring in the areas. 
[deleted]
You ever been in a walmart? They're kinda fucking huge.   **Walmart Discount Stores are discount department stores with sizes varying from 51,000 to 224,000 square feet (4,738.1 to 20,810.3 m2), with the average store covering about 102,000 square feet (9,476.1 m2).**  Not to mention that local law enforcement has set up a security perimeter on a store with nothing in it. Our tax dollars are paying for that btw.
thanks for clarifying details about the s-300s I was unaware they were defensive, but I think you're on to something with your last statement. I put Israel foes as the US as well, because the US has made enormous efforts to arm Israel and seems to be pretty eager to jump to Israel's aid. if not under President Obama, then perhaps the next elected.
Unknown to the members of these various secret societies seeking “Illumination” and “deification,” their masters are the Cabalistic Jew, the originator of Gnostic mysticism. 
So you don't believe the official reports either?  Good.
Just google search the title of this article to read for free if you hit a paywall.
You're asking why it's outdated to treat blacks as second class humans, but not outdated to be wary of a foreign country trying to control your own? I think you're joking.
Please stop spamming this video, as it doesn't pertain to OP's post.
I'm not a 9/11 truther, I just don't like snarky, overly aggressive people telling me black is white. 
obamacare?
Oh, Eric Holder, thew guy who warned Connecticut governor Malloy that a shooting was going to take place in his state and then funneled million$ into Newton? 
We literally get an outright admission the building was a controlled demolition, but faithers try to suggest he was talking about "pull the firefighters" from the building even though it makes zero sense in the context of his conversation and the fact the official reports said the fires could not be put out because the water mains were damaged, so what would they be doing in there anyway 7 hours later.  Not that any of it matters, the building went into freefall, which is direct evidence of a building implosion.
&gt; They saw it with their own eyes  Firefighters:    "Hey everyone, even though we can't see through the substructure with x-ray vision and have no idea when/if/how all the columns are starting to collapse, stand back everyone.  This is the first time in history a steel framed building is about to collapse due to fire.  Don't ask us how we **know**, but we **know**.   Even though all the empirical evidence in front of our eyes is exhibiting all the traits of controlled demolition.  It is not.  This is totally normal steel framed building collapse.  Happens all the time...." 
Poisoning the well.
The problem with the whole "Jade Helm Conspiracy" Thing is that the Military who's supposedly doing this is made up of Americans as well, not Chinese, not Russians....Americans, who all have families and relatives here in AMERICA lol....I mean come on people really?
What I find most amazing is all the leftwing fuckfaces that, on the daily, do nothing but bitch and moan about how Kansas doesn't do anything right.  The harassment of that cannabis oil lady, not a pro abortion state, heavy-handed police tactics, etc.  Yet when they see the same shit from the same place with no author attribution, about people they themselves hate, *Kansas is fucking great!*   [Like DailyKOS thinks]( https://archive.today/lKkO5).  It's like, it's the same shit.  How do you go from Kansas is the home of the koch empire and should never be listened to, to 'hey, maybe we should listen to these unknown people from the place we hate"?  Can you not see the well is poisoned anymore because of political hatred?
Definitely not a beret. It's a shoe. However the logo is clearly based on the US Special Forces logo (see my post above).
*on another list
Some highlights:   "After practicing his sieg heil in front of a mirror, Mooney and two other senior executives from General Motors and its German division, Adam Opel A.G., went to meet Hitler."   and  "Sloan [president of GM], then in his mid-60s, told his closest executives during a Detroit briefing: 'I am sure we all realize that this struggle that is going on though the world is really nothing more or less than a conflict between two opposing technocracies manifesting itself to the capitalization of economic resources and products and all that sort of thing.'"  Edit: Interesting how every comment here is at 0 or lower points despite the post itself being 95% upvoted. 
That's...incredible.  Several of my friends in University are science majors. Some have taken environmental classes and they tell me either the classes don't mention factory farms at all or talk about it for a few minutes. None of the classes I have taken have mentioned it, but my classes were mostly about genes, microorganisms, and lab techniques. I have taken one class about ecology, and while the teacher was very passionate about the environment, he never did bring up animal farming. 
Well, have fun with that. If you want to change minds, that isn't how you do it.
A fucking shitstorm.
&gt;Highlights  •  A steel frame building was tested by physically removing four first story columns.  •  2-D and 3-D models of the building were analyzed.  •  Calculated demand-to-capacity ratios exceeded the specified limits.  •  Although analytically collapse was predicted, test building did not collapse.   That's from the first one I randomly chose. I clicked about ten others and they had nothing to do with corroborating NIST's theory about what happened to building 7.  That post says that the CTBUH explicitly confirmed NIST's findings, but in fact they explicitly rejected them and proposed their own fire collapse theory.  So...what exactly do these scientists agree upon? Can you state it with scientific precision? How can it be verified when the original report, NIST's, not only didn't cite any physical evidence, but ignored physical evidence that FEMA had cited in a previous investigation? 
[deleted]
&gt; you are fucking retarded  &gt;you stupid fuck.   &gt;Stupid fuck.  &gt;Fuck you.  &gt;Learn history you stupid piece of shit.   &gt;Take your big nose and fuck some gold.  &gt;Take your bolshevicks and fuck some gold.  &gt;you idiot.  &gt;dumbshit.  Nope, not insulting at all...
Let's put it this way... the first thing that I checked was to see if this was cross-posted to /r/humor.
PPF?
Solid debunking...
This theory makes most sense, tho it is fact that wal-marts are part of the govt's "continuity of govt" plans
AFFIDAVIT OF FACT AND NOTICE OF INTENT AND CLAIM OF RIGHT TO CULTIVATE, POSSESS, USE, TRANSPORT AND DISTRIBUTE HEMP  Conrad Justice Kiczenski, herein known as Affiant, being first duly sworn upon oath does hereby declare and affirm the following facts:  1. You are hereby given lawful notice that the plant called Hemp (Cannabis genus) is a vital natural-resource for food, clothing, medicine, fuel, and paper; a religious sacrament, as well as being a “Strategic and Critical Material” for “military”, “essential civilian”, and “industrial” purposes as documented in Exhibits A, B, C, D, E, &amp; F attached hereto, and as such is “accessible” and “protected” under International Law cited herein.  2. You are hereby given lawful notice of Affiants intent to cultivate, possess, use, distribute and transport the plant known as Hemp (Cannabis genus).  3. Affiant claims the right to carry out the foregoing intent under sanction of the following constitutionally ratified treaties (Pursuant to U.S. Const. Art. VI. Sec. 2):  International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights, Article 11, Sections 1 &amp; 2, Dec. 16, 1966, http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/cescr.htm International Covenant on Economic, Social, and Cultural Rights, Article 12, Section 1, Dec. 16, 1966, http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/cescr.htm International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, Article 18, Section 1, Dec. 16, 1966, http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/ccpr.htm United Nations Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the crime of Genocide, Article II (c), Dec. 9, 1948, http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/genocide.htm  4. The International Covenant on Economic, Social, and Cultural Rights, in Article 11, Sections 1 &amp; 2, states:  1. The States Parties to the present Covenant recognize the right of everyone to an adequate standard of living for himself and his family, including adequate food, clothing and housing, and to the continuous improvement of living conditions. The States Parties will take appropriate steps to ensure the realization of this right…  2. The States Parties to the present Covenant, recognizing the fundamental right of everyone to be free from hunger, shall take, individually and through international co-operation, the measures, including specific programs, which are needed:  (a) To improve methods of production, conservation and distribution of food by making full use of technical and scientific knowledge, by disseminating knowledge of the principles of nutrition and by developing or reforming agrarian systems in such a way as to achieve the most efficient development and utilization of natural resources;  (b) Taking into account the problems of both food-importing and food-exporting countries, to ensure an equitable distribution of world food supplies in relation to need.  4a. The interpretation for the right to adequate food, as given by the United Nations Committee on Economic, Social, and Cultural Rights in General Comment Number 12 states:  The right to adequate food is realized when every man, woman and child…has physical and economic access at all times to adequate food or means for its procurement. The Committee considers that the core content of the right to adequate food implies: The availability of food in a quantity and quality sufficient to satisfy the dietary needs of individuals…Dietary needs implies that the diet as a whole contains a mix of nutrients for physical and mental growth, development and maintenance…Availability refers to the possibilities…for feeding oneself directly from productive land or other natural resources… Violations of the right to food can occur through…adoption of legislation or policies which are manifestly incompatible with pre-existing legal obligations relating to the right to food; SEE: http://www.unhchr.ch/tbs/doc.nsf/%28Symbol%29/3d02758c707031d58025677f003b73b9?Opendocument  4b. Affiant submit’s the following Exhibits as sufficient supporting evidence that Hemp qualifies as an “adequate food resource” and is therefore “accessible” under Article 11 of the International Covenant on Economic, Social, and Cultural Rights:  Pursuant to Presidential Executive Order 12919, the “NATIONAL DEFENSE INDUSTRIAL RESOURCES PREPAREDNESS” order, Section 901 (e) &amp; (l), attached hereto as Exhibit A, “Hemp” is defined as a “food resource” and qualifies as a ‘‘Strategic and Critical Material’’. According to an excerpt from “Hempseed Nutrition” by Lynn Osburn, attached hereto as Exhibit B, a scientific analysis of hemp seed nutrition reveals that “Cannabis hemp seeds contain all the essential amino acids and essential fatty acids necessary to maintain healthy human life. No other single plant source provides complete protein in such an easily digestible form, nor has the oils essential to life in as perfect a ratio for human health and vitality. Hempseed is the highest of any plant in essential fatty acids.”.  4c. Affiant submit’s the following Exhibits as sufficient supporting evidence that Hemp qualifies as an adequate resource for “clothing”, “military”, “essential civilian” and “industrial” purposes, as well as other necessary resources for attaining an “adequate standard of living” including “paper” and biomass for “fuel” and is therefore further “accessible” under Article 11, Section 1 of the International Covenant on Economic, Social, and Cultural Rights:  The transcript of a 1942 USDA film entitled “Hemp for Victory”, attached hereto as Exhibit C, states that “For thousands of years… this plant had been grown for cordage and cloth… For the sailor, no less than the hangman, hemp was indispensable…Indeed the very word canvas comes from the Arabic word for hemp…All such plants will presently be turning out products spun from American-grown hemp: twine of various kinds for tying and upholsters work; rope for marine rigging and towing; for hay forks, derricks, and heavy duty tackle; light duty fire hose; thread for shoes for millions of American soldiers; and parachute webbing for our paratroopers…hemp for mooring ships; hemp for tow lines; hemp for tackle and gear; hemp for countless naval uses both on ship and shore. ”. According to a Popular Mechanics Magazine article, VOL. 69 February, 1938 NO. 2, pp. 238-240, entitled “NEW BILLION-DOLLAR CROP”, attached hereto as Exhibit D, states that “Hemp is the standard fiber of the world. It has great tensile strength and durability. It is used to produce more than 5,000 textile products, ranging from rope to fine laces, and the woody "hurds" remaining after the fiber has been removed contain more than seventy-seven per cent cellulose, and can be used to produce more than 25,000 products, ranging from dynamite to Cellophane…The natural materials in hemp make it an economical source of pulp for any grade of paper manufactured, and the high percentage of alpha cellulose promises an unlimited supply of raw material for the thousands of cellulose products our chemists have developed…All of these products, now imported, can be produced from home- grown hemp. Fish nets, bow strings, canvas, strong rope, overalls, damask tablecloths, fine linen garments, towels, bed linen and thousands of other everyday items can be grown on American farms. ”. According to an Excerpt from "Energy Farming in America," by Lynn Osburn, attached hereto as Exhibit E, “BIOMASS CONVERSION to fuel has proven economically feasible, first in laboratory tests and by continuous operation of pilot plants in field tests since 1973. HEMP IS THE NUMBER ONE biomass producer on planet earth: 10 tons per acre in approximately four months.”
Check my comment, I linked it for you. 
I agree with everything you say... I know it doesn't matter who gets elected the US is the government of, by, and for the corporations.  However... Something is still true in regard to better versus worse people. Al Gore, Ron Paul, Rand Paul, Dennis Kucinich, Ron Wyden, these are all *better* than the other crap that the elites pretend like we have to choose from.  We COULD be better off with certain people. I am able to recognize them. Bill Clinton was OK in retrospect and Ronald Reagan wasn't bad. I mean they were all increasingly bad, but we've still got to pressure the elites to follow the popular vote.
i did, but it linked back to this one because the link was already submitted, kind of a catch-22. didn't know about the caps rule though, not a frequent submitter here.
Been on Santas list since I was born. Fucker is worse than all the intelligence agencies combined. 
National Grange wants only GMO hemp — with strong-arm enforcement National Grange wants only GMO hemp — with strong-arm enforcement By Adam Eidinger VoteHemp.com - March 18th, 2010 SOURCE: http://www.westcoastleaf.com/?p=854  One of the nation’s leading farming organizations passed a bizarre new policy statement in support of industrial hemp farming, but only if it is genetically modified (GMO) and retains cannabis prohibition with very heavy law enforcement.  The National Grange of the Order of Patron of Husbandry, known simply as “The G r a n g e , ” made the statement in November at its annual m e e t i n g , against the urging of advocacy groups such as Vote Hemp that GMO hemp is offensive and unnecessary because varieties of the cannabis with low THC are widely available in Canada and elsewhere.  The Grange policy statement states: “The National Grange supports research, production, processing and marketing of industrial hemp as a viable agricultural activity. We do not in any way support or condone the growth or use of marijuana as a hallucinogen.  “We support strict enforcement of all laws that currently ban the production and sale of marijuana or that classify all species of cannabis as a Class 1 controlled substance in the US. We oppose amending these laws as the primary means of promoting industrial hemp production.  Instead we urge further research and application of existing biotechnology techniques to develop genetically modified industrial hemp that will be biologically incompatible with all other forms of cannabis or marijuana.  We further urge that genetically modified industrial hemp contain distinct chemical markers that will quickly and easily identify industrial hemp varieties using low cost and accurate on-site testing methods for the purpose of contract compliance, law enforcement and as evidence in court.”  Since organic products must not be made with GMO crops, Vote Hemp is concerned that GMO hemp envisioned by The Grange would undermine the already strong demand for certified organic hemp seed while alienating organic consumers who make up the core of demand for hemp food and body care products produced in North America.  Furthermore, no GMO hemp has been developed and with the prospect of the Dept. of Justice finally recognizing state hemp farming laws as they recently did with medical marijuana laws, the GMO hemp envisioned by The Grange would be irrelevant to the current market demand for hemp seed, oil and fiber now valued at $360 million in annual sales according to the Hemp Industries Association.  Vote Hemp representatives speaking on condition of anonymity due to the sensitive nature of the issue, say “If GMO hemp were developed to be ‘biologically incompatible’ with marijuana it would only benefit marijuana growers who have real concerns of cross pollination between high THC marijuana and low THC hemp.” Outdoor marijuana growers fear cross pollination and ultimately seeding of their crop. “Ironically, The Grange states it does not support changing marijuana laws and is arguing for a policy that ostensibly would protect marijuana growers from cross-pollination while alienating their customers in the natural marketplace who want non-GMO hemp,” says the Vote Hemp spokesperson.  Vote Hemp has worked with members of National Farmers Union (NFU), The Grange, and the American Farm Bureau to get pro-hemp resolutions passed. NFU members will be presenting pro-hemp resolutions at their annual meeting this March, which already passed on the state level. New NFU president Roger Johnson is the former Agriculture Commissioner from North Dakota and a strong supporter of hemp farming. Vote Hemp worked closely with Roger Johnson and North Dakota state legislators to pass bills, promulgate farming regulations, and issue the first state hemp farming licenses in 2008.  As a result of those North Dakota state licenses being issued to state Rep. Dave Monson and Wayne Hauge, Vote Hemp was able to assist them in filing for Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) licenses and then later filing suit for the right to grow hemp under state license without permission from DEA. The decision on the farmers appeal in the US Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit was not in favor of the farmers who are currently weighing their options and plan to push for DEA approval of their license applications.   
Wish you could buy one of those $100 infrared cameras for the iphone and video inside the airport.  Might see hidden cold doorways in the walls or something.   Try to get some shots from the plane when you take off and land because satelite images are edited by google these days . Maybe your pictures will pick up something not seen in public satellite shots.  
how do you know
Wow. It's like you're me on the other side of the fence of my gritty realization. Yes I have realized the same, about the US Government.  I know that even their best men have been shafted, put in prison, left this country, written books, made movies, released documents, spoken out, blown the whistle, etc. etc. etc.  I don't need to take your word for it, I have the word of the US Government itself. Of those people I mentioned.  Reality agrees on all 3 sides. The hope and dreams remain, as Bobby Kennedy said. And we must keep buggering on, as Winston Churchill said.  We must always wonder what could have happened had Al Gore been president as the popular vote decided. THAT is the point in history whereby the power of the elites took hold over the people. The point at which going back in a time machine would branch the United States into a fundamentally different direction.  All we can do now is do everything we can. Everywhere we go. Everyone we talk to. Everything we do. Hope for a better future.
Sent thousands of people to jail illegally, and he got 28 years? Seems to me he should get thousands of years...
Yes, I agree. Smoking THC high strains, for me at least has exasperated my anxiety, so much so that I have symptoms of depersonalization. I know it helps hundreds of thousands of people but for me the cons outweigh the pros.   That being said Psilocybin (Psychedelic mushrooms) has helped exponentially with my anxiety. Plus, it is less harmful for a persons psyche and internals than THC, Alcohol or Aspirin. 
[deleted]
LOL no I'm not saying the consensus is neccisarily right, I'm just saying that "nobody believes anything that comes out of the Obama White House. Nothing. They have zero confidence of the people."is total BS. Popular opinion matters when you're talking about popular opinion.
http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/h5149/for_as_skeptical_as_rpolitics_normally_is_why/
The planes were shape shifted lizards. duh.
Nice.
Mexicans have a monopoly on gang and mafia involvement there are no political reason or otherwise for Mexicans to allow Isis near them. It's like allowing another government come in to replace it.
Hasta la victoria, siempre!
Why are you here going to bat for Monsanto?  Bored?  Hate it when big business isn't properly represented online?
Tell me more
depends if you also emptied those too. consider how large the bunkers were during the cold war era. now look at how much larger the federal government has become and the money that places like DHS and NSA have available now.  i mean i don't think anyone can say those don't exist anymore after 100's of them were outed after the cold war. obviously those would be replaced in any situation as continuity of government etc.  
&gt;I'd estimate about %001 of people in this propaganda filled cesspool actually understand the science of vaccination and the politics/companies behind them.  Doesn't this only really apply to USA though? There's no exactly money to be made in national healthcare systems for vaccinations.  I'll be honest, I'm completely ignorant on the subject but am pro-vaccination. The only counter argument I've ever seen is "they cause autism"; that doesn't have any scientific backing.  Enlighten me.
Sure you got the right subreddit, bro?
I think this is the first time anyone's thanked me on this sub. You are most certainly welcome. :) 
Exactly.  Now (hypothetically speaking) if the government went through the hassle of making the events of 9/11 look like an attack of terrorism by building two military aircraft...  that were reinforced and souped-up in order to fly them faster than you can technically fly a 767...  then painted them to look identical to an American Airlines and a United Airlines plane...  then switched these two planes with the real planes mid-flight, diverting the real planes to a remote airfield somewhere, where the passengers were then "disappeared"...  and rigged both buildings with super nano-thermate cutting charges...  and flying these two souped-up disguised military planes into the buildings and triggering the explosives to go off at the EXACT point where the planes crashed into the buildings...  All to make everything look to the average person watching that the planes caused the collapse of the buildings...   THEN WHY DIDNT THEY DO THIS FOR BUILDING 7? 
I'll start myself off. I get most of my news from NPR, the BBC, and Deutchevella radio, mainly because I'm in my car for an hour per day and it's convenient (and I don't like commercial radio music). I consider them trustworthy because they represent 3 different countries' media and generally agree with one another, as well as with what I see in other places (reddit included, for the most part). 
This is from the town I grew up in!!! A well respected man, even after the accusations... not sure about what they think now.
He obviously died years ago. The only footage of him was from 2001 or before. Nothing new was released since then, except the blatantly obvious fakes -&gt; http://www.wtfrly.com/wp-content/911truth/fakebinladen1.jpg
Nice catch. These leaks are becoming more and more interesting, by the day. Kudos for WikiLeaks, for having the balls to actually do this.
I see a lot of youtube interviews, but I am wondering if all of these people with these qualifications have to tried to publish anything scientific regarding their issues with the report on a more detailed level? Many of the ideas I've seen discussed in this video seem to take things from a very broad perspective. I'd like to see the technical analysis that led them to these conclusions in the form of articles. Have any of them been published (I am already aware of the "journal of 9/11 studies", I didn't find much in terms of engineering related papers). Anyone have a link for any of these?  Aside from that, I am most interested in an alternate model demonstrating the controlled demolition. Given that NIST used video/photo footage and blueprints to construct theirs, I would think that someone with a controlled demolition hypothesis would be equally as capable of producing a model to show that. They could get into more detail, theorize on explosive placement, demolition physics etc. Anybody got a link?
"We've already linked in, uh, with the hospital. We understand how they get the Life Flight. We also have medical personnel that will be on site to, uh, assist if anything should happen."    Um...wut?
Took it from a few comments up where I said nearly the same thing. You must have not been reading before.
I dunno about that.  Breitbart's videos that were supposed to bring Obama down (and most people claimed led to his secret assassination) ended up getting released anyways and they were far from explosive and didn't even damage Obama at all.  Like most of his news stories he made giant claims and then didn't have much to back it up.  He was more flare than substance.  He got a lot of traction with Anthony Weiner's dick pics and that was about it.  I could see Breitbart having an actual heart attack because he was an intense guy who wasn't particularly healthy and kept a pretty stressful schedule with long hours.   
Regarding the high winds.  Here is Edna Cintron standing in the hole in the north tower, other wise known as the air inlet.  http://imgur.com/JLfw37G   Her very long  hair is NOT blowing and she is holding on to  the frame of the building.  The anomalous heat was generated by the demolition of the building   http://homageofreason.blogspot.com/2010/11/wtc-north-tower-victim-edna-cintron-and.html
Are they being fined for taking water with an expired licence? They should have to pay for desalination plants or something.
Considering the tiny amount of water Nestle is using to create POTABLE WATER, I don't see how this is a big issue.  Stop growing rice and nuts in a desert - that's the real problem.  One gallon of water is used per cashew grown.
Why Tree-Rat (my internet stalker) is a one trick pony.  1.  I posted an article. I did not write it. I did not endorse it, I posted it for informational purposes.  2.  I am not in fact Senator James "Snowball" Inhofe. So what he says has no bearing on me, my life, or my internet persona.
http://www.ihr.org/jhr/v06/v06p389_John.html
&gt; legitimate sites/content have not been blocked  "Legitimate".  Of course, they will determine who is and is not "legitimate".
My thing about flat earth is what about the ISS? and the hundreds of satellites orbiting the planet right now along with it?  Like, what are the arguments in support of the earth being flat? I don't get it. I get the artificial moon thing, we've never been there, etc. What I don't get is the flat earth theory, it just so obviously isn't flat..
Distrustful =/= non-scientific
First I'd really like to thank you for providing an intelligent and logical response to what I've brought up! It's always refreshing to see someone genuinely looking to expand on thought instrwad of regressing to a "no but I'm right" mentality.  -- I'll agree with you that its all extremely interesting in thought but it just always comes down to "why". Does it really make more sense that our entire reality is a huge elaborate conspiracy? It would require all governments, all scientists in on it to dupe us poor "regular folk"? Right? I think it comes down to an Occam's Razor sort of thought process.  honestly I can understand where the distrust lies (i mean I'm on this dang reddit) and I can understand where the initial ideas come from But I seriously think a lot of the motives behind duping that picture were political. We as Americans had to be the "best there ever was" and we couldn't let those "damn commies" beat us to space! So of course we duped them. We had to maintain our dominance.   And, interestingly enough the idea of the earth being flat comes from the bible.. And I mean, that can't be wrong...can it?  Whar it comes down to honestly is exactly what you said; if you want to believe the earth is flat then you have to accept that we are all "living in the matrix" or however you'd like to put it. But otherwise I feel there is a glaringly large amount of evidence that support that our planet is a big, round, amorpheous hunk of matter and that we, as humans are actually accomplishing beautiful things by being able to know this and begin to understand how the universe looks And acts beyond what we physically see with our own two eyes on this planet. (which, by the way, also does support that our planet is round.. by observing stars and planets around us and how they move)    Sorry if this is disorganized... I'm writing from my phone :P  
For me its anecdotal. I watched my nephew, and the neighbors kid a year later, who started going down hill right after getting all the vaccinations into autism.  Imagine you see these kids everyday for their first year of their lives, you notice the growth, eye contact, interaction, playing, starting to formulate words and decisions, laughter, emotions.......and then the very next day after the shots, subtle things start changing and within 2-4 weeks, they no longer look you in the eyes, the behavior changes, they can't stand loud sounds, won't eat the same foods they used to.  And then I'm demonized on reddit for having witnessed this and speaking about it. Now I also have a cousin who also seems to be going through the same thing with her son. For some reason, the boys are more susceptible because of a weaker blood brain barrier.
Nope. Never said that. Most doctors do not recieve thorough education in medical school of how nutrition affects the immune system.   In harvard medical school there is ONE class on nutrition IIRC for example. 
That is probably because they advertise. 
I couldn't spot a single magazine.   Am I blind? 
&gt; It is not about denying that vaccinations are effective  Maybe not to you, because they mostly aren't.   Although I do agree with the rest of your post though. 
&gt; No, I want the truther model. I want the model that shows a controlled demolition  and I want a faither model that shows a fire induced collapse, but NIST won't release it.   Difference is that one had millions of dollars to produce one.
&gt;reminds me of a lot of people on reddit -- present company included.  I can agree with that.  If by present company included you mean me, disagreeing doesn't make you right/more educated, don't get that twisted.  &gt;compared to kids in public school ?? you're joking, right?  That was a reference to all children.  They are programmed from the beginning to mimic things they have heard in order to learn.  Public, private, or home school doesn't matter, that's just how children are taught.  &gt;homeschooling would save States billions.  So you are telling me that funding *individual houses* would cost less that having all of the children in a particular area in one building? That's ridiculous.  [In a "Digital Aristotle"](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7vsCAM17O-M) sense, maybe.  Paying a parent to teach their own children would in **no way at all** cost less than having a teacher in one paid-for building teach to 20+ children at a time.  I think you might need to go brush up on economics and accounting and consider how much one alternative would cost compared to another.
Okay, I got the timeline wrong. But the reflectors still do not prove that man walked on the moon. Because unmanned Soviet robots also put reflectors on the moon.
Ten days  Seven hours  Forty minutes  Precisely
I tried posting it on that thread. Got down voted. Most people don't discuss it probably because they don't take the time to look through and see that there's over 300 published articles from peer-reviewed journals. Also, they have faith in the medical industry that's making trillions off sick people and working with food companies to poison our food.   edit: grammar
Don't think for yourself, this is Reddit after all!  Just ask Science Man In Chief Neil Degrasses Tyson!  **Science**  * There was a large rocket, ergo it went to the moon. * There were profiles and interviews of the astronauts in Life Magazine ergo it's all completely above board. * Strange inconsistencies do not merit interest because, well, it happened.  *This has been a Bill Nye and Neil Degrasse Tyson Sciency minute*
Fatty?! What are you a 6 year old? Jesus, it's like talking to someone with autism.
Indeed lsc7! Vaccines cause epidemics of lifelong autoimmune disease leaving many dependent on Big Pharma drugs for life, that's what vaccines are really there for, anyone who believes otherwise is simply naive  
Okay, thank you for clearing that up. Everyone: THERE IS NO CONSPIRACY. That is all. 
Yep, I am anti violence myself. My guess is that people advocating it here are either joking or agent provocateurs. 
Fuck a petition. STOP BUYING NESTLE! The bottom line is the only thing they respect.
He's been active for two months and, based on my very quick check, this is the first time he has posted in conspiracy. He has posted in GTA v, UKhiphopheads, hiphopheads, videos, justiceporn, etc. So you think they've done that for two months to come in here today?
Seriously. The fact that people will take a speech at face value to be "evidence" in a subreddit that tries to promote free thinking is mindboggling.
Yes, it would exaggerate the curvature more.  Instead of 1,440 foot drop, it should be a 3,900 foot drop.  But it's flat.  You can also see Pittsburgh from the same spot.
I'm talking more about the armchair doctors that populate places like Reddit.  Most of them don't know any more than your average anti-vaxxer but they love to pretend they do.
&gt; why not get involved with the candidate that most closely resembles the person you want to see as president and help them get elected instead?  I don't know how many reddit users are going to be able to provide the kind of soft money needed to best the 'mainstream' candidates. 
Proven? Where? By the bullshit photo he posted? That isn't proof.  Anyway. Even if you consider it proof, or if OP considers it proof, OP should be able to answer the follow-up questions.  Also, one of my posts literally says "Questions:" followed by the questions. My questions are relevant. They are on topic. 
I like this. So I'm wondering... How would a flat earth account for  plane paths from Russia to American, going East, for instance? 
[deleted]
You must not talk to many women. A good portion of them think this, but a lot don't, and many of them simply don't care about things like politics and voting. Just like men. 
Obviously Monsanto products are completely fine, you're just crazy!
You should be aware that we have a few people here that are "skeptical" about everything *except* official narratives. 3Try8 is one of those people. Note how he generalized the entire sub as suckers.
It maybe because "Glasses Make Your Eyes WORSE". 
Well put. Many countries don't start vaccines until age 2. USA, 4-6 months.
[deleted]
dat plausible deniability
it's scary, i hope in the future people will be *allowed* to even have pets.
the word boycott comes to mind.
[deleted]
Fuck off with that shit. You don't have any clue what you're talking about. Go visit a SuperMax and get to know some of those sick fucks and tell me they are just as human as you.
[deleted]
reddit's solution is voting straight line democrat. 
This is an appeal to false authority. Who the fuck is this guy and this crappy blog...Is this it, all we have after all these years? A serious of crappy regurgitated points? There were hundreds of people there who saw REAL people with serious injuries. Nurses and doctors who worked with the patients. The list goes on
Pehaps they took the photo for a completely different reason?
It is much easier to control the situation and keep unwanted people out. Also, no one will be subjected to lawsuits. 
I watched 'Spielberg's Hoax: Last Days of the Big Lie'. Have you seen it? Check it out. It will change you for the better. It did for me.
Candide is a satire on the absurdity of romantic and dramatic fiction at the time, while also incorporating satire and parody of those concepts on a philosophical level. It is meant to be absurd. It is not meant to be believed, or desired.
Google maps shows it is exactly where the OP said. 
Yah your link refers to a military study. Thus on adults, not children, which is where the debate is focused. Do better than that
[Somebody already did](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U1Qt6a-vaNM).
&gt;To me this observation cannot be explained by the controlled demolition hypothesis which says that the building was brought down by a sudden explosion that took down all of the supports in a single instant.   Why are you ignoring the controlled demolition hypothesis which says that the building was brought down by multiple explosions and incendiaries throughout the day? And again what has you that fires can bring such a building down so quickly and completely? I mean it's not like you've actually seen any so sold on the notion that lack of experimental confirmation or real world examples which come anywhere close to demonstrating as much, have you? 
Please point to an instance where I've tried to debunk it.  EDIT: Again, no response. Just downvotes. Pretty telling.
http://readersupportednews.org/opinion2/277-75/22994-focus-was-turkey-behind-syrian-sarin-attack
He never said he didn't like Jewish people.. this is what we mean when we talk about any criticism of Jews being labelled as Antisemitism.  Are you not allowed to criticize the Jewish religion? We sure do for Muslims..
When you say "Jewish embargo" do you mean [the economic boycott initiated in 1933](http://www.wintersonnenwende.com/scriptorium/english/archives/articles/jdecwar.html), described as a "holy war" with the stated aim of destroying Germany's export markets?  I would agree that describing this as a "declaration of war" is slightly misleading. It's a good example of what bothers me about this documentary -- in general, more detail and greater accuracy are required, although the film is definitely touching on the important aspects of the history which are generally ignored or downplayed by the Anglocentric and Judeocentric historiographers.  Bear in mind that the boycott action was taken alongside the ramping up of dishonest anti-NS propaganda in Jewish-owned media, and lobbying behind the scenes for nations to take an aggressive stance towards Germany:  &gt;"I emphasised that the defeat of Germany and Japan and their elimination from world trade would give Britain a tremendous opportunity to swell her foreign commerce in both volume and profit." - 'Baruch, The Public Years', by Bernard M. Baruch, (1960, p.347)
6 hours and 32 mins long. Jeez.  Can someone do a tl; dr ? Just joking. Will find time to watch soon. Hope its worth it!
That's a lot of info in those links.  Will go through them.  However, I will still say that even if that *isn't* Bush Sr. (and I will, again, very much admit that it doesn't actually look very much like him to me), the main point of the doc in general (that this ~~country~~ planet has pretty much been entirely taken over by a cabal of *very* powerful elite) is, it seems to me, *very* much still correct.
Thanks for the explanation, I wasn't sure what this picture was about. You said John Doe #2 was never caught, but how? And why did Wikipedia have 2 names if we don't know who #2 was? [It named two people](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oklahoma_City_bombing) -  Timothy McVeigh and Terry Nichols. Forgive me, I'm not very familiar about this, I've not researched anything on this.  Edit: Ahh, I kept reading, I see about John Doe #2. Nevermind this comment, interesting how one got away easily. How can we be sure that there was someone else? I only saw 2 people getting out of the truck in this video.
yeah one friend of mine lost her cousin in the bombing and another friend was hurt (minorly) at the finish line. neither of them are actors to my knowledge and if so they sure didn't get paid anything for this.
i actually -joined- reddit when this happened specifically to find pictures of bauman with his legs unobscured because -every- goddamn photo of the guy had something blocking his legs, and in this sub people were able to find pics of him in shorts, with legs, etc.  (so i guess happy reddit birthday to me)
Have a quick look: [Here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KQET3FFnDUQ)
Chewie says "Rrrraahrr", which in Wookie means...  "The fool that follows him is definitely the one who is more foolish!"
this was the thread i started looking for pics http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1cuj6v/jeff_baumans_legs_pre_bombing/ and one person posted a link but now it's a 404.   honestly while i totally stand by knowing a person injured and knowing krystel's cousin, i found his leg stuff to just be kind of outlandish at the time, but then i honestly also am unfamiliar with urban warfare scenarios outside of playing CoD or something
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MpMp2HAqAeE
the FBI were the ones that radicalized the older Tsarnaev over the past several years.  it is really disheartening and clouding to the debate to pretend that there were "crisis actors" such as the guy who lost his legs.  i went to school with Sean Collier and was actually living at MIT the day that the Mercedes was carjacked in the gas station off of i guess it is memorial ave.  I was actually driving around that day that the entire area was closed down (even briefly through Watertown where everything went down because i had literally just gotten a new job in watertown) but people were legitimitely frightened and wanting to stay at home because they wanted these fuckers caught.  I'm not even going to go into more detail as to why I know the bombings were real and other association i have, but please stop believing that people didn't really fucking die and dozens seriously injured that day, it makes you seem demented.  and people like Arrendondo, who may have allowed themselves to become assimilated into the Boston Strong narrative, are really strong community members and actually spend time volunteering and contributing to the community, he happened to be volunteering at the marathon that day, he wasn't some undercover shitstain fed.  after all the trash that was thrown at him in the past, Arrendondo is finally shining in some spotlight and im sorry just isn't going to start randomly saying "um the fbi actually entrapped these extremists and they went rogue accidentally", because that simply isn't part of the Boston Strong narrative.
with over a billion followers is a good candidate
They are probably old?
&gt;Oh I see, so the Artists are in on the secret as well?  Someone produces the artwork.  And, there's only one "Blue Marble" photo.  OP posted video showing how it was likely faked.  No other verifiable snapshot of the complete Earth.  NASA is more film studio than anything else.  But, here's an artist/whistleblower talking about it:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YKbdH7a2IZw  Most likely sign NDAs beforehand.  &gt;I imagine that NASA must employ a lot of people if they are keeping this huge thing a secret, I mean if they're a movie studio like you said, they would need editors, actors as astronauts, editors and now artists and graphic developers, that's a lot of people that are in on this secret don't you think?   Astronauts are all actors.  It's likely run through secret societies.  &gt;What about the Soviets? did they know the Earth was flat as well?   [Yep.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antarctic_Treaty_System)  &gt;Satellites are another question, what how do Satellites orbit the Earth? are there any Satellites? I've certainly seen some, the ISS as well, we've got images of the ISS from the Earth taken by telescopes http://i.imgur.com/7XWpkZy.jpg, I've seen the ISS with my naked eye using my own telescope, what exactly am I seeing if the ISS isn't real?  If you give them enough money to put a space station up, then you've given them enough to put a balloon up.  I've seen ISS from the ground.  But, what exactly does that mean?  But, [I think they just glide](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Geosynchronous_orbit).  What do you think?  &gt;I have another, genuine question. What about pilots? not all pilots are government employed and there is a large amount of people who own their own aircraft, do they all know that the Earth is flat? that's another HUGE amount of people that know the Earth is flat. Of course, IF they know.  They all use maps that assume the Earth if flat, but they are also all indoctrinated.  &gt;Also what about the Polar routes? pilots have been flying over the poles to reduce travel time, including commercial flights. In 2011 Pilots were given permission to use Polar routes using Boeing 777's, this would reduce travel times and costs (Source http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2078301/Mind-sleigh-Airlines-given-permission-fly-North-Pole-time-slashing-hours-exotic-destinations.html)  Not the south pole.  &gt;Flights such as OMDB-KSFO, OMDB-KLAX, FRA-ANC and others fly over the poles, if the government's are in on this secret, why did they give airliners permission? and where do they actually go? because if the Earth is flat, then flying OUT towards the frozen edges is certainly not faster than flying directly.  The border is south... [it's Antarctica](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Deception_Island).
Sure she did.  I'm sure those snipers really helped the Ukraine.  Oh, and "Fuck the EU."  Uh, and that wasn't my anything.  I answered your specific question about women starting global wars.
Please post this in /r/Op_Jade_Helm_15 when you can. Thanks in advance!
You can add a footnote to comments via CSS but you can't edit them.   And regarding post titles, technically you can cover them using CSS but doing that means a shadowban from the admins. 
I can tolerate immigrants who fucking assimilate. The vast majority refuse to do so, and are just a burden we don't need (this goes for US and europe, in europes case its much worse, going to become muslim countries in a few generations now)   seems to be too big of a conspiracy for r/ conspiracy 
&gt; Nepotism  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nepotism
Four legs good, two legs bad!
&gt; resistance seems quelled   I don't see any quelling of resistance, really. The last major thing I recall was the hippie sit-in against banks / big money in New York, and didn't that last for weeks?  Where do you see quelling?  I just see apathy - nobody cares, nobody does anything.
Look at the image again. One was 2 hours ago, the other was 1 hour ago.  So many moments apart.  OP was looking at [posts by domain.](http://www.reddit.com/domain/politico.com) not at the /r/politics page.  You can tell by the "submitted ... hours ago by ... to ..." tagline.
Evil.  Definitely evil.
Again, so?  How is it a conspiracy if a company closes a store that is being threatened by the unions?  Guess what, collectivism doesn't work in your favor..
I know that you are not asking why, you were ridiculing me for asking why.
Was the jab at jews really necessary? 
I think the reality is that nothing would come out of it, because they would make sure that no "gotcha" information comes out for a good 20-30 years more; killing people if they have to.  Just look at the British Westminster &amp; celebrity pedophile scandal. Many, many hundreds of children sexually abused by MPs, BBC celebs, police and so on. They lost information, almost assuredly killed a few peope who could/would have blown the lid. Now that it finally comes out, the abusers are all very old or dead, too ill to face trial and so on. The people running the trial are all connected with family or friends of the abusers, further shielding them. The younger section of society i.e. those &lt;40 seemingly don't give a shit since it is so far removed from them. Those who were adults at the time, knew who these people were, are too old or comfortable to bother kicking up much of a fuss.  Now picture information proving 9/11 was a setup comes out in 2040. The people behind it would be old, sick or dead hence it could "never happen again" just like other conspiracies that turn out to be true. The people who were younger adults at the time would be more concerned in trying to pay off their colossal amounts of debt before retirement. Likewise, for those who were kids at the time. I doubt the kids born in 2020 are really going to give much of a shit, since all they will know by that point is life under the authoritarian state, and by that point iraq/afghanistan/al qaeda will be far removed as the US moves on to another boogeyman.  
&gt;It really does look fake to me.  What frame of reference do you have to go by?  Have you seen many blown off limbs that don't look like this?  I'm seriously asking because I have no clue if you're a veteran who has seen this kind of stuff up close or some person who is basing their knowledge off of how movies depict amputations.
LOL you have been RES tagged at this subs biggest idiot. Congrats! 
[deleted]
Obviously I'm not suggesting it's the same truck. I'm asking if it's possible they got the same model/year truck as used in the attack from Ryder to help the forensic investigation.
 Money is Debt is another good one, for those who want to understand how wealth is created.  Terrible animations though.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jqvKjsIxT_8
A Chinese secret society with 6 million members, including 1.8 million Asian gangsters and 100,000 professional assassins, have targeted Illuminati members if they proceed with world depopulation plans, according to Tokyo-based journalist Benjamin Fulford.
reddshit  the front page of the Jews  edit: [MFW my post goes from +4 to -2](http://i.imgur.com/3kSBUCZ.gif)
There's a ton of blood in the pictures I looked at.  If you are referring to the one's linked around here that show the scene immediately after the blast: 1. those are bad angles and you can't see the ground below jeff's legs, and 2. they were taken just a few seconds after the blast...gotta give the body time to bleed.  Not implying minutes, but to make as much blood as you see in the close up pictures, it's going to a take more than a few seconds.
This is so sad. 
Sure, it's the siblings responsibility to make sure they stay on the 'right' path.../s  My younger sister was just as much of a liability and at some point your help is not wanted and/or ignored. Sometimes they have to take responsibility for their own actions. 
THIS!!!! This is the question I ask every time someone says that something was faked. Why fake anything, there are droves of mindless idiots out there who would willingly carry out such an attack if you convinced them it was the right thing to do for whatever reason. Why fake an attack when some dumb patsy will do it for you? The Kennedy assassination wasn't fake, but the story we are told is. The 9/11 attacks were not fake, but the story we were told is. When you think everything that happens is fake, you have swallowed the bait... 
I rue the day when 4-year-olds with cerebral palsy rule over us. It'll happen because we're not allowed to make fun of them, right?
Can't you sue 
You think real conspiracies exist.  No shit, people want their money.  You think everything is a conspiracy.. you're a fuck tard with no brain.  Shouldn't you be out proving the moon landing was a hoax?  Yes, there was only one moon landing lol.
Hello, a quick number of things you may want to doublecheck and fix (number are related to your number). 1. Your images-link are not informative. Although the images you link do show a decrease in observed deaths per capita, there is no margin of error/ 95% interval show with the data; additionally the link you provide does not show whether the data is weighted with the booming population size from the late 1800s to mid 1960s; the number of deaths might have been the same, and in the same geographic regions, that image cannot be used to make a statement without proper citations etc. (If you can provide the full articles for those images i'd be happy to review them and edit my-comment if i'm incorrect). Also, saying that the decrease in deaths cannot be attributed to vaccines is presumptuous, you have no data to support your argument; yes, there is a decrease in incidence of some of those diseases prior to the introduction of vaccines, but does that mean vaccines did not further reduce mortality?  2. If i'm not mistaken the reason why vaccines are rarely tested with a double-blind placebo method is due to health regulations/law, which makes extremely inconvenient for clinics to actually use human as samples. Also, you're assuming that macaques have the same immune system as humans and the study you cited is non-biased, which is incorrect. Some very quick biases i found when reading the article: 1st- individuals were subjected to ALL vaccines within a very short period of time, how in the world do you  know whether the combination of vaccines is what causes the any of the side-effects (none of their analyses tested for this btw); 2nd- if you just look at figure 3, you can tell their analysis is actually not significant and the way it is reported is misleading; 3rd- they tested normality exclusively with a plot? Why not use a Shapiro-Wilks test for normality in combination with an analysis of the plot? 4th- The authors used a Bonferonni correction for multiple comparisons but do not report either the original or the corrected p-values (one of the two is missing), no real way of knowing whether their correction method was ideal. There's a few other problems with the article but these are some of the most obvious biases within the methods/ experimental setups. 3. The meta-study is a joke; Yes it has a large sample size, but that is all there is to it. The authors pretty much state "we know how sampling is good" without giving and information of the protocol used. With that huge of a sample size you can also safely assume that individuals are from multiple geographic regions and live under different social and environmental conditions; good luck correcting for that. 4. Wikipedia is not a primary source of information, even for meta-studies, although i do agree that some study should be done on VAERS reports. 5.This is actually a good point, it is commonly known that some doctors administer more then the necessary. It is also however true that preemptive protection against some of the major diseases currently going around is very important. 6. Aye, defective/contaminated vaccines could be a problem, but that is not the average vaccine, now is it? The law was done to prevent people from suing for unreasonable "side-effects"; if everyone that has a minor side-effect from vaccination could sue, you'd expect no one to make any more vaccines... 7. I don't really want ignorant and uneducated people to have a vote on whether a vaccine is not functioning correctly. I think the rest of the points are fine.  8. U.S problems.  9. Vaccines are an effective way of dealing with a majority of diseases (flu,  polio, etc); the leicester method isn't acceptable in this current century, since it allows for non-humane development of the diseases (such as paralysis for polio). The Leicester method has only been used in combination with vaccination on smallpox, it has never been found to be effective by itself. The Leicester method is also not very applicable at the national level nowdays, it could be an effective way at the organismal level (in combination with proper treatment) to avoid the spread of the disease, but "quarantining" a nation sounds unlikely to occur.  10. If i'm not correct the sue is due to breach of confidence, it has nothing to do with the effectiveness of vaccines.  If you have any other sources, i wouldn't mind reviewing them. You may also want to consider using primary sources for your analyses rather then secondary sources.  Cheers
And then out of nowhere "OMG Terrorist attack on US soil! Drop everything and rally together for the greatest country ever"
Who clinches a cigarette with their teeth?
that's too creepy   
[deleted]
And why not just go to the moon at that point?
Thanks. Yeah, that's the video. I agree it's speculation, but I'm still not convinced, either way.
I think... You meant this for the other poster?
Having been an addict myself I can see where a kid would make you want to change. 
[deleted]
credibility-wise, it doesn't really score high. Screenshots are easily doctored.
I just fucking told you in the first 2 seconds his arms move.   You going to ignore that I take it?  Not to mention all the raw footage is free to view online  https://www.hq.nasa.gov/alsj/a16/video16.html  
Show us him moving his arm.  I just watched the doll footage you offered.  It shows nothing of what you claim.  Try again, friend.  The burden of proof and whatnot...
WTC 7 collapsed into its own footprint at the rate of gravity. That implies that all structural impediments (i.e., brick and metal) were somehow pulverized, prompting a free fall collapse for over 2 seconds. Amazingly, it is also the first skyscraper *in history* to have collapsed due to office fires.   There were credible people who begged NIST to investigate the possibility that al Qaida used explosives to bring down WTC 7. But the Bush administration ordered all of the debris to be cleaned up and delivered to a scrap yard in New Jersey, where it was shipped to Japan and India and melted down or reprocessed.   Thus, a forensic investigation was made impossible, and NIST was forced to explain the collapse with mathematical models. Interestingly, NIST has refused to release the relevant data inputs they used to justify how office fires brought down a fucking skyscraper at free fall. They argued releasing the data would threaten public safety (i.e., terrorists would figure out how to bring down more skyscrapers by starting office fires).   The whole thing is patently absurd and it's shocking that Americans are stupid enough to believe the official story. Trust me when I say that nobody in Europe (excluding the English, who are just as stupid and sheepish as their American progeny) believes al Qaida brought down the twin towers and WTC 7 with fucking airplanes. All of this information should be on Wikipedia, or easily googled. 
Imagine how long things like this have been going on but without technology to prove fraud.
I highly doubt that the government gives a crap over whether you make inflammatory comments. I think you may be paranoid.
OP has the wrong title. The article says he is 93, unless they changed it after you said it.
Yeah so break her shit
&gt; The reason is I believe, it's much easier to compartmentalize and control such a large group of people needed, by using a mass casualty exercise, then it would be to actually have a real bombing.  What?!  People do real bombings _all the time_ without much effort.  A couple of guys, make a bomb, set it off, bang.  You can see videos of horrific ones on YouTube any time you like.  Most of these are in poor countries where it isn't so easy to look up explosives on the internet, or walk down to MicroCenter to get a circuit, but they manage fine.  Probably anyone smart enough to write coherently on the internet who also has a few psychopathic friends is smart enough to do this.   Compare and contrast with faking a bombing!  You'd need cooperation from dozens of organizations - thousands of people...!  How would you even start to organize it?  You'd have to have a huge list of compromised individuals in each organization... it boggles the mind!
Colonization actually lifted the standard of living for millions in Africa. When the colonizers went to Africa did you know Africans did not even have the wheel? Did you know they were still hunter gatherers? In the  early 1800's! Did you know they didn't even have a 2 story building? Starvation, War, Tribal Slavery and Tribal Oppression has been the story of Africa for eon. 
If so, it began before 9/11, because I specifically remember watching [this](http://images.sodahead.com/polls/000211494/polls_911_simpsons_5630_727607_answer_1_xlarge.jpeg) episode.
Bread and circuses times a thousand. 
Bernie Sanders non existent platform would consist of raising the minimum wage.
To make them money? But in all honesty, I don't remember fox local news as being any worse than any of the others, not that I've watched either in years.
As far as I know, but you can correct me if wrong- they didn't "develop the technology to help chart and detail people in camps".   The technology they *developed* was used to chart and detail people in camps. It's a subtle but important distinction
I stopped using my fingers to make "air quotes" once the DHS got involved. 
Ah because the U.N has shown so much control over the nations of the world. They say something and do nothing, is what I think you meant to say. 
[deleted]
What did I say that was wrong? The poster is clearly anti-Semitic. Read the post history
At least people in more educational subreddits use common sense and actually watch the material submitted...  You try to submit this in /r/videos and the trolls and morons come out in full bloom who do not even watch 1 sec of the item you submitted with out giving their "morally superior high ground of parroting the official story" and "debunking"....  Or the obligatory "jet fuel cant melt steel beams"  Sort of a lost cause when people refuse to be educated but we need to get more and more people educated about this topic.....
Thought Mormons store a year worth of food . 
Yeah, it seems they are going be selling a video series... I'm not sure what to believe.
I'm not saying gum disease isn't a thing, I understand the medical applications of dentistry, but I'm not going to pay a man a small fortune to "fix" my imperfections if the only thing wrong with my mouth is something ultimately cosmetic.  Nice try, but I'm not ignorant.
[deleted]
Just looked up in google "gold mining in Oregon", that sugar mine company was given special laws 130years ago and are still in effect but go against the now current law applied to everyone else. A group of locals are protecting the ranch because they deem it unconstitutional for government to forgo its own laws when it seems fit. I think the solution here is for the government to either pay out the owner alot of money for the rights to the property or leave the tiny mine in oregon alone.
it sets a troubling precedent for any "democratically elected" president
This is intriguing. I know this is why most people think they're closing, but is there any documentation to prove it? Wal Mart is an evil monopoly and Hillary Clinton has worked on their board of directors so the idea that they cut a back door agreement with the state for something like this doesn't shock me. Just curious about proof. 
at least we're talking about him! 
I haven't seen that. Can you link to some of those videos? I don't watch much television. 
Wolfskull promises not to short change the nation! He's not morally bankrupt like other candidates.  No lies. No flesh. Just trust!
This had [5700](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/undelete/comments/33fp5x/557004391_filming_police_officers_not_in_this/) upvotes before being deleted, there is something definitely fishy going on here. I'm new to this sub but I didn't think reddit mods had a pro police view and actively censored these kinds of posts. I always thought they were pretty much on the side of the people in that respect. 
Yes, of course there would be differences in the results of your track houses example. I respect the concept of non-deterministic systems, but it doesn't rightly evidence anything in itself, certainly not how much resistance should remain after a fire induced collapse of WTC 7's core, or even that its core could've ever been collapsed by fires at all. So it seems what you have is an unevidenced assertion which stands in flagrant contradiction to not just what fires have been evidenced to accomplish in other towers, but also what controlled demolitions of other highrises have demonstrated necessary to bring those buildings down anywhere near as quickly and completely as WTC 7 came down. Here's a through experiment for you: if someone brought up stochasticity to argue that perhaps Jesus did actually walk on water, would you put the burdon of proof on others to refute the claim, mathematically or otherwise?
Sorry, all I read was fucks fuck fuck. Cunty something etc. Not quite relative to the conversation.    I'm all ears of you have something productive and uplifting to add to this converstsation. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What the fuck did you even just say? 
Why would that guy delete his comments?
Why are you getting downvoted?
Ive seen on cnn that some legal costs over $31 a gram in colorado.  WTF. You can do a gram of coke for bout the same price
JTRIG, JIDF. Someone, directly paid or not, who will devote energy to de-credibilise an idea, or even person personally across the internet. Eg:  &gt;The scope of the JTRIG's mission includes using "dirty tricks" to “destroy, deny, degrade [and] disrupt” enemies by “discrediting” them, planting misinformation and shutting down their communications.[2][3] Known as "Effects" operations, the work of JTRIG had become a "major part" of GCHQ's operations by 2010.[2]The slides also disclose the deployment of "honey traps" of a sexual nature by British intelligence agents.[2]  &gt;In 2011, the JTRIG conducted a denial-of-service attack (DoS) on the activist networkAnonymous.[1] Other JTRIG targets have included the government of Iran and theTaliban in Afghanistan.[2]  &gt;Campaigns operated by JTRIG have broadly fallen into two categories; cyber attacks andpropaganda efforts. The propaganda efforts (named "Online Covert Action"[4]) utilize "mass messaging" and the “pushing [of] stories” via the medium of Twitter, Flickr, Facebook andYouTube.[2] Online “false flag” operations are also used by JTRIG against targets.[2] JTRIG have also changed photographs on social media sites, as well as emailing and texting work colleagues and neighbours with "unsavory information" about the targeted individual.[2]  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joint_Threat_Research_Intelligence_Group
It's striking how your response is to order him to "stop posting" rather than just pondering how lucid his point might be and leaving it at that...
July 7, 2015  A day that will live in infamy...  One of the few chances you will have is as a vehement and defiant conscientious objector. It is one of the only things they actually fear. As long as you don't become a political dissident and remain a conscientious objector you stand a chance. However, be warned. This is not an easy path, it might be the hardest path. They will use trauma to induce your debility. They will then try to make you dependent on them. They will then attempt to induce dread to make you cling to them.   But stay strong and remember to defiantly say no as a little child and eventually they will tremble before you.
I understand what you're saying about the trajectory of the magic bullet, but what about the fact that the bullet they put into evidence looks like it's almost undamaged? How did it manage to stay pristine after all of that?
Just for the record: my thoughts are expensive. Not free.
Right. My account is coming up on 2 years old with many thousands of fake internet points yet the small-minded still call me a shill when I ask questions.  Age and fake internet points seem meaningless.  Though I do understand the issue of losing control over one's subreddits via this practice. That's a problem.
A lie repeated often enough becomes truth. 
...except the liberals *have* done it, and are doing it in "Mark Fuhrman" Idaho, (Sandpoint, Moscow and Boise), [Cowboy Colorado](http://www.usnews.com/opinion/articles/2014/02/12/marijuana-immigration-and-why-colorado-is-2014s-most-important-state) and [open-carry Vermont](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gun_laws_in_Vermont). I'm not saying it'll be some instant change.
lol i responded to someone above along the same lines, I really only do it as a hobby because im interested in the things that large numbers of people believe in.  same reason why its interesting to study propaganda really..  its not that its "true", but to understand the interplay between the ideas that influence public opinion/action is interesting to me.  the real debate is, say something were to happen on june 30th,  It could most likely be explained by "well the world expected something bad to happen, which in turn made something bad happen"... but in what sense is this not reality??  its very akin to the central message from the life of PI.  
We could convict him of not acting like a bombing victim but a bomber? 
What are you even trying to say? He is a Holocaust denier, he just flatout denied it three times.  Your point makes absolutely no sense.
This video proves that at least one person faked their injuries at the Boston Marathon, period.  If one is faking, it's not unreasonable to assume all were faking.  Your phony outrage at people who merely look for themselves at the information and then come up with logical theories based on evidence is laughable.  I commend this sub and everyone here who decided they would not eat the mainstream media's propaganda, and searched for the answers themselves, regardless of whether or not they came to the same conclusion that I did.    It's fake as fake can be.  No matter how many people from Boston come to this sub and claim to know someone, a friend of a friend's brother, a womans they know's neighbor, etc, who was injured at the marathon is going to change my perception of the truth, you're wasting your time trying.  
no tears? 
ok then.  here is your "sandy hook evidence" for example  maybe you should re-evaluate it..   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aX2ITHV6k-U  edit: please note 9/10 emergency vehicles don't even have their flashing lights turned on.
So because I prefer to create an informed opinion and assessment not solely based off of a video snippet in .gif format I should "wake the fuck up?" I think you're missing the point of what I'm saying. 
Jewish judges protecting Jewish child rapists nothing new here 
Agreed on the public schooling, totally. I went to public school. You learn shit. These days I wouldn't vaccinate my kids as I don't trust what they are putting in the vaccines. 30 years ago a vaccine was a vaccine. The idea is sound and that's how we got rid of smallpox, polio, etc. But until Big Pharma gets under control and we can trust these things again, I don't agree with making them mandatory. 
I've worked in these tunnels for many years. Ama.
[deleted]
https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/32p9bz/searching_for_the_truth_about_vaccines/  Voting for this mans post. Best post I have seen against vaccines with plenty of facts and links.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
SpOooOOooOookY..........!
&gt; what did Israel do with all their billions of US dollars given to them?  a lot of it goes right back around into bri.... er, lobbying and campaign donations for US politicians.
----------  I've never looked into whether this doc is fake or not--but Oswald being CIA seems beyond doubt. His work at Atsugi AFB in Japan required a high level clearance because that is where the CIA's U2 spyplanes were flown out of...Oswald affording the money to go to the USSR via Europe...Oswald renouncing his citizenship, then 18 months later coming back to the U.S. with a ticket for him, his new wife and his newborn--all paid for by the U.S. State Department--highly unusual to say the least...Oswald NOT being immediately arrested by the FBI upon return from the USSR...Oswald with George de Mohrenschildt (CIA) as a handler (his address is in Oswald's address book)...Oswald working at a High Security photo lab upon return (????-Stovall)...Oswald being seen with David Atlee Phillips (CIA-Latin America) by Antonio Veciana (he finally ID'd David Atlee Phillips before his death)...  Much of this is covered in these articles:    http://jfk.hood.edu/Collection/Weisberg%20Subject%20Index%20Files/B%20Disk/Brussell%20Mae/Item%2025.pdf  http://www.storyleak.com/lee-harvey-oswald-proven-innocent-victim-of-cia-plot-worked-for-rfk/  -------------  How many times is r/conspiracy going to upvote bunk to the top?  I've seen this happen 3 or 4 times in the last week alone...WTF...
[deleted]
&gt; Well if you are going to ignore facts, you whole thread is pointless.  I never said I am ignoring facts. I am skeptical. if i find someone using a biased website or non-scientific study on a topic, then I will accuse of false facts. Im gonna read it. Just give me a second check up with this comment in 10 minutes. 
It's by this logic that the absolute worst person for the job gets in. 
[deleted]
The finger? I'd be flinging poo at the camera.
You've got to check which party you're in when the Bush family is praising your domestic policy.
fair enough
Because your posts are cryptic and vague.
[deleted]
You are in good company here. 
"Propaganda is a form of communication aimed towards influencing the attitude of a population toward some cause or position. Propaganda is information that is not impartial and used primarily to influence an audience and further an agenda, often by presenting facts selectively (perhaps lying by omission) to encourage a particular synthesis, or using loaded messages to produce an emotional rather than a rational response to the information presented."
He looks tipsy or something
god bless reddit
If there is any conspiracy I believe wholeheartedly in, it's that there are for a fact, pedophile rings that exist. And that I would like nothing more than for each and every one of them to be crushed by the foot of justice.  However I am on the fence with this particular case.  After watching the video (Objectively) what does the community think?  EDIT: This video is related to the Hampstead Pedophile Case 
&gt; That's my point. If it's not in depth, than you're going to come off as a loony with this topic.  Ugh, I never really realized that. It's too late to change the topic though lol.  &gt; Should've picked 9/11, Iran-Contra, or the gulf of Tonkin  I'm not big on conspiracies, the only other one I know are Illuminati and 9/11 but those were already taken  Edit: Pressed send too fast.
&gt;Thus it wasn't the intentional bombing of civilians. Case closed.  Despite the fact that intelligence suggested there were military units in the area, the town was leveled, including but not limited to hospitals, civilian dwellings, the town square and market.  Unlike in the cases of say Hamburg or Dresden, there was no military infrastructure or any real air-defense network.   If you're going to use one metric for judgement, you must use it for all.   Similarly, while there were actually no units present in Wielun, the same faulty intelligence reports cannot be applied for cases like frampol or sulejow or tarnobrzeg.  &gt;Except we have evidence showing Hitler rejected "terror bombing" as a strategy in 1940.  What Hitler "said" and what the Luftwaffe "did" are different things.  There are also numerous treatise in place for the shooting of prisoners. People still did it.  &gt;Over six months after the British began their proven intentional murder of German civilians  The British terror bombing campaign didn't begin until late 1942. B this point the luftwaffe hid killed more  civilians in one month than bomber command had killed in all of that year.  &gt; As Overy's book points out, the Brits started it.  Overy's book doesn't state this. The copypasta you've taken from stormfront suggests it, but it doesn't.    On the topic of Bomber Command, Overy makes sure to indicate its guilt in civilian bombing- that's the major point of that book. He doesn't make the claim that "Britain started it".  Overy makes sure to note that Hitler said he would "raze their (British) cities to the ground". Bombing civilians as revenge was a specific provision under Germany's revised air warfare doctrine. The revenge of course being taken out as an act of retribution for England's small military raids against Berlin and industrial targets in the Ruhr. Germany decided to take revenge against England's population.   Moreover, the particular work by Overy previously mentioned mostly concerns the actions between England and Germany and makes little to no mention of the bombing of Poland's civilian centers.  While cities like Coventry and Hamburg had "viable" military targets, those Polish cities didn't.  Overy also attests to the Luftwaffe's order to drop bombs on civilian areas if no other target was identified. British bombers tended to bring them back if nothing was hit. At the beginning they actually tried to hit specific targets; the luftwaffe preferred flattening the whole area.    &gt;I continually recommend these titles to you, Tusko, but you never seem to read them.  I'll dig up those dozen or so historians I've sent to you that you reject as shills or court historians. It's funny you just repeat the things I say to you.
You sure are adamant about distracting the conversation here, aren't you.
Look at the bales of hay in the background. Definately fall, not spring when taken. So i call bull......
So how many world leaders have now openly blamed the US for terrorist groups? I seem to recall this is the 3rd or 4th so far, could be wrong. 
why?
http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/21l6w5/original_content_cointelpro_the_fbis_domestic_war/  &gt;[Original Content] COINTELPRO: The FBI's domestic war against activists. Part I: The Fred Hampton Assassination, Subverting the Black Panthers, and Harassing Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.  From 1 year ago, by /u/Three_Letter_Agency
I suspect "ISIS" will attack while Jade Helm is going on. The public will welcome martial law with open arms.
It's called a waiver.
[deleted]
Interesting article. But as far as the general consensus regarding "changes in vector populations", can you explain the incredible coincidence that the major new North American vector emerged just across from Plum Island at Old Lyme? Especially when the work there involved the weaponization of ticks and other aerial delivery systems? Of course they didn't create some bacteria out of synthetic goo, they would have used an existing strain. Possibly the scientists were able to  manipulate the bacteria on a genetic level to make it more deadly. All conjecture, but they sure as hell were doing something in that lab.
So...it was removed because it simply *looks* like a prior submission?
Well in general laws are most effectively passed during crisis, which is why the Sandy Hook drill was needed to pass gun registration (unsuccessfully however). Its relative whether this is positive or negative. In general, the public is emotional so the government cannot reason rationally with them. Unfortunately crisis management has to be used to mold public opinion.
Parents should either have the right to raise their children however they like with whatever prejudices they deem appropriate, or children should be raised by the state unless their parents gain appropriate licensing and consent to regular check ups. A lot of the world's problems would either solve themselves or become much more visible if we stopped flip flopping on this issue. 
democracynow.org
well add the fact that this sub is full of paid shills. 
I'm having LOTS of trouble finding anything on when the story was breaking, but when it was breaking news it was being reported Carnaby was a CIA officer in pursuit of a possible nuclear device. Then it became officers in pursuit of the agent himself.   Additionally in the months after the family was showing photos of his career trying to prove he indeed did work for the or with the CIA even though the agency denied it (which is actually pretty typical if there is another agent at risk by this confirmation to my understanding). 
He's making a fallacious statement. "If I haven't seen it or looked it up it's not real!"
&gt; If he healed, then they lied and he was able to testify  Who "lied" when and about what?
Hello, sounds interesting, if you need it hosted, i would offer my server as host, could give you specific rights and ftp access.  Another suggestion: cryptome.org. They are always looing for good information to release.  Interested as me? Contact me and let´s get it started.. ;) 
Probably debt, and a job to service it.
To a "doctor" a couple hundred years ago tho only distinctive characteristic of Lyme would be the rash.  All other symptom are general complaints that it takes a fair amount of science to connect together to the root cause. 
Genuinely interested for some sources, evidence for this. Being in India, we just hear the Indian side.
http://www.scripturalaw.org/COLB-MOU-030815.pdf
Actually, the entire left side if his face is paralyzed so yes there is. Sorry but the whole actor theory is completely ridiculous and takes away for credible theories. 
&gt; Actually, the entire left side if his face is paralyzed so yes there is.  I had never heard that, do you have a link?  &gt;Sorry but the whole actor theory is completely ridiculous and takes away for credible theories.   OK, I'm not sure why you're saying this to me. I didn't say anything about actors.
&gt;according to Business Insider, in some cases they are compensated for each conviction   Wow, how stupid are people. When you incentivize winning people are going to do what it takes to win even if it means bending or breaking rules.
[deleted]
You are everything thats wrong with society.  Most of these people haven't done anything of what you posted. They are simply against the new unelected president. There's fucking kids there too, I guess they should be murdered?  you trust the government to label people as terrorists without due process?  How would you feel if a similar website was made in Russia? Where Ukraine sympathizers private info was posted.
Anger
Love you brother. One day the slaves will shed their chains. 
No reason he got down voted is because Pakistan is fighting a war against terrorism a.k.a taliban and the children of the army men who are responsible for fighting against terrorism are kille, not random kids who go to school but kids who go to a school meant for "army personal". Now think what this means? Do the taliban actually give a fuck these kids are going to school or the fact that these kids have parents who have been tormenting their ass in the neighbouring country. Think.... 
Ok, since your post is getting shit on, I'll play along. So, what is on the edges and the "back?"
That's...not what rationalization means.  Rationalization means making excuses for people's atrocities. Nobody's excusing the Taliban's actions, merely pointing out that CNN was misrepresenting their motivation for attacking the school in the first place.  At least do some quick research before running your mouth.
Who are you to tell me how to take part in a conversation? Contributing isn't defined as "agreeing with OP". I oppose your viewpoint, deal with it without name calling.
The previous reply from me to your comment was wrong, I thought you're someone else. I'm sorry.   I do not know what do you mean by 'show me some data'. How am I suppose to do that? I just know it works, because I see the reactions and the whole machine as a whole. I can't just link one account and say Look how this person changed after this or that. My work is bigger than this and has much more little things you can't possible see unless you're directly involved.
Oh, I'm pretty sure he understands what rationalizing is. I'm just not sure you do.  And your next paragraph is complete nonsense. So, the Pakistani army fighting the Taliban, and getting their children slaughtered in response is them being "sympathetic"?  You're dropping the collective IQ here with every subsequent post.
[deleted]
"Going to school" was what the author said. The author assumed that CNN meant the kids were attacked because they were anti education based off that quote. You guys make way too many assumptions. You are not objective at all. Your heads are so far up your ass it is unbelievable. It is like playing chess with a pigeon.   Did you read the definition I posted? Because it is clearly very different than your opinion on what it means.   and Like I said the point is moot because the author is full of shit   actually author of that letter didn't do his research..http://www.cnn.com/2014/12/16/world/asia/pakistan-taliban/   "The identity of the group behind the massacre at the army-run school in Peshawar is no mystery.  The Pakistan Taliban -- who have long conducted an insurgency against the Pakistani government as they seek to overthrow the authorities and bring in Sharia law -- were quick to claim the terror attack.  And they said it was revenge for the killing of hundreds of innocent tribesmen and their children during a recent offensive by the Pakistani military."
lol, so ridiculous.
No, I totally got the joke. That dude really likes the word "moron". It's unhealthy. 
We?
Please don't be rude in our sub.
wow that's really wrong, what if one of the unwilling participants had a heart attack and died????????????????  
From my point of view this axol guy is lieing. My face to face communication is a better source than him sending an email to Abby's brother and not getting a response. That's not considered being in contact with the person in my opinion.
&gt;peaceful slavery for those that obey
A website doesn't have to host content it doesn't want to. It costs money to do that. They don't have to abide by any "free speech" requirements. You're so very wrong.
I just had an urge to be called a moron one more time. Thanks!
Faith is the only way to stay sane.  this is a dream and all their 'work' to create this is equavalent to cat herding.
I understand.. wow...  let me think about it, in which area are you resided? i may be able to find somebody to assist you where you could redirect and get in touch firstly. I´m a supporter of the exposure of any kind of documents that could be lost, i´m confident some russian versed people would translate things, i know an american lady which is half russian and from the military, i could ask her.  If i can be of help, just let me know!  Thank you for giving notice as well about these documents!
Read our rules in the sidebar. If you can't abide by them then you won't be welcome here.
[deleted]
Sure. No serious natural right philosophy ever considered the right to say wahteverdafuck on reddit as accounted among them.  
I don't think your humiliating tactics are working very well. I don't feel any less stupid... 
Yea, this guy loses all credibility when he says America is the last place on earth that has 'freedom'.   Clearly he has never been outside of America. 
I expect "ISIS" will use the tunnel systems to pop up anywhere, manufacturing the need for martial law throughout the country.  Regarding govt and the media, I kinda feel like they're giving those of us who are really paying attention a chance to escape.
"Insane"... While correct, that may be facile. I think they are absolutely sociopathic. Killing billions to retain power is unthinkable for most of us, but it's a no-brainer to them.  Guess what I'm saying is that it's not a random "insanity" -- it's an extremely self-centered psychopathy. Makes them somewhat predictable.
They are grabbing people pretty often stateside that are trying to attack. It won't be long until they let a few do what they paid them to do. 
Well, seems to be getting downvoted steadily. I just stumbled onto this whole thing and I lurk here often. THIS IS INSANE!!!!
Exactly how do you know how tight it was by just looking at the picture?  It could easily be tighter under that wide top part of the fabric, could it not?  Or are you going to deny that without any possible way of knowing?  Also, he most likely did have a tourniquet on the other leg.  The fabric most likely fell off and you can see it near the bottom of the wheelchair.  Did it fall off right before the picture?  That could explain not seeing any blood.  You tell me to "check my facts" but you are dismissing every single viable option so that your narrative will fit.  Check your critical thinking ability my friend.
[deleted]
[deleted]
=)
That the spirit exists! But that's alongside harsh proof of Cubic Time, I've just explored half of it and settled with spirit.
Yep.
Exactly, I wanna know why people thing pissing and moaning will change anything. The cow moos and and balks, but still ends up at McDonald's.
While the fisheries off of California are having problems, the idea that Fukushima radiation is driving the issue is really absurd. The amount of cesium-134 reported in the recent incident of detection was vanishingly small,  less than 2 Becquerels per cubic meter.
God I hope not.  She is just as bat guano crazy as Hillary is, maybe even more.
Savage
Comparing apples and oranges. One was a blatant assassination in broad daylight of an important political figure, among the most well-known critics of Putin. In contrast, Peklushenko may - it's unclear - have committed suicide, and was a guy nobody outside the Ukraine had ever heard of.  Seriously: he didn't even merit a page in Wikipedia while alive, while Boris Nemtsov had a [lengthy article](http://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Boris_Nemtsov&amp;oldid=648845603) before his death.  Expecting anything like the same coverage is nonsensical. 
Which begs the question, why is the usage of these devices so widespread if they can't rely on the data gathered for purposes of prosecution?
What is the rationale for fast tracking it? I mean, i know why they want to fast track it, but what is their explanation to the people?
Nah take it in brother.  Let it consume you,  lol.  That's the beauty of these things.  Really get deep, get paranoid, get depressed, get scared.  Then PLEASE go read as much Robert Anton Wilson as you can get your hands on and learn to laugh at what you used to fear.  A little Dan Carlin doesn't hurt with the narrative history either.  There is a common thread here and I think you'll be pleasantly surprised when you find it.  Forgive me for any impression of being patronizing.  
also: take a look at this http://i.imgur.com/jZsU21q.png   Surprisingly similar to your responses, wouldn't you say?
&gt; Maybe the supposed ETs are actually advanced terrestrials from ancient civilizations.  That’s part of the story, but one should never think that something that small encompasses the entire dynamic.  &gt; I just don't know how I can trust any person or document to not be a disinformation.  And that’s why you DON’T trust any *person* or document.  That’s why you do an exhaustive, cumulative study, aggregate data, and come to an intelligent assessment of where all the compiled data is LEADING TOWARD and pointing to.  *That’s* when you can begin looking more closely in the particular direction that all the information indicates.  &gt; I can neither confirm nor deny the existence of visiting ETs at this point. I'm open to either possibility.  That’s good and that’s fair.  I, on the other hand, absolutely know about their existence.  I know this on the basis of abstract, logical, intellectual data (i.e. [the numbers alone](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aCMp9dZQdZA) along with much personal investigation) and by a closer look at some personal experiences.  &gt; Well obviously I'm only available for a friendly abduction.  Understand that if it is friendly, then it’s *not* “abduction”.  It’s “contact”.  That’s a different thing.  &gt; "I'm into trips across the galaxy, hard anal probing, and time travel paradoxes."  Well, if you’re into hard anal probing, then maybe you shouldn’t really worry too much about whether it’s an abduction *or* a contact.  Heck, perhaps an abduction is what might suit your needs and desires better still.
That does not link to any article, I tried. You at least admitted that conspiracies exist but then typically went to the obvious absurd the typical tactic of the professional skeptic you are. I checked your history, you are an obvious debunker who interestingly suggests Jesus is a hoax or "conspiracy". You don't have a normal account with comments on other interests ie. Movies, dogs, boating, anything. All you do is try to make anyone who has a differing opinion seem crazy. You said your opinion is expensive, they're paying you too much.
[deleted]
yeah but,  &gt;CCR* says that these bills “must be opposed in order *to protect the right to engage in boycotts* that reflect collective action to address a human rights issue, **which the US Supreme Court has declared is protected speech and associational activity.**”  *Center for Constitutional Rights
Oh hey what does null mean????
Made me think of [this.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=itKPxMKgqmQ)
[deleted]
&gt;  Its a job to stay married. I been for 5 years and we have bad days but we knew we were supposed to be together from day one.  Yup I was with my wife for 12 years before we got hitched and it was only so long because we were trying to save for a 'proper' wedding. Luckily my wife is not so particular about that sort of thing - it was mainly me just wanting to make a nice day for her. I got a job overseas so we said fuck it and just did it on the cheap.  Those 12 years had there ups and downs. We spent at least a couple of those years in a long distance relationship. The first two or three years she was on the wrong kind of contraception and it basically turned her into a psychopathic depressed nutcase - it brought us to breaking point but we persisted until we figured out what the problem was - that was a very long time ago now, I couldn't ask for a better wife.   Marriage is HARD... there are so many times I could have walked away and been justified in those 12 years but that is part of the reason why relationships aren't lasting now... people don't give a fuck - it's all about yourself... if something is hard, walk away.  Nothing good in life comes free or easy.
Thought that before.  Doesnt really matter though.  ...  For those of us who do believe and see whats coming...we already know.  We see it and well just accept Gods plan.  That simple. We are watching. We do see.  We are not afraid. Fear not. 
Yeah he isnt what? yeahhh no I get my beliefs from my creator Yahweh Elohim.
I suspect that priority numero uno is for kids to be taught respect for the will of their parents. Parents will accept a relationship or not based on their instinct which can be accurate. Parents that don't even try to influence their children's decisions and just let them do what they like is a real problem. No guidance is dangerous.   
&gt; they care nothing for us.  We must, therefore, stop being ignorant sheep and start caring for each other - because the elite certainly are not doing it.  WE must do it and stop depending on anything/anyone but each other as a community.  Easier said than done, but needed nonetheless.
Has this been posted in world news? I'm curious about the reaction, or atleast how fast it gets taken down.
But you mollycoddle murderers
I don't recall. Pls link.
Though I respect your point, I do not like definitions. What the state might be is dependent on the state in power. We need to discuss every issue from the point of principle, rather than example.
Jesus fucking Christ...
Thank you. 
Yea I agree with you and to all, stay away from Sweet and Low, Splenda, etc.   If you are going to use sugar, stick with moderate natural sugar, maybe natural Stevia. Nothing else.   Diet cokes, sodas, etc. are not diet products. The sugar in diet sodas/cokes will make you gain weight. Stay away from Diet products.   Drink natural brewed iced tea unsweetened, add real sugar or stevia (not diet sweet tea made with splenda or sweet tea which contains a lot of sugar), drink water, even lemonade with little (real/Stevia) sugar, get your body off sodas. It's hard, but do it for 1-2 months and the craving will go away, trust me it will. 
First it's beastalieaty, then pedophilia. Make a note of all the beastalieaty jokes on tv these days. 
vicious murder makes you happy?
So r/conspiracy only give a fuck about due process, civil rights, and burden of proof under certain circumstances then? 
Don't worry about it. You are my brother. Apologies accepted!
&gt; The three buildings line is one of the mainstay falsehoods of the entire conspiracy, there were in fact seven major structures at the WTC all of which were totally destroyed on 911  It is you who is wrong, only three skyscrapers collapsed on 9/11  [WTC 3](http://i.imgur.com/eFd5WOQ), a 22-storey building directly below the towers was split in half by the debris but did not collapse  [WTC 4](http://i.imgur.com/m3Ij5hn), a 9-storey building was almost completely destroyed but the structure remained standing  [WTC 5](http://i.imgur.com/j5v0Yvl) was 9-storey, suffered from a severe fire and damage caused by debris but did not collapse  [WTC 6](http://i.imgur.com/eKWVWAj), 8-storey building, suffered massive damages and fires but did not collapse.  -------  &gt;thermonuclear demolition charges  This is known disinformation, no serious person believes this nonsense.
Clickbait. Here's why:  &gt; The Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (WARN Act) requires employers to notify employees at least 60 days in advance  That's probably why they're paying everyone for 60 days, even those who they can't relocate into different stores. Paying them for the term would satisfy the act.  &gt; Over 2,200 workers have been laid off and no advance notice was given at any locations..  I've seen the number and I've seen the advanced notice reported, so suggesting that news outlets weren't reporting this either shows lack of research or blatant lies.  &gt; None of the Walmart locations have had reports of major plumbing issues out of the ordinary.  "Ordinary" must be a subjective term for the author. I've read articles that describe past plumbing problems in at least some of those stores.  &gt; None of the Walmart locations have, to date, applied for permits for any construction or renovation work.  This has been reported by mainstream news outlets.  Etc.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
So free will ends with your duty to pro-create? Sorry, I'll have to disagree. That sounds a lot like Christian propaganda to me. 
Refund for that one specific tax payer
Right Wing News, not RWW. (It tricked me, too.)
[deleted]
Are you serious? The world hates us because of what we are doing. You really think the middle east would hate us if we didn't fuck that region up for the last 100 years? The US is the laughing stock of the world. We spend the majority of our money on War while the population is getting fatter and more stupid every generation. I'm not sure if you are really serious about what you just said. If you are, god help US. For the record, we are no longer #1, China is.
Can you cope with the question or do you have to redirect the question by composing a strawman from your interpolated presumption regarding the implications of the answer to the question?
it doesn't stop, so we won't stop.
You are looking for debates? Have any of these posts ever lead you to change your stance?
Yeah go to the pinnacle of those fields and ask if theres a pattern.. see what they say.
There is a difference between someone asking tough questions about someone's account of events and them claiming that they know all the answers.  Many people seek to confuse the two actions in an effort to befuddle the question-asking process.  I'm sorry if too many words causes you to presume the author of those words is unsettled somehow, I apologize if I've alarmed you.
The NIST report is not peer reviewed, the NIST report is disproves itself and is criminally fraudulent.  What you are wanting is a collapse model of a controlled demolition, what do you think this proves, we already know it was a planned implosion.  
[deleted]
I don't think anyone hates him. His material is shite though. 3 hummers on a street at a Walmart is nothing. Truckers have to buy shit too and Walmart usually has close proximity to highways and interstates.
&gt;I don't care if you believe me or not the burden of proof is not on me  Didn't you make the thread?
[deleted]
&gt; Reddit has always been dead as a platform &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; You really only need to watch the site for a week or two before you start reconizing patterns. Its kind of insane how manipulated everything is here and people just get on their knees and swollow it. &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; Not many safe places on the internet unfortunately   I am often critical, on r/worldnews, of the Israelis' treatment of Palestinians in Gaza and the West Bank. My comments are logical and well written. They are NOT racist or anti-semitic. I have to wait 10 minutes after every comment before I am allowed to post another. The mods tell me it is because of my low score on the sub. So my reasonable comments get downvoted by Israeli zealots or paid shills and I am basically blacklisted on the sub.    edit - an   '
&gt; Why is America so brain dead?  Religion / anti-intellectualism / science denial.  Education system focused on passing standardized tests instead of learning how to find, evaluate, and analyze information.
So all the people claiming charges were used are wrong?
It is absolutely true that corporations are PERSONS and that human being are not. Should this ever be reversed, be very afraid. That means you can be owned but megafirms can't. Currently it is the opposite.
No, I'm a rational human being who klnows he doesn't have to be ALL UP IN THE ACTION to record it.  Are you an angry oppressed little soul?  Or are you trying to convince people they are?
Evidence for kids not having cancer in the past?   Cancer is primarily a bigger deal because people are living longer. This means that you are more likely to develop cancer sometime in your life because of how much longer people are living 
Great quote 
[deleted]
No, not saying that. I just think it's funny that NK has legal weed and in the "land of the free" it's illegal. You'd think NK would ban it, wouldn't that make the people even more hungry? Aren't they all starving over there?
[deleted]
No problem buddy. 
Once again, this isn't a Jewish frat. Hasn't been since 1954.  The whole "Jews are bad" thing you're trying to make this into doesn't exist.  And it's disgusting that you're continuing to try.
Spoilsport. 
Cross posting from /r/im14andthisisdeep? And it makes it to the front of this sub?  What is wrong with this?
[deleted]
This is just a ride.
It will come true only because the government encourages idiocy by subsidizing it with *actual*  productive people's earnings. 
&gt;Measles death rate had declined by almost 100% before the use of a measles vaccine  &gt;http://imgur.com/eD61Ag5   HarvardGrad007 
what I'm saying is the plane likely didn't have 100% of it load capacity. and what is the overall increase in the resultant force of an airplane going 100 knots over its max velocity, is it 50%? if its greater than 50% plane would be expected to fail. if its equal to 50% your running a damn high risk of the plane catastrophically failing.  and the faster you go the air resistance on the plane exponentially increases so 100knots over the max velocity is a high demand for sure, although to know for sure you would have to calculate it.
Their drug planes were landing in Arkansas when Clinton was governor.
Your USA tax dollars at work.
I'd vote for him if she was vice president.
Unfortunately, that's still not good enough. Now I only have your word for it that the information is correct *and* I only have your word for it that you are a credible source. Can you give some specific figures? Maybe cite sources?
Your timeline is correct (as best as it could be), but what you fail to realize is... Yes, the church was Gentiles and not Jews. But, that very church went off to create the oldest corporation known to man. Kings bowed and converted to the church. That was the point. The Roman empire was forever embodied in the Vatican and Catholicism/Christianity. They won and the Jew hooligans lost. Christianity is the largest religion (most followers) than any other religion.
Training for riot/crowd control overseas. Most likely embassies, since marines are stationed at embassies. US army does the same kind of training for use overseas. We've been doing this for years and if it meant something, you would have deployments to ferguson or occupy. 
I'd disagree. Synthetic cannabinoids are extremely dangerous along with 90% of other research chemicals. 
You've away had multiple pilots tell you that are making crap up yet continue to repeat the same lies. Vmo is not a structural limit. It is a bird strike limit of the windows. Citing Vmo after you've been repeatedly told it's not a factor means you have a mental defect of some type. I think we can all agree that suicidal people are not concerned about a windshield's ability to withstand a bird strike.  Likewise, above, the same old information had been repeatedly provided refuting your invalid interpretations, knowing full well you are incorrect. You are by definition a troll. 
I'll keep you in mind and if I get any revelations on type 1 diabetes will get back to you
Do what?
From the disclaimer page of World News Daily Report:  &gt; WNDR assumes however all responsibility for the satirical nature of its articles and for the fictional nature of their content. All characters appearing in the articles in this website – even those based on real people –  are entirely fictional and any resemblance between them and any persons, living, dead, or undead is purely a miracle.  It's a satire website, FFS. How does this get upvoted?
Great, I will check it out. 
They are using MS flight sim to determine the structural integrity of the craft? I've been playing ms flight sim since the mid 80s, I've logged over 20000 hours in the sim and i can say with some certainty MS flight sim is an excellent flight simulator and a terrible crash simulator. It simply doesn't have any robust simulation running determining how to simulate a crash, especially in its ability to determine when a plane is overstressed. It's basically no more complex than 'are you exceeding a certain speed? Okay you are overstressing the plane, simulation over. There isn't any nuance (for example it doesn't simulate overstressing specific control surfaces, which is the weak point in an aircraft when it comes to overstressing. You wouldn't be able to simulate aa 587 in ms flight sim).
Watched a doc called From JFK to 9/11: A Rich Man's Trick or something to that effect, the guy seemed pretty sure there were 8 shooters, 16 shots most of which totally missed, and the big kill shot came from the sewer below the grassy knoll.  It was posted on here a few days ago, very interesting documentary.
Well that graph is a little misleading. Let's instead look at cases total instead of deaths to discount the effect of better treatments. We're focusing on vaccines so what we're concerned with is how many infections happen, not how severe they are. Let's also use a sane x-axis scale to showcase that even with effective treatment and sanitation or even chlorinated water, that there are differences to be made.  [United States](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/e/ed/Measles_US_1944-2007_inset.png)  [England and Wales](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/a/a4/Measles_incidence_England%26Wales_1940-2007.png) 
"You can't hug with nuclear arms, but you *can* make a lot of people suck your dick if you have them."
oh? you've seen it have you. could you summarize? I'm an idiot and many word hurt brain
I've never seen this phenomena successfully demonstrated. 
http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/1vg3mk/rconspiracy_moderator_9000sins_has_been/cery7ia
Thank you.  Upvote.  I really like the message behind the OP, and agree with it...but yeah.  Gotta say.  This is a bit fucked up.
How could Icke talking about the things he talks about possibly be damage control? 
All of the parts found at the scene were from 767s. No engines found, btw, of any kind. Though, I'm curious what engine was "found" and where you suppose it came from?  Ever worked on a boeing aircraft before? How many stator discs have you removed from the engine of a 767 or 757?
Okay.  Your explanation of what the videos mention, however, do not address all the other points brought up in my linked posts, almost any one of which significantly undermine a flat earth theory.
Ok. Does America have a law for when things can be released to the public?
**When I attempted to report the sighting, Clair at Queensland Police Missing Persons slammed the phone down twice.**   &gt;The next day December 28, 2006, the same day [Katherine Schweitzer](http://np.reddit.com/r/POLITIC/search?q=Katherine+Schweitzer&amp;sort=relevance&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all)'s body was discovered in Sydney, the Desk Sergeants at Police HQ in Brisbane told me to "get out."   &gt;KS was the only survivor if a Budapest family of fourteen, arrested in 1944 by a Jew member of Horsha the Hungarian thug police, and deported to Auschwitz.  &gt;Who told Australian 60 Minutes reporter Richard Carleton, the Jew who arrested her was living a few doors up on the same street in Sydney.  &gt;Her murdered body was discovered in a wheely bin inside her high security Sydney apartment, December 28, 2006, four weeks after we put her story onto a union email went to around four thousand e addresses world wide.  &gt;Including to all members of the Israeli Knesset, and every member of both houses of the Australian Federal Parliament!  &gt;All Queensland Police will be required to show cause why they should not be prosecuted as capital offenders, for turning from evidence linking police to the Steven Goldsmith disappearance, so will all New South Wales police be required to show cause in the matter of the murder of Katherine Schweitzer.
Lmao
Not at sea level, hence why Boeing disagree with you.
Thanks but that is a more recent one. The one I am looking for is quite old, which may be why I am having such a hard time finding it.
You're ignoring the fact that this post was literally 100% approved when someone started crying about downvote brigades. Which, again, is documented. No downvotes at all existed at that time. All facts.   But at least you're admitting that you're ignoring the facts. So you have that going for you. 
I cured several autoimmune diseases but from what I understand beta cells in the pancreas regenerate very poorly/slowly compared to some organs.
It could be more than 2. Ancient indian texts also describe similar phenomenon(no, i'm not quoting ancient aliens.) in the past and the aftereffects also closely relate to a post nuclear situaion.
[deleted]
Pretty sure Americans regular Americans don't support Aipac or citezins United for that matter. Only a matter of time before we kick out the Jewish lobby 
Nice temper tantrum. 
See that is where ConEd gets everyone.  Esco or Non-Esco, we all pay 2/3 of the price of our bill in "delivery charges" for the electicity.  I don't know of any place in the US that charges over 20 cents per KWH for that.  I have lived in 5 states and I never paid delivery charges.  Yes, it costs a ton of money to set up a network in NYC, but the profit is stil made.  Then instead of reinvesting that money in a more reliable grid, green energy sources, or even a discount on our bill, they just give almost billions away to shareholders.  I understand they have to keep cash around for another hurricane, but this is not new. They do have that cash in the bank for that.  You may be paying through a couple cents less for the actually electricity, but that rate is the small portion of the bill.  Even if you got the electricity for free, you still would pay twice the national rate for electricity in just the delivery charges.   The ESCO thing, and the 100% green thing is a kind of a scam.  All of that green electricity is pumped in the grid.  We all use the grid.  So I, a non-esco person, gets exactly the same amount of that green electricity as you do.  They don't run a special lines to your house.  And actually ConEd is fairly green energy supplier.  But the green I care about the money they are taken from me. 
The irony is the state system will do more harm to that boy than marijuana ever would have.
If you think this is "proof" that NASA put men on the moon, would you care to explain the presence of Russian retro-reflectors on the lunar surface?   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lunokhod_2
I was excited at first, then depressed, then SERIOUSLY depressed, now I'm just kind of amused by it all. I prefer the knowing to not knowing, but it becomes weird at first to see all the people living the delusion. Then it's just funny; good to keep an amused/bemused attitude or you'll go crazy. Doesn't come right away, but the mind and perceptions adapt. And you also realize that there are Good Guys battling below the surface as well. I think.
Thanks!  &gt; there will be times when all looks grim  There's a ton of darkness in the world for sure. We're the ones manifesting it, though, and have the power to change the world for the better. 
So I can order a military humv from a closed Walmart now...cool
Yes, friend :)  And for a year in between I was u/Three_Letter_Agency  I have about 100 pages written on the topic. I need to update with the events of the last year and trim lots of fat. Stay tuned!  
https://nonprofitquarterly.org/policysocial-context/26018-hbo-to-air-vice-s-haitian-money-pit-tonight-and-it-is-worth-watching.html
[deleted]
No, you are deluded.  AIPAC is the [biggest lobby in Washington](http://www.businesspundit.com/10-of-the-biggest-lobbies-in-washington/) whose primary agenda is essentially non-domestic.  On top of that you have a slick, relentless and tireless [Pro-Israeli Propanada machine](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cAN5GjJKAac).
The weakening sunspot trend suggests the 1970's fool was right, but premature in his timing.
&gt; The 'official story' is elegantly simple. Those who undertake conspiracies prefer to keep it simple. That's how you keep from getting caught.  Hiding in plain sight behind cognitive dissonance is the perfect way to carry out Psy Ops. This is done all the time. Who you gonna believe, me or your lying eyes. Propaganda works extremely efficiently.
Be sure to X-Post JH links over here: http://www.reddit.com/r/Op_Jade_Helm_15/
I was just about to mention the alchemy association. Apparently, quicksilver has been found at other royal burial sites also.    Anyone who studies alchemy understands why it has become associated (in the minds of the ignorant) with fraud and fools. But you probably know, it wasn't always, and should not be so quickly dismissed. Alchemists who know the importance of mercury (both common mercury, and alchemical Mercury) in the lab will all be excited to hear of this, I think.  They don't call alchemy The Royal Art for nothing. 
How little energy do you use? I only pay .08 per KwH and my bill is still right around $30. 
Maybe it really is our deepest special ops planning to overthrow the Rothschild bankers/NWO/Federal Reserve  or that the same NWO wants this to happen...
I'm not stupid I posited that the plane was traveling at a plausible speed.  You're butthurt about something and you continue to make yourself look like a child.  
Just because that's the cruising speed at altitude doesn't mean its not capable of going faster at lower altitudes. 
[everybody look around and see if you can spot the narcs](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9D_-Gun8R1U)
seems like a good place to suggest  /r/C_S_T
[deleted]
Thanks.  He's a good guy. Haven't heard much from him lately though. It's refreshing to see him again.
You mean we should start throwing people in Jail for smoking cigarettes?? 
Want that the whole point of creating isreal? So the Jews could have a nation s state? 
Btw, look up the word Semitic and you tell me if someone who's white with blue eyes fit's the definition. One of the FIRST races listed is the ARABS. To be Jewish has nothing to do with race, but religion. Therefore, the use of the term Anti-Semitic by a European white Jew is a farce. That's why these days you'll find them saying something along the lines of anti-zionist. I don't have a problem with whites or jews, but rather the zionist (synagogue of satan).
Ask L. Paul Bremer where it went? He would probably know.
I think it was the radars (plural) that recorded the speed since the aircraft black boxes were never found.
Thanks! I've listened to some of Mark's lectures on Natural Law amongst other things and am a big fan. 
&gt;  I'll show you how this whole internet thing works  Lol, like when you accumulated -33 karma with the 5 asinine responses to me before this one, the exposure of which you try to avoid by restarting from my first comment and by withdrawing from your previous argument that was largely complaining that I wasn't using a list of elements that they used which I never mentioned?  And you're going to be condescending to me?  Nice.  Teach me, oh great one!  Also, that's a whole lot of text to cut and paste without attribution.  [Here](http://www.dw.de/just-how-dangerous-is-mercury-anyway/a-16522491).  I'm not sure if that's the one you pulled it from, but essentially you've pasted 1 completely unsourced article either from an unknown German site, an unknown Pakistani site or an unknown blog that reposts a random and wide variety of science articles.  [Edit: Also, the article was written by a theoretical cosmologist, a type of astrophysicist, which is pretty far from a chemist, let alone a biochemist]  Thanks for teaching me how to internet though.  Uh, I said the gaseous form was the dangerous form.  Also, it's pretty widely accepted that in open air environments, mercury vapor is not a major threat.  EPA:  "While elemental mercury can be present in ambient air, it is  not likely to be a significant exposure pathway."  This would actually make sense if they wanted to use it as a deterrent to people spending a long time in the tomb, but that's speculation.  "This liquid form of mercury is especially dangerous because it vaporizes at room temperature."  Very, very slowly.  It accelerates greatly when heated.  So, we're up to, don't boil mercury in an enclosed environment for a long time.  Oh, I don't deny that ingesting mercury will eventually disable or kill you, but that's over a very long time with many doses.  In some cultures well more advanced, people ate it pure for years and didn't associate its symptoms with it.  Now some other stuff from the periodic table:  Polonium is fatal with the inhalation of [10 billionths of one gram](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Polonium#Biology_and_toxicity).  For plutonium the figure is [~19 milligrams](http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Plutonium) or 0.00067 ounces.  Taken orally, [3.6 grams (1/8th of an ounce) of lead is fatal 50% of the time to a 132 pound person](http://www.rocklin.k12.ca.us/staff/avrudny/science/chemistry/unit_5/answers_wskht_lethal_dose.pdf) (a normal weight at the time with lower protein diets and overall vitamin-mineral consumption; the average pre-Columbian male was about [5'2"](http://marginalrevolution.com/marginalrevolution/2004/04/height.html).  Arsenic, depending on the form, is 50% lethal to a 132 pound person at between 0.48 and 2.46 grams.  Not on the periodic table, but naturally occurring, cyanide (hydrogen cyanide) is 50% fatal at [0.06 grams](http://www.mycolleaguesareidiots.com/archive/2009/09/21/428.aspx) for a person that size.   A 50% lethal oral dose of mercury for a 132 pound person appears to be approximately [12 grams](http://www.cdc.gov/niosh/idlh/merc-hg.html) [edit: doh, 12 kilograms was way off, you do not need to ingest 26.4 pounds of mercury to die].  Hard data on inhaled mercury toxicity [doesn't seem to exist](http://www.vce.org/mercury/methyl_mercury.pdf) and indeed, with the exception of polonium, all these measures have been based on ingestion.  Likely those of these, including mercury that can reach gaseous form are significantly more toxic in that form.  And after all that I find [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Median_lethal_dose#Examples) table (don't be confused by the listing for Mercury(II) Chloride as that is a synthesized substance that they would have had not contact with).  Mercury isn't listed, but it's equal with aspirin, just below caffeine 1/200th to 1/400th as lethal as nicotine.  The table is not mainly periodic table elements but is a good guide to mercury's relative toxicity (200mg/kg of body weight).  Sorry, for the bits I forgot to source.  So, I took 5 random things I knew to be toxic, 4 of them on the periodic table and all, even lead (still in widespread use and in new house paints until 1978) were more toxic than mercury.
[deleted]
"goat boy loves young girls"
Youre a fool. You will get what you deserve and will not escape justice.  Here is over an hour of evidence. https://youtu.be/DTxvWLrUeE8  Goodbye you fool. 
Well, that'll help with the whole measles thing.
Nice job keeping your cool when dealing with these ideologues. Not sure what they have to gain from it, but it's nice seeing them calmly disarmed.
You're welcome. I'd be happy to discuss the content of these articles and books with you. I recommend that talk by Schultze-Rhonhof as a good starting-point.
If you don't know what the gold standard in scientific studies is, we're done.  wow...
Do you not like Indiana Jones movies because they portray Nazis in a bad light?
I obviously have sound information or you wouldn't have to keep changing your argument. The frame was cool enough to touch. The air was cool enough to breathe. There was no visible inward air flow . The smoke drifted too slowly for a high wind situation. The air should have followed the direction of least resistance. There was no air coming in from the 'top' what you have is all invisible .    
Lol, no kidding.
Open and shut? LOL  http://911research.wtc7.net/wtc/evidence/metallurgy/
Good luck guy/gal! Your mind is a powerful tool. I call it the creator, but if you ask you shall receive :), because it's all in your mind and the global consciousness. I hope the best!
[deleted]
the gap people set is how the species interacts with the enviroment. Humans are the only ones who create tools and change the enviroment for themself instead of adapting to the enviroment. Any animal tool use you find is just using what is already present like rocks and stones. Only humans create their own elaborate tools. 
A 7.9 magnitude quake devastates Nepal with thousands killed and all the msm wants to talk about is some has-been that is having an identity crisis. Unbelievable
Nowhere in the article anything like that is implied. That'a a nonsense title.  If you are basing it on social media, the better title of the post would be "Anti-GMO crowd makes shit up to discredit real scientists"
Vaccinations are always good.  If you don't believe me ask the government.
Correction: A Forbes *contributor*. Forbes Magazine is a very well respected financial and business magazine. Their website much less so. In 2012 or so they started something called a "contributor program" where pretty much anyone can use the forbes.com website as their own personal blog. It's a hodgepodge collection of garbage that reads like a random sampling of reddit self posts and Forbes has done little to differentiate that from their main stuff.
Various US states ([NC, for example](http://www.reddit.com/search?q=nc+sterilization)) used cons, pressure and forced sterilization on Americans (poor, and overwhelmingly African-American) *up* *until* *the* *1970s.*  Like the US government hypocritically complaining about human rights abuses in other countries when we protect and shield publicly-admitted torturers and support and arm the most brutal dictatorships, our hand are filthy dirty and we have no right to ride a moral high horse and complain about others.
Can anyone on this subreddit produce a coherent thought?
They will be martyrs soon.
I did my job by putting the info out there. Its up to one's interest to investigate. I'm not here for your purpose but here for his purpose. God bless you. Peace.
Thanks
[deleted]
Pls no.   
That conversation isn't ready for radical nuance like that. In or out. No halfsies. 
&gt; Tea Party was/is 100% funded by the Koch brothers.  Are you suggesting the Tea Party was the brainchild of the Koch Brothers from the get-go and was never a grassroots movement that sprung from angst about the 2008 bailouts which was later co-opted?
From an article written in 2011?  Wow sometimes conspiracies move slow.  That was the first time I saw a conspiracy immediately.  I was still drinking the 9/11 koolaid then, but I was volunteering for his campaign that year.  I saw what was happening in real life and on the news and saw how the stories were different, how a stadium full of stunned silence at the sudden appearance of Wellstone's opponent got turned into an evening news story about how we all booed.  I learned that the news was lies.  They take stories and leave out bits and spin it.    For fuck's sake a mear ten years ago the media was full of stories about how vaccines were causing peanut allergies but now vaccines are a sacred cow.    And now we're in a stupid mess with "ISIS" and the news is so convoluted that people miss the fact that even the mainstream news admits we are fighting on the same side as them!  When did society become bots repeating what they heard on the news as facts?
It'd be a lot easier for the elite like Bill Gates
I educate my local doctors in the area, they shake my hand for putting them straight
That was surreal.
The troll is strong with this one.
Why do people keep pestering these child rapists? No one is going to have the balls to arrest any of them so why not just leave them alone, let them molest and rape our children and we can all just learn to live with it.   At least until someone with a brass set comes along and prosecutes and executes these lowlifes, I mean. 
Yes, though I like to refer to them as "The Global Elitists" I doubt they're actually called the Illuminati. Witnessing satanism around the world whether it be in media or federal government, it just seems real to me. I think this "Illuminati" is just a part of The Global Elitists. The Illuminati are the satanists in the group while the others such as the bankers are the Zionists. 
Funny
The point they're making is that, if it acts, walks, and quacks like a duck..it probably is.
&gt; Correction: A Forbes contributor.  Attacking the source, Yserbius? You should know better than that.  Try these instead.  [Guardian - UK](http://www.theguardian.com/world/2013/feb/28/ethiopian-women-given-contraceptives-israel)  [Haaretz - Israel](http://www.haaretz.com/news/national/israel-admits-ethiopian-women-were-given-birth-control-shots.premium-1.496519)  [Independent - UK](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/middle-east/israel-gave-birth-control-to-ethiopian-jews-without-their-consent-8468800.html)  [BBC - UK](http://www.bbc.com/news/world-middle-east-21621388)  Attacking the sources is a weak argument, Yserbius. Tisk tisk.
No, they're not okay, but we're talking about fucking Israel here. You don't see people saying "ISIS is a really horrible organization that murders innocents" and then being told "BUT CHINA MURDERS INNOCENTS TOO WHY THE FUCK ARE YOU NOT BLAMING CHINA ARGGHHHH" no, you don't see that happening. It's a special case for Israel.
I'm spot on now. The intransitive verb has 2 definitions. One specifically mentions legality.
Normal people are not compelled to remove body parts. 
I do not base my actions or thoughts on lines from a book. I use them to help morph my mind for the progression of all mankind. This is what is known as, going outside of the box, which is no doubt foreign territory to you (most people too, not a personal attack; extrapolated information from a minute portion of your mind represented here, to which I have replied.).
Wasn't it depo provera? That's what I recall seeing..if im wrong I apologize. Edit: Just rechecked, and the article itself calls it temporary sterilization...which I'd consider birth control, as its nowhere near permanent. I suppose its semantics though. Either way I don't approve of their actions, id just rather be upset at what they actually do as opposed to things we think they do.
huhehuehuehuehuehue bless yourself friend you obviously do not know the etymology of the word bless. if I've seen one cardboard cutout argument I've seen them all. as far as friends are concerned, apologies are not always required, especially when the truth is concerned. if you've ever had friends, you'd know they talk shit to each other all the time. I would not hesitate to call out my friends ideas as idiotic if they spouted much of the same non-sense you do. fortunately my friends are all very bright....
Some of these "facts" would be compelling if you could provide sources for them. Still, I'll attempt to address your claims one by one:  1) In regards to the cyanide and biochemistry and then the rickety door, this would be compelling evidence if it were true. Could you provide me with a source on the matter? I'd like to read more.    2) There is no evidence of a written order by Hitler, but there was a pivotal conversation between Hitler and Goebbels in August 1941 that seemed to definitively provide for the extermination of European Jewry. Given that Heydrich mentioned a "final solution" to members of the Einsatzgruppen in September 1941 and the construction of gas chambers at Belzec began in November 1941, this is contextual evidence of the Final Solution having been decided upon. Take it or leave it.   3) Source required - but isn't one of the oldest Holocaust Denial claims that when US intelligence planes took aerial photos of Auschwitz in 1944, there was no smoke being emitted from the chimneys? Make of that what you will, but this is a tacit admission that there were, in fact, chimneys present at Auschwitz-Birkenau. "Rebuilt" might be a better choice of words.   4) As a Jew following the Holocaust, wouldn't you want to beat up Nazis, given the opportunity? A little joke. In the case of Hoess though, it wasn't three days of torture - it was a few strikes to the face and then "it took three days to get a coherent statement out of him. But once he started talking, there was no holding him." Is this what passes for evidence of torture? What I am finding is that Holocaust Deniers will pounce on any possible shred of evidence that they might find in order to support their claims. Bonus statement from Clarke himself - since you have previously used his "statements" as proof, I assume that you consider him a reputable source:   "Prior to the capture, my hair was jet black, After the three days, a white streak suddenly appeared in the centre, which stayed until the rest of my hair went white as well. It was not due to the strain of events. I could cope with that. But Hoess had repeated with pride the instructions that he had given to prisoners to dig pits in which they were subsequently shot. He revealed how the bodies were ignited and how oozing fat from them was poured over others. He admitted without a trace of remorse that he had been responsible for around twon million deaths and that killings had frequently been carried out at the rate of 10,000 a day."  Eichmann - that is interesting, but his statement was mostly desired so that they could kill him. Really, there's enough evidence of his actions that his testimony is of little consequence in proving the magnitude of death in the Holocaust. They wanted him dead. If there is an issue here, it is his unethical treatment. Can you blame them? another little joke. Didn't Arendt also refer to Eichmann as the "banality of evil?" Inaccurate by the way - Eichmann seemed to take great pride in his role, travelling across the continent leaving destruction in his wake.  5) It is not debatable - Nuremberg prisoners were abused. That said, is it not notable that the reviled losers of the Second World War were given a chance to stand trial whatsoever? Also, if you are willing to provide me with a link to the Congressional Record it would be appreciated...I couldn't find it online (at least not immediately), although this is almost certainly my fault.  6) It wasn't phony evidence - if you are referring to the Trawniki card, forensic tests have deemed it authentic, and he was at Sobibor from March 1943, something he was convicted of independent of eyewitness accounts in 2011. That said, the eyewitness accounts were based on a case of mistaken identity - when it was evidenced that Demjanjuk was NOT, in fact, the Ivan the Terrible the eyewitnesses thought he was, his guilty verdict was reversed and he was released.   7) re Weizmann - http://www.hdot.org/en/trial/defense/evans/540d.html  8) The Nazis didn't take the blame for Katyn, they said that the NKVD was responsible. Their statement was deemed unreliable by the Allies, as the statement came from Goebbels' Ministry of Propaganda, and more importantly, they weren't going to condemn an ally that was doing most of the heavy lifting! Why even mention the Katyn Massacre? It is only tangentially related to the murder of Jews.   Anyways, my issue with Holocaust Denial is that a lot of it is unfounded or based on very flawed interpretations of poor evidence. Everything is worth questioning, but it is important to recognize when an accepted interpretation is the most accurate one.   
Thanks Jews! 
[Because, why would anyone want to accept science and reason?](http://www.s2ki.com/s2000/uploads/gallery/1171702831/gallery_51990_18791_119166825145d7d3714bae4.jpg)  [Higher IQ linked to liberalism, atheism](http://www.upi.com/Health_News/2010/03/02/Higher-IQ-linked-to-liberalism-atheism/UPI-68381267513202/#ixzz1MRF8B44p)
&gt; There has never been a study proving vaccines safe or effective that was not connected to a pharmaceutical company or a vaccine maker.  Well, you can actually do something about that. Raise the cash and fund one yourself. It's 2015, and Kickstarter is a thing.  And then abide by the conclusions of your independent study.
Hahaha.  Ahh, the old 'you disagree with my uneducated opinion, you must be a shill!' fallacy.
Cops are always the same thing to me:  Armed strangers in black costumes willing to kill me if I don't do what they say.
Non-mobile:   * [Indian Legion](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indian_Legion)  * [INA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indian_National_Army)  ^That's ^why ^I'm ^here, ^I ^don't ^judge ^you. ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble. [^WUT?](https://github.com/xl0/LittleHelperRobot/wiki/What's-this-all-about%3F)
I know the medical condition it's called bat shit crazy. I'm not here to listen to some fruit try to defend all the wack job crazy people wanting to mutilate their genitals. 
If the "wrong" people have control over voting and control of the world's largest military by far, then why haven't they been able to do all the things they wanted to ? e.g. attack Iran, Syria?  I dont think there are conspiracies like that. I dont think votes are pre-determined. In the words of George Carlin, imagine how stupid the average person is. Half of the population is stupider than that. The "wrong" people use the ignorance of the population to get things done and it is completely legal. The fault lies with the ignorant.   I dont think the world will ever become Palestine. The issue of Israel-Palestine is much more complex. It doesnt apply to everyone else. It is easier to control a million or two population but 8 billion and an area as large as this planet? US cant even handle the primitive insurgency that they helped create, how are they going to fight everyone on this planet?
I feel sorry for you. I really do.
Oh neat! Can we have a public trial? *REALLY???*  Can we also charge all those propaganda agents who have played an active role in covering it up? That would be great. Without them, the crime would not be possible. Trivial to prove their involvement, too -- it's all on record.  Tell me, what do you feel would be the appropriate punishment for aiding and abetting 2,977 murders? Think carefully before you answer.
it does.
Stop being so anti-gentilic. Calling an entire population of people anti-semetic is just plain disgusting.
Uh what? What "entire population" did I refer to?
http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2015/04/25/kinloch-mayor-betty-mccray_n_7140130.html
Doesn't need to be believed, it's a fact that there are movies which existed before 9/11 that alluded to the event (IIRC Back to the Future 2 had one). Whether or not they were intentional hints is unknown.
Thanks. Watching it now!
I can't tell whether this is real or Israel.
Give me one example of a true capitalist system that exists today and isn't influenced by publicly owned institutions.
Aaaaand there it is.  Shill. As. Fuck.
This is true. However the Nazi's did it on a much wider scale. American eugenisists began to lament that the Nazi's were "beating us at our own game." 
"The reckless, degraded, and often vicious members of society, tend to increase at a quicker rate than the provident and generally virtuous members. Or as Mr. Greg puts the case: ?The careless, squalid, unaspiring Irishman multiplies like rabbits: the frugal, foreseeing, self-respecting, ambitious Scot, stern in his morality, spiritual in his faith, sagacious and disciplined in his intelligence, passes his best years in struggle and in celibacy, marries late, and leaves few behind him. Given a land originally peopled by a thousand Saxons and a thousand Celts?and in a dozen generations five-sixths of the population would be Celts, but five-sixths of the property, of the power, of the intellect, would belong to the one-sixth of Saxons that remained. In the eternal ?struggle for existence,? it would be the inferior and less favoured race that had prevailed?and prevailed by virtue not of its good qualities but of its faults."  Charles Robert Darwin, The Descent of Man, Great Minds Edition, 123  
btw, slapping a label on something and dismissing it is no replacement for actually listening and engaging with the ideas, and then judging for yourself.  I'm guessing the latter is not your style.
I completely agree with you, just pointing out something we would have to figure out if said rule was in place :).
The same people who should be running it now.  We the people.
Isnt that an attempt to overthrow an elected government? They should all be criminally charged.  See how they like it when the system works against  them like they have been having it work against the black population.  Let them see how easy it is to get a LEO job with criminal charges on thier record.  Like any LEO that has planted evidence, abused thier authority, and made false statements should have to go through.
A+++ haha
You don't get it. I blame those who threaten violence and commit violence in the name of their personal priorities over everyone else for specific circumstances.  At the same time for almost everything else there's no blame I can justify. I can't blame the poor for being born poor or the rich for being born rich.   Can't blame anyone for working for a system that works for them or against it for not working for them.    I'm not in the business of blame, it's not productive.   All I do is take personal responsibility for my actions and decisions. What's your problem with that?
&gt; At what point in your subjective morality does their comfort trump mine?  When you realize it does.  &gt;as a matter of fact I don't have beliefs.  I have objective truths I know and subjective experiences that differ from situation to situation.  You may want to wind that down, and read what you just wrote.
I agree. I don't think EVERYTHING is a false flag, but I like the freedom to investigate events via the info put out there in forums like this one. It's SOOOOO important to be able to question mainstream narratives and stare theories with others, but we do need to admit when we've been fooled or gave made mistakes.  That said, the whole JH exercise is still very fishy, and looks like D7 was purposefully set up to look like a fool. So why would a military-industrial complex mouthpiece like VT go out of their way to set up a sting and make him look like a liar? Maybe to discredit the whole hysteria over JH?  Now, I don't have proof that it was Gordon Duff at VT who set up D7 here, but seems suspicious. And if they are setting up fall guys, it raises a LOT more questions... 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
&gt; Edit: It can be difficult to trust in the goodness of God at times, but from my experience that is what it comes down to: trusting that, even though something may seem foul, the goodness and learning may be made clear from the situation. Appreciation and learning are a couple things which give me hope.   So, if your 'God' tells you to kill some people, it's OK? Isn't that the same thing schizophrenics say?
&gt; I'd like to see someone read that scripture to Bibi Netanyahu....  How about we just all agree that we don't use scripture as a justification for anything?
Have you looked at the Dunning-Kruger Effect? It will explain a lot.
Please closely re-read everything I have written and show me where I ever said it wasn't a term. This would be embarrassing for you if it weren't so entertaining for me.
Bad news for anyone donating to Wounded Warrior. Audits discovered only 15% of donationd actually gets to those in need. Strike Two
is that real?
i mean that was daboo?
I don't think you know what the word "strawman" means. I pointed out that you're making claims that your own sources don't even back up. Again, this is a hallmark of willful ignorance.
[deleted]
My only problem is why do those aliens look like typical aliens from movies? What I hope to see when we do in fact find aliens is that they will essentially be incomprehensible to imagine what they look like.
Ebola is man made
*Interesting* idea. I'll have to take some shots of my dog *Stega* ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
[deleted]
His tone these days is odd. He now says everything in this 'clipped' way that betrays a deep antipathy toward his words. You know, like when you're forced to apologize to someone you don't really think you've wronged?  For this reason, I feel like he's being made to say things he doesn't really believe.
Not like what we are experiencing now. The ideology of Multiculturalism is a recent experiment. Maybe last 65 years or so. 
Yawn -- a few cherry-picked errors in the enormous output of a giant like Irving? (Like Evans has never made any errors?)  Everybody knows Irving was vilified because, after his unparalleled original research and discovery of primary source material, he couldn't go along with the establishment Holocaust narrative.
Ok. Please study history.
I'm not debating the origins of America, I'm sure we both know the history books. I'm saying it's been built upon a house of cards that cannot sustain its own weight.  EDIT: Talking to myself
Don't let it all get you down, tomorrow the sun will still rise and the world will be different again. I try to balance things out by pointing fingers at the privileged money/power hungry i'm alright jake people and than go to work to help the most underprivileged people in my society, balance my friend. 
Only if you let Biotech define "credible" for you
Nope. Its a government that lives in reality.
Civil wars, riots, terrorist actions from our own citizens. Are you are a child or a foreigner that hasn't lived in LA for more than a year?  Our wars are plentiful within this country. Maybe you believe in FOX news that it is just a war on terrorism - that its just for traitors and brown people in airports and outside the country; the public and their constitutional rights is peanut butter in your mouth / shit out your ass.
You just added to that heap of useless comments. Hypocrite!
So...why are we still here, again?
They were essentially the same, but with less technology.  They held slaves.  They raped their slaves.  They got hookers.  They passed STDs around.  They were great/brave men in a lot of the things they did but they were also just as human as anyone else and did a lot of terrible things.  There are people of equal greatness alive today and in 250 years there will be people talking about "how great those people from 250 years ago were compared to the people of today!"
Maybe instead of using the information to make money or play a trick on them, maybe it could be used as evidence of a crime. After all aren't most of these shill activities done in order to cover up something that is basically very criminal? If they are being paid to do it by people who are committing treason, then it might be very interesting to follow the money. 
[deleted]
I didn't make any claims. If there was an inferred claim that's your own. If the inferred claim was "there are freemasons at the NSA" then, by the same deductive process the initial comment claimed there were no freemasons at the NSA, making the initial claim the claim that requires proof. We can't disprove that claim without knowing the social status of every NSA operative, therefore it is an invalid claim to begin with.  The extensive member base of the freemason club is such there is a virtual impossibility that there are no freemason club members at the NSA, even at the top levels. Thus the claim you may have inferred from my comments are far more likely than the initial claim, that he claimed not to claim.  Understand?
Hulu Plus just added a four part series on the independent investigation into 9-11.....  many will be surprised at their explanations and conclusions. 
I believe it's a metaphor for how genetically altered foods from a singular source will be presented as the salvation from famine, while also having "additional" properties that will serve to further mold humanity into... whatever those in control want us to be. 
I thought they already did?
[deleted]
Whatdafuck?
It doesn't even bears mentioning how obvious and self-evident this has become.
That's why I joined. My parent's house was getting foreclosed in the economic crisis of 2008, I was in college but I had no money to pay for it, my parents filed bankruptcy, and I didn't know what to do.  As for the "go to war or go to jail" deal, I knew a guy in my unit who had that happen pretty much. Judge told him if he didn't join the military he'd probably be sent to prison. So he enlisted.  Median age of my Basic Training class was probably 20.   I was 19. Young, naïve, idealistic, and impressionable. Our country loves having a lower class to die in its wars. 
[deleted]
What ever happened to Cheney when he committed a felony by outing a CIA agent?
What money?
It's sort of maddening how obvious this all is, but they are "our greatest ally".
[deleted]
&gt;Any evidence provided wouldn't be enough for you because you are in denial.  Any evidence provided that would confirm the official story wouldn't be enough for you because you are in denial.  It works both ways, hence it's a pointless statement.  &gt;Does it not bother you that more money was spent investigating Bill Clinton than the 9/11 commission spent?  I don't have the cost breakdown for where/why the money was spent, so I really have no comment or care about this.  &gt;Does it not bother you that you don't have mainstream evidence because all evidence has been covered up?  Yes it does, I never said it didn't.  &gt;All the steel from the buildings hauled away?  It was strange, but they still had pieces to examine that were gathered within a short time after the event.  You guys are fine with believing a study done with random samples of WTC dust, held by random people for 6 years in an easy-to-contaminate manner, that says there might be thermite...but you can't stand the fact that NIST only had 150+ pieces of steel and will use this as an argument for a cover-up.  Makes sense...  &gt;Evidence of insider trading?  Insider trading happens all the time.  It's circumstantial at best.  &gt;The power outages on the days leading up?  Again, circumstantial.  &gt;The eye-witness accounts of explosions and the planes not having american airlines markings?  The explosions?  You mean that people said they heard explosions around buildings that were falling down and on fire?  How *weird*...  This is actually the first I've heard about a place with no markings so I'll get to looking into that.  &gt;The provable fact that cell-phones don't work at the altitudes they were supposed to have worked?  Then it's a good thing all but two calls were used by the in-flight phones.  Also, the cell phones calls they say did happen were under 5000 ft.  &gt;The impossibility of the planes airspeeds and trajectories?  Impossible, no.  Unlikely, maybe.  &gt;The unaccountability and negligence of numerous higher offices of military and government?  You mean to tell me that mistakes were made during the aftermath of the worst terrorist in America?  Oh man...must be a conspiracy!  &gt;The lack of plane in the Shanksville 'crash?'  The plane went straight down into the ground at a very high rate of speed.  What did you expect to be left?  (Oh, and there was debris, just not a lot of it).  &gt;The lack of plane at the pentagon?  There was debris in the field around the pentagon.  There are pictures you can easily find by a simple google search that show that.  &gt;The many coincidental impact zones?  Explain.  &gt;Explosives not tested for by the investigation?   I would have liked that to happen.  &gt;Isn't there an overwhelming amount of unanswered questions?  Not really.  There are always some unanswered questions, but many of the "unanswered questions" you guys have have been answered, just not in the way you wanted them to be answered.  &gt;Aren't you being disingenuous when you twist reality to confront the people who are simply asking these questions and challenge admitted speculations that are more logically sound that the official narrative?  Not at all.  I've twisted absolutely nothing.  Simply believing the evidence is saying something different than what you believe doesn't mean I'm twisting anything.  How come it's ok to "simply ask questions" when those questions are against the official story, but it's not ok to ask questions about the theories you guys come up with?  Anytime someone like me starts questioning the official story of /r/conspiracy, I get labeled a shill (not by you, yet), insulted, called a liar, disingenuous, etc....when this is the sub where you're supposed to ask questions?  Apparently, you're not supposed to question the "official story" of controlled demo and gov't cover-up.  Heaven forbid!  
Have a nice day, please stop generalizing the subreddit.  
It's not broken. It works perfectly. 
Micro-nukes are so much more obvious.   But it doesn't really matter. Our own government attacked us. That's what matters.
Correct the Masons use fibonacci and other things to develop this model which to the average person will make sense. Just today go outside and look, I saw the sun at 45 degrees and the moon at 45 degrees on the opposite side yet it's a half moon how if these proportions  (standard model) are correct could the earth block out the moon if these were 45 degree apart or 90 degrees apart and I am standing in the middle of a sphere. Also pay attention to how surrounding clouds look around the sun the part away from the sun casts shadows which would be impossible if it were 93 million miles away. This is the biggest scandal of all times and must be one that is corrected, I see this issue as the catalyst that will shine the light on all of the other lies and conspiracies. It doesn't take a lot of intelligence to grasp the experiments one can do if they just could get over  it in there head first. I have been trying to tell people and they get as upset about this as when I tell people there is no Jesus coming to save you (sun of god). This stance requires bravery and not idiocy as most have come to assume.
Asbestos: why the hell would you demolish a building to get rid of that?  It would just be exposed and spread to the nearby populace.
Would you care to back up your claim with evidence?   Because this material data safety sheet, [here](http://www.sciencelab.com/msds.php?msdsId=9924987), states the opposite of what your saying.   &gt;Chronic Effects on Humans: The substance is toxic to blood, lungs, mucous membranes.  &gt;Other Toxic Effects on Humans: Extremely hazardous in case of ingestion. Hazardous in case of skin contact (irritant), of inhalation.  
I really don't have the time to give you a history of the Egyptian Empire. 
8.No memes... use /r/ConspiracyMemes. Other image posts are subject to removal at moderators discretion.
Jets *can* cruise at various altitudes, but of course I was referring to the normal cruising range of about 30,000-40,000 feet.  The ice-supersaturated conditions for contrail persistence usually occur above 25,000 feet.  Cloud seeding is not done at that height.  What happens when you release CCN into air that is below saturation? Nothing.
I don't have to. I'm not the one making claims. You're getting it backwards. You claim there is evidence. I say there isn't. It's on you to prove it.  
I replaced leftist with Christian Fundamentalists in 4to6's rant and it makes a lot more sense, thanks ct_warlock!
O'Rly?
Oh interesting. Yeah something like that indeed. Thanks for the link!
Welfare reform might be a slight improvement, but it's bound to be undone in the years to follow. So long as there is taxation, there will be handouts and welfare. How else would politicians be able to buy votes?
People in here who claim to know the 'truth' don't want to hear your facts and realise they're wrong. 
First time experiencing that sub and I have to say the posters came off really bad. Arrogant douche levels off the charts. Because of your reply I have taken the sub off my never again list. Thanks
it will because odds are non gmos arent going to ve drenched in round up.  what's the harm of putting a label on gmos? Scared your precious monopoly will lose money?
Who is Bruce Jenner? Wasn't that some dude that ran in the Olympics or something? Why should I care what he does with his body?
I can understand that, but anyone more outraged by this prick than they are by the bankers then they don't deserve an opinion!
I can never understand why dentists champion water fluoridation. If it works as advertised, surely as a profession they stand to benefit from all the cavities were it to be removed. I guess dentists are just selfless.
&gt; a four story replica of the tower's steel framed joists  did this test account for pressure at all?  The twin towers were 110 stories stories each. The plane hit the north tower on the 95th floor. There were 15 floors of full offices and a restaurant above them. That's a considerable amount more weight pressing down on them than a 4 story steel frame.    &gt;one to kick start the opium trade the Taliban forbid) and the other for oil contracts.  Do you have any reliable evidence to support that claim?
If the people who make it are willing to eat it, so am I.
"stolen"
[deleted]
Just saw this on th elocal news here in Austin.  What the fuck is this?  Private land use for military drills?  Uh...  Okay.
Sound like a bunch of blathering to try and explain something that can't happen.  NiST didn't prove a damn thing.  
If you bothered to click on the source of the story, you would see that it came from World News Daily Report. The disclaimer of that website is as follows:  &gt; WNDR assumes however all responsibility for the satirical nature of its articles and for the fictional nature of their content. All characters appearing in the articles in this website – even those based on real people –  are entirely fictional and any resemblance between them and any persons, living, dead, or undead is purely a miracle.  In other words, it's satire and it's fake. 
I found that to be true also. Nicotine while addictive is not the same as a cigarette.  I used to get bad fuzzy brain feelings about every hour or so when I was a smoker and craving a cigarette.  With vaping every couple hours I feel like I wish I could vape but dont feel like I have to. 
https://youtu.be/6ah6c2ySRlc
They also did not air The Simpsons episode that takes place between the towers. Same reasoning, they figured it would offend some people. 
[Keep showing the bias](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/33lp79/rnews_really_really_doesnt_want_anyone_knowing/), good work.  
They have known for centuries that education is the ultimate equalizer.
Yeah, the perspective was certainly intentional. Notice however, the scenery. Definitely attempting to allude to Afghanistan, and there is a certain video-gamey Call of Duty theatrics going on with the special effects and audio of machinegun bursts in the background. Fits in nicely with the trend of military PR converging with video game/hollywood theatrics.
And you can see a string in some of his videos.
My heart sank on that one.
**Recent threads on this sub discussing the same link:**  Time | Title | Karma | User | Sub ---|---|---|---|--- 4 hours ago | [AARP PSA Contains Bizarre Subliminal Message About "Martial Law" and "outbreak" from T.V. in background] (http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3439s4/aarp_psa_contains_bizarre_subliminal_message/) | 51 | /u/OWNtheNWO | /r/conspiracy 6 hours ago | [AARP PSA Contains Bizarre Subliminal Message About "Martial Law"] (http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/342nq5/aarp_psa_contains_bizarre_subliminal_message/) | 4 | /u/nimik | /r/conspiracy   ****   ^^010010010010011101101101001000000110000100100000011000100110111101110100
You forgot to give it a catchy name mister NSA, people wont go for it without one.  How about Life Watch™?
gee i've never ever seen this one before
Roles change without us knowing. That is Orwellian as fuck. 
Why? If cops realize that people can fuck them up, maybe they will think twice about fucking them up. There is more of us then them. They work for us, if a few cops end up in the ICU, so be it. They wont beat people. Which I saw here. Literally HS kids led to the police action. They backed off because bricks and stones were hitting them. Our kids literally took the pants of what we should be doing! WTF.
I never referenced Mortons, all I did was call you out on your bullshit that ferrocyanide is non toxic.   I'm not going to dignify your ad hominem attacks with a response, I'll just leave this here:   &gt;As he watched the eyeless face with the jaw moving rapidly up and down, Winston had a curious feeling that this was not a real human being but some kind of dummy. It was not the man’s brain that was speaking, it was his larynx. The stuff that was coming out of him consisted of words, but it was not speech in the true sense: it was a noise uttered in unconsciousness, like the quacking of a duck.  edit: a word
That's good. You are probably doing more than 90 percent of redditors.  I've been involved a lot in the 911 truth movement.  A family member was a victim in tower 2.  So I've mostly focused on that.
so people from the same company are inciting riots and there aren't any police around to stop it?  Psyop
yeah the info feeds just went black still have geofeed though for instagram
[deleted]
"gang" attacks?  Like the one's they can sponsor all by themselves?  If you see these "gangs", they'll all be wearing masks.....not because they're trying to look badass, but because they're hiding their identities from you and I on the street.  If all you see are gangs burning cop cars, that will be the point.....the media will only show you what you need to get off the fence and back one fictional side or the other.
Ughh the rascism is making me super depressed.. Like cmon people just stop..
You make it sound like AARP is unaware of their own advertisement. What makes you believe that this is a total coincidence of one editors selection. How is that more plausible than a team of people who make advertisements working together to select a target audience, mediums, messages and visuals down to what she is wearing in the ad.   Why would anyone get a stern talk because of this, they most likely selected this advertisement over other similar takes.  
police kill all kinds of people, men, women, children -- but at the moment more Black men are being killed.
Yet the various subs just for Blacks are not?
Oh, I don't know... maybe the dentist telling me all the problems that can happen if you don't brush regularly and floss, etc., then surreptitiously adding $30 to my bill for "dental education".
I considered Detroit, a difference that might play a role is that Baltimore is surrounded by areas of great wealth. I used to live in Chicago, and yea, there are some rough areas, but I heard they've been working to improve the situation over the last decade or so. 
Noam has talked about this dozens of times over the years.  A better way to think of it is that the Pentagon has funded one of its loudest critics for over fifty years because that critic is tenured at MIT, one of their research institutes.  Both him and his wife have worked for the government by contributing to the fields of linguistics under government grants.  This does not mean that they worked on mind control or rhetoric manipulation techniques, which someone like Frank Luntz does openly.  Chomsky did the best he could with his lifetime, its place in the chronology of our species and his birth status.  Originally a form of Zionist, he ***opposed*** the founding of the state of Israel as a young man.  After challenging pseudoscientific linguistic beliefs, he has spoken of the real system of oppression to the effect of receiving FBI surveillance for most of his life.  If you believe that one of the single staunchest opponents of the war in Vietnam was a limited hangout--a man who defended Norman Finkelstein from Alan Dershowitz--you are simply not paying attention to all the available data.
The question is the transition. That elites sycophantic elites will continue in power is nothing new. But the transition is what we should be aware of.  Usually these transitions are only enabled through wars (Napoleanic, WWI/II) since the former does not want to concede their power, even if the shift is natural (all empires succumb to their own burden). Sadly it is always the children of the poor that are sent to fight for the wealthy, and this so what needs to be stopped.   America bellicose posture towards China is seen in its "Chinese Containment Policy", visibly seen in Chinese exclusion of trade pacts (notably TPP), pressuring nations from joining the AIIB, etc.  This is a dangerous game that only serves the current elite. And while some other elite will obviously cone to power, with the quest of " global hegemony" behind *we* (America) can finally think of the welfare of the people. A social revolution (as in welfare) is much due, and the mounting socioeconomic-racial pressures is just further proof of the burden the American empire has brought upon itself.  
You can't do this to your kids anymore. If this was to happen at home. It would be considered child abuse. But do it on live TV and with a positive spin. Acceptable.   Edit: But I do totally agree with lil mama doing her job.
It's not a cover for anything, it's a fucking riot of morons.   
I think it would cause an uproar if the majority of people heard it.  It doesn't fit in this type of commercial at all.  What "regular" person could listen to it the same way after they DID hear it?  Do you think they would like to be reminded about something that should only be in movies when watching an AARP commercial?  
Arm yourself's with grammar!
Seems like we're in a 7 year cycle.  1994 - Nafta, 2001 - 9/11, 2008 - Housing Bubble/Economic Crash, 2015.... ?
The government always lies to you. Why would you trust someone wearing army fatigues when they say, they will be doing the policing? This is to prepare people to ignore what's going on in the rest of the country. To brainwash us into thinking its acceptable for the army to march on its own people.
So Republicans.  Edit: really? This is literally their platform.
Well put.
Yep.
more here; http://www.nydailynews.com/news/national/2-navy-seals-die-training-accident-virginia-article-1.2200322
If you paid close attention to the video you'd notice the color of the below objects  First woman's dress = Jade Towels = Jade Shirt in Picture Frame = Jade Sewing needles below pictures = Jade Yarn below picture frame = Jade Lamp behind picture from has a ship's HELM attached to it  Super-strange I think would be a vast understatement....
Second Navy SEAL Dies Following Training Accident at Va. Base  VIRGINIA BEACH, Va. (AP) -- The Navy says a second SEAL has died following a training accident in a swimming pool at a base in Virginia.  Lt. David Lloyd tells media outlets that Special Warfare Operator 1st Class Brett Allen Marihugh of Livonia, Michigan, died Sunday.  http://www.whsv.com/home/headlines/Second-Navy-SEAL-Dies-Following-Training-Accident-at-Va-Base-301453651.html
Damn. How is Vince still alive haha
Yes
[deleted]
[deleted]
/r/vaccinenews
Who benefits from the riotz?! Are u fo real?
Ah I see the point you were making, my bad on the misunderstanding
Da fuck does health care have to do with this? 
Neither image is working for me, removed already?
tl;dr?
&gt; for the rest of us we shop at Wal-mart to save money.  It's an illusion. You're saving money in the moment but paying more in taxes to subsidize the employees of WalMart.  Some states have recognized this is a WalMart business strategy and are taking steps to enact laws to charge WalMart for all the social services their employees use.
Non-mobile: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Liberal_Fascism  ^That's ^why ^I'm ^here, ^I ^don't ^judge ^you. ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble. [^WUT?](https://github.com/xl0/LittleHelperRobot/wiki/What's-this-all-about%3F)
The fuck?  What possible explanation could there be to include that in the commercial?  Any "debunkers" have one?
One of my all-time favorite movies is *Gattaca*; *Lord Of War* was excellent as well.  I didn't know it was the same writer.  Thanks for pointing that out.  I guess you could view M. Night Shyamalan's *The Village* as a similar metaphor as well....
YODO
Is there such a thing as an "American" nation? Because the only ones I can see being nationalistic are the red-skinned folks that live in reserves...
If you take that logic you could easily call this post an upvote brigade.   
He's got a good brain.
Well, with a quick, offhand search:  [Women Helping Women? Evidence from Private Sector Data on Workplace Hierarchies by: Astrid Kunze, Amalia R. Miller, Dec 2014.](http://www.nber.org/papers/w20761)  To be fair, maybe Norway is way more sexist than America.  That would mean there would need to be some other explanation, for, say, [findings like a pro-male gender bias among American academia, I suppose](http://www.pnas.org/content/109/41/16474.abstract#aff-1).
They were trying to help.   http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-3059143/The-Wire-Unimaginable-scenes-Baltimore-s-Crips-Bloods-Black-Guerrilla-Family-Nation-Islam-unite-black-men-stop-violence.html
You don't have to line them up at all. Its perfectly fine if you shoot them where they stand.   I am saying the violent ones. Like the ones throwing trash cans at others. Or starting fights. Burning cars and senior citizen homes. 
Maybe but *my* point is that one or two or three people (or one person with more than one account) can significantly increase which posts make the front page and top 5-10, whether that be by upvoting or downvoting, and this would be considered a brigade.  It doesn't need to be a team of devoted shills with 50 accounts obliterating every post, just a few strategically timed votes will do the job in many cases because reddit's voting algorithm weights votes higher right after a thread is posted.
Holy shit did you just accuse me of being an "enemy of the people" for challenging your methods for determining shills?  I am honestly starting to wonder if this is some brilliant satire. You aren't for real, are you? 
Alright, just spitballing ideas. Hope you can find out, but I think it would be tough.
It's government taking over for government. Different costume, same guns. Regardless of what government it is, all that's required for *any* form of government is your obedience. 
There has been no traffic increase today, via the mods.  I am talking about TODAY. Not in the general scheme. 
&gt;No, I am saying what is taking place in the new queue was most likely done by one person.  Maybe. But you don't know and neither do I.   &gt;My problem is that OP is essentially making a veiled call to arms, which I totally don't agree with.   Not really. Just pointing out that *this morning* if you made a post to /r/conspiracy, you might have gotten an indiscriminate downvote. And that's shitty.  Call to arms? Hilarious. If anything I wanted to remind everyone that this shit happens, and still happens. If it gets more people into r/new to toss upvotes around - great. That's not a call to arms - it's a call for awarenes.  &gt;It's not like there are people from r/conspiracy that have their hands clean from upvote and downvote brigading.   Something something two wrongs don't make a right.  &gt;I find it all hypocritical and not worthy of the front page on this sub.   Then downvote it. Downvote it as hard as you can. But it looks like you're in the minority here (currently #5).
I think something really did crash on that day...not sure if pics will ever see the light of day....i'm always hopeful though.  People need to put it in perspective, there was a massive UFO flap back then which coincided with us developing atomic weapons.  Call it a coincidence but I don't buy it, i think whoever "they" are didn't like such a primitive/combative race having access to blowing the planet up.
[deleted]
&gt; At a significantly higher rate, too. 3:1, to be precise.  Black people make up what?  12, 13% of the population tops?  And white people were close to 75% last time I checked.  So you should factor that into your calculations, there are five or six times as many white people in America so them being arrested three times more than black people actually points in the exact opposite direction as your conclusion.  It seems black people are arrested at a significantly higher rate than are white people.
I agree that there is a better way than violent protests...   I kind of attribute everyones acceptance of the violence to the msm lately.  Seems like there have been stories almost every day where cop shoots an unarmed man... I almost believe that the msm was setting this up by getting everyone all riled up every night there is a news story showing a man getting shot by a cop...   I think it just happened in the part of town that wouldnt go peacefully...   
[deleted]
the herd needs thinning out. anti vaxxers have existed since the dawn of vaccinations. I've known families that refused immunizations back in the 60's and there wasn't a real problem as we have today. The REAL problem is that we are now allowing illegals into the country and schools that have never been medically screened and the federal government has mandated to school districts NOT to require them to prove vaccinations. So the anti vaxxers aren't the threat to society as everyone else are already vaccinated...the illegals are the threat to them. Darwin's law.
Look at those broad shoulders too
[deleted]
Thanks :) I guess it's because we pretty much grew up with the Internet 
I guess if have never shot an AR-15 you wouldn't know would you!  Anyhow since you are here in Reddit Conspiracy, you should probably take a listen to this person, she worked there and what she had to say.  I've personally other eyewitness testimony on the local news from there that said the same thing she does. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dhUxRD7XNwc 
It was more of a hypothetical, to illustrate that if we actually followed the example of our leaders, we'd all be looting and burning! If they are supposed to exemplify ideal behavior, we're all fucked. 
Its not just the good message, it's an incredibly entertaining film. I was hooked from beginning to end. 
Honestly I think these riots are ignited intentionally (look at the rest of the world) and I think they plan on bringing in martial law using the riots as an excuse. 
Thats the Mojave.
The key is that every time you bend over you make sure dig a little bit around their feet. They'll never know what hit them when they fall in.
No occupational franchise for one... 
[The New Babylon Those who reign supreme A Panoramic Overview of the Historical, Religious And Economic Origins of The New World Order Inside the Rothschild Empire : The modern Day Pharisees - FULL FREE PDF](http://www.balderexlibris.com/index.php?post/2012/02/23/Piper-Michael-Collins-The-New-Babylon-Those-who-reign-supreme)
The Swastika was a peaceful Hindu symbol before it was used by the Nazis, but you won't find that in pride of place in the Indian parliament.
People need to realize that each individual should be accountable for their own actions.   I cannot justifiably burn down your house and say, "this never would have happened if you hadn't kicked me." It would be immoral, unjust, unkind, and unfair to kick me, but I cannot lay blame upon you for my actions.   People are frustrated, angry, fed-up, and scared on both sides. We cannot attack one another, pass blame, and expect peace. 
&gt; Well, as an old white retiree, I can tell you it takes a lot to convince me of anything. And the official narrative of the events of, leading up to, and following 9/11 is not the least bit convincing. Neither are comments like "all the points are nonsense".  i feel you. i'm not trying to convince you of anything other than the ridiculousness that is this constant appeal to authority. as to his points - which are really just the claims of the A&amp;E Truth people who gave him a DVD, as he says immediately in the video - haven't we been through them already? it's 2014.
[deleted]
I don't think Im familiar with JBW. Feel free to send it to them!
Do you even shoot bro?  Ok, so as a shooter I can tell you a couple of things from the video.   You can see the mirage at the target and throughout the whole image, you can also see the camera jump when the shot is fired.  It is affected by the recoil or the concussion from the break on the rifle.  You can also tell the projectile doesn't travel that fast.  It takes almost 3 seconds to reach its target.  That is pretty slow.    The target seems to be doing a walking pace.   It is a silhouette target, so it is man sized, that means they would set the speed of the target to speeds a person can do.  Here, its not so fast...so that's why I say a walking pace.  During that pace, the projectile has time to correct itself a couple of times only.   The distance should only be 500 - 800 yards away.   It is amazing they can do this, but this is early video.  They wouldn't release it if this was still the case.  If they're pursuing it, you can bet things have evolved to the degree where it would be useful and comparable to a current target rifle......OK, who am I kidding....military...a current *sniper* rifle.  This is not fake.
I think OP is suffering from delusions of grandeur.
This is just another lame ass attempt at faking.  How long were people watching the Patterson bigfoot video and claiming all sorts of shit  ? They probably still are.  I'll believe this when its front page news. Don't gimme crap about how the MSM covers up aliens.
Dude, I love a good conspiracy, but come on.  You need to get a life if you believe this.  Or, maybe you'll get anal probed by an alien (extraterrestrial, no mexico) tonight.
Open Source Direct democracy.  As soon as we start protesting for something, as opposed to against many things then it'll happen.   There, I just solved the future. 
Have you ever heard of the Hegelian Dialectic? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v_F4WomLlq0  Not the best explanation, but in essence it doesn't matter under what form of control is used; what matters is control itself.  
You're fooling yourself. We are living in a dictatorship! A self-perpetuating autocracy in which the working classes...
The camera didnt pan nearly far enough over to show where he was probably getting arrested. They aren't sending protesters to CIA black sites lmao
What happened is they [just got charged](http://www.latimes.com/local/lanow/la-me-ln-bumble-bee-charged-death-20150427-story.html) so it's hitting the news again.
[deleted]
So the military explosives were just there by coincidence, got it!
Giant superconductors that launched pharaohs soul data back to the Orion nebula via gold capped resonating pyramids. Same way a processor works
The Danish nationalbank is owned by a private stock firm, finding the name of this firm online seems impossible,   Could it be rothschild? maybe, maybe not 
There we go.  Everyone too busy is circle jerking over how to correctly doublespeak "disappearing" to even see someone getting arrested for... Being.
No one rules when no one obeys.
True that brother
&gt; ...the only speculation is whether or not he got charged for breaking the curfew.  I got a lot more speculation than you...
Yeah, [it's that simple.] (http://imgur.com/QSwzNoW)
The 2008 bailout was the biggest transfer of wealth in the history of the United States. From 08 - to present the federal reserve are still buying bad debt from banks and hedge funds at their set price. Also known as quantitative easing 
It's not the microphone. Facebook displays ads based on a few factors. Some involve your age and region, others involve your search activity. For example, I googled a book I wrote recently to see the Amazon reviews and the next day Facebook is showing me ads for the book.  What people don't understand is that Facebook is a marketing platform. They collect user data and statistics for use in marketing. Sometimes this is used to show you ads and sell you products, other times they sell access to the data to marketing firms because marketing is a data hungry industry.  My point is that you have probably googled information relevant to what you were discussing. The ad and marketing systems connected a few dots and gave you ads it determined to be relevant.  Now, are there systems that monitor your telephone calls? I do believe there are. If you've ever been on the phone with someone who is "on the radar" you'll hear strange electronic sounds when you start talking about certain topics. The difference is that phone calls can be intercepted like any transmitted data in a passive way.  What you're talking about requires active measures.  Let me ask you this: How would they know to listen in at just the right time?
If the goal is to restore the founding principles of the US, what you're suggesting runs in direct contradiction to that end. You're advocating "the end justifies the means" which is what *they* believe. Violent revolution never goes as planned, and would likely only help them clamp down and impose the planned one world totalitarian socialist state. Which, by the way, goes back much farther in history than Larry is letting on. It has been the goal of these people ever since the fall of Babylon.  The founders of this country were incredibly smart men. They called it the Great Experiment because that's exactly what it was. If the first country to be truly set free could learn to defend those ideals, that would have been the new world order. But they knew deep down, and you can read it in their writings, that human nature would cause us to piss it all away. If we are to ever restore freedom; hatred, fear and violence are not the way to accomplish it, as that plays right into the hands of those who would like control.
It is called "getting arrested". So spooky guys. 
That looks like epoxy to me, not clear scotch tape.  I'm sure any backwoods red neck only knows of five or ten materials though so scotch tape it must be!
No it's not. It's the truth. 
I just think microphone data is more likely to be used for affinity demographics than things like age/sex/language- which are easy to get in other ways.  We'll see how it goes, though.  Interesting experiment.
Seriously? This has about as much to do with Communism as my left foot. Not that I am for what's going on by any means, but the whole "commie" angle so misses the mark it would be funny if it were not so self-defeating. The rhetoric has gotten so bad that that if a government official just says "be nice to other people" then obviously their Marxists.
Exactly. Huge difference. Seems like he was arrested for taunting police after curfew. That video provides zero evidence of "disappearing."  Titles like this is why /r/conspiracy had very strained credibility. 
I understand doctors are wrong sometimes, and that's okay.  But this guy was getting on a national stage and touting a product to *millions of people* that he obviously wasn't even 100% sure about.   He's an opportunist.  A doctor-turned-celebrity who decided at some point that his bank account was more important than practicing good medicine. 
Better than nothing. 
Goddammit ! That didn't take very long. It was such a good video too, the protester really figuratively slammed that MSNBC reporter. 
To a hammer, everything resembles a nail.  http://reason.com/archives/2014/07/23/over-policing-america
If anyone is interested, here's a link to Ellul's masterpiece [Technological Society](http://monoskop.org/images/5/55/Ellul_Jacques_The_Technological_Society.pdf).   No other book has had more of an influence on me.  Ellul is criminally forgotten, but his ideas are more relevant than ever.
Have fun being on a list
Clearly the only logical thing to do then is riot and loot liquor stores. 
[deleted]
Better a bullet than a cage.
The school administration is activist and anarchist in political organization. Responsibility for very fatality, or injury of police, or students involved can be laid directing at the feet of these failed educators.
Anyone who thinks these riots aren't part of the plan doesn't deserve to be on the list.
Hmmmmmmmm 
Well, most redditors do live in mother's basement. No money, but angst in spades! 
One day you'll recognize spambots when you see them. 
No, they would be black operators. Special forces and stuff. 
&gt;Earth is hell  Not until 32 hours from now
wat
Sad but true.
Well, my happiness has been insured for the day. If this lying, hypocritical, traitorous piece of shit has a brain disease, it can only benefit the world.
Well, the paper is from 2009, so it's not like this is new information. The paper itself is an interesting read nonetheless.
[deleted]
Like a well paid gang of thugs.   One cop harasses a girl, touching her inappropriately, prompting her friend to begin filming the incident. Without warning, the cops lunge at the girl's friend, arresting him and then throwing the phone to the ground, breaking it.  Afterwards, the cops file a report stating that the girl's friend was trying to attack them, forcing him to be restrained. If not for the surveillance camera capturing the entire event, this innocent man would have likely been placed in jail.  It's difficult to feel safe with cops like this operating. 
I meant LEO. I consider that space. I don't think we've been past the Van Allen Belts. 
We're in the "conspiracy"  sub. I'd be surprised if they even read past the first few words in your reply. 
Bullshit  Last big war, it was a holocaust against jews, remember?  with the Zionists sacrificing jews to the cause  and it paid well, didn't it.  Still paying well in fact  Just change the names and some of the faces  and here we go again  and not as if muslims don't replace their dead before they're even cooled  same old game  and who gets rich/richer ?  that's right
Should police get tanks? What about fully automatic rifles? What about missiles? Is there a limit to how much they should get?
Seriously? You are an adult in a first world country and you have this kind of pressure to conform to ultranationalist propaganda still? That's pretty terrifying.
Thank you. Going have to check that out, been a fan of Ickes (and others, I know he wasn't the first to say it) work on the dracos..haven't looked into atlantean society and inner earth jazz too heavily. 
That would be fascinating if they used hot air balloon ships to cruise the world and visit other civs.
You can see a fire started on a car and hear some guy yelling "Let that shit burn"   They were obviously journalists but they were in the line of fire with chaos starting behind them.  Choose a better spot to film from and you won't be fired upon.
What they really need is a deeper psychological examination before allowing officers in. Spotting anti social People is extremely difficult considering how they are manipulative and pathological liars and therefore can easily doctor a basic questionnaire type session to hide their internal lack of empathy.
He disappeared.  It is the right word.  You will not be able to fight this.  Movies and other fiction do not represent the real behaviour of the human populace when subjugated.  This is America, not China or Saudi Arabia.  We will be **free** again.
Nothing, thats the whole point as to why there could be endless limited hangouts in our news designed to normalize their atrocities slowly but surely.
Your getting more traction than my post did of the exact same link.  Mine has been up for 4 hours and is sitting at 2.  here is the comment I have had from it. http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/34aoo5/israeli_soldiers_attacking_throwing_stones_at/  I would just as soon see yours upvoted to keep this on the front page of conspiracy.  Mine got hammared soon as it went up
I definitely will. Thank you!
[deleted]
&gt;we have no context  Is it my fault you've been blithely ignoring the police militarization stories over the last half decade because I recognize virtually every pic in that image.  Someone else instead of generalizing like you tried to nitpick one image, this is what happened to them.  &gt;See the thing is, I actually have been paying attention to the news for so long I know every one of those pics is the police, even the bottom left one, it took me a minute to fully recall, I thought it was in San Diego, I knew it was in California.  &gt;https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yHQ5jqbXF0Q  &gt;http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KLoJ5nKQyTA  &gt;http://www.activistpost.com/2012/08/insane-amount-of-militarized-police.html  &gt;https://www.indybay.org/newsitems/2012/07/30/18718571.php  &gt;I wasted 30 minutes of my life digging this back up for you, I hope you actually give a shit. 
No
Big corporations &amp; governments are like big fat parasites. Go ahead, keep recording us. Keep collecting our data. This is a world filled with rats who don't even realize they're being watched, drained. The good news is some of those rats are watching you too. You will be exposed and removed like the parasitic tick you are.
Yah lets bust into this house with plain t shirts and squirt guns! We totally won't  get shot! Are you kidding me the threat of danger when raiding a home with no knowledge of what could be waiting for you inside justifies the gear. You're trying to argue against use of gear in raids by arguing against raids in general. That's not a relevant point, dude.
also true.
I didn't agree with it at first either, and was out to disprove it the first time I heard anything about it back in 02.  I couldn't.  And it pissed me off, so I dug harder.  Keeping an open mind about things, and not just accepting things because someone was asserting knowledge of it.  When looked at just as far as an evidence standpoint, I cant tell you what happened.   I can tell you the investagation was a sham, and we need a new one.     Shermer is an obvious hack, but is effective on the surface.  Until you dig into what he is actually saying and realize it doesn't hold up under scrutiny.     The 911 inside job thing is craziness, but whats even crazier is the official theory relies on computer simulations that no one can see the software on, and law of physics taking a leave of abscence that day.   I will be the first to admit that I dont agree with all the "truther" sites out there, but the fact of the matter is, there are so many holes in the story, all unrelated, so its not like solving one would solve them all.  It takes a bigger leap of faith to believe the official story and the lack of science they have, than to believe what your eyes see.     It is easy to see a stupid theory like no planes, and dismiss the other things, than to accept an ugly truth, I dont blame the people that do.  But for the official theory to be correct, all of the other theorys have to wrong, and just one of the other theorys have to right to disprove the official theory.  You are entitled to believe what you want to, I just want to see the tapes at the pentagon.    Know why our air defences just happened to go full blown retard that day, and would love to see the computer models NIST ran to simulate the collapses that they wont show anyone.    Does that sound crazy?    Or crazy that the government hasn't just provided that info to shut everyone up after all this time?
Yeah I can completely understand why they need access to it, but I don't see why they need access "at anytime without your confirmation" unless it's being used for something they don't want to tell me.
I cannot see np subdomain links on my relay app. Can we stop posting such links? Or does it break some rules here?
And oh look huge riots in Baltimore where hundreds of people are getting hurt, good thing we have police to restore order huh!
[deleted]
Lol that sarcasm is so thick you could cut it with a knife. 
Yes because rioting is not withing their rights. 
he probably didn't have approval on what opinion he was supposed to have for an unexpected incident like that so he didn't say anything. 
I like your quote more but this one came to mind:   "The Party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command." 
shit ducks was right there for the taking. 
nope its usually drugs and when its not its asphyxiation while masturbating.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Thanks so much for reaching out, I realize there is a lot of books on there that I've never read so I'll be sure to check those out!
&gt;There were staggered explosions and visible puffs of white smoke, wtf are you talking about?  No, there most certainly wasn't. You're going to need a link for that.   &gt;if you take hundreds of super thermite beam cutters  &gt;you dont need huge explosions  So you're saying that if you let hundreds of thermite cutters ignite, you wouldn't need explosions. So... where are the thermite cutters? Thermite burns *incredibly* brightly; so bright that it requires eye protection to observe. How were these cutters on 9/11 invisible?  &gt;Youre fighting losing battle here.  Throwing out little quips doesn't really support your argument.
&gt; Some shady organisation is poisoning/infecting you with chemicals sprayed several miles up in the air, where they're unlikely to come into contact with you in any great concentration after being dispersed by the wind, and which have caused you to develop symptoms almost exactly like the common cold or flu.  Are you fucking nuts? By the time it hits itll be in another country? What a laugh. That stuff decends quickly. I think its funny that you can clearly see trails in the sky, of which spread accross the entire sky within 4-5 hours and blanket us.  But 'science' tells you that mathematical numbers and all the 'behind the scenes' work, is true. Learn to think for yourself.
[deleted]
This case will have conspiracy theorists speculating for years. 
God forbid they protect themselves with advanced technology 
I still don't see how wearing a ski mask when it's need means anything. And recreational?? I live in California and whenever I head out to big bear to snowboard half the people are wearing ski masks.
If anyone honestly thinks that civil rights movements of the past aren't stained with the blood of violence, and a lot of it, they are sorely mistaken. 
[Sure](https://carpentersvilleplayhouse.files.wordpress.com/2011/11/bush_prince_abdullah_kiss_hold_hands.jpg)
milf, I am unsure of what a fundy troll is 
&gt;it wasn't a result of the direct attack  Is that the official reason? Or is that your opinion? Either way it doesn't make sense.   
[deleted]
wait til they release the names of the Officers and the entire country starts donating money to them for some reason
lol @ libertarian extremist. The actual right wingers don't recognize the passive foo the libertarians promulgate. 
&gt; He was a drug seller. I don't much care how he died, but I'm glad he is dead.  Come on, at least try a little harder then that if your going to troll this post.  This sub is way to smart for that BS, at least add SOMETHING to the conversation, please. 
[deleted]
K
Thank you.  Where are the cameras and obsessive media coverage of the peaceful protests?  You won't find them.  What you will find is the constant association of protest and anarchy. There is a reason why the peaceful protests do not get the attention they need and it feeds right into the pacification of the masses.  Bombard the media consumers with the idea that protest = looting and violence and you will see fewer and fewer people participate and even fewer support what are often legitimate concerns over social matters.    
Public schools aren't education? 
You can argue that both peaceful protest or violent protest are enabling to fascism. People forget Malcolm x when they talk about Martin Luther King. Many believe it was actually a combination of the two that brought changes. Riots have often brought social change here in the UK. Threat to property moves capital that controls our political theatre. That said personally I think direct peaceful action that forces the state to react like blocking high ways is the most productive form of protest.
I didn't say it was right, or that I agree with the orders being given, or carried through. I'm saying violence only brings more violence. Gandhi showed that it's possible to overcome adversity without delving in yourself, otherwise it simply propagates a volatile society of further division.
Anyone know if the US police actively recruit from ex services etc? 
[deleted]
There was at least two in that thread.  Gilded top poster and another guy who showed up randomly; whose first comment on reddit 200 days ago was some rant about how we have no right to know what's in our food because "it had nothing to do with us." This was in a /r/politics Monsanto thread.  Edit- no normal person upon reading that all provided "proof" links were done all or in part by Monsanto and not think there was not a huge conflict of interest. Minimum.
Excuse me, but when did that Rolls Royce Silver Ghost become a Harley Davidson motorcycle.
[deleted]
I guess we somehow expect the police to know everything? Even stuff they can't see? So if one officer shoots a tear gas canister and doesn't see it land, and another sees a fire near a building...you get the Tweet that was linked and must rely on a third party for additional evidence.   Please stop letting confirmation bias dictate your reality. 
Hitler was elected, but only in the way that he basically elected himself and everyone else was not allowed to vote.  The only serious opposition to Nazism, the Communist party, was effectively outlawed.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-F6sXlEepUM
So far have ignored and evaded what I offered to point out FOR you. Perhaps too much fluoride? 
i see this response a lot. Its a really popular response. yeah, its common that people accidentally say that the empirical methods of science are 'dogmatic,' when instead they mean the belief in the results. Your argument is really just about semantics, and it's a pedantic argument at best. I find *this* frustrating. Its such a waste of time, as its pretty damn easy to understand what is being implied - whats more is that you're arguing *they cant* understand, when you seem to be struggling yourself.
This showed up in /r/all, that may have something to do with it
wow ruuude
[deleted]
I was just giving my opinion on it. 
Suppressing fire.  It makes it so that your guys can move, while the other guys are hiding behind cover. It's a giant waste of ammo, and if you ask anyone in Infantry how often they use it, they'll laugh.  It's fun though. No denying that. Hence why it's called "The Giggle Switch". 
Yeah, it was hard not to feel sorry for them. I had to keep reminding myself they were collaborators. When they mentioned specific people it was always this official or that military official who had spent the war killing their countrymen. Or the helicopter pilot who lost his gold bars when he had to ditch and go into the water.  Of course most of the panic was due to American propaganda telling the South Vietnamese that the north Vietnamese would kill them all. Which was nonsense. Later some officers had to go into reeducation camps but that was it. Though I hope they got everyone involved in Operation Phoenix.
No wonder. We are sane and civilized up north, so of course that escalation of unaccountable state-sponsored violence scares us (and the rest of the civilized world).  For example, take a look at this article on CBC (CBC is *the* broadcasting company in Canada):   http://www.cbc.ca/news/world/american-shakedown-police-won-t-charge-you-but-they-ll-grab-your-money-1.2760736  Am I worried? I have to say, I've had good fortune wherever I went in the States. The ordinary people are very nice and friendly. Am I worried when I see the police? Yes. Because I know they can kill me with impunity, if they chose to.   
Reptilian eyes can see thru stainless steel. 
Just get allergy medicine, dude.
I'm the idiot? Do you even *read* what you type? 
The system is designed to be self-perpetuating. Continuing to engage in your own disenfranchisement only signals to your controllers that you are right where they want you.  Knowledge will light the way. Spread content to other sub-reddits, to other social media, to everyone you know and care about.  If you see something you like here, from any user, plagiarize it! Don't try to remake the wheel, slack and use the abundance the universe provides us with. Copy and paste the golden hits from here to the rest of the internet; the truth will resonate if we raise our voices.
Oh!  Burn!  
*They* weren't on twitter. The people posting to twitter don't arrest criminals or drive squad cars or throw tear gas grenades.  They make coffee and sweep floors and stamp files.
explain why I'm a moron....
Ehh, so what this video is saying is that we either worship psychos that say they have power and you can too, or we worship psychos that say they have access to power and you can too. no thanks
train a person to use a gun and you made a potential  murderer not a hero. heroes do not get paid. 
First thing, don't ever speak for me. Second, Please explain what looting a convenience store accomplishes? All the retards are doing is giving those in power an excuse to further infringe on our freedoms. You must be completely ignorant to think that violent riots that target random "mom and pop" shops accomplish anything. There are options besides looting.
Maybe they would know at TruthDig or at The Real News Network. 
My comment was about rejecting the idea that there are sides to be taken. Also would be a bit awkward to be Jewish and watch this lol.
Who or what doesn't care when white people riot? I keep hearing this imaginary argument as a way to downplay what's happening in Baltimore. Here's an idea. DON'T FUCKING RIOT? This shit will never end if we keep acting like little babies and saying "Welll... welll... no one cared when *he* did it, why can't I??" Two wrongs don't make a right.
Even Merck's own employees have been speaking about about this vaccine .. http://www.cbsnews.com/news/gardasil-researcher-speaks-out/
I absolutely believe it. I work in human trafficking awareness and the more I see the more I am convinced that politicians will never do much to end it other than put on a false act in support of these bills that will eventually get stuck in appropriations.   It also sickens and scares me how many posts were downvoted in the thread after responding that they also believed in a coverup.
It wasn't tear gas, it was white smoke canisters.
I find these potatoes shallow and pedantic
I'm not onboard with it, but I do find it fun/interesting to contemplate.  Supposedly, it has to do with the Saturnalian religion/death cult.  Something about the planets are a 3rd dimensional representation of a 4th or higher dimensional something.  There stuff out there.  Icke (which is a bad word here) talks about it quite a bit.   Fun stuffs.
If... You mean "when" and "how".   Your post is very short but the questions you ask deserve essays and books to answer. The sub holocauster linked is fantastic and provides some good context and critical analysis that conspiracy lacks.   I think local "sustainable" food and tool &amp; life wares production/solutions is something we should care about more than voting, church, the suburbs and going to our jobs combined, regardless of any and all collapse scenario predictions.   I'd like to see the USA more like europe. One arcgovernment trying to keep it all together just doesn't make sense when you have texas, new england, PNW and the south/midwest politics all amix and diluted and co-opted by the fed. It isn't good for solution finding. It turns presidential debates into hyperpostmodern farce. EU has its own problems though. I'd like to see a loose coalition of the states, with state or regional law being 99% of the game, with the fed acting on matters of DEFENSE(not empire building; we should be isolationist to a fault) and little else.   &gt;I think we need to maintain a society who at its core can still utilize artisanal skills, most people have a garden and self-sufficiency is distributed across the population and not just left to a powerful few.  I wish to subscribe to your newsletter.
Bull.  The protesters picked it up and threw it onto the trash.  Watched it.
That's a fantastic analogy. I have a thing for analogies. They're efficient, yet poetic.  Edit: it's actually a metaphor, but you know what I mean
No one argues that basic sanitation, clean water and clean air are vital to our health. However, your other points show an utter lack of understanding of even basic immunology and disease processes starting with how vaccines work, how they are made, the different types of vaccine and the epidemiology of vaccines. Simply to label vaccines as filth that drives bad outcomes through increasing antigen load is purely speculative and generally debunked by science. Jenner's theory has not only been extensively supported, but we now understand its biochemical and evolutionary underpinnings to the point where some of our vaccines are not even attenuated pathogens anymore but subunit vaccines that utilize synthetic pieces of pathogen to trigger the immune response. No vaccine is 100%. Some people never respond, some people are immunocompromised, some times the pathogen changes. However, it needs to be effective enough to break the chain of transmission and generate herd immunity and this depends on how contagious and how a disease is spread. Finally the antigen load of being exposed to an actual infenction vs a vaccine is many, many times greater. Also almost no one outside the military is vaccinated for small pox anymore and vaccines are rarely if ever made in animals anymore. Anyways, pick up a basic immunology text, like kuby's or even just read the wikipedia article on vaccines and adaptive immunity and then rethink your positions...
My brother and I know a guy who left the police force after working in both rural and non rural parts of Wisconsin.  He did this after 10+ years on the force.  When asked why, he said he couldn't deal with the crime and corruption.  My brother and I assumed he was talking about paper trails leading to politicians and prominent members of society.  Nope, he went into detail on describing how virtually every police department in the country, including his own, is on the take in some shape or form.  He said after awhile, he felt more like a thief than a cop, always looking for situations and people to exploit.  He said other cops won't even ride with you if they know you won't be a part of their ideology to steal cash, drugs, or jewelry.  This is the state of our law enforcement today.     Maybe that's why there is so much police fantasy in television today, where 99% of the episodes in CSI and Law and Order never even hint or touch upon the subject of police corruption.  
[deleted]
Yeah man they were all paid actors! The guys dumping garbage on people and throwing chairs through windows and looting stores were all told where to go to make it look worse than it was. Are we sure Baltimore isn't where all the shills reside??  It's physical evidence by people, doesn't matter who, captured on tape. You can't just act like its being faked or whatever it is you think is happening...  The burden of proof lies on the accuser. Prove that any of this is being faked or whatever your thesis is.
Nailed it
Thank you for going.  It means a lot to us in Baltimore that other places are there with us on this.
Not to be that guy but the term 'Achilles Heel' would be better used over tendon for this reference.   An Achilles Heel is a terminal weakness, the tendon is just a tendon.  Tendon.
Lets member this is from Nov 3, 2014
Do you honestly believe that ONE BOMB that destroyed a whole city would show NO SIGNS of a blast crater or shockwave? The blast would be coming from ONE SOURCE in all directions. It does not matter how high it was dropped. If ONE BOMB destroyed a whole city then the aftermath would show, but it doesn't. In fact, Hiroshima and Nagasaki look identical to the Tokyo firebombings that happened just prior in 1945, there are several people who have testified to this fact. One of the prominent voices debunking the nuclear strike is  Alexander P. de Seversky.  
This is statistically the case in most scenarios where race is considered a variable, that the significance is far greater if you evaluate on social level instead.
I used to love Jon Stewart... Nowadays I have to take everything with a grain.  I enjoyed that interview, but ive had to cringe when hes interviewed some other guests that he should have grilled but didnt...   You just have to remember who is paying him.
There is only one commonality between serial killers and thats is that  almost all start with torturing animals. This behavior shows depravity and a disregard for any type of life and is the exact type of person that should not be a law enforcement officer or in any position of power. Unfortunately more and more its this type of person that are in these positions.
The article does not say anywhere that they think the app is terrorism. It has a one sentence blurb talking about the potential dangers of people knowing the location of police officers. Saying is could aid terror attacks. I'm not saying I agree with the article, but your title is sensationalist.
Depends how long they've spent in the meat grinder.
Shit, they're onto me...  #Pocket sand!!!
im actually *sort of* happy you wasted your time posting
From the disclaimer page of World News Daily Report:  &gt; WNDR assumes however all responsibility for the satirical nature of its articles and for the fictional nature of their content. All characters appearing in the articles in this website – even those based on real people –  are entirely fictional and any resemblance between them and any persons, living, dead, or undead is purely a miracle.  It's satire people. 
It has always been a machine like this. Only before, the machine was a less painful machine for its cogs, in all the ways you mention. You could get more for doing the same amount of work. People could afford houses, take vacations, pay for their kids' college, and retire.  Now... not so much, unless you're the 1%, maybe 5%.  What has happened is that big money has taken everything over, and big money got ever more greedy. Instead of getting their money the old-fashioned way (either earning it via good business ideas and sense or swindling people), they now simply use their money to bribe politicians to rig the system ever more in their favor... "trickle down" economics, but the trickling is urine rather than money.  There are few ways to escape the machine, and I don't think there are any ways to destroy it or change it substantially.  One way to escape the machine is death, but that option sucks so that's the last I'll mention it.  Another way is to figure out how to get insanely wealthy yourself. There are still business opportunities out there. There is still stuff to be invented. There are still million and billion dollar ideas to be implemented. They're few and far between, of course, but new members of the $100 million to $1 billion dollar club are being made every year, so it's still possible.  Perhaps the final way is to change the way you vote. Yes, the system is rigged. Yes, politicians are owned. And that's why the machine will never change so substantially that those with significant power could ever lose it.  However, the system can change. It can be brought back to a state in which the cogs can have a pleasantly comfortable life and do all the things they used to be able to do - vacations, home, college, etc. We just have to start voting, and voting our lot in life instead of the position we wish we had or might have someday, "if only".  But even if we vote a democratic socialist like Bernie Sanders into the Presidency, it's not going to change overnight. The country didn't go from relatively painless to "holy fuck this hurts" overnight - it took decades of continually putting "trickle down" idiots into power to get it where it is now. We just might need decades of continually putting "trickle up" proponents into power, even if they refuse to outlaw abortion and will tax the living hell out of you if you ever win the lottery.
If a dog is too far away, they'll call it over:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3qRl7zrSj7k
[deleted]
I'm curious to know who you think the winner of the Holocaust is.
We're supposed to take a random tweet as gospel?
A pruney panderer propped up to promote the promise of participation, part of a parade of puppet pretenders polishing their public personas, proceeding to parody plutocracy and placate the passionate.
Awesome amount of video on Liveleak of what seems to be poor blacks and whites looting together, in a predominately black neighborhoods.  Oddly enough, I've not seen any gang colors flying at these looting and arsonist events captured on video.
Wise choice of words.  Since we can't afford it then why don't we stop buying it.  Stop buying.  Stop buying.
Yes anybody can prove that. 
Sorry about the downvotes.You are 100% correct. 
Thanks for contributing nothing. 
Im just going to link this here /r/cringeanarchy
&gt;Anchorage, Alaska  It would start with the Inuit society, as the current white cultures, regardless of state, seem to be unable to stand up to local government oppression to the likes of how the black communities rally together, looting or no looting.  Regardless of who is creating alignment and mis-alignment throughout the multi-cultural societies in the US, the wealthy class media groups will be there to instigate anger towards any of these groups, using double-speak and distraction propaganda toward their viewership, who are not in the area of interest to get the account of the issue first hand, and have no history regarding the area to understand the long time issues regarding the class division in the state of Maryland.
1 - you keep pushing it as if that's the most likely option and therefor can be disregarded.  2 - It's not about "scary" and its not about defense, its about a position of power and a potential threat to people who are looking at the escalation and asking why it needs to be in the first place.  The average joe confronts these people and all they get is "know your place", or a threat of "obstruction" or some other trumped up charge will come about.  We've seen it before.  The old adage, power corrupts, and absolute power corrupts absolutely.  We're on our way to that stage, ignoring this potential allows this to carry on.  3 - That's fantastic, its not just about you.  We're talking about the escalation and the need for it in the first place.  You're dancing all around.  Your argument is that the guys around you don't need it, right?.....so why do we see this escalation?  This escalation *isn't* normal, as you've said......so we're actually in agreement then?  See, it sounds like you live in a nice place...but again its not about you only.  It's about other people who are already in a shit position.  Like Baltimore, those people think they're being abused, right or wrong.  They react.  People react.....and as you should know, our Gov't jumps on that opportunity to escalate the situation.    Thus, why we're having this chat.  You said its not normal, you don't know if this is all for "Training" but you're happy to pass it off even when saying its not normal.    I'm getting mixed signals here.
Facebook wont let me post this either. "This message contains content that has been blocked by our security systems." 
This post is getting vote manipulated. I refreshed it and all points went down by 3.
Regulation of Bitcoin is already happening and talks of adding a transaction fee through the miners is happening. It's big business to do transactions and if less people use cash, we are moving further away from cash. Bitcoin is not untraceable, there is a transaction history for each through the blockchain. 
Bernie Sanders taking over America.
You're making a lot of assumptions. Away with you. 
Most of that is anti-AIPAC stuff, except maybe his position on Iran nuclear.   Compared to the vast majority of candidates, he's a lot less slavish to AIPAC than most.
Indeed thank you for catching that
I was waiting for you to say he kicked it / shot it. I let out an audible sigh of relief.
All those people who lied to congress, those are the people who we should be arresting/shooting.   edit: great quote "they killed it because it didnt cost enough money"  The bureaucracy, the contractors, are just as much to blame as some big central 'conspiracy' bad guys. 
nice meme
I think abortions are necessary in some cases but they also give teenagers a free pass. In a sense it encourages open sexuality at a young age which is wrong. Obviously other things contribute to this but teens and young adults should be taught to have better morality and not go around screwing like sailors just because they can eliminate a problem. Either this or to use protection. I by no means am a bible thumper, have sex only when your married preacher. I just believe that people should have a free pass like this
Its anecdotal, but the police unions appear pretty tight with the district and state level judges in Houston. They all seem to rub elbows together at the Petroleum Club.
[deleted]
I'm confused.. Mercenary?
LOL GOD YOUR DUMB
[deleted]
Scared of what? I'm not scared of anything at the moment. 
That's been my theory since day one. If their end game is to implement countrywide martial law, Baltimore would be a good city with a predominant demographic of systematically impoverished and incriminated population to a incite a revolt in response to the protection of racially driven police brutality that would quickly spread through other cities. 
Probably rewrote 10000 lines of code or less.
[deleted]
Locally the people who are investing in 'revitalization' gentrification hired some pros to torch the community based old folks home under construction to destroy this potential community focal point.
Jesus christ you are a cunt...Go to google...use it. You're trying to come off as the reasonable person, but the problem is you just aren't the reasonable person. Someone posted the source video to the post we are commenting on. Do you have to be such a pretentious dick?  &gt;give us something we can see for ourselves besides your word.  Excuse me? It's not their word, it's someone else's...first, and even more, he literally gave you something to see. If you're curious about it, perfect opportunity to go research it. Hell maybe that's why they posted it!  Jesus...this sub and reddit in general is becoming infested with the facebook crowd... 
Too visible to the public, I suppose...easier to abuse those in custody in a van.
Yeah, but look at the source. I seem to remember that I was going to be in a slave camp like two years ago.
Well if it works then we need to take it to human trials eventually. Remember, drugs are illegal for recreational use but cannabis for usage in medicine is fully legal and moral by all standards. Therefore, why would it be so hard to get people to try this unless it really didn't cure anything at all?
AFAIK, decarbing the herb and extracting cannabinoids using naphtha or similar solvents to produce an oil provides the high concentrations necessary to fight the cancer.  The doses have to be extremely large. It makes sense that it fights cancer because of the potent antioxidant and cell-retarding/metabolism-slowing effects. It makes the user happy, well rested, and gives them a good appetite, all of which is good for the immune system.
Is that really a conspiracy?
This is very thorough. Nice job!  I'm too lazy to run an experiment like this but I'm curious about what the results are going to be.
This is ridiculous. If you can't tell that these aren't the same people...
Umm, people can be more than one race, there's no reason the numbers should add up to 100%.
C'mon, I get the die changes but our money looks like monopoly money except for the 1 USD. It has never changed.... Ever..dafuq?
[deleted]
Yes, but this time, no lube.
[deleted]
So what's your real reddit identity?!
looks like you got your wish -  someone made a Jade Helm 15 yesterday!   We did it guys!   /s
Surprised or not, it's still disturbing. http://foreignpolicy.com/2013/07/14/u-s-repeals-propaganda-ban-spreads-government-made-news-to-americans/
Actually it just shows how afraid the government is and how the media is a big part of the issue
People are already accustomed to being watched.  Selfies, tweets, FB posts, instagram, snapchat, YouTube.  Our behavior has already changed.
I like that this question comes up only when it's about killing and not when for instance the percentage of other minority in prison, or stopped an searched by the police in certain areas.
Yes, money can be exchanged for goods and services. In this case, money can be used to obtain high quality medical care. 
Some1, somewhere published, something, about 20? 40? 60? million dead, but no1 knows where exactly they are buried... hmmmmm
Ya think?  Jewllywood glamorizes it, and then The Federal Govt; C.I.A., F.B.I., D.E.A, and Armed Forces are used keep the drugs flowing into the U.S. for over 60 years.  
Awesome, good job bud!
You should try mushrooms sometime.
I liked that car...and I never got my coke back.
There weren't very many Americans in the USSR to begin with, I imagine.  da-dum-tish!
I will read and get back to you. Worked my way through the first portion of the NASA worm segment. Interesting read.
[deleted]
Probably. Alcohol or prescription drugs.
http://www.cnn.com/2015/05/01/us/freddie-gray-baltimore-death/index.html
[deleted]
The lander bases are there. Scopes with high enough resolving power can definitely make those out. 
&gt; The primary argument is severely flawed: "It was easier for NASA to go to the moon than to fake it". This argument assumes at its core that NASA did go to the moon (which is the very argument in question). The reality is that going to moon (or even leaving the Van Allen Belt) has numerous problems involved that baffled the world's greatest scientist for years. People who believe the moon landing was staged believe that we never actually solved any of these complex problems. So we faked it. The argument that "It was easier for NASA to go to the moon than to fake it" invalidates itself because to entertain the argument, the reader would have to assume that NASA did go to the moon (which is exactly what is in question).  
So many of the stories about police abuse follow a narrative of "the bad cop" deviating from all the good cops, but this case in South LA really shows how systemic the problem is when it comes to how the police view and deal with the public.
3 decades you say to justify the Revolution and Boston Tea Party?  Gee...I wonder how long African Americans have been mistreated.  
And since you are interested:  I think this video is even better to illustrate how the media are all controlled by the same few entities:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=jH8dejYGa5A&amp;t=35 
I just got off an 11 day transatlantic cruise.  The ship had CNN, MSNBC and Fox news stations.  During the around 3 hours I watched of the riot coverage, not a second of air time was devoted to why the people were upset.  Not a single mention was made of yet ANOTHER human being being needlessly murdered by the police.  This why when I am at home I get 100% of my news online.    I'm with Mr. Freeman on this.  F**K the media!  
if it happens like that it will be the beginning of a big migration to another platform.   
&gt; There's a reason physicists laugh at him  Source this claim, keep in mind that he has a BS in IPS physics/engineering), an MS in mathematics and was formerly on the editorial board of The Physics Teacher (AAPT journal) 
A lot of bottled water isn't regulated (especially if it doesn't cross state lines), so contamination can go unchecked. Also, the plastic can leech harmful chemicals (ESPECIALLY when left exposed to solar radiation).   It's best to drink tap water (from a public source or private well) that's been run through a reverse osmosis system. And I'd recommend a glass container. 
Fuck these asshole cops. This is about making everyone accountable. That is actually some justice. Usually police get a slap on the wrist *at the most * in these situations.   You're pathetic if you think she's doing this because they're white.   There are a lot of stupid hick conspiracy types.   -a white guy 
thanks for the info.  cheers.
Yeah it is, those people don't even look the same. Besides that, nobody is surving an accident like that; even if they did, why keep it a secret? It's just all too damn stupid for me to wrap my head around. 
&gt; many of the religious teachings around the world would literally crumble as a result of the contradiction that life, intelligence and most importantly morality are solely relegated to Earth.  Well stated.  So much of human dogma revolves around the fact that earth is the center of the universe or geocentric.  Imagine the what reaction will be when the aliens tell humans that they have never heard of Jesus, Allah, Buddha, Vishnu, etc.  It will not end well with the masses.  Their whole after-life believe system: poof.
It also helps that one points out the lovely fact that the guy who recorded the video was wearing a mask, speeding, didn't  pull over when he was asked they of realized who they caught once they finally got him to pull over. 
Buddhism suggest that desire is the root of much suffering.   However, there is a difference between desire that is elicited through external sources (advertising/society/culture/media) and desire that is sourced from knowing who you are.  Without desire, i find that I don't have much motivation or drive. I found that in order to accomplish things, I had to learn to carefully cultivate desire. I don't think I was particularly materialistic as a teenager. In order to set a goal, I have to first desire that goal. Many goals worth achieving aren't easy. In order to achieve that goal, I have to cultivate and build that desire like a bonfire.  I think that lust is a form of desire. I love my wife more than life itself; when I see her look at me with lust, I have my own feelings of lust that make my heart skip a beat - I see nothing wrong here, this is pure and part of a healthy relationship.   There is nothing inherently wrong with the emotion of desire. However, it can be manipulated and used against you. Know thyself, and desire becomes a tool that can help you to achieve your goals.
A good rule of thumb in life is to listen to what the critics have to say before jumping on a bandwagen. Check out /r/conspiratard to see some of the more common arguments against this subreddit.   I dislike that this community   - completely dismisses the struggles of the Jewish people and supports group that deny the holocaust  - has no quality control  - upvotes garbage to the front page  - draws conclusions from headlines  - encourages loud and angry debate about issues that don't exist (chemtrails, vaccines as mind control, Illuminati etc..)  - is contrarian by default to be edgy and cool  - is convinced that disagreeing with what is mainstream is unique or intellectual   - is on "buddy-terms" with places like /r/whiterights or /r/theredpill   - uses the movie "The Matrix" as an analogy but still takes itself seriously   - thinks that just because you can't deny something, it must be true   - routinely makes a mockery of tragedies like 9/11 or Sandy Hook or the Boston Bombing by making baseless speculation about their validity or apologizing for the perpetrators in the face of clear evidence of their guilt  - doesn't tolerate dissent or criticism (anyone who disagrees is a mindless government drone)  - encourages in-group out-group thinking  - clings to outdated, broken theories and beliefs  - is an echo chamber and validates the delusions of the mentally ill when they make threads claiming to have been abducted by aliens
[Icke] There might be something...
[Stalin.  Flying through the blood smeared heaven with his human skin tambourines drumming eschatology fairies.  Like he was taught in the seminary.](http://cliparts.co/cliparts/8ix/rqg/8ixrqgRxT.png)
Agreed. Looks like a general 'cover our asses legally' type thing.
They bury the real stories and upvote the fake ones. Why would they use SUVs when they are flying in jets full of cocaine? Who is going to drive cocaine all the way from Nicaragua. Seriously.
When the cops kill your brother it's only a matter of time until they get you. Self defense against the police state is real and it's happening.
J.a.d.e is  acronym for a rapid battle and troop deployment software that require maps, plans and data from previous operations to build off of
You started it. You said 'those fuckers' without understanding the reasons behind their outrage. and now you're offended someone called you out on your ignorance? 
Small town canada; less and less people belive anything they see on the news.  Not conspiracy types either. Regular folks.  Conservatives, liberals, everything in between. 
As a former order follow for 5 years, I'm quite familiar with the cult. Once I became aware of the fraud that is that state, I examined my values and principles and realigned them with the truth. There is no authority, only obedience. And we all obey after 15,000 hours of compulsory indoctrination during our most formative years. Over coming the mental trauma requires time and work. Work on the self. Right over wrong action. When the individual takes right action, meaning do no harm, the manifesting is peace, which is the natural order of this planet. Man taking wrong actions has manifested into this condition of slavery we are currently in. I wish no harm upon any being, and desire to friends with everyone.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Facts are facts.  Opinions an interpertations of the facts can vary, but the facts cannot.   
For a non-Star Trek watcher, what?
It wasnt suposed to. Just like you didnt answer mine.
Please be aware there is a lot of disinformation out there so you are going to have to judge for yourself what is and isnt true, but mostley the foundation of it is sound imho, and then there are people who take it way out of context. I'm not sure if its disinfo agents or stupid people or both. Id start with menard, he gives you information on the right attitude to have when dealing with agents of the government where dean is pretty solid on experience since he has been to jail many times by testing his theories.
Lol what are they supposed to do? Ignore the elephant in the room? Freeman is no genius by any means, just an actor.
If it was a long play, it's a hell of a long play. A 30 year long play. It's already irrelevant in terms of spaceflight, it's time to be used to further any agenda really has passed IMO, but I respect your opinion.
reddit is state media
I'm looking for the post. If I find it I'll edit.
thx for posting it once you got it sorted.
Typical CGI feel to it. Night sky filmed, lights added through some software. That's my opinion.
Absolutely. The evidence stands for itself.  I pray that more people might take it seriously enough, even for ten minutes, that their eyes might be opened to the truth.  "Come now, let us reason together, saith the LORD" (Isaiah 1:18)
I hope there's more juicy Hollywood stuff.  Angelina Jolies death stare at the exec was awesome.  I want to know which artists are brats.
Oh wow. I'm not an antisemite, so I must be an Israeli. Get bent. My great-granddad didn't go to Germany so we could have punk Nazi-wannabes like you in the USA.
That's a pretty central idea in most world religions. When Saint John talks about being hated by "the world", the word is "kosmos" and it means, basically, society. The system of the world. The impulse to turn away from the material, from the social and the commercial is fundamentally revolutionary. It isn't just in Christianity. The Buddhism is pretty much all about transcending desire and fear. Sufi Islam has the same basic idea in it. 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EOcU6uc1vh0&amp;list=PL1AD22C692429933B
Just to blindly assume something is used for malicious purposes when there are so many legitimate uses for it is a bit of a stretch
Yeah, I thought it was strange the color seemed to match exactly with that street(?) light in the youtube video. But the other footage from the NBC link looked pretty convincing. (meaning that there was something up in the air)
&gt;You haven't explained how it makes *sense* for them to fake a mission  I'm not privy to why things are done by nasa lol.   &gt;and if they did, everyone in the control center would know.  Everyone who witnessed the launch would know.    &gt;You don't know what a strawman is.  You don't seem to know what compartmentalization is. 
Uhhh 'popped up'? You mean people in this sub jumped to a conclusion before any facts were in?  And it makes sense that former military people would be involved in this industry not suspicious at all
touché  
Well I dont agree with the way this system works, but it is what it is.    Suck it up on a few comments, lie and say shit to get upvoted so you can post quicker on the next go round.   Think of it as taking one for the team, so you can dish rapid reddit rheotric like a champ in the future.   I could care less about upvotes, and if I have to wait, if its important enough for me to make my point, I will.  If not, i move on.   But if getting your point out right away is your goal, and if you care about points or what people think here, that is the best advice I can give you.  If you want to take it a step further, lets say you can respond right away, you put everyone in their place that has a different opinion than you, what do you win?  Will you sleep better at night?  Will your lifes goal be accomplished?    Keep it in prespective, this is a reddit think tank, (is that an oxy-moron or what?)   Food for thought.
couldn't you run from that?  That looks like it fucken sucks
Is this the yearly may day ad?
[deleted]
Ok, I guess this is where I stop. It's pretty obvious that you have some kind of inherent bias that diminishes your theory of mind.  Edit: In hindsight, this comment makes me a hypocrite. I guess the hateful language was getting to me. I do want to say that I was not using murder as the legal term defined in US law, but rather my own definition. I define murder as the killing of another person without proper justification. I haven't explored my own definition to the deepest depths, but I would not consider the Baltimore rioters' actions as justification for murder via the police.
The issue isn't whether you're paranoid, but whether you're paranoid enough. 
Some native American cultures valued dreams extremely highly -- to the point where children were taught to remember their dreams at the same time they learned to walk and talk.  They believed that a "dream" was not a movie in your head, it was your perception leaving the body while the body rests. When someone with full conscious memory and control over their dreams goes to sleep, their conscious perception leaves the body and can travel anywhere, not just on earth or in space, but in time and even to what we call other dimensions (alternate realities, higher planes and elsewhere).  When you are awake, you experience the lower dimensions through the five senses.  When you sleep, you receive guidance from the higher dimensions through other senses.   For people like us westerners who are taught as children to ignore our dreams as "less real" than our daily lives, it can be really hard to regain this ability as adults.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Disclosure does not have to happen suddenly. It can happen gradually so that the people who would freak out can stay in denial until they get used to the idea.  For example, "NASA discovers somethings that looks like microbial life on Mars but they are not sure yet, and still have to confirm the findings".
Quotas
Not saying its the truth, but I got the same impression.   I work with autistic adults, and sometimes you just can't keep them perfectly safe in a restraint if they are really freaking out. It can take 5 people to restrain one person and something can still go wrong. It wouldn't surprise me if the police couldn't control the kid in the restraint and he was self inflicting by bashing his head on the ground or trying to hit it. It's a sad thing to see a person self inflict in such a serious way, but they don't know any better and these behaviors are very common.
it was staged. that's the point.  cuynhik 12 points 2 hours ago  "It's CNN...so it's probably staged. Remember that fear is the tool of control. If they think they're losing control, they ratchet-up the fear. The trouble is that if you've got nothing to lose (like Baltimore), you've got nothing to fear. So this is all a fairly predictable outcome of capitalism's winner-takes-all policies. "
Ok, or a family? Do you know many well-to-do people who would risk their families lively hood to go out and protest, much less a riot? No you probably don't, and you clearly don't understand the meaning behind the Baldwin quote either. 
Messaging you on [**2016-01-01 12:28:37 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2016-01-01 12:28:37 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this comment.**](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/34iukf/i_think_alien_disclosure_is_imminent/cqvyyzj)  [**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=[http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/34iukf/i_think_alien_disclosure_is_imminent/cqvyyzj]%0A%0ARemindMe!  January 1, 2016) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.  _____  [^([FAQs])](http://www.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/) ^| [^([Custom Reminder])](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!) ^| [^([Feedback])](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&amp;subject=Feedback) ^| [^([Code])](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)
Dat Ebola though....   3 weeks of continuous fear-mongering hype in the 24hr news cycle and at least one "victim" was intentionally imported into the U.S.
I didn't downvote it any of the 3 times you've posted it.
Ending Tuesday seemed like a pretty specific statement and I was trying to understand it.  Perhaps you should reread some of the very few words I wrote the first time where I explained I wasn't challenging OP and was curious.
So...one downvote?
That looks to me  like he's creating a bit of drama.  The media are feeding this and turning this into a frenzy.  It's a circus.  
Everything that you said is correct, except the use of "capitalism". It isn't the fault of capitalism, it is the fault of corruption or fascism, sure, but capitalism didn't cause this problem.
Two of the top voted comments are:   "To those complaining: come on, seriously. The gun's on safe, it's pointed towards the ground, his finger is nowhere near the trigger. I'm all for calling cops and the military out for abuses of power, but let's at least try to enjoy this one picture without turning it into "he's trying to kill the little girl!!11"   And   "There is also a very good chance there is not even a round in the chamber.   Edit: Holy shit, folks. This is not a violent photo. This is very peaceful. Yes, it is unfortunate that a soldier has to show up at all, but the national guard was mobilized by elected officials to keep the peace, and so here a guardsman sits. Here's the peace!"  They currently share 5000+ upvotes between them. 
http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Butovo_firing_range  Heres 20k confirmed in one location. Not incineration but mass grave so maybe burial was the way! Im just throwing incineration out there as the more efficient possibility.
Lol I'm sure. Keep thinking you're important, I wont stop you.
!I'll affirm that your free energy theory behind procrastinated disclosure makes quite a bit of sense.  However I've got one or two caveats with some minutae of your message.  - as far as experience tells *me*, earther humans represent but a sliver of the human species as a whole  - free energy devices don't solve *everything*. F'r'xmple, food. As Western agriculture currently stands, free energy added to that high input, low output system could conceivably kill Gaia in a fortnight.  Perhaps disclosure can wait till we adopt regenerative systems of design. ;)
Hey, I've had that dream too. On a few occasions now, come to think.
Have you not seen The Dark Knight Rises? 
&gt; You have no idea why the cops stopped him, why they arrested him  The cops didn't know why either.
I am in the same boat. Went to the navy for a career. Cooks were not needed in the workforce when I got out.   So I searched for another. Found repossession a good income. I was that mother fucker too. Creeping while you sleeping type of bastard. Lol  Then I got the gig I got now. Inspection of aerial equipment for airlines and power companies like bucket trucks. I make around 70k to 80 a year. I pay cash or o don't get it.   No credit cards and little debt. Easy life. Fuck a fico score.
No, everyone needs to define it together. The 3 billion poorer half of the people should have equal say with us rich ones. 
I refuse to be a part of it. People who think about supporting any of those pathological liars are downright delusional. They are mere puppets of the corporate oligarchy.   I'd rather spend my energy convincing other that the elections are fraudulent illusions of choice,  rather than dream that any of those bourgeoisie scum will benefit the country. It's all a façade.
Sounds pretty plausible to me.
I believe that Snowden may have released documents which mention Haarp, I'd like to see those documents before I concluded that HAARP "is definitively engaged in a program of assassination and mind control." I suspect that's a a bit of a distortion. I'm just not going to take the author's word for it.
[deleted]
Scylla or Charybdis?  Wait wait - edit:  Hell or Whitewater?
So what's the conspiracy?   Edit: it's a valid point, why is everyone trying to bury me with downvotes?
Source?
[War is coming.](http://rt.com/usa/254757-house-committee-lethal-aid-ukraine/)
&gt; Mr. Dehmann had hit his head on the floor   How unfortunate.
&gt;At the Chronicle.SU, we take truth seriously. We take what we do so seriusly, untruths at chronicle.su are punishable by mutilation or death. Sadly, chronicle.su is not of this earth. After crash landing in an asteroid December 30th, 1976, the alien husks of Chronicle editors rapidly adapted to Earth climates and bacterial flora. They are able to survive naturally in the wild and reproduce freely. Here at chronicle.su, we take a liberal stance on drug abuse and theft of intellectual property, but that does not mean we are liberal because liberals are faggots and I ain’t no steer-boatin’ queer! Receiving tweets twice daily via fax from religious advisers impregnates our right-wing furnace of hate, enabling us to bring you the most horrifyingly sensational headlines you’ve ever seen, or your money back – guaranteed!
Site is satire. HAARP is real.
Unfortunately a lot of things about Aliens will get downvoted nowadays.  Aliens and conspiracy theories are like peas and carrots, but this sub has grown and changed considerably in the last few years.  Not necessarily a bad thing, but I do miss the crazy and outlandish sometimes.
But all those zillion agencies are obviously part of the conspiracy!
That pig isn't planning to shoot anyone with his safe queen 1911 that isn't even ready to fire. Nor is he prepared to fight in that shape, or even run a block. Pure prop.
Those 2 arent even police officers.... Are people as stupid to believe such blatantly wrong propaganda. Look at the pants, boots, and other gear. None of it is military or LE gear. It looks like a couple grown adults are ready to go play some airsoft with their sons 5th grade class.
I have indeed found that every conspiracy theorist I've met has turned out to be an idiot.  They keep expanding the conspiracy, deny the legitimacy of anyone who says anything they disagree with, claim crazy or patently untrue things, believe every single conspiracy theory ever invented, etc.  Anyway, I would put "conflicts of interest" under the "innuendo" category.  Since CT's can't give clear evidence that the official explanation is wrong, they fall back to personal attacks on the investigators/officials.
Hey the insurgents live in Surda! Lmao didn't know we lived in Alagaesia 
That's a fair point as well.
What makes you think the government values votes? An official will say anything and everything to get you to vote for him and they usually go back on everything they promised. How on earth would more voters change that fact?
[deleted]
He has proof.  Bring it!
Probably because that sub is dedicated to **one** conspiracy from 14 years ago.  This one is a more all encompassing place.
Great comment. 
These guys talk about the pentagon at length. https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=fVQ1-o6FKxA
Rule 10. No personal attacks. Removed.
They didn't care before 9/11 and they sure as fuck don't care tomorrow!   Got it?   Get it!  Stop being *fodder*!  You spin yourself out there like your damned skin and bones matter!  If you can't drill down to the Nut Job that has sent your life into Chaos, for fucks sake stop!  These Fucking Nutters will turn your *Streets Into War Zones* America!  Not Ready?   Sorry.  See that Woman on the Right hand side of your screen?   She had something to say! She fought! Stalwart! You want to ignore her? Dismiss her? Go right ahead.  Dream.Reddit dream!           
I thought that for a minute because there didn't seem to be a struggle through the window of the humv  and it almost seemed like he was escorted the opposite direction behind the police line that the humv  went. I have no clue though, just that I felt you would have seen something in the back
Sad thing is, even if this video were real (and it isn't), debunkers would still see that as a Boeing 757. It looking like a missile would just be another amazing coincidence that occurred that day, fully explainable by their contrived pseudoscience.
Very well said.  I'm about a year out of college, and if I could go back and talk to my high school self, I'd tell me to skip it and learn a trade while saving money.  Instead, hopefully someone who can still make that choice will see this.   All the socialization and extra curriculars are available without committing to wage slavery if you put effort into seeking them out.  Hell, you could just move to a college town and get most of the benefits of being in college simply by living there.  Granted, you'll have to pay out of pocket for a gym membership, concerts, and maybe for some extra curricular classes like painting or woodworking, but if you're not paying an exorbitant tuition and instead are working full time, that won't matter.  If I'd skipped college like I wanted to do and hadn't caved in to my parents' and high school facultys' push towards "higher education," I'd be rich from Bitcoin (long story, but I would've started mining in 2009 had I not left the state/my desktop PC for school), and at the very least, have a small nest-egg saved up from working rather than the 40k in debt I'm going to be slaving away at paying for the rest of my life.  My degree has done absolutely nothing towards getting me a "good" job. I'm working for minimum wage and trying to find something better.  Sorry for the rant, but excellent post OP.  Young redditors, think long and hard about whether college is truly worth it, and perhaps consider an apprenticeship to learn a trade.  **Check out [this US government website](http://www.dol.gov/apprenticeship/find-opportunities.htm) that most counselors/parents/educators frequently neglect to mention to you before you begin your path towards a career.**  *EDIT*  Also, even if you don't agree that our education system is "slave conditioning" and think that's a little too out there for you, it's undeniable that most higher education institutions are in it to make a profit.  Their #1 priority is the bottom line, not your well-being.
Fucking Cunts!
Unless you believe north america would have been much better off without one big totalitarian nation.  
I have always thought mental illness was a symptom of a sick society, assuming that we as animals are a product of both nature and nurture. Thus if you were to function symbiotically in a caring and loving world it would be safe to also assume you wold show care and love and again if the world was to be cruel and irrational you might display similar symptoms.   
They already admittedly bounce signals off of the 'ionosphere.' It wouldn't be a stretch at all to say they could bounce signals off of the dome.  Furthermore, everything that's supposedly been done by satellite can also be done by towers on the ground already.
So is this saying that Israel and the US made Daesh for the purpose of scaring the world?  Can someone explain this?
[deleted]
They hire the mentally ill.
I mean, after you send it back in.
Whoa   dat blatant racism doe. 
I agree.
You got all that from that one video? Or are you just using this opportunity for some generic rant. I agree with your rant in principle and have concerns about overall increase in police brutality, but that's not what I commented on.  But let's look at this video. I don't know what kind of stress they were in, but neither do you or the OP. Maybe the protesters acted aggressive even before pushing the cameraman. Or maybe they were really just well-behaved kids.  It didn't look like a "first strike". One policeman tackled the guy they targeted. If you watch the video (not the one linked in which that part is cut out, but the full video) you can see that protester's friends immediately started beating policemen with their sticks.  Whether they could have had a quiet word and pull this guy on the side, I don't know. I agree that they should have considered that first. But we don't know whether they considered it.
Word. I've had a couple history teachers who really opened my eyes, so that's good to hear. 
  b) let me know when America starts putting people in concentration camps  ...We did that to the Japanese-Americans after Pearl Harbor.
[deleted]
No. The moon and earth are much father away than you would expect. 
[The Holocaust Mega-post](http://grizzom.blogspot.com/2013/12/hard-facts-of-holocaust.html) 
What was the address?
You're trying to make concerned, informed citizens sound like naughty children. 
Indeed. And they have bad teeth and they groan asthmatic in your face when they are fucking you. Take their sweet time too, damn.
See item 11 of http://www.nist.gov/el/disasterstudies/wtc/faqs_wtctowers.cfm  Written by people who studied the actual evidence, people who know about physics and materials and construction and engineering and investigation and such.
The Fed was only ever a one trick pony; they either print a little money or a lot of money.  All the different 'tools' they claim to have are really all just the same tool, i.e. printing money.
Russ Baker: Family Secrets  Kevin Ryan: Another Nineteen
Got it. Downvoted until I realize **only** black lives mater. Thanks. 
Even if he didnt say that, his actions and beliefs confirm that this is what he was trying to do. It's interesting to read about all the people he and his brother pissed off.
Yes but each individual is a part of the whole. So the change starts with the individual. Similar to "Be the change you want to see in the world". But this isn't happening. So we need to MAKE change. That's why those "constitutional audits  are so important during traffic stops. It reminds these officers of the duty they have whether they like it or not. If they want no holds barred policing, where they can be as corrupt as they want, we've got a beautiful third world country to the south of us. Where bribes are common and no one complains about this.
Great /s.   I actually did start a business and pay my way through college. It is doable.
Outlaw PACs by federal statute or constitutional amendment if need be, and enforce campaign contribution limits.  Of course easier said than done.  Politicians got where they are with the support of those organizations, and power is seldomly relinquished voluntarily or with ease.
https://www.metabunk.org/threads/debunked-theres-a-plot-in-this-country-to-enslave-every-man-woman-and-child-jfk.319/
Oh gawd; the proles are being whipped into their annual frenzy with visions of 'rising up'. Meanwhile in reality-land, they can't even get their obese asses off their TV-room couches or from behind their keyboards. They can't save up enough to survive six-months disconnection from the .gov tit. Who needs "Spies" when there's D.A.R.E? Who needs the Junior Anti-Sex League when there's porn? Who needs a telescreen when idiots line up to fight over the newest i-thing?  But yeah; "if there was hope, it MUST lie in the proles". Right. How 'bout one of you wiki-addicts posting a *single instance* of an actual takeover by mass mob action, as opposed to **disgruntled, out-of-power elites** using dupes as bullet-sponges and discarding the survivors once *they* get on top.
WW2 america? Yeah we worked together and busted our asses but it was a healthy relationship where both sides helped each other. Marx was 100 years too early and if you ask most people while his solutions where not the greatest his ability to spot flaws in the current world system is and was on point. 
Being condescending never helps.
partisan garbage.
Workers of the world Unite..*.lol, nvm.* Here are your scheduled riots.
Although this is a karma grab.... http://newyork.cbslocal.com/2015/02/19/bay-shore-family-demands-investigation-after-dog-shot-by-police-officer/
[deleted]
Yes but there are countless videos showing waterline views or sea level seeing past 7 miles where there ought to be a 16 feet drop due to the curvature of the earth. Also flat horizon at every altitude  from sea level to 10 miles high.
&gt; You are crazy, here I am opposed to the depiction of **a Jew**  What "Jew"? As I said above, the cartoon was clearly depicting the **Israeli government**/military, not "a Jew", let alone *"The Jews"*.  The character of Uncle Sam is obviously WHITE, yet I don't hear you whining about anti-white racism - *why is that?*  &gt; and you've managed to allege that I'm anti-semitic?  Anti-Semitic *is* as anti-Semitic *does*, and your repeated false assertions that Jews=Israel or Israel=Jews creates a HAZARD for all Jews whether they support Zionist atrocities or not. How dare you paint all Jews with your filthy broad brush?  You should do Jews everywhere a favor and **STFU**.   
Or show Clinton, Bush and Obama together
This is footage from about 1985 but this all started back in 1967. Fight against the development of Narita International Airport. Led by anti-communist, but left wing Christian group who also opposed the Vietnam war. In the early days they were composed of a group of roughly 1500 farming families opposed to the displacement and organized themselves into junior, young adult, housewives and seniors.   Later on a complete mix of left wing and even communist got involved and attempted to attack Narita Airport even after it was open. Should take into account that Nakasone prime minister was the US' lapdog so as you can imagine the locals easily flip flopped all over the political / motivational spectrum - they wanted immediate action.   Some data from those years with a focus on that footage (1985-10-20)  Weapons Used Steel pipe, wooden poles/bats, bamboo spears, Molotov cocktails, rocks, flame throwers, BB canons, shotguns  Delivery 3900 protestors of which 1000 were armed. Majority of weapons buried near proposed battle sites. Jumping out of manholes within airport grounds in order to circumvent security gates. Use of cars disguised as Taxis to pass security and then set on fire with flame throwers. 2 Dummy fire engines then gained access in response to fire.  Fire hose nozzle converted to ball bearing canon (200 steel BBs at a time) successfully broke control tower window. Plan was to burn tower down with flame thrower but malfunction. Even still the airport was screwed for a good while.  Police Casualties 3 burnt out water cannon vehicles At least 68 police seriously injured. Previous battles resulted in several deaths.   Civilian Arrests Male 195 Female 46 Prosecutions 16 (ten years later)   [Link for more info](https://ja.wikipedia.org/wiki/10.20%E6%88%90%E7%94%B0%E7%8F%BE%E5%9C%B0%E9%97%98%E4%BA%89)  
But if there was heat enough to melt cars that would have nothing to do with fallout. It would be thermal radiation or the thermal shock wave. Both of which would have "melted People" if it was strong enough to melt cars at the same distance. Are you suggesting that a nuke could melt a car but people in the same radius would be fine? Come on...  Also define "clean nuke". Are those capable if getting hot enough to melt metal but nothing else? That sounds ridiculous. 
&gt;**ZetaTalk: President Kennedy** | *Note: written on Nov 15, 1996*   &gt;President John F. Kennedy was killed under orders of MJ12 as he was threatening to tell the American public the truth about Roswell. JFK was of the opinion that the public would accept the fact of the alien presence without undue panic, but in those days MJ12 was still affronted with the personalities and actions of the Service-to-Self aliens that the CIA, as an arm of MJ12, continually made alliances with. JFK believed in the strength of the human spirit, in its ability to sort things out, and in any case felt the public had the right to know what they were facing. The CIA wanted the knowledge they hoped to get from the Service-to-Self aliens who were playing them along, and they wanted this knowledge for themselves and themselves only. Thus, they used their influence with MJ12, which in those days was considerable, to press for JFK's assassination, which they were allowed to implement when the order was finally given.  &gt;MJ12 has recently released us from our agreement to remain silent on the Kennedy assassination. This agreement to remain silent covered certain matters involving the Secret Government and the alien presence. Should humans be incensed by this, that we knew something they desired to know but would not share the information, they should contemplate what life might be like without our having an agreement with the government. In this situation, only the Service-to-Self aliens would be communicating, having as you say the inside track. Such was the situation when we first encountered your government, which had been vastly misinformed and was engaged in all manner of harmful practices under the influence of the Service-to-Self crowd. This has now turned around, but we are honorable in our agreements, and a promise made was to be a promise kept.  &gt;The JFK incident is one which hardened and increased the determination to keep elected officials in the dark as much as possible about the existence and activities of MJ12. Given that the US is a democracy and could potentially elect a dark horse written in on the ballot, such stringent rules about non-disclosure kept elected officials from the danger of being killed. Prior to JFK, presidents and other elected officials were already being kept in the dark, a decision made by an exiting president who did not want a rival political party granted such knowledge. JFK learned what he did due to leaks, shared this with a girl friend long known to be so reliant on sedatives that she could be expected to murmur forth this information with the next man who shared her pillow, and argued incessantly with MJ12 representatives who came to visit him under other pretenses.   http://www.zetatalk.com/govmt/g80.htm
&gt;How do I know that no stars would show up if this were a real video, I don't?  Honestly, would you expect them to on such a low quality camera? This thing is far worse than what the astronauts have.  &gt;How do I know if the relative size of the moon and Earth and accurate in this shot, I wouldn't?  Ask someone who does? Easy to verify.  &gt;Why is everything on the Earth stuck like a picture, how do I know that a real video of Earth wouldn't show actual cloud movement?  Of course you're not going to see cloud movement from that far away, in a few second long clip.  In any case, we definitely had the ability to send unmanned craft to the moon at the time, so they could have got the footage from a drone if required.  &gt;along with all of the records, blueprints, or anything else that would corroborate its existence.  A simple google search confirms this isnt true. Try be a little skeptical of your own claims, or you just make us all look crazy.
I thought op blackjack was an elaborate hoax. When it all broke it ended with an odd page that people tried putting in handler codes. Wasn't it a guy from a the BBC who did it? I remember the phone call to 911 or 777 from a British citizen concerned about it. This was like 8 years ago wasn't it?
So great that all these accounts who never post here are being up voted telling **me** that in **their** judgment there's nothing to worry about because safety and security are what really matter and we should be grateful at this occupation.
[deleted]
You're not making sense when you equate "no full explanation" to "no explanation".
Didn't want the title to be too long, and cause i want you to do your own research if you are interested, I just wanted to warn you guys if you haven't heard
[deleted]
&gt; He's playing up ISIS like it's not a **CIA front group**.  That's the only cause for concern.
Then why is it so shilly in here?  I never accused you of ad hominem attacks.  I never used the word until now.  And I see you're screaming at the top of your lungs.  I love squishing cockroaches.  I do accuse you of ad-nauseum.
WELL yea they can be tricked by anything, so might as well "trick" them with the truth in it's implications. Even if isn't portrayed with direct evidence, that would probably be too confusing for the masses anyways.  But yea I heard that those unions basically support all the candidates. To really know who they support the most an analysis would be done to see which candidate got the most money from, obviously. I have no idea though I just found this picture on the internet and researched after
&gt; I dont believe that the US government can be defeated or forced to stand down through violence.   We don't need to fight the *entire* US government; just certain key individuals within it.   We should not trot out into an open field and announce "hey guys, i'm declaring war on you". We should secretly and silently deal with our oppressors in such a way that they don't even know who did it.
&gt;trade in energy usage for Bitcoin. That's what Bitcoin mining is  That is not correct. Mining is the processing of bitcoin transactions.  
The state aint me brother
As a former oilfield guy, I'd worry about the radioactivity of the water more than anything else. The fracking scare is overblown, there aren't all these secret demon chemicals . You have acids, potassium, various clays, sand, and emulsion agents that are common in the food industry. Waste water initially will be water from the frack, up to one million gallons(usually less). After it's the water the naturally was in the ground. Depending on the location an "oil well" can be bringing up 30% oil and 70% water. This water is VERY SALTY and contains components of crude oil and natural gas. It's not well publicized but oil wells and the fluids that come out of them are radioactive. This is from radon and naturally occurring radioactive elements in the soil. IMO this is the real danger, just like using radioactive fertilizers in the tobacco farming industry.....there will be consequences.
There are certainly easier and simpler methods than a blockchain. The simplest is a paper-ballot based hybrid system. Voters mark a paper ballot, it's tallied at the polling station with a OCR system and the vote stored.  To verify later it's easy to manually check paper ballots against the data that was recorded for them.  Other systems include a simple paper receipt that's stored securely for post-election verification if necessary.  Basically you need an unalterable record of a voter's intention that can be compared to the recorded result.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I love Bernie, but I have disagree here. 6 percent of this country's inhabitants own more than 50% of the wealth, therefore the minority of people can never financially overwhelm the rich, and therefore can't win an election as long as elections can be bought.   We can only beat the billionaire class if we stop feeding them billions of dollars. Become self-sufficient to the maximum extent we are each capable, buy locally, and stop caving into brand recognition.   Homestead farming/ gardening and 3D printers. That's the solution. 
&gt;**The contest was described as a "free speech" event by its sponsor, the American Freedom Defense Initiative.** It offered a $10,000 top prize and featured Dutch politician Geert Wilders, who is known for his anti-Muslim views, as its speaker.  Note that the AFDI is also known as the Stop Islamization Of America, and thr Southern Poverty Law Center has them designated as a hate group.  [Source](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stop_Islamization_of_America).
The thing of it is, I'm still not seeing Sanders get any mainstream coverage. It's all just word of mouth with 90% of the people I know. 
By your logic the Catholics should be carpet bombing Isis held lands because of what they've done to Catholics there. Or any western nation should lay waste to them for destroying all the ancient treasures they've destroyed.
Were you molested at this organization? 
[deleted]
Are you suggesting that the term "Zionist", a political movement,  is a derisive slur? If so, then should that also apply to "Socialist", "Democrat", "Republican",  etc?  Precisely what do you think is misleading about the submission title? Was Goldberg *not* powerful in the media? Was Goldberg *not* a Zionist? Is Goldberg's death *not* still a mystery? Was Goldberg *not* 47?  The only agenda I have here as a mod is to enforce the rules when I see them broken.  Now let me ask: Considering your personal attack on another user, what's *your* agenda here?
Go to hell.
They certainly do!
oh man, I completely relate. One of my close friends basically has become a Marvel convert, and has totally immersed himself in the universe of comics and pop movies of the such. It's getting to the point where I can only talk about real conspiracies with him *through* analogies that he is used to (citing examples from the fiction he reads and having him reflect on their validity or possible reality). It's quite bothersome.  Most don't want their reality to change. It can appear in the form of rejecting actual opportunity, for fear of greater responsibility on some lower subconscious level. So, if most people are unwilling to face the facts of the problems of their own life, what makes you think they'd ever conceive of a greater (and more meaningful, more real) picture?  That comment about ingesting alcohol... yeesh, I feel ya. Mind eraser, no chaser at all.
What is your fav worst thing you had to hear from a 911 debunker.
There's a fairly reasonable explanation in this link- http://www.news.com.au/sport/boxing/floyd-mayweathers-victory-explained/story-fndkzthy-1227333953802
What????
For the last damn time: We. Didn't. Go. Through. The. Belt, and NASA isn't lying when they say we cant. [**We went over it**](http://www.braeunig.us/apollo/apollo11-TLI.htm). It's been said before. The Van-Allen belt counter argument is one of the worst you can make, because it's been debunked time and time again. You act like not sending anything beyond LEO is some shocking revelation, but it's really not. There's no fucking point. We went to the Moon, and found it's not worth the cost of going back. We're not going to Mars, and we're not going to Venus. Both would cost an insane amount and really wouldn't accomplish anything a rover can't.   What is so scary about humans having gone to the moon, that you cant possibly conceive that we went?  *Edit* Yes, down-vote instead of rebutting, it's much more effective at proving your point. 
Probably the most accurate answer I've ever seen.   On a side note.. I see the word "shill" getting thrown around a lot. I think it's funny that you chose it as a name. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Then we're allowed to fight.
&gt;Another said: "I thought this too - that the baby is at least 7-10 days old.  &gt;"First of all, she is too big for a newborn, and secondly, the face is smooth and pale."  I'll actually support this idea. Source: have 4 kids. They always look a bit "froggy" for the first couple of days. The Royal Family is fairly media-savvy. They probably want to make sure the public only sees them at their best. So, no haggard post-partum Kate and no froggy looking newborns... even though it's perfectly natural to look that way.  For us regular folks anyways.
&gt; There's of course no evidence that steel melted.  There is vast amounts, heck, there is even a piece of molten iron and fused concrete in the 9/11 museum in NYC
&gt; There was smoldering and black smoke indicating that what fire there was, was oxygen starved.  You can't tell from the colour of the smoke that the fire was "oxygen starved".
Here is a better link to [JFK II](https://youtu.be/Ut7H1GDoP9U?t=47m47s) The sound gets off at a certain point in the first one I provided you.   This one stays right.
&gt;Israel behind Humus  FTFY 
[deleted]
Have there been any stories about all this NOT on a conspiracy blog?
Except for the giant wheel wells and landing gears that you can't pick up... but hey.. whatever floats your boat.  Maybe thousands of people had a mass hallucination and thought they saw planes.  Maybe there were camera tricks during the live broadcast of the planes crashing into the second tower.  If the government wanted to fake this whole thing wouldn't it be easier just to use real planes?  The whole "no planes" thing makes no fuckin sense.  Now you have thousands of people who have to be in on it instead of just a handful.  
You are applying propaganda techniques knowingly or unknowingly. Everytime you are bandwagoning, labeling, spreading half-truths, generalizing, repeating, scapegoating, using oversimplifications, red herrings, straw mans and transfers you are using them. Nothing bad, but you could use your time to do something more productive for mankind.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Propaganda_techniques
If I remember correctly, wasn't there an airfield or a base that the flights all happened to fly over?  EDIT: [Stewart Air Force Base](https://911anomalies.wordpress.com/2007/06/20/911-military-drones-stewart-air-force-base/)
That soldier is not keeping his muzzle pointed in a safe direction.  If his rifle discharges, that girl will be hit. 
IIRC Anon had a bunch of stuff about a decade ago, stuff they had compiled over a 5-6 year period before sending to news stations and law enforcement around the world. None of the information was ever acted upon to my knowledge (probably used as blackmail)
[deleted]
Here buddy, I'll explain it to you, and don't worry, I'll try to keep in simplistic for you.   As is obvious, she couldn't have used her cell phone to make that call from a flying jet. The technology didn't exist to make a phone switch between cell towers that fast, but, we know she made it from her cell phone.  So in one way or another, she wasn't in that plane, so she was someplace else. If the government was behind this, she was  very likely coached to do this by a government agent of some sort, who very well could have offered her her life in exchange for making that call and keeping it a secret. Part of that deal would have to be a name change along the lines of witness protection. It's the perfect program to use to achieve this purpose.  If you respond trying to debunk anything I just said, I challenge you to explain how she made a cell call from a flying jet. Let's start there.  
Total guess.  My reasoning is that since the ionosphere is very low density, any extra gases ejected into the area would be a very significant change.    I do know that large areas of the Earth can permanently rise or fall several feet after an earthquake.  That displaced air has to go somewhere right?  Really, I'm skeptical that HAARP is anything more than a communications experiment.  Of all the terrible things a military does with technology, I don't think this is one.  But again, I have NO concept of the magnitude of the forces involved or the physics necessary to explain a mechanism for HAARP effecting weather or seismic events.  It is very interesting, and of course, should be questioned.  I can't say it's impossible, but my intuition says nay.  If you have any juicy sources where some of this might be explained, please share.  All this talk has piqued my interest.
lmao do you know how fast radio waves move
Seattle as well, big time junk problem shortly afterwards.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yep!  http://www.ukipfoi.moonfruit.com/
Jesus Christ this is depressing. I'm so fucking sick of these borderline retarded police shooting at the first possible chance they get. I really hate cops, they're turning into an occupying force protecting nobody and serving the wealthy.
Absolutely disgusting. Always hard to lose as friend or family member, human or otherwise. I wish your friend and you the best of luck in this matter. 
At first I was reading your comment thinking "yeah, that's right lets get them!" Then I realized you're not from America and I felt jealousy.  I hate my country now.  Never thought it would get to this point.  But here I am.  33 years old now and officially hate my country.  Have for a while now.  Makes me sad.  :(
&gt; Right now its humanity at odds with each other and the only way to fix it is to level with each other on terms of respect.  And that's accomplished via peaceful protest.  The peaceful protests kicked off investigations with very short deadlines instituted by the mayor, DoJ investigations, and outrage over the injustices that happened.  Violence like rioting kicks off armed police response.
&gt; ~~God~~ NSA knows what kind of scores the intelligence agencies keep on us.  
Your lack of meaningful contribution to the discussion makes your intentions fairly clear.
[deleted]
It didn't collapse, it exploded. Proof: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VwjRaadx-QU&amp;feature=youtu.be
[deleted]
Have you read the 4th amendment?  It includes our right to privacy.  But the government is actively spying on pretty much every American Citizen without a warrant.  Illegally search you when you board a plane. Ever hear of the Patriot Act? There's ONE.    You ARE on earth right?   The 2nd Amendment. You know, the right to keep and bear arms?Are you allowed to carry/conceal a gun in your state?  Most states have taken that right away.    How about 6th amendment rights, Habeas Corpus rights, and your ability to defend yourself in the court of law?   The Obama administrations passed the NDAA, a provision in which allows them to indefinitely detain American Citizens without a trial.    Shall I go on?  I can you know.  I can go on for a while. But really if you are an informed citizen and not totally oblivious you should understand how your rights are being taken away and eroded AND HAVE BEEN FOR A LONG TIME.  I mean if yours is the awareness of the average person we are in big trouble. 
Just happens to be my foot. That was built up from the over prescribing of opioid narcotics to anyone feeling a certain amount of pain. Then the government, 'fearing an epidemic', forces the price up on the drugs, cutting off supply, and cracking down. The hard addicts could not afford the new prices, but so much bad tar was flowing in, who needed Vicodin?
If they was the case this entire country would be full of power hungry cops and their fucking fanboys like you i guess.
My current dog is named Otto. He's only 9 months, but I concur. Same name; amplified feels
Dogs/Black folks. They don't give a fuck. Shoot first, ask questions later. When did the US turn into the wild west? Expect backlash if there are no repercussions for this.
When I read about this last night I didn't believe it for one second.
https://www.facebook.com/Justiceforotto  
Because of the censorship of /r/politics we're allowed to post alternative sites here.
What, why?!
I mean, what the fuck can we do? When authority uses force and violence, they are supposed to lose legitimacy, yet we, the citizens, continue to passively read about these horrific crimes by those in charge via whatever your preferred mediated communications/news source is.  If I said we should stand up and do something, what could be done? A protest? That's been done, and with the current social climate, the true meaning would be lost in the media's handling, and those who would take advantage of an opportunity to display mankind's true nature would come riot and loot.  If I said we should take back power from these gangsters and criminals, I would be labelled an extremists, perhaps even civil terrorist, when it is in fact those in power who allow and condone the protection of authority figures who are perpetuating terror; of civilians and citizens.  So, again, unfortunately, what the fuck can we do? This shit makes me so mad, and the fact that we citizens idly stand by pisses me off even more.   -edit-  And, of course, my heart is breaking for your friend and the friend he lost.  
Netjets uses iPads to show pilots the flight plans in air, granted those jets may have an internal wi-fi system.  Page 4 in the slide show below  https://www.netjets.com/Global/News/Newsletters/NetJets%20Update%20Winter%202012%20Web%20(ONL11412).pdf  Don’t think your pilot is playing “Angry Birds” the next  time you fly with NetJets. We recently distributed iPads to  pilots to take the place of numerous binders and hard-copy  documents previously housed in the flight deck of each  NetJets aircraft. Recent advancements in Class 1 Electronic Flight Bag  (EFB) hardware and software options made this transition  possible. Previously, all NetJets aircraft carried one set of  Jeppesen navigational charts and several binders of required  documentation, such as the Jeppesen Terminal Procedures,  Airway Text Manuals, Flight Operations Manual, and Minimum  Equipment List. The frequent updating of these items required  manual revisions, which carried associated costs and  inefficiencies – as well as the potential for human error – and  presented significant logistical issues that created challenges  for timely distribution of critical information to aircraft and  crews.   early adopter NetJets is one of the first large operators to receive approval  to use the EFB during all phases of flight – including below  10,000 feet. Even most large commercial airlines have  authorization to utilize the EFB only above 10,000 feet. In  addition, we are the first operator to use Jeppesen’s Mobile  FliteDeck Pro solution across our entire fleet.   user friendly The EFB has numerous advantages over the previous paper  system.  • Better search and bookmarking functionality, allowing for  rapid retrieval of critical flight information. • Enhanced readability in all lighting conditions with the  ability to zoom and pan documents. • Redundancy and backup, since both crew members  have a device. • Streamlined, much faster update process.   Also you should read up on a company call Aircell before you say it's impossible to use a cell in flight. Depends on the capability of the aircraft  http://aircell.com/services/iridium/  Voice Only  https://youtu.be/wO_OQk_DnRQ  Voice and Data:  https://youtu.be/dgXPxWrSDIY
My dog looks exactly like this and I just had a conversation yesterday about how I'm terrified of this happening to her. Hopefully having a "WARNING SECURITY DOG" sign makes a difference if cops ever come into my backyard. It really makes my heart sink. They treat dogs like property. Best case scenario, they will give him a couple hundred to settle this. My heart goes out to him and his family. R.I.P. Otto.
Wear a swastika patch in front of her and see if this Zionist Jew is still screaming "freedom of speech".  Oh, that's right.  You can't do that in Europe.  Why?  Because Jews made sure to pass laws making it illegal to display the swastika.  Hell, you can even be sent to jail for denying the Holocaust.  So much for free speech.  Freedom of speech for Jews only.  They'll deny the Armenian Holocaust but want the world to recognize the Jewish Holocaust.  They demand that the Arab world recognize Israel but blast any country including France and Sweden for recognizing a Palestinian state.  That's the Jewish way.
Kick in his door and shoot someone in his family it's only fair
Gotta make a quick confession.  I found the officers Facebook page.  I couldn't send him a direct message so I shared his profile photo and added a comment asking if he was proud for what he did.   5 minutes late he deleted his Facebook account, haha
Yes! You're shadowbanned. If people try to check your profile it says "user not found".  You responded to my post but I didn't get an inbox notification.  https://www.reddit.com/r/shadowban  edit: Unbanned!
I agree in this case. But blanket statements are almost never true.
dude......that shit is funny could i pm you?....i want to know the source link for that
Totally off-topic, but fett brukernavn!
Its every police officer. If you stand by and watch your coworkers commit antisocial crimes and cover for them you're just as guilty. Every other professional has a duty to report negligence and malpractice but police officers have a duty NOT TO REPORT corruption aka the "Blue Line." 
I'd love to see that debate!
Officer Kyle Ferreira: http://i.imgur.com/0ojTXHM.png
Sick fucking cop right there. I'd let a dog bite me before I ever shot it. 
Alexis is [not the CEO](https://www.reddit.com/about/team#user/kn0thing), and he doesn't do active, day to day community management, like banning people who break the rules. He's got way more important things to attend to than that.  If you guys actually want questions answered, why don't you ping those of us who do? [You](https://www.reddit.com/about/team#user/krispykrackers) know [who](https://www.reddit.com/about/team#user/ocrasorm) we [are](https://www.reddit.com/about/team#user/Sporkicide).
[deleted]
welcome to reddit  http://www.reddit.com/r/subredditcancer 
Canada is no different - http://www.conservative.ca/cpc/stand-with-israel/
This should be reason enough to sue for ''pain and suffering''. IF not, atleast for destruction of property.. 
They also didn't use NP. Looks like an attempt at brigading if you ask me. Ban 'em!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Almost as weird as the poster's profile showing "user not found" except his comments and name are still visible in the thread.
I'm saying that there are a lot of good cops who probably wish they didn't have to deal with the shit from the actions of their less honorable coworkers, but that they might find obstacles to "doing something about it," and that they find themselves powerless in that situation doesn't mean they're bad people, and by that logic, that not all cops are bad just because some of the ones around them are.  I'm comparing that to having a coworker I don't like, and who I think sucks at his job, but that I can't get him fired because of office politics, and that doesn't necessarily make me or anyone else in that situation a bad person or employee.
[deleted]
It's fact that CDMA testing for inflight calls didn't begin in earnest until 2004. Before then, the technology to allow personal cellphones to complete calls to stationary ground based towers from a moving aircraft did. not. exist. Definitely not on commercial flights. Even in 2004 the test necessitated proprietary antennas at the front and rear of the test aircraft and a modified cell site inside the actual plane.   I went back to find the qualcomm white papers and press releases on this information, [and it's all been scrubbed.](https://www.qualcomm.com/news/releases/2004/07/15/american-airlines-and-qualcomm-complete-test-flight-evaluate-cabin-mobile) Imagine that. However, the tech was perfected and installed in commercial planes. **In 2008.**  Moreover, people will assert that calls are "plausible" at or below 5,000 feet. But according to the United States v. Zacarias Moussaoui trial data, the calls from United 93 began being made while the plane data reports an elevation of 34,300 ft. The calls continued as the plane data reports a climb to 40,700 ft. This is quite an impossible elevation and speed from which to complete a cellular call in 2001.   It's intriguing that the NYT asserted directly that “cell phones can work in almost all phases of a commercial flight” three days after 9/11, when in early 2003 a Canadian mathematician by the name of A.K. Dewdney (a frequent contributor to *Scientific American*) went up in a two engine and tested with his Motorola. Beginning at 3100 ft. he was [critically unsuccessful](http://physics911.net/projectachilles/) in completing a call.  
It's strange that there seems to be a huge uptick in these cops shooting dogs incidents.  I'm wondering if there has been some federally mandated training changes that is making this more common?  There are some theories floating around that [post-9/11 federal training of police](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2011/09/12/police-militarization-9-11-september-11_n_955508.html) is making them more aggressive as possibly a tactic for people to call for reform, which would in turn end up with [more federally mandated training.](http://www.frontpagemag.com/2014/dgreenfield/democrats-in-congress-call-for-federalizing-police/)  If there's one thing movie makers know it's to almost never kill a dog.  That's how you piss off an audience and make them hate your movie if you do it wrong.  If a character kills a dog, people are going to hate that character.  Knowing this psychology smart police training would advocate every possible way to avoid killing cherished pets.  Instead we see cops seemingly trained to kill dogs on sight.    It almost seems like someone doesn't' want us to trust our cops.  
They love to hold the community accountable through rules that they create and claim to want to establish an environment of discourse and sophistication yet ironically, they lack their own set of transparent standards that we the community can use to judge their behavior. They have no publicly visible ethical standards that they try to moderate the site according to.  Then there's the very notion of what a "shadow ban" implies. It absolves them of any responsibility in justifying why a user was banned. It's a cowardly tactic that allows them to allow the user to exist in ignorance that his voice has been squashed.  You cannot and should not trust anything they say; most of it is a charade.
This makes sense. 
Israel got a booty
Tongue in cheek seriousness.  This place is a total loss though, and most people have no idea how controlled the flow of information is here or how many mods and admins are in cahoots.
Oil companies are just part of a much larger system that keeps us locked in this unsutainable status quo, but it is a great place to start your research!
I'm in Baltimore and I'm pretty concerned right now.  I think what everyone saw last Monday was just a small taste of what's to come when these cops walk with a much lesser sentence than what they are being charged with.  Everyone was loving the States Attorney the other day when she gave out the list of charges but from everything I'm hearing, she really fucked up hard by doing that.    Not to mention she and her husband (a congressman) received large donations from the group representing Freddy Grays family.  So we have a major conflict of interest there if that holds true.  From what I'm hearing, the defense has a major case in having her removed from the trial and getting the entire trial moved to a different district in the county because of how she handled the situation.  Things are going to get ugly when this trial is over.  I really don't think any of these cops will be going to jail at the end of the day or if they do, it won't be the punishment that the rioters wanted.  
Well ain't that some shiznitz
Please pretend I gave you 10 upvotes. 
Yeah, I'm friends with the dog owner and OP and this isn't really productive. I'm sure he's getting a shitstorm as it is. I don't think we should be going after the guy, but the system/department protecting him and refusing responsibility and just fucking mild discipline and re-training.
That officer is fucking scum. You fucked up, and you killed somebody's dog. Why would you not own up to it and apologise?
It all has bearing, if you can't see how the tech developed, the research being done with out our knowledge and how it's used to confuse and muddle issues. The fact that UNICOM has been around since 1981 as a private sector party specializing in real time to AIR-Ground Communications it definitely has bearing.  It has even more bearing if you considering all the tech available and research that was done prior to 9/11/2001 by companies who worked directly with UNICOM, makes your statement unreasonable since it was quite feasible for this to occur. A company is not going to turn down large tax breaks and free new tech when approached by the Government. This is how Qualcomm came to get their hands on some of the tech they released in 2008
It all has bearing, if you can't see how the tech developed, the research being done with out our knowledge and how it's used to confuse and muddle issues. The fact that UNICOM has been around since 1981 as a private sector party specializing in real time to AIR-Ground Communications it definitely has bearing.  It has even more bearing if you considering all the tech available and research that was done prior to 9/11/2001 by companies who worked directly with UNICOM, makes your statement unreasonable since it was quite feasible for this to occur. A company is not going to turn down large tax breaks and free new tech when approached by the Government. This is how Qualcomm came to get their hands on some of the tech they released in 2008
[deleted]
If you're not aware of the transhumanist conspiracy and their ties to the unabomber and google you need to do more research.
How exactly are they taking more power and writing more rules?  If anything, this gives them less power because it's much harder for them to lie about camera footage than their own eyewitness account.
Because most of us don't want to look through every Redditor's account to view their comment history.
there isnt a conspiracy here only idiotic censorship
I'm pretty sure I didn't say it **was** an illness.  I was answering a hypothetical question with a hypothetical answer.  Then, if you had read the rest of my post, you would have seen that I expect we'll see a video of a cop shooting someone, to be posted soon.  But, yeah, they'd call medics for heart attack, stroke, diabetic related seizure... just as quick as they'd call if they shot someone in the back.  Relax. Breathe. Read. *Think.*
Yeah, otherwise that dog would have taken the witness stand and testified against him.
but not you, right?
I'm not implying anything; that guy is stuck in the uncanny valley. 
Certain dogs they decide are human, are human.*
I've tried some things, mostly relating to tax protesting. Gone to court over it a number of times.
If he for sure broke protocal, yes definitely. I just don't think we know for sure yet that the police officer's actions were against accepted procedure.
[deleted]
Just called the Wyckoff Police Dept., woman who answered said they are "investigating" and hung up.
&gt;In my opinion, successfully sending people through the VAB should have set the bar from many different manned missions outside of LEO.  *why* though?   They can do it, but they don't *need* to do it. And the general difficulties in doing things outside of LEO means that doing so is incredibly more complicated and difficult.   &gt;Also, funny how it seems like no other country can get through it, just us, and just those 7 times during the Apollo program.  What makes you say that others can't get through it?  Again, not *needing* to go through them is not the same as being unable to do so. Why would space-programs conduct operations outside LEO when there's no reason to?  
in this moment I am euphoric
Absolutely. He's received MSM coverage as a presidential candidate unannounced for the last few years. Which means his presidential run has been planned prior to the coverage began. 
My GS has a knee surgery this week and I'm nervous about how she'll do. I cannot imagine the rage i would feel to come home and find my dog dead because of a police mistake. Fuck that.
I work at a place with digital faxes.  It's easy to filter them out.  Especially if they're black.
Christ. The picture of Otto at the hospital makes me feel so sick. I can't imagine what the family feels like, I'm so outraged on their behalf, I'd probably just snap if it was my dog. So sorry for their loss. 
Fuck the police. From /r/India.
You are onto something here? Any upclose zoomed in images?
the benefits of decentralization and redundancy of information
http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FOp_Jade_Helm_15  is the best way to send a request. 
Collect addresses and circulated pictures of the elite. Start dropping off the homeless at their vacation homes. Throw rotten food at them and their possessions. Run them into the sea....or back across it at the very least.
No, it has nothing to do with paranoia and everything to do with critical thinking and the scientific method. Extraordinary claims require extraordinary proof.
Or you've gone so far off the rails that the average person is getting annoyed.
That's popular advice by now. 
np
Sure do like that excessive force. They pepper spray him point blank and he just stands there, cop literally slams him down by pulling down on his hair. 
Because cops
Hope he gets justice for Igor...
The balance between what is accurate and what people understand
Yeah, I don't think so.  Good try.  You weren't involved in, or apart of, any of those things, I can promise you that.
Because in civilized countries they don't worry about that kind of shit LOL
This post got flagged on Monsanto's PR sub:  * http://www.np.reddit.com/r/GMOMyths/comments/32xkkn/word_quote_indentified_43332_bot_shillteamsix/
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fconspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Ah. I didn't see the typo in first comment. Muchos gracias. 
[deleted]
Well, there goes another channel of freedom of speech, just like everything else. What's left now? We can try ham radio again maybe. The more technologically advanced we get, the more restricted and controlled we become. It is going to come down to drawing crowds in the street to send a message again... oh wait... that will just get you killed by police probably. LOLJKNM.... 
I completely disagree with you, throughout his entire career, much longer then Obama's, Sanders has stayed consistent in his views. He has never taken money from a super PAC and has run as an independent consistently while in his time as a congressman. If you want to really look at how Bernie Sanders has spoken and acted for the people of Vermont look at [this](http://www.ontheissues.org/house/Bernie_Sanders.htm) Never mind that his net worth is only 460,000, he's not a millionaire or a billionaire trying to buy out the country, he's an american citizen who wants to create change in a system that has stayed stagnant and regimented for far too long.
I completely agree with that, one hundred percent, I feel he must know if he wins that his life will be in danger and maybe he doesn't care and wants to change the country. The deep state is the greatest threat to this country as time and time again they undermine those that wish to do good for this country, I completely agree. Not to mention the tremendous uphill battle he faces in terms of fundraising, I was reading that this election cycle could see over $5 billion dollars in funding from the oligarchs who control the country. The system is fucked, this country is fucked.
conspiracy is a sub your average people will not use. It is also a series of pics, the subreddit filtering of content like this is ruining the website, and supporting it is shillery. If you don't mean it, then take a step back and have a think for a bit about your subconscious reactions
Fair enough. And I was just approved, so that was quite fast. Sorry for doubting you! 
This is done with literally every publicized american "issue"  black vs white  rich vs poor  men vs women  capitalism vs socialism  red vs blue  this method of control doesn't stop at false flags, our entire social structure is built to facilitate division and vitriol
So you're saying it's not that much of a scam? 
You're not responsible, but don't shirk the duty of being an elder.
I think she words basic human goodness in a hostile way.  It is classic Marxism, create a false notion then destroy it with a false conclusion.
That's why you have a stupid response to my comment. 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Allegory_of_the_Cave
I'd rather not have a_shill around but...what it is it is.
Everything you know is trivial to someone smarter than you.  And those "trial" truths in turn point to so much more in the enlightened mind.   "To see a World in a Grain of Sand And a Heaven in a Wild Flower, Hold Infinity in the palm of your hand  And Eternity in an hour."  Hope you soon learn the first lesson in this journey, humility.
It's an appropriate response to a comment that conflates communism, socialism &amp; collectivism, a.k.a. "Norway = North Korea".
Good point. But people have to choose to better themselves.
*"Where's the Birth Certificate?????  Is he from Kenya???  Is the Pentagon safe from Marxist overthrow??"*
Because you are asking people to look at our past to form an opinion on the post at hand.  Exactly what you just claimed Chaim was doing.  But keep raging!  Keep showing us how smart you are via anger!  Its so scary! AHHHHHH!
This is the media.
Canada too,  illegal to deny.  Illegal to speak truth. 
-no shrapnel, garbage can objects seen exploding, no one saw a back pack explode, big gap in crowd at "explosion" site,  a real eyewitness stumbles on the scene, absurd scene of shredded pants, the infamous Boston benches, the Hoaxathon hair perm, controlling scene at the hospital via a bomb scare: http://winteractionables.com/?p=20069   
Video of the aftermath of an actual, real, (non-Hollywood B movie) bombing with legs blown off:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OCj1XzFEOkU  This is the close up hoaxathon footage of "injured" https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AnkcyJIl2Go  Video of a real, actual but non-lethal shrapnel hit on a young Marine in Afghanistan.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V6vjYq4a5r4 
You are only digging a hole for yourself while I peer down at you from level ground.  Just use google and research my assertions.  
[FAKE PARIS SHOOTING](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KAVCRVps-zY)  [Charlie Hebdo Shooting: Signs of a False Flag](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Slj5S9ibM8c)
This is some shit I am willing to riot over.  Sorry for your heartbreaking loss.
The buildings relative to the camera were south of the towers. The video is still a CGI fake demonstrated by the wing crossing the side of the tower.The presenter was wrong about the position of the buildings but right about it being a fake. Here is an astounding vid with an in depth study of this whole fake video aspect...here it is https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gORu-68SHpE .
[deleted]
As I said not every here buys into every post. I've had arguments and been downvoted for saying no conspiracy on certain posts. You're arguing that a large group of people have the same psychology and since reading about one conspiracy suddenly buys into the fact that the earth is flat, or hollow, or a hologram or some stupid shit like that. I'm just saying your wrong. A lot of people here have their head screwed on right, don't you worry about us. We're quite fine and capable of seeing whats bullshit and whats not with our own discernment. Some of us still use critical thinking and require evidence to back up our beliefs. 
So if they have no power, why did you just use one?  And "my day"? What?
Dave recently did a presentation on this on the Caravan to Midnight show with John Wells.  Haven't watched it, cause I've read almost everything he's written about it.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mzgON_5sg4Q
Blatant and literal copy of http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2015-05-04/war-cash-australia-leads-new-age-economic-totalitarianism  They didn't even bother to replace the Tyler Durden tag line or make the image Url work. 
Google is not a source, try harder.
/r/worldnews 
Gsd = German Shepard Dog
Show me documents that 'they' were trained by the US. That clearly shows these are ISIS members and not 'moderate' freedom fighters.  I mean I dont doubt it, but this is not 'concrete' proof that is going to convince your friends of anything.
[deleted]
I understand and accept your angle. Thanks for the reply. However, my point was more so that anyone who is running Windows or OSX either doesn't care or is too ignorant to know any better. Therefore, at least running Linux they'd have a much better default of security and an environment to learn better practices in. Otherwise its like chasing your own tail. Hell, air gapping is hard nowadays. For their threat levels though, they probably just would like to take a step away from malware. If they understood more of the technical aspects of the security process then they'd probably not be running proprietary software in the first place. I think everyone running Linux and now and trying to catch up on security and the process of staying secure is much better than the current state of things. Yes, a false sense of security will happen to most people that are too lazy to learn how to control their system and habits, but this is surely much better than leaving them with Windows or OSX. What do you run currently, may I ask?
Rule 10. No personal attacks. Removed.
[deleted]
Did you miss the report stating that conspiracy theorists are the most sane?   
there's been a few decades of "the civil approach" .. its time to move beyond the soapbox and the ballot box.
Because after years of being awake you know how these guys operate.   Sibel Edmunds gladio B whistle blowing is helpful. 
US Gulag corps.
There wouldn't be one. This sub just likes to pretend the evil federal government is planning to take over... the land they already own. I think?  FEMA CAMPS!! 
People have short memories(and lifespans... puny humans).  The Federal Reserve similarly was touted as a "Reform", and opposing legislation to the international bankers.  Of course,now we know it was written by those same bankers(one of them specifically recalled the meeting on JEKYLL ISLAND).  They even made an "opposing" plan that was 90% the same to offer some further controlled opposition.    It's the same thing now, but a different century.  If you want to see what is going on today, it is necessary to understand history first.  Contrary to many young peoples' beliefs, this in not new, and it is not unprecedented(many groups have tried, and some have even come close to world domination).  Also, you cannot POSSIBLY understand what is going on today without learning what happened before.  If you see a ball's motion for 5 seconds, you can easily predict its path.  But if you don't know the ball's history... predicting, and understanding its motion is impossible.  
I call bullshit. The title is just wrong. I'm no fan of the CFR but I am a fan of truth. The CFR members are discussing the millions spent by the carbon energy industry to distort the debate on climate change. Whatever opinion you may hold on that debate, they are simply not admitting in this video that the CFR is spending millions to intentionally distort the debate.   There are so many things you could post about the CFR that would criticize its activities that would be truthful, why resort to lying in your title? THis kind of propaganda, because that's what you're doing, doesn't help people in any way.
I didn't downvote you, but I think people saw your comment as saying that this anti-corporate search engine was way worse than google's pro-corporate search engine.
I'm not familiar with these things: Jubilee Year &amp; the Shemitah 
Roosevelt confiscated all the gold in WW2. Find the right crisis, pass the right laws, and the people will willingly hand it all over to help fight whatever enemy we've cooked up. I think Americans weren't allowed to buy PM bullion on the open market until the 80s or something.
Not very bright are you? 
Most of the popular ones, short of reptilians. 
So what do we call [this?](http://imgur.com/gg9Vd6E) And who is hiding what?
Absolutely!
We don't support IS. That's why American planes are dropping bombs on those lunatics. Some members of IS may have received training and equipment when they were affiliated with other rebel groups before they hooked up with IS, but that's a completely different situation. There is some evidence that arms being shipped out to the rebels ended up going to IS, but that was by accident rather than intentional. No one in the American government wanted to back these psychos at any time. 
Its tan with splashes of army green which have been the color of sheriff uniforms for over a hundred years. Once again it's not military gear. Saying it is doesn't make it so.
What evidence? Faked math, fake pictures?  Jesus stated to be as wise as serpents.  Send me a real picture of earth good luck. Show me a picture of the 13,000 satellites in orbit. 
Never Forget ...   Pat Tillman was murdered by friendly fire, his body armor plus personal belongings were burned, and a bullshit media propaganda campaign was created to cover up something in Afghanistan.   &gt; **Patrick Daniel "Pat" Tillman**  &gt; http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pat_Tillman#Aftermath
send us a modmail.
[deleted]
Yeah it's definitely not just the NYPD though.  It's all over the country.   http://www.rawstory.com/2011/12/report-israeli-model-underlies-militarization-of-u-s-police/  &gt; According to Blumenthal, the transformation began after September 11, when American law enforcement officers began to look to the Israelis for counter-terrorism expertise and in response the Israel Lobby “provid[ed] thousands of top cops with all-expenses paid trips to Israel and stateside training sessions with Israeli military and intelligence officials.”  http://electronicintifada.net/blogs/rania-khalek/israel-trained-police-occupy-missouri-after-killing-black-youth  &gt; At least two of the four law enforcement agencies that were deployed in Ferguson up until Thursday evening — the St. Louis County Police Department and the St. Louis Metropolitan Police Department — received training from Israeli security forces in recent years.   http://www.timesofisrael.com/israel-trains-us-law-enforcement-in-counter-terrorism/  &gt; A delegation of law-enforcement executives from California and Washington state has come to Israel to receive training in counter-terrorism methods from Israeli experts.  They're being trained by forces who are expert in occupying hostile territory.  Sounds like just what we need in our police forces.
400,000 miles round trip. Thats like, to the moon and back. Why cant trains get that kind of fuel economy? Trains are traveling relatively flat compared to the verticle travel of a rocket.   This should be a story problem in math science physics text books #OpWeb10 http://twitter.com/hashtag/opweb10  
I gotcha - ya can't expect much from what is essentially an advertising company though.
[deleted]
A good reason not to get your DNA run.
Of course it's a false flag.  Gotta keep us scurred of da ebil A-Rabs!
You might find this interesting, this guy has a world citizen passport travelling with it since 1948. Guess who else has a world passport? I called this a long time ago too, the reason why they wouldn't even attempt to impeach the guy, but they won't admit to why, even though he could have been charged for violating the constitution. He was picked because of his status, because any US citizen would have violated statute or code and they could have charged who ever it was. Not him, he is just like the guy I met the other day born in scotland to american parents can only be convicted of violating common law, in a common law court.   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FV5PfervH3w 
Russia Today is your source...  Seriously? This is just propaganda from one nasty country about another. Less impartial and less serious than Alex "clockwork elves" Jones.   Inb4 CIA counterintelligence bot.
Just like many places that scan ID's now they say they don't retain any data and only get your DOB.   https://www.facebook.com/Quiktrip/photos/a.396185082327.170525.5890187327/10151523923487328/  In the comments Todd brings this up. Call the 1-800 # nothing useful. If you dig further there is a lot more than just your DOB on the bar code. 
My thoughts exactly.  This event was bare minimum LIHOP at this point.
Frankly, I'd rather have more like him that question than those so very many that open wide and accept everything.
look at my name-israel is a pariah and i work for its demise but i will not deny this odious history nor allow it to be used for crimes today by its survivors...
http://www.democracynow.org/2015/4/20/fbi_informant_exposes_sting_operation_targeting  Trying to find another doc I saw some months ago where they had a former informant / handler who would meet up w\ the target individual and then direct their actions.
This country's views on sex is an abomination. 
Like Joe Biden said, "You don't have to be Jewish to be a Zionist"
Hope and change away your problems. 
I know an upper middle class white girl who gets away with talking to the cops like that as well. 
How is that relevant? 
So true
Not if "respected" media outlets don't report on it :\^)
Turned like Senator Palpatine to Emperor Palpatine?  :p
[deleted]
holy shit this entire subreddit is now about the words "jews" and "zionism" when really those two things are like the most irrelevant substrata of conspiracies that it just discredits the entire field to constantly focus on them, so good job.
I built my computer and made sure there were no built in mics or webcams. The one I use in rare occasions remains unplugged when not in use. I have to buy old phones to get ones without a front facing camera. Good luck finding one without a rear camera or a hardwired mic.
You say this but it does not take a majority of interactions to give a bad impression to people.  If 1 in 5 pizzas you got were rotten and an additional 1 in 5 just incorrect that's all in all 80% good pizzas but you'd have some impression that something is going on with pizza.   For work I drive 40-50k miles a year and often at night.  The police in many towns are nice,  they might run your plate and move on,  most often they sit and monitor traffic if nothing more pressing is happening.   I'm in Massachusetts and our state police are all but militarized.   They don't just patrol highways they patrol areas that have existing local police forces essentially because they have an unlimited budget.   I've been pulled over for no reason with a random excuse alot,  it seems to be part of their organizations culture, random stop and checks especially at night because you know we must have a curfew or something.   I've been very compliant because if you aren't they can essentially say anything.   They start often by insulting you,  knowing you can't insult back.   I've had everything from telling me my wallet is shitty and him pulling out an open money clip full of 50s to compare,  to being told keeping my distance from parked cars (which I wasn't doing more than usual) will startle drunk drivers and cause accidents.  Just strange shit and lots of random critique and degrading comments or outright fabrications about my driving conduct going so far as being told he didn't want to see me driving there again after he wasn't able to find anything wrong with me or my vehicle to justify the stop.  This is just in the last couple years.   I'm a white male,  early 30s, I dress business casual to work and my vehicles aren't modified or in disrepair.  Instead of accepting there is nothing to see the police- again mostly state police in my area farm revenue and perform random stops.  If you drive only say 10k miles a year its one thing , drive 5x that and it gets tricky.    I know you can read this and think there must be more to it,  I must be DOING something.   A year ago I was pulled over legitimately for speeding on a local highway,  an officer pulled 3 cars over at once and lined us up,  we were all traveling together and I wasn't watching my speed so it was justified.  He came to the passenger side (not usual for safety on a highway stop ) smacking loudly on chewing gum and almost screaming for the registration,  when I opened my glove box he grabbed everything out of it,  my cars manual fell on the ground outside, he told me pick it up after but stay in the car til then,  he took the registration and threw the rest of the papers and maintenance receipts onto the passenger side floor missing the glove box , asked for my license and went back to his cruiser, threw them in I guess and went for the next guys documents.  A few minutes later he comes back and we literally have the" would you jump off a bridge if they did" conversation , I had acknowledged I wasnt watching my speedo and was going with traffic, he throws a ticket at me,  tells me if I appeal I'll lose , suddenly changes his tone saying slow down and get where you're going safely and walks away.  I was the last car there and he had shut off his lights and prepared to pull away,  at this point I get out and walk around the front of my car to get my cars manual which is trampled... he pulled up next to me with his lights on and seemingly accused me of trying to dispose of something,  I showed him what I was doing and he says something about "pick up your fucking shit" and floored .  Sadly, this isn't nearly the worst I've dealt with but it's the only time in a decade I was actually doing what I was accused of.  This is a huge rant... but just figured I'd speak up.  And I get out plenty so it's not just my armchair bandwagon opinion.
This is the first of its kind.
Born too late to explore the earth, born too early to explore space. Born just in time to get shot &amp; killed in a civil war. 
Chiang Kai Shek slaughtered my ancestors' buffalo and razed their gardens and fields. Then Mao came and crippled their equipment and restricted their production; no more than three pigs per family.  Your rights can vanish. Americans can bear arms. Bear arms.
Yes. Yup. It's obvious.
You did though. You pmd me and tried insulting me. If you are now saying you didn't and wish to be a liar. That's fine. You are a bully
Good job. I should have done this but, all I did was complain. Thank you for providing the information.
And why is there no media on this???? God. I wish I could pay a reporter to find the truth. No one cares about these girls. So sad. Wish I could find statistics :(
No problem!
You're sentence didn't make as much sense as you think
They are lobbyists. It's no secret that lobbyists control policy. 
Don't they specifically train the Nypd
[deleted]
Rick Siegel is quite a controversial figure [[1](http://911review.com/reviews/911eyewitness/)] [[2](http://911blogger.com/news/2006-08-26/911-eyewitness-probably-disinformation)] [[3](http://www.truthmove.org/forum/topic/546)]. His [video 9/11 Eyewitness](http://www.dailymotion.com/video/xciscu_9-11-eyewitness-1-7_shortfilms) is no newly released footage. Back in 2006 I found online the documentary he was selling and it was quite interesting, because it had a different angle. But already back then in the loosechangeforum he was viewed as somebody who pushed the most unscientific theories around (small nuclear bombs detonating, helicopters dropping fusion bombs). And they were right. My 2 cents of advise: watch the video, but do not listen to the guy.
The law applies to baked goods, canned goods, and fresh eggs, so it's a little different than fresh veggies.  There is huge potential for food born illness with things like that.  I agree, it's kinda lame, but it's better than not being able to do it.
Mass media my ass.  Servants of the previous owners more like.
Only if it conflicts with our preconceived beliefs.
   You sir have a very good point, Texans do pride themselves on carrying enough small arms in the back of their truck to take down 3 battalions of roman legionnaires. 
Just like there is no such thing as Dark Energy or Dark Matter.
&gt; I think the non-child-producing path is utterly sane  It is.   &gt; given the way the world is and where it's going  But not because of that reason. The "world" is always on the brink of destruction. Destruction and rebirth. If your reason is accepted without criticism, no one would have children.   &gt;If you wanna set aside your fear and take up arms  What if you want to set aside your fear and create a full life in this world? A full life that includes family and a desire for continuation.   &gt; But thrusting that choice upon someone else (your offspring) is like putting a gun in someone's hands who didn't ask for it.  People in this thread manage to simultaneously overestimate and underestimate the power of parenthood in shaping a mind. Your children will be individuals. They will have a subjective view of the world entirely created by them. Within their subjective view, you, as a parent, will have a privileged position. They will judge the character of their interactions against your character. You become the measure.   That is all the influence you actually have. Its direct power is minimal. You can't force your kid to be a soldier, or a lawyer, or doctor, or whatever. It won't work. Child will rebel, or, if he/she attempts to live up to your projection, will feel inadequate. Its subtle power is vast! If you show real character you provide an example that will echo through your child's entire life.
[deleted]
[deleted]
The entire premise hat the government is taking over in this way is ridiculous! Especially when you have 31 military installations in one state alone as wel as owning more than half of all land west of the Mississippi 
Does it have dank memes?
&gt; So the "straight" guy is the one who goes to insults first?  When the bit calls for it he does.  &gt; I think maybe you just need attention.  You're giving me plenty. 
Glad this is top post, was going to say the same thing.
CIA needs to get out of the drug trade because its all going to go legal soon so they need a new form of making money on the side.  
[deleted]
*The Better Angels of Our Nature: a history of violence and humanity*  There are reasonable disagreements about the validity of Pinker's statistics to prove his point. [This is a good article](http://www.theguardian.com/books/2015/mar/13/john-gray-steven-pinker-wrong-violence-war-declining) if you want to read more about that. The real nitty-gritty stats can be found [here](http://www.fooledbyrandomness.com/pinker.pdf). A good quote from the latter: "The fact that nuclear bombs explode less often than regular shells does not make them safer."
OK, Brian Williams is the all too typical mainstream media tool who failed at staying on top of his office politics and got *hoisted by his own petard* because of it.  As for Edward Snowden, I have a few problems with attacks on him.  First off, if he is some kind of actor in a "limited hangout" scenario concocted by the PTB or some kind of inner faction rivalry, so what? Do we ignore his information?  The information he released stands on its own, nothing is really gained by casting aspersions on the source unless one is just attempting to cast doubts and obfuscations over the released information. I see the Snowden criticisms as a distraction with little to no practical value.  It should be enough to realize that we NEVER get the full story and everyone has an agenda.  In my way of looking at things, Snowden isn't required to be a shining knight or an operative, the information stands as it is, even if it was released deliberately by the gatekeeper factions.  If a known "terrorist" group announces that a certain airline flight will be blown out of the air an hour before it does; we don't need to argue:  * on whether they told us the full story,   * who their real backers are   * whether their organization's mission statements are genuine or insincere  * whether they warned us in order to save lives   * whether they just wanted to inspire fear  Sure, it would be a good discussion but somewhat missing the point. It's tertiary and distracting and by implication is an attempt to throw doubt on the veracity of the information in rather circuitous ways. The information we received was *correct*, so as an information source the organization's pronouncement should gain some street cred.  None of these "attacks" really do the job, facts remain unchanged, the details don't overturn the facts because they are irrelevant.      
I usually sub to this for amusement as many of the conspiracy theory stuff is laughable.   But this, yeah, this smells like there really is a pile of shit there....
You seem butthurt or something. Maybe it's time to go outside? 
You do realize that Jesus the man existed and and how he died really happened. Its not like just because the religion may or may not be correct in its beliefs that the main figure head never existed.   That's like arguing that just because Nazism is b.s. that Hitler never existed.
They also say that their ages are:  36-46-56.  An interesting array of 6's...   This could all be distraction though... 
Why is it idiotic?  A government creating a problem to push the solution they want. Its been happening for centuries.
But funny right? And look at all the sweet downvotes!
The supposed shooter, for some strange reason, left his brother's ID at the scene.   http://www.businessinsider.com/the-wrong-ryan-lanza-pictured-on-cbs-2012-12
[deleted]
Since the beginning of the first war, gangbangers have systemically slaughtered their own community members in numbers greater than all wars, police, people protecting themselves and North Korean gulags have combined since.  And with a guess at the statistics, probably at a10 to 1 ratio.  But let's just continue to ignore that and all say that this is just expected behavior.
[deleted]
It's the bill the US government uses to deny citizens their rights.  I hope you're not from the US of A.  I'm Australian and I know.
Do it
You are delusional. I have not hinted at that possibility. You are so bad. I wish you luck. Please, get yourself some help
I'd ask your teacher to provide proof that they can do this.  Personally, I doubt it. Many of the people that, hypothetically, they'd want to do this to would likely be savvy enough to be properly protected against such an attack, as well as capable of monitoring their network to detect the traffic that a live camera feed would create.  Wouldn't be worth the risk to them, IMO.
Kind of reminds me of when they were talking about talking money away from firefighters in Texas and wildfires popped up all over the state.
[deleted]
thats exactly what it means you think just because something has majority vote means its right? 9/11? vaccines? holocaust? 
For more information head on over to /r/holocaust or read through these links  - [Extermination' Camp Propaganda Myths](http://codoh.com/library/document/1170/)  - [Liberation of the Camps - Fact vs. Fiction](http://www.ihr.org/leaflets/libcamps.shtml)  - Perhaps also: [The Nuremberg Trials and the Holocaust](http://codoh.com/library/document/2369/)  - [And this documentary about the Allied use of the western camps for propaganda purposes is also worthwhile: 'Buchenwald, a Dumb Dumb Portrayal of Evil'](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wVZ_5yWmBRk)
Explain
You can always tell when the Government lied about something because all of the evidence disappears. Supposedly all of the Telemetry data from the Apollo 11 Moon Landings as well as the original high quality video recordings have all disappeared. 
some guys produced a whitepaper a while ago on how the macbook built in webcams could be turned on without turning on the warning light.  Apple changed to a different system since (i.e., you can't use the same trick anymore) but I'm sure the new one also has some vulnerability, possibly built in deliberately.  Imagine how sweet it must be for those lonely NSA dudes, being able to peer lovingly at their crush through a hacked webcam.  
I'm canadian, I was just posting this to figure out if I was the only one that thinks the U.S. Is fucked, because the comments in here are crazy.
I meant specifically in this case of this flash crash, could be a market force not engaged in active rigging. We will surely find out, these events never go unnoticed and usually end up on the front page of newspapers.  The derivatives market appears to have more value than the global economy on the surface but the settling value is what really matters, many of the derivatives cancel each other out which brings their value down tremendously although still insanely valued which is unsettling to me.   The market is more rigged than ever but this case could be a glitch.
And yet now they can do what they did to Rodney King, and much worse, all while being caught on camera, and get a double paid vacation for it.   How exactly was it worse in 94?
If you all haven't seen this tid bit yet.  Anyone else infuriated?  [Private Prison Live Auction](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__EIZk_JdjQ)
*they'll leave the light on for ya'* and give up your info
Sources that convinced you?
[The dose makes the poison] (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_dose_makes_the_poison).  [(image version)](http://www.senseaboutscience.org/data/images/SAS_-_Dose_Makes_The_Poison_FINAL_1.png)  People who use X-ray machines wear lead vests. Does that mean x rays are dangerous?   You shouldn't drink glyphosate - it isn't made for that. But when applied to food, which is then grown, rained on/watered, blown by wind, picked, transported, probably washed, and ultimately sold (at which point you're free to wash it again), the amount of Glyphosate remaining on the food is negligable, and well below the quantity required to cause any concern.  This fact is well studied and known beyond doubt.  The difference between someone spraying concentrated glyphosate all day and someone eating food which was previously sprayed with it, is even bigger than the difference between technicians sitting besides xray machines all day, and people who get xrays once every 5 years.  * [Glyphosate fact sheet](http://npic.orst.edu/factsheets/glyphogen.html) * [Wikipedia on human toxicity of Glyphosate](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Glyphosate#Human_toxicity) (with links to references...)   
&gt; The NSA is getting so saturated with data that it's become useless for actually stopping, avoiding and lowering the essential reason it was created for: terrorism/acts of violence in America.  Unless you have data on the number of terrorist plots foiled by the system, you have no authority to say this. For all you know, the NSA could have stopped a dozen 9/11 level events from happening.
Slaves in slavery.
Goldstein.......he was truly ahead of his time
Welcome to the rabbit hole, it only gets deeper from this point on.  If you lived in a poor area, and the media was broadcasting all over the area. Wouldn't you think some people who are wanting to be on tv show up especially illiterate fools looking for attention?  On top of all this the media is controlling the narrative thus making the few illiterate fools follow along this narrative letting the media achieve their agenda.  It sounds surreal, but always remember there's two sides to the story, the question here really is, which story do you believe in and why?
So did Canada today.
The hipster at the end made my eyes bug out.  &gt; I decided to like negate or be conscious my environmental impact for a year, and see what it its like. But i live in New York, and most people think of returning to the land yknow. But we can't just go back to the land, We Will Very Much Destroy The Land.  [So not only did they setup the reduce population meme. but the megacities meme](http://truthstreammedia.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/07/Biodiversity-Mapagenda21.jpg).   
Oh well dont get what youre trying to do, but have an upvote (if that helps)
Non-mobile:  * http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Casualties_of_the_Iraq_War * http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_military_casualties_in_the_War_in_Afghanistan  ^That's ^why ^I'm ^here, ^I ^don't ^judge ^you. ^PM ^/u/xl0 ^if ^I'm ^causing ^any ^trouble. [^WUT?](https://github.com/xl0/LittleHelperRobot/wiki/What's-this-all-about%3F)
It could be the premise for a hot new romantic comedy :)
Black holes are an inside out job 
God forbid. My debt was the fault of the military industrial complex, man.
Rofl   I stopped reading when you told me to get the fuck out a bunch of times. But then said "If you aren't here to debate or share knowledge then fuck off".  So which is it? I have to debate, but you can just tell people to fuck off?  You are pretty angry.  By the way, it isn't even a question that the majority of police shootings are justified. Having a little knowledge and a little research would have helped you there.  
MLK Jr. was asked to commit suicide by the FBI. Did you know that?
Central Banking should be **way** higher.
[deleted]
Yep, keep poisoning the well dude. Gnite, how you are a mod here and promote this shit is beyond me. I'm not a troll but have been here for years, way to go, you support Bill Gates sterilizing people too? We are all animals accordingly to you. Let's kill of the undesirables, the weak, the sick, the young because it's not worth the money. Maybe we shouldn't spend so much on the military and help people. People like you are sick in the head.  This doc points it out and you have wrong prerogatives.  Seek help.  Edit: notice how you get downvoted and I get upvoted. You are in the wrong dude.
I'll let you try again.  Not only are you taking *beyond* extreme liberties with the word 'routinely'. But you are also muddying the water considering this thread is about citizen police and not military intervention outside of US borders.
[deleted]
Well here's some science. :) Please please understand that planes do not vaporize like the official story has taught you. And buildings cannot have a sudden explosions from top to bottom 20 feet below the foundation hours after the fires died out even though 98% of the building was perfectly intact unless by CD. Oh and please enjoy.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ddz2mw2vaEg https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8YaFGSPErKU
To be fair, debunking is rather difficult when you keep making up new things as if they were factual.   Like suggesting that the fires had "died out" in buildings with giant plumes of black smoke pouring out of them and visible patches of orange flickery stuff. 
But you do know that jet fuel can't melt dank memes, right?
No. Wrong. The holocaust propaganda machine has made all this bs possible. It has been the greatest of sleight of hand. 
Murder. 1st degree.
Yeah, that's exactly what I said. Nevermind the massive structural damage they received from the giant fucking airplanes.   Strawman much? 
http://i.imgur.com/cr70zEj.jpg  Yeah, no one here gets mass downvoted....
[The tilting of the south tower,](http://i.imgur.com/YmynBCH.jpg) just before collapse.  According to Sir Isaac Newton’s law of the conservation of momentum, it should have kept tipping over, but it didn't, it fell through the path of greatest resistance. The top was tilting at approximately 20 degrees or so, how could it be exerting a uniform, symmetrical pressure on the floors below? it didn't and couldn't.  [Watch a compilation of the collapse](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=08nhsn9w9Vg) what you are observing is approximately 30 upper floors begin to rotate as a block, to the south and east.They begin to topple over, not fall straight down.The torque due to gravity on this block is enormous, as is its angular momentum. But then  this block turned mostly to powder in mid-air! How can we understand this strange behavior, without explosives?  [Video evidence also shows that the lower sections of the Towers do not even begin to start collapsing until the upper sections are completely destroyed]([Imgur]\(http://i.imgur.com/Ag88tNY.jpg\)) This is an impossibility if we are to believe the official reports   ------------  NIST's global collapse theory, in regards the complete collapse of two 110 story skyscrapers violates Newton's laws of motion.  It is scientifically impossible and completely illogical that these two buildings, which had an upper block exerting a force of only 36% of its static weight, could crush the larger, stronger, undamaged lower section of the building to the ground, when the building, at any level, was designed to support several times the weight above it,  while it maintains its downward acceleration.   The persistent acceleration of the top section of the building is direct evidence that some other source of energy was used to remove the structure below it,    Videos show that the section of the building above the plane impact point was the first section to disintegrate  ----------  For the Twin Towers (WTC1/2), NIST examined only the period BEFORE the actual destructions began but nevertheless concluded that there was   &gt;no corroborating evidence ... for controlled demolition using explosives - NIST NCSTAR 1 report, pages xxxvii and xxxviii  This approach ignored the fact that most evidence of controlled demolition appears only after a demolition begins  -------  NIST never attempted to explain the physical evidence of the building destructions such as what caused four ton perimeter columns and other debris to be ejected horizontally in all directions from the “collapsing” Towers at speeds of up to 70 mph, or why column sections weighing many tons were stuck in buildings hundreds of meters  from the Towers as in the following pictures  -----  NIST’s study...  &gt;does not actually include the structural behavior of the tower after the conditions for collapse initiation were reached and collapse became inevitable  - NIST NCSTAR 1 report, page 82, footnote 13  NIST’s model did not proceed past the point where initiation of collapse was asserted to be imminent and therefore did not cover the actual collapse. The collapse was clearly the crucial portion of the investigation. This omission was in defiance of the stated objective to determine  &gt;why and how WTC1 and WTC2 collapsed  NIST claims that a floor sagging downward pulled in exterior columns initiating the collapse. NIST provides no theory whereby a sagging floor or buckling columns on one side could lead to the observed completely vertical descent. There is no explanation for the crushing and pulverization of the undamaged, stronger, much larger portion of the building underneath at about two-thirds of free-fall acceleration, no explanation of how the upper portion disintegrated in midair and no explanation for the horizontal ejection of a large fraction of the building structure  NIST’s 10,000 pages of NCSTAR reports clearly lack the most essential theory needed to substantiate a gravity- driven collapse. NIST’s WTC1/2 computer model also appear to be fabricated, and there is no way to judge the model without independent scrutiny. NIST’s failure to follow the NFPA code and test for explosives and omission of key evidence for controlled demolition is falsification since it concerns highly relevant data that was excluded.  NIST’s report underwent no independent peer review before publication.  -----
Pretty simple folks remove the cops from the equation. 
&gt; Sanders has the same bosses as pre and post election Obama.  Sanders' donors are mostly unions.  Obama's donors are big businesses including a lot of big banks - Goldman Sachs, Microsoft, JP Morgan Chase, Citigroup, Google, Time Warner.  Definitely not the same owners / bosses. Check out http://www.opensecrets.org for more detailed info.
Quote-mining much? Evading the topic at hand much? Sophistry much?   We have two hypotheses. One says the building collapsed due to plane and fires. The other says the building would still stand, had it not been for the fucking best demolition job in the history of mankind. One hypothesis is tenable and plausible, but requires a few assumptions - like, that a demolition crew rigged the whole structure weeks and months before. The other isn't plausible at all, has no science to back it up, is lysenkoistic science from start to finish, makes false assumptions, comes to false conclusions, needs a new set of Laws of Physics to work, ignores all evidence, looks on as evidence is destroyed, and you defend it as if your life depended on it.   Guess which "team" I'll be more proud to stand for: Team Newton or Team Bazant.
Maybe he was investigating something as a congressman, she was working on it as his staff and someone else killed her as a warning to him to back off. 
So you're admitting that you come here solely to troll and piss people off then?  Have a ban.
&gt;Why have we never put a women on the moon?  Because no women were in the program back then, because all of the guys were former air force pilots and test pilots, and women did not do that during that era.  &gt;Why did the Russians quite and never land a Cosmonaut on the moon?  Waste of money. There is no value on the moon itself, the only value was being the first there and they lost. Why waste billions and billions of dollars to go kick some dirt around? Even by the end of our own Apollo program the moon landings and launches weren't even really being watched on TV. People lost interest.  
The building was not meant to withstand all the bombs placed by terrorists. 
or sitting in a wheelchair... after you had your legs blown-off! They really think people are idiots. Even someone without any medical training can see that It doesn't make sense.
There isn't one who has an actual chance of being elected, and certainly no one kn either faction.
The simulacra is real, jaden
Ok. Explain to me what reddit is censoring.  and I mean reddit, not subreddit mods 
Yea, I'll keep both. Just for subs im active in
simple.   - borrow dog to take for walkies.   - take note of any modified caccti you find. Draw a small map.   - begin to take water bottle with you. Not a clear plastic one.   - at a certain point, fill your water bottle with a solution of 1/4th salt, 1/4th agressive chemical cleaner, 1/4th laundry detergent, 1/4th water  - as dog takes a leak, spritz it all over the place.   - when you arive at the cactus, make sure noone is following, then empty that bottle like you are peeing against that cactus.   I guarantee you, that cactus will die and rot within weeks. 
They are very touchy on provacateur tactics.   I've had several posts in lightly treaded subs get over a hundred downvotes in less than an hour when I point out that aspect of most "terrorist" actions.  It's like "Don't point that out - we'd rather you engage us in an argument about taking away freedoms and pouring over you the gravy of Amurican security state goodness."  People have a hard time believing the FBI is behind provoking or outright committing most "terror acts" in the US (and the CIA outside) until they get the dots handed to them for connecting on their own.
If you watch the way that rule is actually applied, you'll find it is applied just as I outlined above.  Let's face it, *many* topics of "world news" has the US involved. But the censors of /r/worldnews apply that rule to censor articles that criticize the US (especially any systemic or deep criticism) while the censors allow other non-US-critical articles which include the US.  Just look at the front page of /r/worldnews and you'll see what I mean, e.g. [this](/r/worldnews/comments/356c9m/the_us_court_of_appeals_has_ruled_that_the_bulk/), or [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/356dg4/italy_us_break_up_mafia_cocaine_trafficking_ring/), or [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/3515yl/nasa_will_pay_us5000_for_your_best_ideas_on_what/)...etc.  If you follow /r/worldnews for a period of time you'll see a definite pattern -- just like I mentioned above. This is nothing more than raw censorship.
What does "rogue, illegal nuclear power" mean ?  Just that they haven't signed the nuclear non-proliferation treaties or something ?
Most important film footage EVER, yet it was never shown to the public, and was never preserved.  People are so easily fooled.   &gt;The zio TV told me.  It must be true.
**BUT**... they did not rule it unconstitutional. Their argument is, the program isn't *currently* legal because Congress didn't authorize it. A step in the right direction, to be sure, but far from a victory for the people. My prediction is, the PATRIOT ACT will be allowed to expire, but will be replaced by a similar bill on steroids under a different name (a name based on Orwellian double-speak, to be sure). 
see this guy, despite his name, gets it.  so many codons in our dna, yet we have no idea what most of them do.
[deleted]
Because it expresses your displeasure and shows your constituents that you are there fighting on their behalf.  Plus it often flies in the face of both main parties.
Don't worry! The people can change this the next time they vote!   S/
You are not sure of the significance of voat not only being a direct clone of reddit, it also has the exact same moderation and probably admin....I wouldn't be surprised if it was also owned by one of Advance Publications companies....Also, the mod migration isn't limited to the conspiracy sub....voat is infested with reddit mod subterfuge.Voat was DOA.
I think you commented on the wrong story.
Yeah, I am sure the banks and the terrorist intelligence agencies would just stand around and let someone infiltrate their political factions and tear it down.
[deleted]
&gt;We did it 6 times in 4 years they tell us. That was in the 60's-70's should it not even be easier and more efficient now?  The point still stands: easy, more efficient etc doesn't matter when there's *no reason to*.   &gt; They did a terrible job at faking their space walk, you can see the air bubbles rising since they are in a water tank.  Been through this with you under an alt before. You can't see bubbles, since there are no bubbles since they aren't underwater.  &gt;LOL, how could they fuck up that bad, it is not possible!   There's a TIL post every week about how important things get lost and misplaced in archives.  &gt; There is no explanation  There is plenty of explanation.  The *backup* tapes which were largely unimportant since the broadcast was a success were shuffled off to some archive where they gathered dust and got moved around, poorly tracked and probably taped over.  
It's an attempt to combat trolls and the like in hopes they don't notice they are banned, otherwise they would just make another account as soon as they are banned regularly.
Lol facebook. 
Whites need to have more children. They need to have large, extended families with eight or nine kids at a time. The number of whites is dwindling.  All the arguments you've heard for not having kids? Those are propaganda talking points pumped into your head by those who control your media -- wealthy Jews, mostly -- who want your race to die off so that they can more easily control the races of humanity that are left. Don't buy into their lies.
&gt; It must be nice to go to work every day knowing someone is gonna try to kill you today!  They know the risks, and they still **choose** that career.  I feel no pity.  That's like saying "Gosh, all those poor firefighters... every day fire is trying to kill them!".  Yeah.... it's kinda *part of the job*.  The job they *signed up for*.  Don't want to go to work at a job where somebody might try to kill you on a daily basis?  Can't handle that kind of stress?  Then go become a fucking accountant.    The only thing out of control are these fucking meat-head cops.
What she says is well known and 100% accurate, she explains in more detail here:-  **"Immunology does not study immunity. Immunology studies how the immune system responds to immunization—that is, to the injection of a “foreign” protein or particle (virus, bacteria). Immunologic research focuses mainly on the long-term changes that occur in immunologic organs and bodily fluids following immunization. Such changes are collectively referred to as “immunologic memory.”**
[deleted]
"ISIS" **is** the US.  Google ["ISIS CIA"](https://www.google.com/search?safe=off&amp;biw=1162&amp;bih=750&amp;noj=1&amp;site=webhp&amp;source=hp&amp;q=isis+cia) and dig for a couple hours.
ATS has been called out for the same BS as GLP
Holy shit dude. i really can't believe you with U/Sovereignman Cannot see through this collectivist coded language. 
&gt;  I dunno if you noticed but there are an awful lot of experts who have explained why the towers collapsed and they maintain that it was perfectly legitimite. I am aware that there are also experts who say that it would be impossible for them to collapse in the manner in which they did without the use of explosives. So you have experts on both sides of the debate.  See, and I happen to be in the camp where they obey the laws of the universe.   &gt; The whole point that I am trying to make is that arguing that the towers couldn't have fallen due to planes striking them is a fruitless effort. It is unnecessary.  Ah, that's where we disagree, I find the collapse very important in many aspects, is all. 
It's not safe for corporations or governments, I think that's what they mean. 
If you watch the whole video, from the multiple angles you can tell that the top section remains mostly intact until it hits the BT building.
We played a game with red markers when we were teenagers, where one person would try to tag the other, and the other would try to disarm them. It seemed to me at the time that if  you get in a fight with an attacker with a knife, you often have only one chance to stop them from stabbing you, and if you make a mistake you're getting stabbed multiple times.
Yup, fukushima. Cause its also birds, fish, sea lions washing up as well. But there is a huge media blackout about it
See, and I have learned from a child's age how to dig up useful information and how to process it to bring it into logical order under expert scrutiny.  Don't take my, or any expert's, word for it, but think about it for a minute. Never ever has something "collapsed", imploded, exploded, dustified, compressed in the very shape the Twins did. Hundreds have fallen like WTC7, though few as big and neatly. One you can do with a house of cards, the other you can't.   Don't go there if you don't want your brain fucked, because then you start thinking about other things too, and it has strange implications.   &gt; I get frustrated when I see communities of the supposedly critical-minded spin their wheels trying to support obscure theories that don't hold water when there's so much being perpetrated in the open every day by those in power. How much does it even matter exactly who did 9/11 or how if the end result is the same intractably authoritarian surveillance state waging an illegal global war for power and profit?  I agree, that's why I hold that 9/11 is the key to it all - with it came the Revenge of the Sith and back there were invasion wars for holy lands, torture, kangaroo courts, surveillance, systemic oppression, exploitation and psychological tyranny. If they can make you, an intelligent human, believe in the inevitability theory - how fucked is humanity as a whole? How do they even stand a chance against... whatever those psychopaths name themselves? They are good. But not _that_ good, it's all tricks, no true magic. 
Plausible. Less hideous than a larger-scale invasion.
Voat looks like it could have great potential. It's basically Reddit with a sleeker, nicer-looking design and more admin and mod transparency. What it needs are more active users, though. I love Voat in theory, but I keep ending up back on Reddit because it's simply more active.
Can we find a new home?  Is there not a geek among us who can lead us to the promised land? ie a new Reddit?  
And the notifications! "Hey, a friend of a friend shared this! Check it out and like it if you agree!". 
Oh wow i just realized the type person im arguing with after reading this comment. Either A. You are into some sketchy shit in life where maybe you really do need to be this safe. B. You are a complete paranoid nut. You have no phone and you recommend if anyone use a phone, make it a burner. Lol yes your average person lives in so much fear they need a burner. Yeah you totally don't need a facebook.
I'm not gonna bother coming down on different groups for standing up for something. Look i don't blame them. At least they're out there standing up against the powers that be for what they believe. I'd rather it was more inclusive but que sera. 
It still says it's a funding issue though.   &gt; Canberra has offered each state a one-time, lump-sum payment to take over the responsibility of financing remote Aboriginal communities indefinitely.  They are encouraging their state governments to take over the financing of the communities,  not threatening to literally bulldoze the land I think.   Decentralizing power is 100% against the NWO agenda, and actually proves my original point that the current government of Australia gives me hope.
Didn't this come around last year in April, I'm  not saying this isn't true but I found this http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2730616/No-room-beach-towel-BILLIONS-mysterious-jelly-fish-like-creatures-wash-beaches-west-coast-U-S.html
We are together in this(situation - both want the best for our countries)
[deleted]
One word: GREED
Lmao 
Unbelievable.Thank you for the link. So if I got it right? There is and there was a base set up before all this bullshit with "one way ticket to mars" ?  Edit : Man this thing gave me the exact feeling as the movie : The island .
choo chooooo... all aboard!
Random links. Whatever I saved.  FEMA  ran an exercise on December 14 2012 by Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, Emergency Services &amp; Homeland.    FEMA L-366 Planning for the Needs of Children in DisastersSecurity  http://www.ct.gov/demhs/ical/calendar.asp?mm=12&amp;yyyy=2012&amp;calendar_ID=0  Sandy Hook No Children http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_embedded&amp;v=7qFEsXAipaM  FBI Says No One Killed at Sandy Hook Agency publishes crime report showing "0" murders occurred in Newtown in 2012 http://www.infowars.com/fbi-says-no-one-killed-at-sandy-hook/   Sandy Hook questions. http://asheepnomore.net/2014/02/17/sandy-hook-game-changer-solid-new-evidence-cover-presented/  Sandy Hook, Game Over http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_embedded&amp;v=btD5qv7ZtBg  Sandy Hook Victims: Lottery Jackpots and Free Homes – Two Unusual Clues Unearthed in Newtown  http://21stcenturywire.com/2014/02/18/sandy-hook-victims-lottery-jackpots-  Breakng News MUST WATCH Raw Helicopter Footage Before The Fake Sandy Hook Shooting Started  http://www.disclose.tv/action/viewvideo/120826/Breakng_News_MUST_WATCH__Raw_Helicopter_Footage_Before_The_Fake_Sandy_Hook_Shooting_Started/#DTV 
Fucking terrifying. Any suspected cause yet?
Oh, the irony. It burns. 
[deleted]
A million different lifestyles are available to you.  "The evil that runs our world today" is a bit of a myth.  You can live in nature if you wish, but be prepared for sacrifices.  Farming is not easy.  There are reasons people like air-conditioning, refrigeration, cars, office jobs, etc.
He won't be elected because they'll see to it that the media shapes the national dialogue around someone else; they'll steal the vote by screwing with the vote counts; and if he manages somehow to win, they'll just kennedy him.    No Eisenhower did it right--he waited to his very last speech to narc out the military-intelligence-industrial complex.  Kennedy talked about planning to nerf them, he got shot for it.  Then they killed the rest of his family while they were at it, as they has similar agendas.  Any time you are in a powerful office and you say, 'hey guys, lets just pack up and go home from this war and shrink the budget of the military (and therefore the intelligence community, defence research, dept of energy, etc)'  you get removed one way or another.  Semen on a dress, necktie around the neck in a hotel room with a hand full of vaseline, or a shot in the head.
I heard this in Toronto too a couple of months ago
To be fair, there's already a sub that deals with real, fact-based conspiracies (r/actualconspiracies) and anything that's fact-based and isn't a conspiracy doesn't belong here. So what happens is that a lot of stuff just gets made up so it can be discussed. Otherwise, it'd be a very barren subreddit.   This isn't r/science or anything. It's mostly just a hobby sub. 
Go off-grid and help others do the same, if they're interested. Think of good ways to make life off-grid enjoyable...the Tesla Powerwall will be huge in this movement.  When it comes down to it, personal and spiritual strength is key. Learn survival skills, learn manufacturing and machining skills (blacksmithing is a great starting point), and start learning how to camp effectively. Maybe buy a small plot of land as a getaway spot, where you can set up hidden caches of supplies and secret hiding places in the area. Have fun with it while you can.
People have forgotten about God.
or just vote with your own money and spend it at local independent stores instead of corporations.  after all WE are the dollars and cents, the pounds and pence, there are methods we can use...
It's sad to see that this is still going on.
&gt; ...suggesting the longer the tracking lasts, the worse it is constitutionally.    in this instance, the only reason the tracking ceased was because the plaintiff detected the device
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;My personal anecdote goes against this reproducible evidence. I am so afraid of marginalization that I will marginalize others.
Try and keep a level head man.  We need to keep the moral high ground, it will benefit the movement in the long run.  
Okay, I'll start. Jade Helm isn't martial law, it's prep incase martial law becomes a situation required. I see your down votes, but no comments. Come on peeps, bring it or leave it, but if all you got is a dv and silence, you know you're my bitch, right? How's that for testing what can and can't be said. Punk ass haters. Speak up or GTFO
[deleted]
I'm not interested in baby-sitting people who don't can't do their own calculations.  You rant and you rave, but you don't math, so why the fuck would I help you out?  I don't like your kind around, anywhere.   
He may look funny, but he is not doing the jews any favors by what he says. Especially since so many people are listening to him and taking him serious as they learn from him. 
What's sad about that schoolyard logic being turned on it's head is that the reason we told children that words would not hurt them was to help them steel themselves against psychological damage, to help them be stronger.  Now we encourage the weakness and the victim mentality while trying to eliminate all possible sources of harm. Protection of people to this extent creates dependence and the inability to deal with any adversity.
Check out this list of banned words.  The idea of a gamerghazi mod in collaboration with a history sub mod.  [Imgur](http://i.imgur.com/3qAsoZu.png)
COOL
It sounds doubleplusgood to me
&gt;the 180 mile stretch of rail would form an arc with the center point at Birmingham raising a full 5,400 feet above London and Liverpool. Adding the station's actual height (240 feet) to its theoretical inclination (5,400 feet) gives 5,640 feet as the rail's necessary height on a globe Earth, more than a thousand feet taller than Ben Nevis  This is satire, right?
Disinformation was not the only thing I did, but it was a component of the security that I helped provide. I am retired now, and no longer disinform.
We're through the looking glass here, people.
Interesting, when did that occur I wonder. 
Sorry, I fixed it.
Whatever. 
the lighting "anomalies" in this photo can be explained, yes.  
Anti-gravity and  Electro-Magnetism (ELI5 how does it work) ?  Basic principles ? Prototypes ? working models ? who is doing research ?  What counter-intelligence information is disseminated (on that topic) and why ?
Race Pride is the problem. Why take pride in something you have literally no control over, yet somehow elevates you above your peers? 
The anti-grav disinformation dates back to the early 50's based on a joint collaboration between MI6 and CIA based on an even early scheme run by the CIG and alumni of X-2 from WWII. Its purpose was originally part of a disinfo scheme aimed at the soviet union to convince them that we had high altitude intercontinental craft with the capability of carrying nuclear payload, essentially an unstoppable weapon at that time. That disinfo scheme has since been absorbed into other disinfo schemes aimed at different players.
Nothing specific then huh, can't say I'm shocked what with all your blustery dismissals.
Funny how that was posted 18 hours ago yet her reply from an hour ago is the top rated comment and all comments challenging her are downvoted.
  &gt;Do you have anything that's not from NASA or a NASA affiliated agency? Do you have anything independently reproducible?  http://farm7.staticflickr.com/6235/6394252219_a2380ef026.jpg skyscraper in the desert.   http://www.jamesnixon.com/files/img_5345.jpg dubai from the airplane   
Don't you know, according to OP, you're just regurgitating NASA lies. It's all a big plot so that some coalition of armies can control a giant ring of ice for the purpose of living through global warming. Everyone knows this and all the coolest hobbits and elfin people are there. 
Considering you dismiss anything that doesn't support your beliefs? No I won't bother.  
( this) could only be the case if Apollo 16’s rover footage was filmed in a vacuum. A vacuum like you'd find on the lunar surface, for example, which couldn't exist on a sound stage on Earth. http://www.nasa.gov/multimedia/imagegallery/image_feature_1281.html
[deleted]
God seriously you've been given 10 examples and come up with more crazy bullshit to ignore every single one. People like you give every other human on earth a bad name. 
His policy towards Palestine is nothing new, that's certain.   He tells his constituents to shut up when they disagree with him.   What's his feelings about the official 9/11 story?   Does he think Lee Oswald shot JFK?  Does he think Sirhan Sirhan killed RFK? Does he believe James Earl Ray killed MLK?   If he is anti establishment, does he think "they" won't assassinate him? 
Israel's allies dont support them because they are good at lying. Israel's allies support them because they believe in the same values. That was the whole reason behind 9/11. Al Qaeda was trying to punish US for its support of Israel.
&gt; If the Earth were a sphere, airplane pilots would have to constantly correct their altitudes downwards so as to not fly straight off into "outer space"!  i remember asking this question in 5th grade
Thanks!
Which is not true.
Keep posting as you get more info. 
Yep, I'll try to see what else I can get. Here's another one.   http://i.imgur.com/Ry1DSyb.jpg
Sure they do, kid. 
"This is the U.S.A."  what is? the world? nope. Twitter only serves Americans? nope.  
Wrong sub.
It seems what your implying is that what ever "reality" is doesn't change regardless of beliefs or anything.  So I'm just saying that this notion that reality is objective and doesn't change from the perspective it's viewed from is not always true, and in special relativity it's definitely not true as the whole notion of objectivity is undermined.
Please no
There are some legitimate things on this sub. Then people who believe in a flat earth spoil it.   Another problem with this sub is that it is prime recruiting ground for nazi groups. 
interesting, y? 
I have a theory.  I believe this sound may be caused by one of those massive (thousands of tons) tunnel boring machines that they use to drill subways and other tunnels.    These machines operate deep underground.  As the drill cuts easily through soft material, it may not make any noise, but when it meets resistance from hard material, it causes the drill to grind and vibrate.  The sounds from these vibrations reverberate through the tunnel, and possible through ventilation shafts, all the way up to the surface, much like how a horn reverberates the sound through it's pipes.  The result is this bellowing horn sound.    The exact properties of the sound in this case would depend on the shape and length of the tunnel, intensity of the vibrations/resistance, RPM of the machine, etc.    To prove this theory, I would investigate whether they may be drilling any new tunnels for whatever reason in your area.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tunnel_boring_machine
[deleted]
never whistle while you're pissing
 the concept of ama. an honest one. meh.
I'm an old boiler guy
Yes but do you really think climate change is "the coming storm"?  Flashbacks to when W. started talking about Gog and Magog?
No, I genuinely don't give a fuck. Apathy. I just come here high sometimes and post, mainly for shits and giggles. 
I've been sitting here reading most of this post, along with the links and I keep having one thought flowing around in my head: why the fuck does it matter? I mean, so what if they make up someone asking a question? It's most likely a good question that no one has thought to ask yet, but would be very well received if answered. I mean, I get that there is a lot of shady stuff to this site, I do. But, it seems like half of you guys are just trying to find anything possible to point to. That doesn't matter though. It's totally fine, and I respect you trying to be the watchdogs of Reddit. But, seriously.. I feel like Victoria making up a question just to answer it is a very small thing to pick at even if it does happen. 
You genuinely do. Because you're here. Giving a fuck. Not backing up your claims of "truth web pages with their quackery, pseudo science and sometimes downright lunacy."   You're just afraid to state that you believe the official story / NIST. Because you aren't actually educated on the matter. And you're afraid that I might be. And you don't want to be embarrassed by someone who you are trying to mock. It's OK. You can admit it. It's obvious whether or not you are brave enough to agree.
[deleted]
The article is poorly constructed, I agree. But, it's true.   **The American Institute of Architects (AIA) Finalized Resolution 15-6:** *To cause the AIA to adopt a Position Statement in support of a new investigation into the complete collapse of 7 World Trade Center on September 11, 2001.*  &gt; "Thousands of members of the architecture and engineering professions, including 55 sponsors of this resolution, believe the NIST investigation did not adhere to the principles of the scientific method and as a result the conclusions of the NIST investigation are fatally flawed."  Source: http://www.aia.org/aiaucmp/groups/aia/documents/pdf/aiab105884.pdf 
You know, to make sure were all safe. 
"A sperm cell." Is a good answer.
Do you realize that each piece of track they lay is much much much much shorter than a mile?  Just looked it up. They're usually about 15 feet long
[deleted]
This:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3m5qxZm_JqM
/u/trollabot bulgogi1970
Anyone can go to Antarctica.  They even have openings for dishwashers.  http://www.usap.gov/jobsAndOpportunities/
[deleted]
[deleted]
Cue the Genocide Princess on the right in the photo!   Yep! Her!  The children in Gaza are Snakes...  
Check this. She will win the case. Supreme Court : You cannot be detained  for a K9 unit to come.  BOOM ! I hope that guy gets raped 100 times in a day for his rest of his time in jail. 
&gt; spammy with it.  Wow, 3 whole comments on the Ruffalo AMA. One in response to the shady question, one in response to Victoria, and one in response to a random user.   If that's your definition and understanding of the word spam, I'm curious.. do you just try to make words fit what you want, or do you think you're using the same lexicon as everyone else?
Russia is there, in fact (13 below the US on the table). But interestingly the UK and France are not, although I suspect they would both be fairly low on the table. Personally, I think it's a bit 3rd world for citizens to be overly proud of their country.
[deleted]
It was my understanding that OP didn't ask about exorcists, the religion posts were made by others posting their suggestion. The voices are there, and silencing them using medication manufactured by a government trying to control its citizens might not be in OP's best interests. Neither is an exorcist, but turning to drugs off the bat is not the correct approach, as those drugs can not be trusted to do what they say they do.   I know I sound paranoid and crazy (rest assured I am not), but this is how diligent we need to be in order to notice and fight against governmental overreach. People are far too comfortable to claim that they are free.
I'm not afraid of Jews.  I'm afraid of Romney and the Mormons.
Soooo... Are they paid off and part of the conspiracy also? I'm just curious as to what excuse you will use when any idea od controlled demolition is dismissed *again*..
I think you need some new talking points from your church. These don't even make sense.
Jesus was never here. Yahshua was Yahweh manifested in a physycal prepared sacrificial body. To fulfill all things and to defeat death and the grave. To pour out his spirit on all flesh so they might have his law within them (we've nick named his still small voice "The Conscience").   You are right. Its crazy to think that an all forgiving father would torment you eternally. Its such a contradiction its a sad for anyone to and stupid also to believe that. It was a twist by roman to add the redition of Hades, hell, to the bible. The scripture has only ever said Sheol(the grave) or Gehenna  a garbage dump outside of Jerusalem that was always on fire. You threw trash in and it returned to its base substance or it returned to where it came (dust to dust ashes to ashes). Are you a precious gift to be preserved or are you trash to burn? Do you Love or do you Fear. Yahweh Elohim Yahshua is the truth Call on him and HE WILL ANSWER. Thats a gurantee.
theyve been doing that in sparks they flew so low to us me and my wife ran with the baby because the smoky smog was falling direcrly on us....
Oh absolutely. 
You shouldn't hate the Hebrews, you should hate the Zionists.  And if you need a reason why and not because they rule the world or have to much money, how about because they stole land from Palestine and went to war with Britain while most of their army was off fighting the Nazis. Pretty fucked up move if you ask me, especially with the horrid light they shine on the Palestinians  http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jewish_insurgency_in_Palestine  
Look at Apollo 12 landing footage. They kicked up a hell of a huge amount of dust.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kFSa6vUix70
FRBs are not "unidentified". It's aliens opening their microwave ovens too soon
this is kind of looney, most gang stalking videos are paranoid schizophrenics 
There won't be a Smithsonian in the next decade or two.
I haven't found a more reliable nor more popular discussion of sources on the internet than on /r/conspiracy. The other message boards I used to visit have become overrun by memes and pointless political debates like the rest of social media. 
We've been warned about this over and over but now its here in full force. What saddens me the most are the ones that follow this power structure and only see it one way.   For instance. They can spy on us all willy-nilly in the name of "fear / terrorism / lies" but we can NEVER (peek inside) to what the power structure is doing or thinking!   I just don't understand why people can't understand this basic fact. Its also the endless amount of "double-speak" that blows me away plus the level of propaganda being spewed has and is out of control.   If you go against this "power structure" they shame you. So childish!
&gt;he says: "When I'm in class, I'll wish I was playing World of Warcraft. "  ain't that simple? Games are way more visually stimulating than a chalk board. Add in that school gives less reward for more work while having partly retarded rules and it's not even close to competitive on a reward basis. The only thing better about school are your real live friends, social interaction is also a reward. That however kinda got substituted with all the kids hanging arround facebook.  lastly that dude apparently hasn't researched what kids play. It's not world of warcraft. That's mostly for old people nowadays. 
One search on Google for "hipster neckbeard" or "white knight" proves this guys theory beyond a shadow of a doubt.  It's like 90% of all twenty-something guys (and younger) are pusillanimous wastes of space.
&gt;I actually thought you were joking  Please explain to me what reason you have to had thought that I was joking.
I linked figures explaining my math. Please explain with figures and equations how "the drop is constant" because you can't measure a linear constant drop on a curved spherical surface as far as I know.  And if you could please include your calculations for how you calculated 8 inches of constant drop, because the 8 inches I calculated is not constant at all but varies inversely with the square of the mile.  I am extremely interested in this and very serious; if you mock me and fail to provide any of the figures or equations I will be forced to assume that is because they don't exist because your calculations are incorrect.
propaganda appeals and is targeted to the most ignorant of society...
What you are saying is true. I wonder how Saudi gets away with all that misogyny. But then I think, those Saudis may very well be following the [Talmud.]( http://www.ynetnews.com/articles/0,7340,L-4494074,00.html)
[deleted]
If only Iran would stop persecuting Baha'is and other religious minorities. 
Not saying there's anything wrong with it.  Just pointing out that there are distinguishable enough restrictions to rightly make the claim that zimmis are second-class citizens.
They do after a huge plane flies into them and damages the structural integrity of the building. What about that don't you understand? Lol you keep the same canned response at the end. Its hilarious. You have no proof. Please stop pretending. 
at least those guys seem to have a great sense of humor :-)
&gt; Spherical trigonometry dictates that if the Earth was a globe with the given curvature of 8 inches per mile squared.    Learn to read before you call it nonsense, and you are obviously the one who can't grasp the math.  It's 8 inches x miles SQUARED.  That means at 28 miles it would be 28x28 = 784 x 8 = 6272 inches or 523 feet  523ft -194ft (elevation) 329 ft   then I think that they factored in the "candlelight power" of the light and it would still be 190ft below the horizon.  On a ball earth at an elevation of 325 ft, you can only see the horizon at 24 miles.    Edit: instant downvote just because I pointed out that you did the math wrong?
http://www.answering-islam.org/NonMuslims/rights.htm  One example:  *Zimmis are not allowed to join the army unless there is indispensable need for them in which case they are not allowed to assume leadership positions but are considered mercenaries*
&gt; 8 inches per mile x 28 miles = 18 feet 8 inches.  Haha that's not the formula!!  It's miles squared!   For every upvote you get It shows how people can not think for themselves and would rather keep their heads in the sand.
Gee, they sure spend a lot of money on Network TV commercials advertising how awesome they are.
I graduated high school last year and was taught extensively about Tesla. His works, how Edison ripped him off, how he evidently revolutionized the kind of power we get on a regular basis. 
Spare some of your righteous indignation for the politicians who constantly make claims which turn out to be false.  Invasion of Iraq will stabilize the region:  http://www.nytimes.com/2015/02/26/world/middleeast/kerry-reminds-congress-netanyahu-advised-us-to-invade-iraq.html?_r=0  New government will be more transparent:  http://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/monkey-cage/wp/2015/03/16/has-obama-delivered-the-most-transparent-administration-in-history/  If you burn through those really quick let me know and I will send you some more examples.
Poor people are losers, rich people are winners; suck it up losers! &lt;--that's what you sound like
We are already in midst of WWIII, but we do not recognize the weapons of modern warfare.
So do you understand now why the helicopter will still land in the same spot? 
Not for long.  All of their oil wealth is belong to us. 
There are a lot of good people in Israel, the problem is there whole poltical systems is a mess. The right wing racist part of that country only get like 30% of the vote but that is enough to rule I guess. 
It's a game of numbers to the cop, one guy actually stands up to him,fuck it coffee time any-ways.  The other thousand people he pulls this shit on this month will roll over and beg. 
12 months is my longest window prediction. 
Apparently the dispersal agent was worse than just leaving shit be.
If the cop was willing to walk away and give up so easily, then yeah, he probably is a scumbag.   If he had any probable cause, he could have stopped the guy at that point, but since he didn't, it's pretty safe to assume he was just trying to harass the guy.  And yeah, maybe the guy filming was trying to harass him, but a cop should be better than that.
my account is not 19 hours old, why do you consistently post unsubstantiated garbage?
They must be releasing the video tapes from 9/11.
That's BS. beta-glucosidase is NOT at all exclusive to cancer cells. Without it our digestive system wouldn't function.    
pretty much
Technically speaking..I would have expected an innocent bystander to be recording it incognito and the video to surface once the officers were free of all wrongdoing after their own department investigated itself and without dueprocess decided it was innocent.
It's advertising to a demographic. 18-30 year old males 
*you must be a professor*
You know where the world headquarters of Baha'i is now, since it was driven out of Iran?  [Israel.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bah%C3%A1%27%C3%AD_World_Centre)
I'm thinking it's more likely that the US government has given explicit orders to Facebook and Twitter to keep ISIS posts alive, so they can track the network and go after US civilians who may "support" their cause. I think it's a honey pot, essentially, to arrest political dissidents.
Took me a while to figure out that you were talking about 'those' Indians.
[deleted]
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mNFSrJSR9Ec   so you don't wonder why this guy isn't fronting a Nirvana reunion?  'n what was supposed to be the "best kept music secret of 2008," an official press release leaked earlier this morning, reporting that Weezer's Rivers Cuomo would join Dave Grohl and Krist Novoselic for a Nirvana reunion at this month's Coachella Music Festival (Indio, CA), as well as a headlining slot at this summer's annual Lollapalooza Music Festival (Chicago, IL). (left to right: Cuomo, Novoselic, and Grohl will play as Nirvana at this year's Coachella and Lollapalooza)...'  http://www.ifc.com/fix/2008/04/nirvana-to-play-coachella-with  would love to hear those rehearsal tapes.. don't know why they didn't go through with it.  
Seems to me past historical figures who today would be called "SJWs" include Martin Luther King, Ralph Nader &amp; Gandhi.  Mark Twain was a member of the [Anti-Imperialist League](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_Anti-Imperialist_League).  Anyone opposed to slavery?  [SJW](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_abolitionists).  "SJW" is a re-packaging of the term "Political Correctness" which was basically the same epithet.  Jesus Christ would have been considered a massive SJW.  Even if the story was fiction, the alleged reason he was crucified was for being an SJW.
&gt; The word SJW is now associated with people who are manipulative, spiteful, and who generally have an authoritative viewpoint.  According to you.  And according to those who intend to smear the phrase and its origins and any type of protest that isn't Tea Party/gun protest.  Notice you never hear pro-gun protesters called "SJWs".  Aren't they also protesting for justice?  "SJW" is intended to be a smear against one part of the political spectrum.  Otherwise, why not just use the word "authoritarian" which covers members of the entire political spectrum?
To put this all as simply as possible.  The system is not broken, but working exactly as it was designed.  The thing that freaks me out the most is not this fact, but the common person who is pushing for "the end of days".   I am very spiritual, and enjoy talking religion with people. But the ache for everything ending coming from christian groups is chilling.  Look forward to self fullfilled prophecies.
oh dear, i got bad news for you son. only bleached skinned folks have a place in Rothschilds world. this being evident when looking at both Africa and South America and western cultures reluctance to give a good goddamn shit about anyone in them. and the treatment and brainwashing of the African American population courtesy of gangsta rap. The popularisation and self identifying use of the word Nigger has only served to convince the black population that they are a seperate people, even in their own eyes.   Oh dear youre an immigrant, or as the government\media would put it,an 'Illegal Alien' Two words that serve to criminalise and dehumanise on the most basic of levels.   (Im Australian, and i still identify more with African Americans that those whiteys that are running the joint)
Dude, you're so deep in an Egyptian river, if you can't see yourself how heart-wrenchingly stupid that is you just wrote nothing in the world can help you.   I'll make it short: SEVENTH post in a row and you have just been stealing everyone's time and did not provide proof or evidence, a model or experiment, a study or example of ANYTHING at ANY SCALE collapsing from top to bottom - except the very thing in question.
[Only the written form. Before that it was referred to as the "Oral Tradition."] (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Talmud#History)  [For further information see this link.] (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oral_Torah)
[deleted]
That made me laugh the hardest I have laughed all day. Great work there, keep it up 
 http://www.abc.net.au/news/2015-05-10/riots-erupt-in-london-against-re-election-of-david-cameron/6458098
Out of curiosity, why is that more likely than him not existing at all, or being a fabrication of man?
That almost attack really freaked me out. I graduated at that centre last year.
What can you expect from a divorced mormon on a weird diet 
Bernie Sanders has a deeeep throat
&gt; Notice how none of them could imagine it exploding hours afterwards.  Everyone knew it, why spell out the obvious and inevitable? /s
I agree. But they're going to do that shit anyway. Might as well take the weed. 
well then.... no conspiracy here folks!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I think this sub has a pretty huge population of leftists (anarchists, socialist, etc) that just don't post much. Its like when you see a news article online and all the comments are right wing racist nut jobs, those aren't the only people reading it, they're just the commenters.  Why would leftists like Bernie? Glad you asked!  http://ontheissues.org/Bernie_Sanders.htm
But you want everyone to conform to your agenda.  Can you not see the hypocrisy?
[Sheldon Adelson bribed Chinese officials to get his casino in Macau](http://mediamatters.org/blog/2014/03/31/bribery-money-laundering-and-islamaphobia-the-s/198684)
Wait I dont understand. Nike said they could possibly  bring about 10 thousand jobs to America if the TPP passes....can't  they already do that now?! They're  just choosing not to because of the insanely  cheap slave labor they get in other countries? I feel like they are only willing to bring jobs back to America if there is some secret bull shit behind it. And doesn't  anybody think its weird we have corporations almost advertising for the president? Its so blatantly  obvious  that corporations have quite honestly  infiltrated our government yet nothing is being done about it.
There is just no way to prove yet scientifically if there are super intelligent beings that exist in our dimension or other dimensions who are capable of creation on a grand scale. Yet we see in nature that ants are like gods to simple single celled bacteria, then what are humans to ants, then what would be other-dimensional beings who make us look like ants.  Easily an ant-like human would be able in some way to come across some massive being and think it is God
We deserve the world we get right? Well we fucked it up so we deserve to burn with it. 
Organic food, fresh air at their country estates, clean filtered water, and they avoid psychotropic medication just like they avoid vaccines.  They also tend to purchase long lasting luxury goods instead of the array of cheap disposable plastics that surround the average person.
too busy donating money to people in palestine so they can eat
Not completely sure. I thought I had heard something to that effect some years ago.  But you are right, it does make a big difference. I will edit. 
Well, that should be a wonderful mix of propagandists and shills.   I think I'll pass on asking the nouveau Nazi anything. 
He's been saying this kind of shit his entire career. Look here to see:  http://ontheissues.org/Bernie_Sanders.htm
I'm not in the least delusional.  I'm realistic and know how to manage my expectations when it comes to our legislative processes.    Remember your history?  Women's Suffrage?  African-American Civil Rights?  Gay Civil Rights?  The Affordable Care Act?  These accomplishments were won over a long struggle and legislative process.  Real, positive, non-violent change takes time.    I understand you're frustrated with our political processes (as most of the country is), but we can't let that frustration turn into anger, pessimism, or apathy.  Being any one of those things is not conducive or constructive if you want to have a sincere and serious discussion about our nation's problems and potential solutions.
Just watching CNN and reading between the lines, it's right in our face what is coming. 
&gt;Because so much of what it teaches today is not how Jesus lived.   Therein lies the problem. That is what needs to be taught
That was offensive to my sense of hearing. 
Can we pick none of the above?
More golden boxes full of shit. 
Look at the photo: http://grin.hq.nasa.gov/IMAGES/SMALL/GPN-2001-000013.jpg  The circle of light he is standing in is exactly what we would see if a hanging spotlight were used. The circle of light was not edited into the picture to make it look more dramatic. And the effects you are talking about would make a circle on the PHOTO, not on the GROUND of the photo.  
It takes far more ego to assert something without having evidence than it does to ask someone to think critically in a less than polite manner. You can't turn it around and try to portray me as the bad guy. You're the one claiming people who you don't even know and have no association with are pedophiles. That's an incredibly egocentric, ignorant, and disturbing thing to do. I believe people are innocent until PROVEN guilty. If you don't believe in that, then you don't believe in liberty and justice. 
&gt;, moreover Stalin's army was nothing more than poor people forced to fight for fear of execution  In trying to paint an accurate picture of history, one should repeate falsehoods
&gt;Section 5 of the bill specifically prohibits "any entity included on the Too Big To Fail List that is an insured depository institution, or owns such an institution" from using insured deposits for such activity, which means the prohibition does not apply to entities not on the list.  Can I get a source for this please?
yeah at this point you have confirmed you are completely batshit.
Thanks
lol I've never met anyone in 36 years that thinks the government is "good and pure"
[deleted]
State of the Union this morning, they were discussing the Texas event and how the FBI knew about Elton Simpson.    They discussed why the FBI missed public messages.  They talked about being overwhelmed, etc.    Basically, they talked about how the Internet is too big for them be able to monitor those who are supposed to be monitored.    It seemed pretty right in the face to me. But, I know my husband never notices things like that.  So, maybe I'm nuts?  LOL Hope that makes sense. 
Oh I definitely think PATRIOT Act and Citizen's United need to take precedence of martial law concerns.  But I also think it's worth expending some energy keeping an eye on that front.  If there was another big attack, people might be more willing to live under curfew than you'd think.
Yeah, that's plausible.  Thanks for making the effort to post the links.
Hello Smith.   Your seem to appear when there are discussions about the Federal Reserve, the Rothschild Family and the Kennedy Assassination . Did I leave any out?  So on a warm sunny day in Texas, a man dresses in all black and holds a black umbrella for a silent protest against the President's father for something a British Prime Minister did 24 years before. This happens to take place THE EXACT SECOND In THE EXACT PLACE that the President is assassinated.   Here are the guys actual words when he testified about it:  "Mr. WITT. . . . It had something to do with . . . when the senior Mr. Kennedy was Ambassador to England, and the Prime Minister [Neville Chamberlain], some activity they had had in appeasing Hitler. The umbrella that the Prime Minister of England came back with got to be a symbol in some manner with the British people. By association, it got transferred ot the Kennedy family, and, as I understood, it was a sore spot with the Kennedy family, like I said, in coffee break conversations someone had mentioned, I think it is one of the towns in Arizona, it is Tucson or Phoenix, that someone had been out at the airport or some place where some members of the Kennedy family came through and they were rather irritated by the fact that they were brandishing the umbrellas. This is how the idea sort of got stuck in my mind. . . . This was in a conversation somewhere at work. I wish that I could remember now who brought the subject up and put this idea in my head. I am sure that I would have taken that umbrella and clouted him over the head somewhere in this last 2 or 3 weeks."  I have seen 5 year olds come up with better stories. This is a crackpot explanation.  
Obviously a fake.  We all know that buildings collapse if a plane hits them....  This link has a recording of the actual impact- http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=92987873
what does 7/7 have to do with 11?
Given the disparities along racial lines, you have to wonder if this actually has more to do with diet.
No. International bankers didn't come over for a BBQ with Hitler and handed him a briefcase. Prescott Bush funded an American front connected to Fritz Thyssen's steel corporation. An old-school capitalist, much like Ford, who wanted to make a worthy buck off a redeveloping nation. It would have been impossible to directly "finance" and just "hand over" money, considering it was useless because Germany had a non-transferable currency to prevent international swindling. And if a currency is worthless globally, and you have massive subsidies, hence the bartering system.  I didn't know legitimately investing in an economy which was back on its feet was evil, but I guess with NS Germany it was. And I suppose it was also taboo because this was direct investment into the German economy, and not international speculation. The horror....  The Germans tried to do some bartering with the Americans more than once. For instance, Germany tried to acquire some helium to use in their new line of Zeppelins, and offered to trade with USA because of their massive world monopoly on the gas. The Americans refused, partly because of political reasons and the International bankers detested Germany's new economy that broke their stranglehold, so they used hydrogen. 
[deleted]
Just checking in to make sure everybody here knows that there is a theory that Bush Sr. was born in Germany, and there is some compelling evidence which supports that. Not going to post links, just search it.
The Talmud is *debates.* Although the last opinion cited is often the one followed as settled law, that's not always the case.  There is the Written Law (the Torah) which is clearly a summary and outline, and not to be taken literally; the Oral Law (the Mishneh Torah) which by tradition was given to Moses at Mount Sinai, which is interpreted in the Talmud. Actual practice is set down by Rabbinic tradition, which is codified in the Shulcan Aruch ("Set Table") for Sephardic Jews, and which is further amended and adjusted for Ashkenazic practice by the Mishna Brura. That's why we say, "as a qualified Rav." And that's why a degree in Rabbinic Studies, or Semicha, takes about 12 years of study, and why only a few Rabbis are qualified to actually set precedent and practice.
And look what happened to him. It's a damn shame we lost one of the greatest generals this world has seen early. He respected enemy generals and his troops would follow him to hell and back.
Broadly yes, although I would attribute different probabilities of "fakeness" to each of those. But surely you're not claiming that NASA "has done **nothing** of substance" (sic) apart from this little list?      
That their conclusion doesn't match their data at all. This is shitty science.  If I saw more DNA damage in rich hispanic people than poor, and poor white people showing more DNA damage than poor black, I wouldn't say, "oh, well, obviously, dealing with the stress of racism is the cause of this DNA degradation," I would say, "What is different? What are they *doing* differently? How far apart were they to begin with? And what the eff are they EATING?"
That's a burly claim.  &gt;So-called skeptics are basically conspiracy theorists that gave up when their questions were left unanswered...  I don't agree with anything you've said except that asking questions is good.
And I wouldn't write off that you could be in contact with OP; and/or doing this on purpose. Ask a legitimate question, the first thing people see is your BS. 
"hundreds of thousands"  Merridale, Catherine (2002). Night of Stone: Death and Memory in Twentieth-Century Russia. London: Penguin. ISBN 0-14-200063-9. 
Holy fuck. Imagine how much money you could make if you could only just cure the fucking disease. The patent holders on the cure would make 100's of billions of dollars. No one would withhold such a thing.
[deleted]
Pretty sure USAma Bin Laden/Tim Osman was dead long before Obama got to the White House. 
[deleted]
When was the Fed established?  And when was it dismantled?
This is horrible
If a "cure" did exist, it wouldn't be like some magic pill that you swallow and suddenly you're whole again. Different types of cancer, different treatments. For more serious cases, the dosage would be higher. Charge by the milliliter. Then proceed to Scrooge McDuck your way through the mountain of cash you will make.  Here's some more real-world common sense. Wouldn't the same apply to aspirin and other medications? Why should they release something that cures ails in a few dosages when they can get you to keep buying weaker medicine? Actually, fuck that, why release anything that works when you can just peddle vials of snake oil and charge a fortune?  You see, if what you were saying were actually true, then chemotherapy would have a much lower success rate than what currently exists. Your logic doesn't quite line up with reality. I applaud you for trying to think differently and not accepting everything you hear as gospel, but some theories reek of bullshit.
In most first world countries, chemotherapy is paid for by some sort of healthcare program. For example, here in New Zealand, a friend of mine was diagnosed with cancer. She never had to pay a cent for her treatment, and I imagine that the ACC didn't bankrupt themselves on her treatment, so your three questions fall flat.  &gt;Rich people don't get cancer  Google "celebrity cancer survivors". Most of these people are worth dozens, if not hundreds of millions of dollars. [So... umm... you're wrong.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WrjwaqZfjIY)
accuracy of what !?  its about the literal arrival timing of individual photons into a photo-multiplier-detector, not what colour or sound they make...
Dude needs a raise.
Only for the headstrong.
[deleted]
My bad man, my apologies.
Meditate. It's key for strengthening your mind and expanding your consciousness to include other ways of thinking. Plus you feel great after!
Not addressing anything I said, or just blindly angry ?  I can't tell.
&gt;The new DSM considers conspiracy theorists to be mentally ill  Haha I remember that hoax story. Thought it died out after a couple reposts here debunking it. 
&gt; the mission of the police force (is) to protect the citizens against violent offenders  Well, it was 50 or 60 years ago... at least, a little.
I only recall one passport being found.
The strong hand of Technocratic Dictatorship strikes down Free Speech in favour of Politically Correct Slave Speak.  Double Plus Bad!
[deleted]
Considering there is a sub already specifically to call out this sub and it's members(posters) as anti-Semitic and racist for telling the truth, I call this as a move pushed by "The Jews that say they are Jews but are not."  http://www.reddit.com/r/isrconspiracyracist/search?q=conspiracy+semitic&amp;sort=relevance&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=all  
you don't get it
There was something a few yrs back that allowed indefinite detention of americans without crime. I think it might have been an Obama exec order NDAA
they make up 2% of the Canadian populace and should be essentially irrelevant to the country and its laws.  they condemn mulsim people every day and should lock themselves in jail for hypocrisy.  no tolerance? quit hating arab people you fucking bigots.
Explain your case. I'm done with back and forth empty banter. Explain your case using strict science, if not then don't reply. And you wonder why most of the scientific community and the general public don't take you people seriously. If you had a strong case, you wouldn't be wasting your time with a bunch of empty banter. If there is no math and no science, don't reply.
The thing about this is, it totally doesn't jive with the "conspiracies" I've read about what really happened. I mean, was OBL even alive? This report says he was indeed alive and living at the compound. So it feels like disinfo designed to get people confused... Just like the Saudi/911 link... Government "leaks" docs/info claiming 911 story isn't true, but hints that it just has to do with Saudis (no mention of controlled demo). So again, just feels like disinfo/distraction to the "real" conspiracy/truth/whatever.
Wonder if Amaz*n Prime will make my 11:00 delivery of a dozen foil boxes. Oh wait, cyber not EMP? Well I'm fucked.
Boycott any other country and you would be expressing your rights. Boycott Israel and you should be lynched immediately for anti-semitism.  
Serene Shim deserves a higher quality .jpg
I'm not distracted, hence why i am asking the question. Sometimes its nice to find out how deep people go with their thoughts. Responses to questions like this can be telling about the upper and lower limits of analysis people are willing to go to get the truth. It makes it easier to identify those who follow the crowd, and those that actively question everything. Even their own thoughts.
This Week in the Creeping Horror...  By Aaron &amp; Melissa Dykes | Published on May 10, 2015  We start off with our recurring news segment, THIS WEEK IN THE CREEPING HORROR.   You know, the Baltimore riots that George Soros paid for went off without a hitch to further federalize our police, and a lot of people spent an inordinate amount of time talking about Bruce Jenner’s makeup for some reason like it matters to them and their personal lives.  Aaron goes live on location where a child has been black bagged and a school was locked down by SWAT for simply thinking about a gun.   Yes, a deadly, horrible, evil thought crime indeed!  Then we hit the streets to take part in an Austin “art” project where we can use our smart phones hooked to the Internet of Things to “wake up” and talk to smart “street furniture” like lamp posts, smart meters, and parking meters that want us to inform on people parked badly…  Finally, we announced the Name Hillary’s Pathology Contest (more details coming ASAP). Watch episode below:  https://youtu.be/zY9p9unyjKE
What did you have?
[deleted]
Rule 1. Removed. This is your only warning.
Hey guys! With the information in this thread in mind, now's the perfect time to start your own garden! Not only is it fun and rewarding to grow your own plants, they really do taste better than stuff you buy in the store most of the time! As far as dairy and other foods that need to be processed...support your local farmers market (if they're there)! Pay the extra couple bucks to get organic stuff.....as far as 'voting with your dollars', it's one of the more low-effort, positive switches you can make, it's better for your health, and I'll be damned if it isn't all much yummier too! If you're still shopping at Walmart, you don't get to complain about this shit.
&gt; shadowban  I never heard of that before.  Why do they do that?  Does Voat.co do that?
&gt; you base all your logic off of principles easily seen at that scale.  Then enlighten us: at which scale are things suddenly allowed to collapse completely from top to bottom in and out of themselves, if they don't at 2 meters? 20m? 40m? 80m? 160m? 320m? 417m?   &gt; Which tells me that you are a child who thinks that he understands the world cause his 8th grade science teacher showed him some neat equations!   I pity you for your poor teachers if they failed to do that.   &gt; Anyways, I will keep on showing up in your comments section because your logic is so funny, let my laughter follow you through life.  Do that, you will choke on it :)
Lol, ok, I'll come laugh at you when the IAI upholds it previous statement and you are left again without any hope of any true experts backing up your beleifs
Same in eastern Pennsylvania.  Followed by dark haze..
As an American they are a symptom of our mass media, mostly influenced by reality TV. I can't watch most US documentaries or tv shows because of the melodramatic gossip mongering bullshit, the ridiculous music, the frantic pacing, and the fact that the narration is geared toward people with the collective IQ of a retarded child.   It's designed to appeal to middle aged women and teens with short attention spans. Everything is presented as a scandal, even if it's not, it's pathetic and embarrassing. 
The US Government contradicts itself officially, while failing in every regard to contradict Snowden and the many US officials who have left and blown whistles reporting to us about "The US Government Problem".  It's almost as if they just want us to think that they're bad, even as they're also actually bad, as if evil is a new US Government technology.
Where's the body?  We dumped it.  Where?  The Ocean.  Oh.
that article was little more than your title repeated on another website. boo. also, just checked your post history- wayy too many posts to this sub to not have been paid by someone to do so. I wish I could make you stop.
Ad hominem logical fallacy. Attack the argument, not the speaker, or you reveal the weakness in your own position. 
Hersh article seems to amount to "dispute over how much Pakistani officials knew and how much they gave their permission for the raid".  Doesn't seem very important to me.  Some other side-notes about torture and such.  Seems to be no dispute that the raid took place, OBL was there, he was killed.
http://media.giphy.com/media/Qw4X3FnmFFCPANtlhtK/giphy.gif
I tried to look up SSSS in this context and got stuff about the codes on boarding passes.  Can you tell me what to google? 
Leave the phone in your desk drawer at 5pm, problem solved.
Either you're stalking me, or the word "narrative" is getting better traction.
[Holocaust Revisionism by Mark R. Elsis](http://holocaustrevisionism.com/HolocaustRevisionism.com_-_Holocaust_Revisionism_by_Mark_R_Elsis.pdf)
[deleted]
He's planning to short the stock of companies that make the drugs the soldiers were taking or withdrawing from at the time of suicide and make even more duckets? Or what?
Fucking downvote shills,  nuke em.
http://imgur.com/ofuT0XJ
FBI Uncovers ~~Al-Qaeda~~ ISIS^TM Plot To Just Sit Back And Enjoy Collapse Of United States....
[deleted]
A shrine for CIA?
I think that this [gif](http://giftrunk.com/gif/mythbusters-fire-a-soccer-ball-at-50mph) might help you to envision simultaneous relative motions. The ball is moving away from the canon at 50mph in a parabolic arc and not moving horizontally, relative to the background, at the same time. The Earth moves at "1000mph" at the same time, but so are the ball and truck. Enough with the willfull ignorance and/or troll.
Nice response, I suppose that since this article has no science backing and I'm not an avid poster of BS (though I do like to read it, thanks for posting) I'll be called a shill.  Really hurts my feelings.   However, you post an article that makes nothing but assumptions and provides no evidence of any correlation of causation except that glyphosate was sprayed in a country and the rate of autism has increased... So I assume since more and more people pump gas in their cars and the rate of lung cancer has increased it must be due to the hydrocarbons...  I'm not saying there isn't a correlation between glyphosate and autism, but the article has no verified evidence/studies and is basically an opinion piece and everyone has opinions. It also goes from claiming its cancerous to jumping to autism... Still with no evidence. Better not drink alcoholic beverages and be around wood dust either as they are "potentially cancerous."
Reddit was just down for a couple of minutes a while ago I assume they were cleaning something up. I've been hearing big news all day. 
Future generations may know the truth but they just won't care
&gt; The wealthy don't want to sweep floors or flip burgers. But someone has to do it.   Funny you should mention that.  They've actually already come out with robots [to flip burgers](http://www.businessinsider.com/momentum-machines-burger-robot-2014-8) as well as robots that increasingly are getting better at [vacuuming and mopping floors](http://gizmodo.com/roomba-880-review-all-hail-the-most-powerful-robot-vac-1462446289), so if they've already figured out how to automate these tasks you mention with no human intervention needed,  why do they need humans again?   
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Nope. saw this on the front page and got really upset. Three of my four grandparents have died of cancer in my 19 years on this planet, and coming from Norway where we really trust the government I know sure as fuck the cure would be available if it existed.   Another aspect the people here seem to ignore is that in countries like mine with "free" healthcare, the cure could cost the government twice as much as treatment and they would still save money, as it reduces time in the hospitals and thus saves everyone money (the hospital, the state, the patient, the state again when the patient gets back into work and starts taxing again, when the next person gets treatment faster etc).  Because of this, our government works hard for a cure.
This is what I want to show people when they ask "so they did it for oil?".  It's bigger than that my friend.  Waaaaaay bigger.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You forgot to add in the jet that crashed into the building into that image.
Yes, I agree. What do you mean when you say the shitposts are real though? That there is a lot? I would agree with that. 
That picture makes her look like a real snaggletooth.
Why would he attack his friends?
My dad constantly ordered me to clean my room, it only worked 1/10 times. Just because the US is a child with ADHD, doesn't mean they can't be ordered, it just means they won't listen.
What I'm saying is that when you attempt to piece together all of the "holes" in the "official story" your narrative falls immensly short when put under the same scrutiny. Piecing together various "inconsistancies" that have probably been explained numurous times to each individual, is not a good way to construct an idea. Honestly, the only reason your ideas of "holes in the story" are not extinct is because of memetic reproduction, not because they hold any weight.  &gt;Next... you have to tell me WHY Looking only at a video of the collapse is not a good way to determine similarities between them.  I'm truly and utterly amazed you asked this. Can you see what is going on inside the building from the video evidence? Nope. WTC7 was constructed completely different to 1&amp;2. A fire induced progressive global collapse could not have occurred in 1&amp;2 due to the load bearing.  So, the manner in which they collapse is not alike. And the cause of their collapse is not alike. Would you like to elaborate on how they *are* similar? Other than "they both fell down".  &gt;Who are these people who KNOW that "this" wasn't a demolition job?   The scientists who built a model at Edinbourgh University know it wasn't an intentional implosion. Pretty sure the NIST report covered it also. So would you care to elaborate on why these two groups are lying?  &gt;people have been asking questions for years and years about tower 7   There are still people who believe the world is flat, 6000 years old and evolution cannot happen. They "ask questions" pretty often, that doesn't mean when they get a rational response they will take it on board. Its the exact same thing with the Truther community.  &gt;and why are you able to say that Tower 7 is explained without being able to explain it to me?  You didn't ask me to explain it to you. What would you like to know? Also, do us both a favour and do a quick search before you ask me. I don't want to be regurgitating stuff that you won't listen to for no reason.
Paragraph 4 logical fallacy, and you make me sick by using that word Truther, another example of weaponized language. Stop trying to label me and answer my questions, keep in mind that the burden of proof falls on you when you throw out information....
for the same reason "AlQaeda" never attacked Israel
Really?  Is that what is happening to Bernie Sanders?
If you vote for Hillary, the terrorists win.
What exactly can I do other than vote for someone like Sanders who doesn't stand a remote chance in hell of winning? Should I protest   my own? 
Total bullshit. What the Nestle CEO said was that clean, processed drinking water should always  have assigned a monetary value assigned.    
Interesting but that doesn't mean the technology exists.   You link to William Cohen giving a statement about the anthrax attack in Washington, which turned out not to be anthrax. He mentions an acclaimed futurologist and quotes him. I managed to find the actual quote from Tofflers' "War and Anti-War".   &gt; These acts [Saddam Hussein burning oil fields] are primitive compared with some of the imaginable (and imagined) possibilites of sophisticated ecological weaponry. For example, triggering earthquakes or volcano eruptions at a distance by generating certain electromagnetic waves; deflecting wind currents; sending in a vector of genetically altered insects to devastate a selected crop; using lasers to cut a custom-tailored hole in the ozone layer over an adversary's land; and even modifying weather.  Now to me, you have a defense Secretary talking about false threats, and even the fear of terrorism being a danger and he quotes examples of imagined fears as listed by Toffler. It sounds to me like Mr Cohen was just looking after his budget. Perhaps you could expand on what you believe? 
Maybe so, but the country is rotting from the inside. 
its funny, with the increased militarization of police, the rate of killings of cops have gone up as well. so by arming themselves better, they're thinking they can get into and deal with hairier situations , but at the risk of more dead cops. that alone should be reason enough to go back to the un-militarization of police
Someone needs to put the US to its knees
Seems stupid to put an IQ lowering drug in the water, and then complain when kids don't do well in school.
Like hell you can spin what he said.  He said very clearly that nobody should get free water.  He is a horrible, absolutely evil man.  Stop riding his dick for seminal compensation.
Corporations are legal fictions. They are government creations to displace blame, and accountability. You can't have a "corporation" without the state. So when Exxon dumps a bunch of oil, the "corporation" is punished and not the people  responsible. Of course this happens all on public land, at tax payers expense. Then Exxon hits a rough patch, and needs a bailout- tax payers pay that. We have to do it  to "preserve jobs". then we pump a bunch of money into the industry to show "how well it's doing".  All the while getting campaign donations, and being able to personally manipulate the stock market.
That's the sad state of affairs my friend. 
Vice versa because you have been there and you got the trophy. Man the arrogance you exude talking about subjects you have no clue about but read in multiple sources so therefore it is true. Gotta love your groupthink. It must be true it has been repeated so many times to me it must be true. Well here are a few:  You can be president of the USA  Terrorists attacked us on 9/11  Osama bin Laden repeat Osama bin Laden  It's not lack of science that has me believe the earth is flat quite the contrary. I know coriolis effect, I know how gravity solves everything, I know we have a magic velcro atmosphere that keeps us all here. I know it all and let me say the shit is garbage. We have been lied to my man. WAKE Up OR Keep Praying To Your masters lies.  
After the singularity, all police will dress like cowboys.
i love a good conspiracy founded in truth. I am so tired of all the Joo haters in the community. 
That's Trailer Park Boys for ya.
[deleted]
My job is awesome. I'd never complain about it. But that's totally irrelevant to this conversation, which is largely me ridiculing you for idiocy.
Well, they can take your money out at a seconds notice. Funds availability has a little more to do with the bank holding onto your interest bearing capital as long as possible, if it's an interbank transaction. If you have to wait 3 business days to access your payroll check, you have a bank problem, or your employer doesn't have the liquidity to be able to satisfy to the bank his or her ability to cover the checks.
You're quite welcome, I'm glad I could enlighten your day. I aim to please.
A lot of republicans did, if you go to the south these days they hate him cuz he's black
This is a victory for idiotic hysteria. 
&gt;You want to make minimum wage at a dead end job then by all means do it.  You think these people actually *want* to work those jobs?  My grandmother worked at Walmart for a while.  They treated her like garbage.  But she was 60, didn't have enough for retirement after her husband died, and had no marketable skills after working in the church for the past 20 years. (As a side note, if the average age of minimum wage workers is 36, then there are a LOT of people WELL over 36 who have to work those jobs.  People like my grandmother who literally have no other marketable skills.)  You think she should have simply gone out and gotten a better job?  She tried, trust me.  I think your view on how easy it is to "go get a job" is totally skewed.  You have a job, so you think it's just as easy for someone else to get one.  Here's another example:  My step-father was making more than you were at his previous job.  He made enough for my mom to be a stay at home mother with my two little brothers (well half-brothers).  They lived comfortably in a two story house, and were able to save for retirement.  One day, the company decided that his department was too expensive to be run out of the states, so his job went to someone overseas making 1/50th or less of what he was making (keep in mind this happened just after my mom had her second child with him and had just transitioned to SAHM)  My mom started working from home to bring in *some* form of income, but her dream of being a stay at home mom (which she never got to do with me) was over.  My stepfather searched for jobs for 16 months, and I have never seen a man look so defeated in my life.  Toward the end he always had this distanced, glazed over look in his eyes.  The only jobs anyone would offer him were demeaning to his experience.  Part time and minimum wage jobs were easy to find, but he never found work in time to keep the house.  So my mom and stepdad have moved, to a much lower income city, where salaries are more stagnant and the majority of people are employed part time or minimum wage.  The city is quite and peaceful, but the people are miserable.  &gt;What should happen? Walmart should just pay people more cause they can?  Well if Walmart offered SOME type of livable income, my step dad and mom may have been able to stay in their old house (yes he was offered a job at Walmart, but he preferred to keep his dignity as you claim you would do so adamantly).  &gt;Its reasons like this that I don't call in sick. Why I rarely take vacation. I prove myself valuable to my company that I work for by not being a drain on resources and doing my job better then anyone else.  I'm sorry but I have to be blunt: that's an extremely bleak outlook on your priorities.  Financial security is great and all, but I expect a certain quality of life.  How long have you been at your job?  I felt the same way when I started at my first job with a decent salary and I got burnt out by the end of my first year.  Consider yourself extremely lucky that you have found a job where your employer values your hard work and rewards you.  I got absolutely no rewards for my hard work (requested promotions, lobbied to get sent on more advanced projects) even though every single of my employee reviews were flawless and painted me as the model employee.  &gt;They don't have to watch over me like you do at Walmart or other minimum wage jobs because I apply myself. I solve problems. I never say I don't know to a client. I always answer "I will find out and get back with you"  Fantastic advice for someone who already have a good job, but that won't help them get in the door.  I have had interviews that I knock out of the park and still don't get the job.  When there is one open position and 50-100 people applying for it, it's unrealistic to tell other people "See?  I got that 1 in 100 opportunity, why can't you?"  Again, you should consider yourself very lucky.  The opportunities that you got are just simply not there for the majority of people who **are** stuck working these minimum wage jobs.     &gt;Blame the people for accepting this not the employer for trying to save money.  What the fuck?  I'm kind of in disbelief of this statement.  If the people have *no choice* but minimum wage jobs (see my examples above) then how the hell are we supposed to say "you know what, you're right.  The waltons need to make more money, so how can we blame them for not paying their employees a livable wage?"    Here's a history lesson for you.  During the industrial revolution there was a huge shift in the way people worked.  People started working in factories instead of on farms and craft shops.  Suddenly, cheap unskilled labor was needed on a massive scale.  So, with the new revolution and no government regulations, employers enforced sun up to sun down work days, unsafe working conditions and even hired children to work in dangerous situations.  It became clear that the quality of life for the average citizen was declining rapidly because these companies wanted to save as much money as possible (read: make as much money for themselves as possible).  The government saw that the employers were taking advantage of the workforce in an unfair way and stepped in to add regulation.  Thanks to that, we now only have to work 8 hours in a single work day (well, sort of.  Mandatory overtime, without compensation seems to be a common issue), and we get things like vacation and benefits (for some people at least).  Keep in mind, I'm paraphrasing a little here.  Unions were involved and it was not a very pretty process, but change happened.  Change that makes YOUR LIFE easier.  So now we sit at a moment where corporations are trying to only create the cheapest (for them) jobs possible, and anything that can be, will be outsourced (they have to save money of course! Even if they are continuing to turn over record profit and record bonuses for their CEOs), and you have the audacity to STILL blame the person who has the LEAST control in this scenario: the worker.  In that case, what is your opinion on employers outsourcing jobs?  What happens when your job gets replaced by a robot?  Because, I hate to break it to you, but your job WILL be replaced by autonomous workers eventually.  I hope you keep your job long enough to save up for retirement (did you know it costs more money to retire now than ever before, and that social security will likely run out before you die?)  &gt;What did I do to talk shit?  Jesus, man your entire fucking post was talking DOWN to people working minimum wage jobs.  Are you just that fucking oblivious to the god damn world?  You insult their ability to do basic math, their ability to know where shit is in the store.  You know whose fucking job it is to teach them that type of shit?  Their EMPLOYER.  Sure math and stuff should be taught in schools, but some people just struggle with it.  The employer should be responsible for making sure the employees they hire are properly trained to do their damn job.  Workplace training at Walmart (since it's the example you used) is fucking horrible and a joke.  That's because it costs money to train employees.   Gotta save money!  If that is the only driving reason for any decisions to be made then I hate to say it man, but you are also in line to get butt fucked sideways until you give up yours too.  Because you feel valued at your job by your current employer doesn't mean the whole system isn't designed to fuck you at the slightest sign of trouble
So here is some evidence...  Ever heard of Rita Katz?  She is able to obtain ISIS videos even before our intelligence services. And so well produced, you might say professionally produced. Maybe she is more than a conduit, maybe she is actually involved in staging these videos.   http://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2006/05/29/private-jihad  http://www.veteranstoday.com/2014/09/04/video-of-sotloff-beheading-might-be-staged-by-rita-katz  http://www.blacklistednews.com/Rita_Katz_is_at_it_again_—_Fake_ISIS_video_exposed/41539/0/38/38/Y/M.html  Or here we have an interesting article  http://www.jewishjournal.com/israel/article/gardeners_discover_bag_of_isis_flags_in_northern_israel  I would love to hear your explanation of this.   Another thing to think about.   http://politicalvelcraft.org/2014/09/10/10-signs-that-muslim-brotherhoods-isis-is-an-nwo-scripted-psyop/#more-101124  http://youtu.be/k43Dfh_RcgU  And lastly, how do you explain the scene at :33 seconds. It is a scene from a Turkish TV show.  It is also in an ISIS "execution video".   Oops!  
and the fake on that does exist was created by Israel and the CIA anyways.
I try to be a kind person, but that pisses me off so much, people coming in here and making generalizations about hundreds of thousands of different people with completely different beliefs and opinions. They always choose the easy targets to slander and ignore any kind of rational discussion.
I will also leave this here http://www.reddit.com/r/NoParticipation/wiki/intro 
No, hiring them in the first place did.  See: about 2000 other events "secured" by Israeli "security" firms.
**[Dr. Steve Pieczenik, Snowden Is No Hero:](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TxwcWly9E-Q#t=617)**  &gt;Pieczenik said "Irish Catholic" individuals are "embedded in the CIA hierarchy" who follow orders irrespective of their legality.  &gt;That the whole lot should be brought before a suitable committee of prosecutors to testify about Benghazi, 911, drone attacks and about Snowden's antecedents!  **Alex Jones comes in with details of CIA recruitment of every doctor and dentist in Texas..**  &gt;P said he left the Council on Foreign Relations because it was a waste of money and time, and like a "nursing home for NeoCon Jews who did "terrible things" on 911," he says his Jewish family was "exterminated by Germans."  &gt;He omits to mention that Hitler and all of the top Nazis were Jews .. he said it would have been impossible for [Elliot Rodger](https://www.google.com.au/search?num=100&amp;newwindow=1&amp;q=Elliot+Rodger+Santa+Barbara%2C+Hoax&amp;oq=Elliot+Rodger+Santa+Barbara%2C+Hoax&amp;gs_l=serp.3...9852.14511.0.15134.6.6.0.0.0.0.259.1285.2-6.6.0.msedr...0...1c.1.64.serp..4.2.414.GLen3X-SeGc) to have carried out the level of destruction alleged to have occurred at Santa Barbara.  &gt;That the whole affair is a "redux of Newtown" and an "entire False Flag," he blames Holder and the FBI for failing to issue subpenas, and says the President has to be held accountable!  &gt;He says Snowden is CIA like Daniel Ellsberg who was with notorious "Ugly American" Edward Lansdale forty yrs before, that he "got rid" of numerous CIA assets during his time there   **[Insider, CIA is Purging The U.S. Military in Globalist Coup"](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_PUAs2nOlgA&amp;feature=g-u-u)**  &gt;P says Hillary Clinton and the CIA engineered the Rwanda Genocide, that Generals and Admirals are being set up in "Honeypot" stings then replaced by CIA found mercenaries  &gt;Pieczenik was subpoenaed by the FBI at the behest of the Justice Department, Eric Holder and the Florida district court judge Cecilia Altonaga.  &gt;Following on from his work under the auspices of the US State Department, during the kidnapping and murder of Italian Prime Minister Aldo Moro by Red Brigade terrorists in 1978.  &gt;Moro was snatched at gunpoint from his car in Rome, and held for fifty four days before being shot dead.  &gt;He had been set to implement an alliance between the Christian Democrat Party and the Italian Communist Party, an action that Henry Kissinger told Moro’s wife he would “pay dearly for.” Infowars.
[deleted]
No it doesn't  But what good will the Presidents efforts do if the Senate rejects his proposal after seeing it.  The president should negotiate openly with the senate so that he can be assured his treaty will be acceptable.  The alternative is a treaty that may be very bad but will be approved because of political pressure by the monied corporate elite.  
So basically the Matrix?
It's totaly bullshit. They're trying to make money form it like Nestle, but also if you control the food and water, well then you control. It's total garbage. 
I said, the most informed decision they CAN. I have no illusions that the voting system is totally rigged. Or that the population has been so dumbed down that they just vote for the obvious. There are those who still vote with their knowledge- like me. 
Blah blah blah. Shut up. I'll get back to you when I get time.
Source?
[deleted]
  Because you didn't follow r/politics Title posting guidelines ya dingus.    **You have to post articles, and the title must be the same as the articles.**    Get someone to write an article about this, and post it.     But nobody is censoring you, in the same way no one is censoring that lady who barged into a muslim press conference and grabbed the mic and started yelling crazy shit.    
&gt; Right now people are called crazy for believing the obvious truth of 9/11.  You are actually comparing 9/11 inside job fanaticism with heliocentrism? You're actually saying they are equal?  Please provide ANY evidence to support the idea that 9/11 was an inside job.   Just one piece of evidence.  BUT, it has to be evidence. Not opinion wrapped up in something you call evidence. It has to be incontrovertible, emperial evidence.  Go ahead. I'll wait.    
If she gets elected because of her vagina, I'm leaving the country.  
If I remember correctly he announced Bin Laden's death the day after he released his forged birth certificate.
I'm curious as to what you feel these pictures actually prove.  I mean, this is a picture of a compound in Pakistan with no other details.  How is this evidence of... anything at all? 
&gt;reddit is an independent company, a startup in fact. we are not "owned by a corporation."  lol, a 10 year old company is a startup? Also, reddit is indirectly owned by Advanced publications via major share holdings. Are people really this naive to think that major share holders don't control the ship? All you have to do is look at what happened at Apple and Steve Jobs.
What I have trouble getting my head around is how so many different governments and corporate contractors can do this right in our faces, as a concerted effort, and in nearly complete secrecy.
[deleted]
They are probably not watching you and don't care about you 
There is no technical distinction between psychopathy and sociopathy.
Yes, but the robot army could be defeated quite easily by installing Microsoft Windows on them causing them to all become slow and buggy and eventually they would all crash.  
What ideologies am I imposing?
[deleted]
Neither. It was not voted on today.
I've been studying it and related material for over a year now and I am starting to see a total shift in the way I see myself and those around me. I am so thankful I was pointed in this direction.   I bought the books rather than read online. There are also numerous free study guides available if you search. Any questions about it feel free to pm me. I was feeling the same way you are a little over a year ago and I've never looked back.
this doesn't seem normal  
All this tells me is to expect a false flag attack soon, swiftly followed by a "I told you so". Then swiftly followed by a vote on the Patriot Act.  
why not the [OP](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=01sPhlWkkBA) instead of this limey cunt
Yea, idk. Reddit does have rules about PI. But like I said to your buddy, I have a few pointers coming from a web dev/designer stand point which I think could improve your site, if you are interested. If not, good luck with the project. I think it's a great idea!
The fact that this host is smoking cigarettes like some pompous ass really makes me angry  Also, the host died of lung cancer.
they probably feel the same and haven't changed a bit   *sigh*
Given that we've already had a couple of racially-charged riots this year, the summer will probably be much, much worse. Inequality is the worst its ever been, and there are a lot of angry people out there. 
Give an example where science is nonsense. 
seems the so-called crazy conspiracies are popping up, when this was mentioned a while ago, i doubt many people believed it.
What's the conspiracy? Pretty messed up though. I agree with the outcome.
insidious plan: slow death by food, what better way than to use cheap fast foods.  
At least state politicians are accessible to their constituency.  As well, under that style of government, you don't force everyone to fit the same mold.  
This kind of thing isn't [really](http://www.reddit.com/r/utcognoscantveritatem) going on is it? [Maybe it's just your imagination.](http://memeshappen.com/media/created/hz12mf.jpg)
Ask the million parents who lost their Children if it was worth it.    It's too bad that those tho drive us into war and profit from war are not required to murder third own children first.   They should be.   
What is the libertarian stance on abortion?  I'm not trying to be inflammatory, but seriously curious. When life begins would be a big deal to the "infringing on others life choices" point of view. 
Even though you're a cunt, I can't for the life of me figure out what this statement means.
This is your typical article that takes away the small attention span - most people already have today - away from important factors in the actual manipulation of mankind, to fact-less near-schizophrenic ideas of fancy.   We are in a war for hearts and minds, and - sadly - the aim of the scope is being focused more on sci-fi than real-world politics and finance.
Sent as well. 
&gt; They lost all the backup data. The data was still recorded.  Well it *was* allegedly record but now NASA claims that it's "missing".  Go ahead and try to find some.  &gt; To clarify, this isn't anything out of the ordinary. For more than a decade (probably longer) this was standard practice for converting format types.  The essential point is that most of the hard evidence doesn't exist today.
Libertarians are as divided on abortion as everyone else,  most of the time the argument comes down to life&gt;liberty.  IE: the childs life trumps the mothers liberty, it's not a 'choice' to kill another human being, that severely denigrates the child's very existence.
The fact that you don't know about this *is* the conspiracy.  It's been a long term agenda with this man to make sure you don't even know he existed.
And this doesn't make you question your assumptions that he is paid?
&gt;The engineers never saw the back-up telemetry tapes again.  Exactly.  The backup tapes are missing.   The data is not lost.  
[how's this?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cjp_M5LIvQw&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;hd=1) - NSFW
Yeah, but such testimonies aren't recognized in the official reports provided by NIST or the 911C, and therefore aren't discussed in the mainstream news, which means they're nothing more than tinfoil hat wearing conspiracy nutjobs making up eyewitness accounts to suit their agenda. Right? /sarcasm
oh thats who you are
[deleted]
He'd definitely get my support for that. A wise and reasonable man. Amazing he lasted so long among politicians.
&gt; he regretted that he himself ended up causing so many people to pick up the habit  how so?
Those were Republicans mostly saying "Just say no." It was a big part of Reagan's War on Drugs. 
So an execution with an anti-aircraft gun is too over the top for best Korea? 
If blacks are revolting (and they are) then *by definition* it's a Massah organized revolt.  Not a popular revolt.  A popular revolt would not be increasing the power of Massahs state and Government it would be pursuing something sane like segregation.
It's disputed land, not "unclaimed land" idiot.
Haha, "JIDF".  And it says the user has been deleted!  Clever, clever.  You know, there's this theory that the JIDF spam this and other places with holocaust denial to defame our skeptical population.  Ironically, any Stormfronters who get caught up in it are helping Israeli civillian intelligence, more or less.
1984
So can he pass narcotic drug analysis test aka truth serum test? Shall we the people, arrange to issue a subpoena?
What concerns me about this video is that he is telling these people they will be fine without the government telling us what we should and should not put in our body, and they hate him for it.    It really goes to show how dependent we have become on control that we fight against anyone saying otherwise.
It was only when I heard that you could actually go to jail in Europe for questioning anything about their official story, that I really started questioning everything about the official story   
Most concepts aren't "common knowledge" for those who only receive their information from compromised sources.  This, as well as so many other things are already known to those who are aware of what they are wearing, eating, sleeping on, working for, patronizing etc.   I am saying this is common knowledge for those who actually do their own research and follow the money.  Just look at our democratic system, completely corrupt and tainted - yet their "common knowledge" would have you believe that everything is working splendidly.   Two types of common knowledge here.. one of the masses, and one of the free-thinking progressive individual.
Probably some dried up old twat
[deleted]
Don't forget Rumsfeld and Holder! Reading this post got me pretty excited, even if it's only a pipe dream; for now.
1)  I agree the dude was straight up robbed.  The DEA is a corrupt organization of robbers.  If I wanted to become a robber, I would start my own "civil asset forfeiture" program like the DEA.    2)  But why would you be carrying CASH if you wanted to start a BUSINESS?  I have no trouble accessing my bank account when I am out of state.   Really poor judgment on his part if he really did want to start a legitimate business.  
Are you being seruois?  So what?  What's your evidence that any of the scientific information we have that has been studied over and over and over and over again is false?  You realize this is an object that everyone who has the right vision can see right? You realize this is an object that any space program can verify exists right? You realize when you go out at night if you live in a non-light density place you can see this object right?   You realize this object has been seen for centuries and millennia wayyy before any technological innovations capable of misleading people right?  I fail to see what your point is 
Well, it must be true then.
Look at my other links in this thread. Yes. I am sure. S9995 was not voted on yesterday.
&gt; inured*  Not inert.
Reddit likes to think of itself as the enlightened and super intelligent side of the Internet, but the fact that the top content in most default subs consists of memes, reposts and unpolarizing "fluff" news proved that was a lie. 
That is one of the things that does not sit well with me.   How did that video get released? The authorites were removing the video of the claims left right and centre but this gets  leaked?
You'e misunderstanding. The data isn't *gone*. The data went on to be used and recorded as intended.   The physical tapes (which were intended solely backups) are gone.   If they were to ever find the tapes (which I doubt as they were probably recorded over) they wouldn't go "Whoah!! Look at all this new data we have!". Whe the data was originally being sent it didn't just go out the window.  It's sort of like how I lost my Age of Empires 2 cd years ago, but still *have* the game and it works just fine. 
that would be wonderful but since I believe the system is corrupt from top to bottom they are probably preparing for the civil unrest that will happen when 9/11 finally gets exposed to the idiots that could never believe it was possible to betray your own nation.
Could you be any more full of yourself?
ಠ_ಠ
&gt;  incontrovertible proof of a conspiracy  Once there is incontrovertible proof of a conspiracy, it falls out of the context of this sub.  If you want conspiracies that were theories at the time but later proved to be true, try researching the following:  - Leaded gasoline conspiracy (start with Cosmos - the recent series hosted by Neil DeGrasse Tyson)  - Tuskegee Syphilis experiment  - FBI poisoning bootleg alcohol during Prohibition  - Operation Northwoods
I'll take the flat earth model seriously when I see a proper piece of scientific evidence that supports it that cant be explained by a round earth theory.  As for the moon landings being faked, I would have actually be more difficult for them to have faked them due to the lack of filming technology around at the time, like im not saying that absolutely everything the US gov says is true is true, im not even american so im pretty sceptical about most of the things that they say.   Bottom line is that they had 0 to gain from faking the moon landings, and everything to gain from doing them for real, so what possible scenario could have lead to them faking them?
Misinformation and misdirection is replacing journalism. When it's 100% concocted bullshit, we'll all think it's just half cause we'll only believe one "side" of the imaginary controversies. Without free press, we are SO FUCKED!
Read in this order, all available online and not more than 50 pages all together:  The Pedophocracy by David McGowan  The Greenbaum Speech by Dr. Corydon Hammond  "A Dissection of the Spiritual Nature of the Elite", a post in my history.  None of this is related to the bible.  The bottom of the conspiracy rabbit hole is the spiritual nature of reality, and evil is a tangible force working to keep us from waking up from our deep hypnosis. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qe5pv4khM-Y
The Greenbaum Speech is a horrible source  There is nothing substantial to back up the claims made, and while the doctor who made the presentation is real, there is no related information about this from him to be found on the net.  I believe that it's possible for the write up to be true, but there's no proof to validate the claims. It's not smart to recommend, what amounts to a story, to someone as an introduction to something as serious as this topic.   Find a better source if you want to be taken seriously
Or people disagree because you are blatantly wrong and most conspiracies are moronic. 
I went to a boarding school called Hyde, which was the same premise, but sounds like a cakewalk compared to Elan
The interesting thing is that I am in a few circles that have at least one person who will always take the position arguing in favor of the government. On this issue though it seems like I have never met anyone who thinks it's a great idea to let the police take your money and force you to prove you got it legitimately.  Just who, outside of these agencies themselves, support this and want it? And how did it come to be?
It gets posted fairly regualry no need to stickie it
I'd probably lobby for junk food, invest in McD's, BK, and Taco Bell.
tell us more you sound smart...
Interesting.  Did you do an "update all" in the 3rd party tracker list after you checked everything?  Is there any way in ghostery to find out what those 3 are?  I get 25 hits on uBlock Origin (0.9.7.0) with everything but "EasyList without element hiding rules‎" in ads, privacy, and social checked.  FWIW, I like drudgereport too.  Don't let the hard-left reddit hivemind dissuade you from getting news from multiple sources.
&gt; Which conspiracies do you reject?  I don't believe in any of the theories floating around. I've pointed out before. I'm far more into taking note of the inconsistencies, cover ups and patterns about stories. I list a few examples [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/C_S_T/comments/35mcze/has_anybody_noticed_that_lone_wolfs_in_the_us/) and [here.](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/35kk03/crazy_conspiracy_theories_you_guys_need_to_stop/)  Pointing out inconsistencies and lies and cover ups doesn't necessarily prove or back up anyones conspiracy theory at all. But it helps you parse available information in a different light. And stops you from believing official narratives. 
It's been a topic in conspiracy circles for as long as I've been around them. Check out this sub. http://np.reddit.com/r/TargetedIndividuals/  Also you can do a google or youtube search of targeted individuals or gang stalking.
Wow, where to even start.   Delaying the investigation until Nov 2002 is bullshit. Claiming we didn't see it coming is bullshit (saw multiple government officials on the news trying to spin this, including Rice) No footage of the Pentagon is bullshit.  Trying to appoint Henry Kissinger as the 9/11 commission chair was a huge red flag, and bullshit. That obviously didn't stick. The same day accusation towards Osama Bin Laden is bullshit.  Osama Bin Laden's entire history is bullshit. The muslim "they hate our freedom" motive is bullshit. The same day "training exercises" are bullshit. I still think the cell phone calls are bullshit. George Bush Sr. meeting with the Bin Ladens on 9/11 is bullshit (Carlyle Group). The 9/11 Commission investigation was bullshit. WTC 7 falling because it was on fire is bullshit. Any claims that it had enough structural damage to free fall are bullshit. Donald Rumsfeld is full of shit.  The WMD scare was bullshit. The anthrax was bullshit. The wars were bullshit. The muslim boogey man is bullshit. Al Qaeda is bullshit.  ISIS is bullshit. The patriot act is bullshit. The NSA is bullshit.  There is a lot of bullshit. I could link articles and evidence - that has been done countless times to no avail.    
&gt; They only report like that when they are in on it.  Yeah that was my thought. If it's taking this long to report it's either legit or not the case. When shenanigans are afoot they usually know who was responsible within minutes.
[deleted]
Socialism != central planning. 
It's all in the eye of the beholder.
Yes but it's not in-depth history. It's a multiple choice exam.
You need Occam's razor.
[deleted]
Ivy Leagues accept a larger percentage of applicants than McDonalds. That doesn't mean it's easier. The average american has a much higher chance of being accepted to McDonalds than an Ivy League, the type of people who apply to McDonalds are more likely to be unqualified.
this thread of conversation is amazing to me 
[deleted]
[deleted]
KILL THE POWER KILL THE COUNTRY Mainstream press continues barrage of deceptive articles on domestic operations.  by INFOWARS.COM | MAY 13, 2015  https://youtu.be/kaq6eIoj1PM
And who's selling them those weapons they must know they're selling them to isis
Maybe you should open your eyes and realize that the crazed govenrment is lying to us. Edmund Hillary was killed 3 days after admitting the earth was flat, that's not a capricious coincidence. You just have a closed mind and can't even try to accept something that challenges and materializes in a irricogible way your bucolic worldview. I'm sorry for being loquacious but you're stupidity is overwhelming. 
From the No Shit department.  Honestly, name one citizen that supports this unconstitutional, illegal behavior.
wait wut? Elan is still going on? How has it not been shut down?
&gt; Do you know who decided what you could learn in school? Do you know why you learned Newton and not Tesla?  Because Newton was like 200 years before Tesla.  Because Tesla never really expounded on his thoughts about gravity, let alone published any kind of synthesis.
&gt; 1 in 200 kids that went through gained national recognition for positive reasons. Pretty good turnaround rate  They would have an even better turnaround rate if they simply killed half the kids. Sure, 90 percent of the rest would rebel, but a few of them would  become insanely dedicated to whatever cause they joined.   I'm not advocating it by the way, but my fiancee's mother was raised in Germany before the war. Child rearing there was brutal. And yes, it was good for producing people with great self discipline, who received national recognition. But that does not mean it was good for society.
Well, that money goes somewhere.  I don't think they need it all for swimming pools, green screens, 0 grav plane flights and hair perms.
I have not, though I am familiar with his writings. I will have to find a pdf of it somewhere, thanks for the lead!   How alternative and extreme is the thesis? The more the better to capture my interest. I've done plenty of reading of socially acceptable alternative history and I am looking for something different.
There are wealthy even in places with no government. 
Impulsively yes hah I wanted to say that. But thats not nice.
[deleted]
And then we get a black pope and it's WWIII. Interesing times indeed.
Seriously? That's your response
Nope
[Here's the article](http://www.informationclearinghouse.info/article41827.htm) - sorry for the formatting issues. 
I think it's a terrible fascist dictatorship but it's probably more brutal and repressive than cartoonishly evil. I think the reality of a fascist dictatorship is very boring. It's hard to get people excited about how evil some country is unless you can find something juicy.   For example they don't have free speech but hey, either do we. They have a pretty brutal prison system where you can go to jail for the tiniest infraction... but hey so do we. Are you starting to see why it's important to generate juicy gossip about an opposing country as opposed to the reality of it? 
Men and women are different. REGIONALLY people from the same country are different, the races are different, IQ levels, culture, **Impulse control** The list goes on. For example FBI statistics have published that Africans are 14% of the population, yet commit more then 60% of the crimes. And then the moronic statement usually occurs:   "B-b-b-but it's because they are opressed and forced to commit these crimes!! lalalala i can't hear you!!"  So it's suggested with EBT &amp; social security, affirmative action and more. These people are considered "opressed" individuals? And despite of this, it's why these peoples are occupying most of the american penitentiaries? No, the simple answer is clear. For their **14%** of the american population they commit a an absolutely ridiculous and astonishing crime rate of which is over **60 percent**. http://www.fbi.gov/about-us/cjis/ucr/crime-in-the-u.s/2011/crime-in-the-u.s.-2011/tables/table-43 http://www.bjs.gov/content/pub/pdf/cv11.pdf   We do not only see this in America but in Europe as well where the jewish promoted idea of multiculturalism roughly, a social experiment, which never has been proven to work has caused an extreme amount of crime in those countries of europe effected most notably Sweden which formerly had no issue with crime or so called "rape epidemics". These immigrants are responsible for most of the rape, smuggling, and overall crimes as well as social security fruad and usage of the latter. And not only that since the birth rates in europe are uncomparable to people of the thirld world one will see genocide and displacement of native population in Europe, collectively genocided to be replaced by non whites.   The governments who encouraged mass immigration into White nations are in severe breach of UN Convention on the Prevention and Punishment of the Crime of Genocide 1948. Article II: In the present Convention, genocide means any of the following acts committed with intent to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnical, racial or religious group, as such: (a) Killing members of the group; (b) Causing serious bodily or mental harm to members of the group; (c) Deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life calculated to bring about its physical destruction in whole or in part; (d) Imposing measures intended to prevent births within the group; (e) Forcibly transferring children of the group to another group. Article III: The following acts shall be punishable: (a) Genocide; (b) Conspiracy to commit genocide; (c) Direct and public incitement to commit genocide; (d) Attempt to commit genocide; (e) Complicity in genocide. Article IV: Persons committing genocide or any of the other acts enumerated in article III shall be punished, whether they are constitutionally responsible rulers, public officials or private individuals. 
Funny how this has had zerooo coverage......this is my first time hearing about it.........awful
this is a MEME and this should be DOWNVOTED and sent to /r/conspiracymemes  edit: DOWNVOTES FOR TRUTH WOW
but im saying, it would be interesting to know which specific countries are knowingly selling weapons to isis
Oh sorry, didn't read /u/captainSketchyPants part. D'oh.  He did indeed kill the daughter of the lawyer who defended him though.
It looks to me like they said "transparency" and then posted boilerplate corporate legal copy on the advice of their lawyers in order to justify what they are about to do.  See ya'll at http://voat.co
Some of my submissions at /v/conspiracy do better than here.  The fact that you have to "earn" the ability to downvote makes it tough for the trolls.
This post isn't about North Korea.  &gt; [We still have free speech in America,](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sedition#United_States ) there has NEVER been a recorded case of someone [just stating an opinion and getting prosecuted here.](http://www.chron.com/news/houston-texas/article/Feds-raid-Texas-secessionist-meeting-6096637.php)  &gt; [Imagine the police, which you think are so bad in America, coming to your house and shooting you outright,](http://killedbypolice.net) and your entire family just to be safe.   Edit: It's not about America either. It is about Propaganda.  See how my friend was tricked into thinking the important question was "which country is worse" instead of "[what am I being sold?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mII9NZ8MMVM)"
&gt; But yes, the government IS paying wal mart to practice particular scenarios for jade helm.  Do you have a source for this? That's what I was hoping for. Thanks.
Whistleblowing is the same as calling a leader a dickhead? 
rule 1 sure seems to mean nothing 
[deleted]
Many of them would cover up the sun from the perspective of their planet, sure, but our Moon seems to be the only one in our solar system which is near the ballpark for similar subjective size (although I haven't done the calculations for the distant moons, I'll assume as much.)   Of course, that's not saying much, as in the past our own Moon was closer to the Earth (thereby duplicating what's going on with many of the other moons) and in the future it will be further away, thereby making total eclipses an impossibility. We already see the latter now, when the moon is as far away as it can get - you get an [annular](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/3/37/Annular_Eclipse._Taken_from_Middlegate%2C_Nevada_on_May_20%2C_2012.jpg/1024px-Annular_Eclipse._Taken_from_Middlegate%2C_Nevada_on_May_20%2C_2012.jpg) eclipse rather than a neat fit because the moon is too small to cover the sun.   The main takeaway is that though the relative similarity in size is an interesting observation, one has to jump through a lot of hoops to dismiss other observations which make the odds far more in our favor. If the Moon was actually exactly the right distance away for a total eclipse, I could buy the argument. The fact that 'exact' has to be defined with several percent of wiggle room removes the strength from that argument entirely.  It's basically like arguing that, say, a guitar is made specifically for a certain guitar case... but only to within an inch or five. Don't mind the bits sticking out, or the rambling around inside, it's clearly intended to be that way. 
I would not vote for him either (if I could) as he does have a number of weird ideas if I remember correctly. He does however seem that much more genuine then many of the other candidates of the last presidential race. He also seems to have a deep understanding of issues that are central to American prosperity and security such as the Middle East and the Federal Reserve. In 2016 however I will probably be rooting for Bernie.
Sounds like bullshit really. 
&gt; it's meant as a device to question our own interpretation of what we perceived vs. what we assume about those conducting the band, as it were.  Reread the OP then. Your persecution complex is strong.
You don't get to "vote" on CEO's and other corporate fascist "officers" because corporations are privately owned tyrannies by definition.  Why does this surprise anyone?  
Buddy Fletcher, husband of Reddit CEO Ellen Pao, is being described as being the operator of Ponzi scheme after his now bankrupt firm diverted money for their own use and, according to the Chapter 11 trustee, committed fraud against investors. Three Louisiana pension funds lost $144 million.   
wow....
&gt; Can you really not hazard a guess as to why one of those things might be a little harder to keep under wraps?  because captain america is for justice and freedom? Also apple pie?  The point remains that a conspiracy involving tens of thousands of people can be kept secret by limiting peoples involvement and knowledge. In the end it's just a few hundred of the people at the top that might know the entire picture. So it's been done.  &gt; And you do realize that the entire premise of your argument (that trillions of dollars went missing on 9/11) is complete bullshit right?   Are you really trying to say that the US doesn't waste trillions of dollars in the military? Should we talk about Haliburton and Dick Cheney's connection to it?  Eisenhower warned the public about the military-industrial complex and this is the fruition of it. We're in perpetual war and 9/11 pushed that along. just because you believe in Murica! doesn't make it not true.  &gt; why the fuck would Rummy have commented on it publicly?!  Because of the things you just said. People like you see him coming clean, so you goggle up his honesty and think he's on your side. But now we have 9/11, so military waste can not be addressed and it's swept under the rug. There is simply no better time to have made such an announcement.  If he didn't make the announcement, then someone like me could go digging for military watse. Now that Rumsfeild admitted to it, you'll say "thats old news, he admitted to it already, no problem exists". 
Jesus.  Can we put this guy in the witness protection program already?
&gt; The measures would give the police powers to apply to the high court for an order to limit the “harmful activities” of an extremist individual. The definition of harmful is to include a risk of public disorder, a risk of harassment, alarm or distress or creating a “threat to the functioning of democracy”.  &gt; The aim is to catch not just those who spread or incite hatred on the grounds of gender, race or religion but also those who undertake harmful activities for the “purpose of overthrowing democracy”.  &gt; They would include a ban on broadcasting and a requirement to submit to the police in advance any proposed publication on the web and social media or in print. The bill will also contain plans for banning orders for extremist organisations which seek to undermine democracy or use hate speech in public places, but it will fall short of banning on the grounds of provoking hatred.  I'm speechless.  Mostly because the police haven't given me permission to speak yet.  I'm sure they will soon.
We're not all Tibetan monks!!
It is the perfect exemplar of a limited hangout.
The USG is definitely the worst.  Unfortunately they have guns and have repeatedly demonstrated they will use them.  If you boycott them, you better do it from far away.
[deleted]
Can you explain what you mean - give an example of a merit -based scheme that is naturally discriminatory
I don't know and I don't care to be honest. Just fun to see people getting their butts hurt for something so obvious and natural.My house my rules.You can be racist all you want outside my house. But in my house you get your ass thrown out. (not saying anyone been racist here)It's no conspiracy, it has nothing to do about freedom of speech.If you start a reddit 2.0 tomorrow with new rules to prevent this "conspiracy"  I can promise you will see exactly this behavior when and if the that forum become a reddit size forum.Not saying it's ok or something we should strive for. But this is exactly how we humans work. Stop bitching about it and build your own forum and see what happens.
&gt;Saban, a billionaire best known for creating Mighty Morphin Power Rangers, has dual U.S.-Israeli citizenship and has spent heavily to support Israel. “His greatest concern, he says, is to protect Israel, by strengthening the United States-Israel relationship,” The New Yorker noted in a 2010 profile of Saban. At a conference in Israel, the article said, Saban had outlined three methods for influencing American politics: “make donations to political parties, establish think tanks, and control media outlets.”  &gt;Saban’s foreign-policy activism did not escape the attention of the State Department. The agency’s designated ethics adviser, James H. Thessin, wrote in a memo that his objection to the proposed consultancy was “based on the fact that Haim Saban, a founder of this entity, is actively involved in foreign affairs issues, particularly with regards to the Middle East, which is a priority area for the Secretary.”  &gt;Thessin’s memo, one of 1,017 pages of records obtained by Judicial Watch, was the only instance in which the Department of State objected to one of Bill Clinton’s proposed speaking engagements or consultancy agreements.   &gt;Yet between 2009 and 2013, as Hillary Clinton served as secretary of state, the Saban Family Foundation paid the Clinton Foundation more than $7 million, and listed $30.5 million in “grants and contributions approved for future payment,” according to nonprofit records filed with the Internal Revenue Service. It’s unclear whether there was any overlap between the $7 million paid and $30.5 million committed to the Clinton Foundation in those years.  &gt;The Saban Family Foundation and Haim Saban declined National Review’s request for comment and would not answer questions about how much they had given to the Clinton Foundation while Mrs. Clinton was secretary of state. The Clinton Foundation lists donations from “Cheryl and Haim Saban &amp; The Saban Family Foundation” in the $10 million to $25 million range.   &gt;Since 2009, Hillary and Bill Clinton have both given speeches at Saban Family Foundation forums. Then–secretary of state Clinton delivered a major policy address on Israel at one such forum. And in 2013, Saban’s wife, Cheryl, joined the Clinton Foundation’s board.  &gt;It’s not clear whether anyone at Foggy Bottom reviewed or approved these donations or Hillary Clinton’s speaking engagement at the Saban Family Foundation forum; the State Department did not respond to National Review’s repeated e-mail inquiries and phone calls by deadline.  &gt;Saban has been a longtime friend and supporter of the Clintons, also donating more than $12 million to Democrats since 2002, according to the Center for Responsive Politics. He was a major fundraiser for Hillary Clinton’s previous presidential campaign, and in addition to giving to the Clinton Foundation, he has also donated around $5 million to the Clinton Library.   &gt;The Sabans have continued to support Hillary Clinton long after she left her post at the State Department; this past Thursday, Cheryl and Haim Saban hosted a $2,700-per-person fundraiser for her at their Los Angeles home.    http://www.nationalreview.com/article/418181/why-israeli-american-billionaire-pouring-millions-clinton-foundation-jillian-kay
People need to analyze 9/11 like a murder crime scene.  First, you need to establish a motive.  Who would have to most to gain by having the USA attack and destroy a bunch of Arab countries? 
Seth Rogan is a israeli spy
Get pics if you can.
Maybe that's the point, dumkopf.
Thats not how terrorism works. Its to make a statement, and whats the point in making a statement if nobody knows why? All that planning too, if they were responsible they would have been shouting it from the rooftops.
That's a good point. But that's why engaging in violence is very problematic in the first place.  Even if you choose the best available target, you're likely to alienate people, and in the end the force-monopoly of the state will conquer you and damn your memory. The weak (as well as the strong) should be encouraged to behave smarter. One should especially hesitate to decide that someone else is deserving of death.
Same here. I'd like a sauce, and no onion pls.
Uh oh...looks like you're gonna have to create another account /u/darbynrib. Someone is testing you.
You're a bro, bro. Thanks for this.
This entire thing is damage control because more and more users are becoming aware of the reality of astroturfing, which IS NOT MENTIONED in this transparency nonsense.   Vote total obfuscation, "safe places", and the reality of a shadowban are all pieces to this puzzle.
&gt;explain why your average blog needs SSL encryption.  * Because it's the new standard and without it, your site will be left in the dust. Deal with it.   &gt;What are the options for SSL Certificate? How much does it cost?  * https://www.namecheap.com/security/ssl-certificates/comodo.aspx  $8, $10, $30. 
ITT: Bootstraps.
[deleted]
I'm a sheep!!!!!!!11
America is the govt that the elite elect. There, I fixed it for you.
sounds like propaganda. I've seen the video. It wasn't a grenade. 
That's fine. I work hard for what I get, and it's a little over minimum. Not much, but it is.
I meant to say LEO. Need more coffee.
You just gotta be genuine to your beliefs.   Disagree without being disagreeable.   When talking, very briefly and simply say how you reached your conclusions. Show people the process. Even if it's about cooking pasta or something. "So I just googled, how long do you cook cavatappi pasta for" for example. Don't be like "I've read 100 of the best blogs by the best chefs and this is the only way"   That conversation at work turns into "so I just googled 'corruption in congress'..." I think it's important to put that brief self discovered process of knowledge into your arguments. If it comes to a point you can explain your sources better.   Be a leader in regards to thinking, in a subtle way. People will follow. 
I didn't realize the engineers who played in mud were weaponizing shit... oh wait that's Geotechnical engineers, I've never heard of geoengineering. 
Oh that's even better! Try to start your own business. Not sure what state you are in but the government allows for whats called Homestead Food Operations.   Where you can sell food products to local vendors that you made at home, or even start a food truck business.   You can start small and work your way up if the food is good enough!   http://www.forbes.com/sites/instituteforjustice/2014/01/29/california-legalized-selling-food-made-at-home-and-created-over-a-thousand-local-businesses/
Didn't all them buildings have natural gas lines? You know, for like: cooking?
Spend a few years homeless. You'll get off the grid, find new things to be pissed off about, and appreciate the shitty life of a cog more. Plus, when you're ready to say "fuck it" to said shitty life, you'll be more prepared for what you'll need to be self-sufficient.
That is clearly not what I did. Anything that was stated outright I rebutted, anything that I didn't have a full grasp on what exactly he was claiming I asked him to elaborate on. Nothing there was nitpicky, his "evidence" on the other hand certainly was.  You must, nessesarily, think my responses were outright false. So would you care to refute them? Or are you going to continue venturing through my comment history? I mean either or is cool. I'm all ears to your response, and if you keep reading you'll probably learn some shit.
it makes me wonder how much someone could be paid to take an argument from logical to illogical very quickly.. good job taming them folks
If shadowbanned will give feedback !! Why ? 5 year (actually 8 but forgot previous account) redditor check my fucking history !!
It's always about race. You don't just forget who you are and where you came from.
To my eyes that photo looks shopped. They have helpfully put the photo its was faked from next to it.
I once thought of a conspiracy meet up site. 
I unsubscribed from there the first day I created my account.   I just wanted to see if it was true.... Lo and behold.  Apparently they fixed it now.  You can say Zionist on there all you want now.
Try this: http://bits.blogs.nytimes.com/2015/05/14/reddit-introduces-anti-harassment-policy/?_r=0
[maybe this could help?](http://i.imgur.com/gk1MRZ1.png)  found here : http://rense.com/general86/talmd.htm  Would you like to know more ? http://www.jewishvirtuallibrary.org/jsource/Talmud/talmudtoc.html
but it's not even about winning this war today for them. they will slowly but surely change the perspective of millions over a much longer duration.  /disgusting
if by "left the reservation" you mean brutal invasions, then yeah, sure.   It's "hollowed out" because it was a garbage sub to begin with.  It's "hollowed out" because on multiple occasions, submissions were shown to be complete fabrications.  It's "hollowed out" maybe because redditrevisionist and his hundreds of alts keep getting banned from places.  /r/conspiracy loves to complain about vote-brigades, shilling, censorship and mod control, or the dozens of subs his alts had and would just sit in. RR and all of his alts are a prime example of this. There's also that time he claimed to "make his last post on reddit" just to come back under an alt.
I've seen persistent contrails at night, plenty of times (and I've seen chemtrails believers post pictures of them, too).  But they're harder to see in the dark, and there is a lot less commercial air traffic at night.
CONFIRMED SHILL   rational thought is a tool of the Zionist robber baron overlords
[deleted]
[Here's the filthy lying traitorous cocksucker the day after 9/11](https://youtu.be/GdBQOe85i3M), after giving a blowjob to "Robert Gurlinsky".
Just saying, skimmed through your history and it certainly doesn't look like you're just flaming and making idiotic comments all of the time either.
A broken watch is still better than a politician... At least the watch will still be right 2 times a day. 
This is where something like voat.co will come in handy. 
So they can just re-release it with the trademarked stuff removed. 
OP claims to have grown up in a place that pitted kids against each other in fights to the death, tortured them in various ways, both physically and psychologically, and somehow didn't get closed because of connections with powerful people.  edit: I'm not saying I believe OP to be lying; I just wanted to word it neutrally
Or maybe just to produce cattle to feed the private prison system....
D.O.C. employees *never* take part in this political theatre.  *https://youtu.be/DyNOPosiUX8
im over 25 and still there. gonna try the state assistance next. i just got fed up with employers and community giving subliminal messages to off myself.   might as well start a career on the bottom to avoid such accusations. i know too much about oppression at this point to care.
He's a naive idiot?  First of all, it's not exactly peace time.  Second, it's a perfectly legitimate exercise.  Would you rather they practice shooting non-compliant protesters?  Do you think protests in conflicted areas are any different?  You're the one that's naive, there's a perfectly good reason for this exercise and it has nothing to do with suppressing the American population.  The fact that you're willing to jump to the worst conclusion possible makes you the idiot.  They aren't even infiltrating anything.  It's not even a war game.  He's not naive or an idiot, he's actually voicing reason and you can't hear him because you're on the fucking moon.
It began over a century ago with the creation of the federal reserve in tandem with the income tax. And the octopus spreads her tentacles to all corners of the earth.
THE NIST REPORT?
Haha!  Funny. But those guys were the *least* 'undercover' you can get and still claim the title. I'm wondering if their job was to get 'discovered' as plants/provocateurs, then move on, and lull the protesters into a false sense of security, with the 'true' plants still in place and *very* undercover.
What was filmed was NOT a war game.  It was an exercise.  
That's what I took away.  I'm just curious what his actual job is. I'm thinking federal, but can't venture an informed guess.
http://www.aljazeera.com/archive/2004/11/200849163336457223.html
Interested to know more? Check out the articles and books pages of the /r/holocaust/wiki, or watch one of these videos:  * [Holocaust? What They Hide From You](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bpjqf-vNq6I) * [David Cole in Auschwitz](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RHzWo79dCHs) * [Buchenwald, a Dumb Dumb Portrayal of Evil](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wVZ_5yWmBRk) * [Auschwitz: The Surprising Hidden Truth](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AQ_Dhgufzqw) * [The Truth About Auschwitz](http://vimeo.com/87724980) * [One Third of the Holocaust](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7dxsVSzL4HE) * [Treblinka Archeology Hoax](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=47rbRNSGQUs) * [Holocaust, Hate Speech, and Were the Germans So Stupid?](http://vimeo.com/23102303) * [Last Days of the Big Lie](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hIRaYCRF69s) * [More [videos](/r/holocaust/wiki/videos)]
Woah man, that's very funny stuff.I think u/panamaspace has an interesting comment.
That's not even a point.  That's even MORE arbitrary.  You're citing an example to argue an unrelated point in order to support a previous argument that cited a source that argued an unrelated point..I'm in dumbception.  It's real, I'm here, I'm too deep.
If you can read the rules, then why don't you follow them?  You said: &gt;you *shilling* for people like this  I also just noticed that you received an "only warning" for rules violations on 4/29/15. Guess what that means.  
Do you drive around in a van with a dog and solve mysteries too?
Eh I'm seeing a lot of threads regarding Redditors leaving because of censorship. 
Ditto.
Lets start one :)
[deleted]
&gt; The Likkud party is the very essence and inevitable conclusion of Zionism.  This is a statement without basis in fact, unless you accept Likud talking points as gospel.  Fortunately, they are not the only voice in Israel.  The party ruled the Knesset for most of the 80's, but did not gain any power in Israel until 1977, a full three decades after the formation of Israel.  They've been in and out of power ever since, and face plenty of internal criticism.  Netanyahu's recent fourth government was only recently formed with a paper-thin 61-59 majority. Just pick up *Haaretz* any day of the week to see what the Israeli left thinks of Netanyahu and his ilk.  
https://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/35upip/septa_says_commuter_train_hit_by_projectile_just/
Yep. Busted into his house through the backdoor, kick door off hinges, then shot and murdered his whole family. On Christmas! Then called it a suicide. Thanks Obama.
Nope, the computer auto controls turns like that.  
Fuck, you are so right on, man.  I'm in AL at the moment, never thought I'd end up here.  I have two sons in CA, 27 and 30, who don't give a fuck about me, or care if I'm alive, unless I come into money.  I went to Russia in 2005, expected it to really suck, but had the best time of my life.  Had an awesome hot young girlfriend who blew my mind in bed, and I'll skip the pun, she was awesome at that as well.  I even brought her over here for a visit, but had to send her back because I had no job.  Had invites to visit other Russian women, which is a guaranteed fuckfest, beautiful high class women,  all smoking hot, one was an MD and a captain in the Army, one was an MD with big tits, one was a lawyer, and one was a concert pianist with a PhD in music, and was the director of a ballet academy that won 1st place in world competition, and was a fucking celebrity in Russia, and is a concert pianist in Philly now.   I was in my 40s at the time, and they were all 10+ years younger than me.  One girl told me she had a pair of handcuffs.  All fluent in English.  I don't fucking waste my time with American women at all.  Too much trouble and I'd rather just do without.  And I didn't see a single fat chick over there.  At the Moscow airport, I was sure there was a supermodel convention in town.  And, you're right about corruption in CA.  It's not just corrupt from top to bottom, it's right in your face if you have to deal with it.  Like, oh... that case you had, yeah we decided to bury it so go fuck yourself. And if you don't take the hint, they will fuck you up, put you in prison, or find an excuse to shoot you.  The way I dealt with them was to act dumb and crazy and predict what they were going to do next, which saved my ass several times.  They're not that clever, but they're used to winning, and they hit really fucking hard.  The trick is, when they hit you, go down and stay down.  They will walk away and assume you won't won't come back, because nobody ever does.  Then you get up and hit them from behind.  Then hide.  Then my cunt ex-wife got me locked up on a 3-day hold.  I got out of CA and got a job in FL on the beach.  It was a little bit quieter down there.  I was in SoCal from 1980-2000 and couldn't believe how much housing was put up in that time.  Way too fucking crowded now.  Although, the air was much, much cleaner in '00 than it was in '80. You could only see the mountains 1 day a month in '80.  Now you can always see them.  I used to go hang gliding out there, and raced speedway bikes for a few years, 500cc, ethanol fuel, and no brakes.  Yeah, I've gotta scar.
&gt; When millionaires beg their blue collar fan base for money   He's not begging. If people like him and they think he can produce a good film, why can't they donate?  Super Troopers 2's indiegogo campaign netted them nearly $4.5 million. By your same thought process, this should be considered shameless as well, no?   &gt; He's asking for handouts... he spent decades rallying against the idea that million dollar corporations shouldn't get hand outs **from the government.**  Yes, *from the government*. And this is not a "handout", that would imply that you are just looking for free money. The difference here is that the donor is anticipating receiving something in return, even if that is just to help the movie get made.   &gt;This exposes him as the elite vampire that he is.  Is Bernie Sanders an elite vampire for asking for campaign donations? Is the only difference that it's a kickstarter campaign?  &gt; How do you not see how this is everything he has campaigned against his entire career?  Because it's not. He was against the government handouts and bailouts and taxes, which are forced upon people. This is completely in line with his beliefs.  &gt; He has always said that in the US people should put their own fucking money into a business, take the risks and reap the rewards.   No he hasn't, he has never said, for example, you shouldn't receive a loan from a bank, that is ridiculous. 
Not hot enough to make aluminum look molten orange. There are pictures of the rubble being picked up from molten metal that is burning orange in color. The initial pouring of molten metal from the tower caught on tape was orange in color. This was explained as organic compounds from furnitures infused within the aluminum--thus the orange color. Even if that were true, it would not have explained how molten, orange metal remained for months.  &gt;There were fires burning in the wreckage at the bottom for days afterward  Actually it was months, not days. In a oxygen deprived environment, beneath the rubble, the fire could not be completely extinguished until december. The jet fuel was burned away in minutes according to NIST. You would need an oxidizing agent to provide for such a long sustained fire.  &gt;Only bad science requires faith.  Touche. I admire your attempt to remain logical. Frankly, it is somewhat obvious you haven't spent much time understanding the entire "conspiracy" re:9/11 that's been brought up. At least read up on the side your debating against. If you're in any way open minded abt this, this is a good start: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8DOnAn_PX6M  cheers
Such as? I have always seen the Simpsons take no prisoners. Plenty of episodes mocking Americans (such as when Bart gets a muslim friend and homer thinks the family is a terrorist cell)
Read the article?He wasn't driving, but even so how does that make it okay to assault the man?
https://voat.co/
    
Profit motivated feedback loops everywhere I turn... DOH 
*emperor voice*   Good, good, let the apathy flow through you..
I'm not in TX, so I guess I'm safe.  If the soldiers who swore to protect this country decide to go along with taking it over, I'll just run over to Canada.  You can live like a shivering little Chihuahua and pee a little every time someone knocks on the door.  I have better things to do.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ktLEYPUWOOw Just think "the other way around" and it all starts to make sense.  
Care to explain why? Studies seem to suggest a strong link between the two: http://www.hsph.harvard.edu/news/press-releases/study-strengthens-link-between-neonicotinoids-and-collapse-of-honey-bee-colonies/
Prepare and organize with other like minded people.  I started a [Citizen Preparedness Team](http://oathkeepers.org/oktester/cpt-community-preparedness-teams/) in my neighborhood, and was absolutely shocked at how many people were concerned enough to show up.   This has really been the best thing I've done to alleviate anxiety and fear of what's to come.  I highly recommend starting your own CPT.
Murdoch's ViceNews is not a relevant source. This video is bending the truth just like all of their other videos they put out. It's like infowars 2.0. I would stay away from Vice.  At 4.14 the speaker clearly states AlQaeda actually did 9/11. Are we that stupid?    
You're right, and what also will happen is that there will be way more harassment charges than the admins can handle and this will be an excuse as to why some harassment reports end up with bans and others are ignored.  This is their open door to selectively enforce the rule.
[deleted]
Take a look at the website and video I posted a few comments back - there is ample evidence Sandy Hook was a total fraud and hoax
I've always been told that when you watch a 'documentary' or read a study, you follow the money. if it's a study on the effectiveness and safety of a pesticide but funded by Monsanto, I know to be a touch wary about the findings. if it's funded by the EPA or NIH or a reputable scientific body then the findings could all be well and good..   that and if they come up with the money to film the movie that shows the demand is there to see it
[deleted]
Oh yeah cause the word shill is really demeaning and hurtful. Come on man, you have to know that's ridiculous. I wasn't even particularly rude in my comment, it's not like I was insulting their family, or their intelligence or anything. Such bullshit, excuses for censorship is what it is. No one should have the authority to restrict speech due to perceived harmfulness of words. They're fucking words, no one needs to be defended from words. Anyone who is "offended" by the words of a Stanger is choosing to feel offended. Words don't hurt anyone unless they choose to feel that way.
makes for a small penis side affect, then they have to make up for their small penis, then take more steroids, go into roid rage for small penis, then take more steroids......
As narrated by Mr. Garrison.
That depends.  Do you read Koine Greek?  BTW, I surmise from your tone that you aren't really 'interested' in an intellectual 'honest' way.  
That's because it will require a massive unifying event that brings all the citizens together to work with each other for forced change.  Its a big country, segregated by geography, race, politics, etc. So the event, for example a massive economic collapse/great depression 2.0, would instantly effect everyone. Now if there are soup kitchen lines, and starving hungry citizens are getting beaten by cops in these lines in cities across the U.S......this could be the spark.....  Its going to take something big because its a big country.  Look at Russia......many people there also want a revolution, but its a HUGE country and segregation via geography. Only chance there is a mil coup
Does anyone here know of any relatively simple way to learn a few characters and phrases of Arabic and Farsi?   The narrative remains under lock and key because only a sliver of our population is educated in such things and can read the other half of the world's side of the story.  I mean, I know Muslim publications exist in other languages, but I think--for example--India has lots of gatekeepers that prevent an accurate story from being told in Sanskrit.  I'm not sure how I would even go about teaching myself these languages, but maybe there are books at the library or MOOCs that would help.  EDIT: Well, it seems that there are only three short vowels in Arabic; most words are written with only consonants and the pronunciation is implied by constructions of the language.  I'm going to try to keep a stiff upper lip.
"Hey, I've got a weapon of ass destruction."  *unzip*
Yeah, the problem is that there is too much coverage of police brutality, right.
[deleted]
Because everything in this sub is...
Go on...
Lets be skeptical here. I find it more likely that Obama's greater fundraising efforts allowed him to pay the media to a greater extent than Ron Paul was able to - as opposed to the media itself having personal bias against Paul and for Obama.
could you go into detail as to why ron pauls opposition to the war on drugs is wrong?  or how about his positions on the war on terror, could you specifically note why his position regarding the continuation of hostilities is wrong.  the more detail the better, thanks. 
True.  But one may need guidance and direction to find this truth.
Right.  But if we don't fall for the subtle fake democracies of the west we surely shouldn't be falling for the blatant fake democracies around the world.  Same with people sticking up for Putin.
Ay man u aight wit me. 
very edgy and original, i like it. its unclear what you're disagreeing with though.  how about you clarify so i can have a fair shot at refuting.  otherwise your comment could be misconstrued as not meaning anything.
hmm  
That's funny, just the other day you were arguing that it was flat.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I think they're talking about "nigger".
I ask those questions in hopes that you would answer my concerns with actual evidence, not with a series of excuses for why it *could* be true.  When people make a claim like yours, they usually try to actually back it up.
[deleted]
Yeah fuck the zionists! 
[deleted]
The numbers don't matter, but as of 2013 and now that all the documents are in one place. Historians are now saying it might have been as much as 20 Million people killed.   http://www.businessinsider.com/shocking-new-holocaust-study-claims-nazis-killed-up-to-20-million-people-2013-3  
No actually you were asking for speculation, don't you remember?  &gt;why would they allow him to make it to trial, much less onto death row?  I gave you a bit more than that in citing the execution of the unarmed Tsarnaev associate who was being interrogated by the FBI, and the footage of Tamerlan being taken naked into custody by police, followed by footage of him in FBI custody fully clothed, which does not jibe with the official story.
[deleted]
"they"will speak about the glories of war
&gt;If some of Israelis enemies had it they would use it.  Like who? You realize, if any one in the area launched one, it would be suicide to their country and their allies. I'm not buying any of that Zionist bullshit. 
No, fog is fine. Fig is the problem word.
Oh, the PI thing, huh?  Honestly I hadn't thought about that because the information is public, but I guess they do that Orwellian thing wherein you're not even allowed to disclose full names.  In the United States, people have no reasonable expectation of privacy with regard to information that they have posted publicly on the internet.  Out of prudence, I have replaced the direct link with one to an archive.  Here was my process:  1.  Read username of the admin (not enough characters 9). 2.  Confirm user is an admin by clicking on the user's profile and observing the subreddits that they moderate. 3.  Click about-&gt;team present at the bottom of every page and find out the name of that admin. 4.  Copy and paste the name into Google. 5.  Click on LinkedIn result, confirm that it's the same person as the administrator. 6.  Compose post to r/conspiracy with the relevant information.  I mean, anybody could do it.
no  there's probably been a few false flags this year  therel be more, always 
/r/op_jade_helm_15  I personally believe it has nothing to do with ISIS, or martial law. I believe it has more to do with an incoming disaster. Think Yellowstone, asteroid, massive quake on San Andreas. Along those lines.   That sub has lots of info though, certainly enough so you can find facts and make your own decision on what you think is really going on with Jade Helm. 
1 person no. But if Hitler can raise an army of criminals and rebels to throw out the banks and jewish ruling class, it can be done again. Stop being a coward.
how about we call you on the conspiracy theories you believe in based only on faith in authority..  19 saudis plot in secret, 2 brothers plot in secret.. etc.. you don't want to go there.
[deleted]
b-but muh net neutrality ! !
My belief is, he wasn't meant to stand up after that point. When he came out from under the tarp you could hear the radio channels go batshit. I think the narrative had to change at that moment because the TV Helicopter was already over the top and pictures were being leaked at that point
I was trying to be neither brief nor witty, but to provide accurate information.  For succintity, I believe you will find the emboldening quite effective as a statement of the most salient points when read in the order already presented.  If you wish to reread it in a different way:  The man who is the basis for the term "Hegelian dialectic" went on to abuse his rational device through overstrict adherence and it was Marx himself who pointed out that that the limits of philosophical thought were how it affected actions taken in our corporeal world.  He wrote that constructing an accurate analysis of any extant struggle based on providing an abstract of its workings, how it negates itself through its nature, and what the concrete reality is after the struggle is effaced through its inexorable events was the only way in which people could accomplish lasting societal change.
This just doesn't make people mad anymore... Its been a while actually.
How exactly is not allowing the "Systematic and/or continued actions to torment or demean someone in a way that would make a reasonable person [. . . ] fear for their safety or the safety of those around them" akin to cultural marxism?   Seems like basic human decency to me. 
Both, because that's how stupid the American public is, they'd believe that tea party types would ally with muslim extremists.
[deleted]
Np
[deleted]
It will be a false flag alien invasion. This will do what terrrsm has done but much larger. It'll spark the need for one world government all in the name of "unity" and "safety."
I apologize for the delayed response.  I suppose for a lot of events with conspiracy theories floating around the masses are limited to information from the official sources because simply we weren't there.   With events such as Sandy Hook, the Aurora theater shooting and Columbine, there were CCTV feeds that only the authorities/agencies have their hands on and only the latter were released after editing. The events were so isolated from the public view, the official recording is all we (would) have to work with. Same goes with the CCTV feed depicting four of the 9/11 hijackers go through security, we're unsure if the video has been altered.   The majority of New Yorkers on 9/11 were probably in too much shock to grab their bulky VHS camera rigs and go film. Any non-NY who wanted to have "tangible evidence" recorded the news broadcasts with their VCRs. Same goes with the Boston Bombing, there were several released clips of the bombs going off taken by amateur and professional photographers but they went through the filters of the MSM before reaching the public. Same goes with the Charlie Hebdo shootings, there were a few amateur cellphone videos that were edited before airing and distribution. Another example is of the Al Qaeda, Taliban, OBL and ISIS footage coming only from SITE Intelligence group.   Today we have the power of cameraphones, as we've seen with the Ferguson &amp; Baltimore riots and the Egypt revolution. These events were public and not all-at-once occurrences. Many people are able to videotape everything and upload to public hosting sites. This will benefit us in the future just as long as those video clips are shared through the right outlets. Selling them to CNN will put cash in your pocket but your video is likely to be altered and spun with sensationalism. I feel that popular video sharing sites will not be trustworthy outlets with the increasing pressure on censorship for the sake of "cybersecurity".   Your skepticism is a shared opinion with much of the community and we must do are best with what we have in our reach. 
[deleted]
It can be argued that being raised in poverty has an affect on IQ. I know very many moronic white people, and I know many smart black and brown people.
They will direct the anger against rich people or some dumb shit.
"propogate conversation"?  What are you selling?  The question was "what does this have to do with conspiracy?"  It is a complete non-starter.  Did you go through my comments history because you didn't understand what I wrote in that other thread?  He's not asking relevant questions about issues.  He says specifically that he is trying to stifle discussion.
must be nice?
Use Dice. Get a devops job!!!1!  -slashdot
You don't follow very many of my posts do you, none of these politicians are safe from me.  I'm with Mark Twain, they are like diapers, they should be changed often and for the same reason.
CNN (CIA National News), we're here to program your news.
You are super cool 8D
[deleted]
Nearly everyone in that album is "rich people". 
[deleted]
Forget the companies, name the people
I'm sorry but I do disagree, so I'll need a source of this personnel department existing so long ago.
Okay, that shows that herbicide and pesticide resistant crops are in widespread use... What I was asking for is evidence that the consumption of these crops is poor for your health.
[deleted]
HOLY SHIT LMFAO. NYPOST IS THE WORST OF THE WORST. THEY FUCKING HATE US. I live in NYC and I check the post and the times everyday when I get a bagel or a drink.  The post oozes contempt for regular people and the poor. They love police and police brutality and they love the obscenely rich
You are mod of /r/worldnews?  I seriously doubt you actually "apologize for having to be the bearer of bad news". You smug fuck.  /r/worldnews is the biggest fucking shithole of censorship on reddit.com.  
Error 404: Source not found.
In the photo of the train in the article, you can clearly see a very circular mark in the windshield, right next to the wiper
Who gave you those pictures?  
Don't get me wrong, I agree with You.  I think the issue was with perceived elitism. 
It's called Buycott. 
Enjoy, foolish TPP supporter.  https://wikileaks.org/tpp-ip2/  Care to tell UA how ever other "trade deal" has served america?
How about fuck all teams?
[deleted]
I totally agree, although I do think it sort of is a restriction of freedom of speech. I don't know, that aspect doesn't bother me though. You're right, Reddit is a platform and platforms have their own choice to make rules or not. They want to make rules, whatever, that's their decision. I am mostly annoyed at how obviously they are selling the website out so blatantly to corporate interests. That's probably the main nail in the coffin because when you have corporate interests, of course you're going to have some unnecessary censorship (because some "suits" don't like it or they have an agenda, which is clear they DO have an agenda here) or harsh rules.  I probably wouldn't even care if they DID have rules, but they really don't have ANY clear cut rules whatsoever. The whole thing is very vague to me. People are being shadowbanned for arbitrary reasons, given no warning either. At least on other places if you're banned you get a message telling you why. Here, there's no warning, no message, no indication that you did anything wrong. How do you know your account wasn't hacked?   It's just very shady the way these admins handle this situation regardless of the whole debate about how sensitive people are and how willy nilly people throw around "harassment", which mostly is just people disagreeing with each other and are perfectly normal debates and exchanges.
OP might like the latest post over at RuneSoup.
My local light rail in the US uses the rotary throttles as well. 
Those links concern brain trauma. I don't see how they support the idea of "football fans = good, dumb soldiers."
Yep; I've seen it happen a hundred times.
Sounds like a have a book to buy... 
Rule 10. No personal attacks. Removed.
[deleted]
They yell racism to everyone else when there aren't enough minorities in a school, neighborhood, workplace, but when it comes time to show their commitment to diversity they live as far away as they can get.
Nearly: Aaron Alexis wasn't on drugs; apparently that was the problem.
I was blown away, to say the least, as it was a family member. I look back at my first phase, the one where I felt the need to share this appalling news I had just learned with everyone and realized how scatter brained I was knowing all this stuff and not being able to coherently piece it together. But once you get past that and work on oneself, that's the true beauty of knowing what we know.
Someone I know spoke with Richard Gage, Abby Martin, and Ben Swann.  They *specifically* mentioned the fake AMA as the reason that they will never associate with the /r/conspiracy Subreddit or even Reddit in general. The worst part is, it is not just because of this irresponsible moderator behavior of the course of the last year or two, but equally because of the suspicious behavior in regards to the same mods always involved with Hitler/Holocaust debacles.  This Subreddit lost all credibility and every moderator should be replaced.  edit: [This is the environment in /r/conspiracy now and that sucks.](https://prod01-cdn00.cdn.firstlook.org/wp-uploads/sites/1/2014/02/deception_p48.png)    
Could not be more true 
I can see you learned English very well.
Yes, because it was I who dug it. Do you need help with mirroring btw?
&gt; How would the squeaky-clean, peaceful, loving, and caring image of homosexuals portrayed by the media look if everyone knew that homosexuals were capable of becoming Hitlers? Worse yet, how would it look if homosexuality contributed to the rise of mad men?  Is this submission a joke?
Oh fuck off
[deleted]
Actually, one can make the necessary plans for possible outcomes in almost any scenario with 4 squares, like Louis Carol's "game of logic". I remember reading the Art of War and wondering if Chinese philosophers came up with such logic grids thousands of years ago. 
It's meaningless in the context you are trying to use it because it applies to every single forum or group or facet of social order in existence.  What you need to do in order to use it is identify the things within /r/conspiracy/ that either push the group together or pull the group apart. Then you perform those things that get you the desired result.  This post is a thing designed to pull the group apart.
Likewise.
I agree.  I was just bringing to light the two biggest culprits.  But yes, you are correct.  There are definitely others in cahoots.
I'm not devoted to anything, but people like you enjoy clumping people that understand the generalization of the messages into category "Der paul tards" But you don't seem to be able to listen.   If he were dirt fucking poor would you be a happy man?   No, because you don't listen, i want the 1% to have their fucking mansions torn down and come live in the real world. I understand what your saying, i really do.  But if the GENERAL message is "Equality, better standard of living, higher wages, less wars" and then POINTS OUT the problem, I don't give a fuck who he is, where he came from, or why hes doing it, because that message resonates with me.   So no i don't fucking care about his money, or why he has it, because i'm more intrested in some one who is ready to push legislation to fix things.    YOU how ever, want to cut off your nose to spite your face. You're welcome to it.   
Well stated. However I will continue to preach towards those deaf ears. People have thought I was insane since my awakening last year, but some are slowly coming around to my beliefs and listening to some things I say.    After that Texas "ISIS attack" a couple weeks back, my mother and brothers girlfriend found themselves saying, "wait the SWAT Team was already there waiting for it to happen?  Something is fishy here..."
[deleted]
Where did this myth come from? Rothschilds dont own any central banks
What's so funny? Snowden gets a 60 minutes interview on nbc in prime time.. That should be suspicious to anyone who is paying attention. 
Jews hide behind atheism. Trust me. 
I never said anything about questioning the state of Israel. What I'm talking about is this line in the article:  &gt;Let us no longer be fooled by all the "terrorism" rhetoric perpetrated by the liars in our own governments and Jew spew media  There is a big difference. Do you see it?
 Apples and Oranges and they don't even equal the same ill. TRY AGAIN, because I didn't sign up to kill people and then kill them for no good reason. ARE YOU ACTUALLY TRYING TO EQUATE KILLING PEOPLE TO SHOWING IMAGES????
If only it were restricted to Russia.
exactly hes driving down the street as the people run with him and high five him
It might be small but seems potentially significant to me. The man says he voted for himself but got 0 votes.  In [this](http://www.mirror.co.uk/news/uk-news/i-know-voted-me-angry-5703584) article the following appears: &gt; Local Adrian Spence, who voted Tory, said: "What is the point of the socialists complaining? Even if the people counting the votes slipped up, he'd only get between one and three votes, which is hardly worth bothering about. It must have been very embarrassing for him at the count - he would have gone as red as a socialist flag."
How about the sjw's use of the word 'trigger'?  Makes me want to vomit every time. 
And what happened to Libya's gold?
The rules are for the slaves, not the Masters.
raised in an atheist household, actually. guessing you're in the KKK?
[deleted]
Talk to an investment advisor for the wealthy, then talk to another and decide.
[deleted]
ok then what the fuck was your point? all jews are complicit in an international conspiracy? real tolerant attitude.
When you resubmit this, include a source - The convenience helps a great deal with promoting discussion. 
He videoed the empty vaults of WTC 6. 6 was the building that looked like someone scooped the top out of it. The question would have been, "Why were these vaults empty? Who knew to move their contents elsewhere before the attacks? http://www.voltairenet.org/article160636.html
I downvoted him, so it netted out to zero.
*Sensational* headline! Except, that's not exactly what the article says:  &gt;One of the nation’s largest public school systems is preparing to include gender identity to its classroom curriculum, including lessons on sexual fluidity and spectrum – the idea that there’s **no such thing as 100 percent boys or 100 percent girls.**  (emphasis mine) 
&gt; They would act this way on US city streets on the street corner getting drunk as well  They pretty much do.  Look at all the fine upstanding police officers in this country today.  Most of them served in Iraq or Afghanistan.  The perfect breeding ground for our police to learn their barbarian skills.  Makes you wonder if they brainwash all our soldiers over there, so when they become police officers here they have no problem choking a fellow citizen to death over selling cigarettes.  
[deleted]
Not surprised.  Especially if they had the vote setup so everyone could see how everyone else voted, then yeah.  Who would vote for that when your boss can see you voted for some "conspiracy stuff".
**I know the whole topic of UFO's is always treated with automatic ridicule, but please bear with me and have an open mind for a few minutes. Remember that nothing is impossible, despite what the governments of the world tell us.**  Here's a great interpretation of what's going on: [Richard Doylan @ The Secret Space Program Conference, 2014](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=buNCOlB-HeM)  Searching Youtube for "Secret Space Program" brings up a lot of similar results, and Googling info on "Solar Warden" is also pretty interesting.  Regarding aliens visiting Earth - the Pleiadians vs. Reptilians - I could point you to what I've come across, but it takes a leap of faith to get behind it - many people wouldn't consider the information to be accurate or truthful, whereas I feel that just because this information doesn't come from government officials, that doesn't make it untrue. In the event you're interested and want to check it out, here's the site of a very well-educated man who goes out of his way to document this stuff:   http://www.drboylan.com/   [Pleiadian Message](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U9HtZFb_VtM)  The big picture, in my mind, is that aliens have always visited Earth and that humans are actually aliens that have forgotten their past. The documentary "Ancient Aliens" covers a lot of good stuff...some of it is a bit 'out there', but the majority of cases it covers points to the use of futuristic technology - for example, they emphasize the accuracy with which ancient structures were built, when the only tools those ancient people supposedly had at the time were chisels, hammers, rope, and logs. That level of construction doesn't make sense without advanced technology being in the picture. Apparently, Earth is under some kind of quarantine and whatever happens with humanity sets a precedent for other worlds. The Pleiadians are trying to help humans "wake up" and stop focusing on shortsighted goals and the consumerist mentality, while the Reptilians are the opposite - trying to control the humans and suck up Earth's resources before leaving us behind. Apparently, the  war is about freeing humanity and allowing us to join the "Star Nations" to start life in space.   The creation of the atomic bomb prompted the Roswell UFO crash - someone out there saw our progress and may have sent the ship, I don't know - but since then, the government has had a leg up in technology and has kept that advantage behind the highest levels of secrecy since that event. For example, as stated in the first video I linked, the NSA had the computing power of a computer in 2000, in the 1960's - ~ 600-650MHz...when the first **supercomputers** of the time were only supposedly capable of 60MHz.   Now imagine you're a member of government and you have access to this insane amount of power that the public doesn't have any concept of, or frame of reference for. It's simply too unbelievable and would change everything about the world. Provided that you are bringing in enough money and are able to keep your projects hidden/classified - or off the books entirely - what would stop you from continuing to research more advanced technology and put it to use? Absolutely nothing apart from honor, which it is clear that many in power do not have. So in my mind, the governments of the world - primarily the US government - absolutely has extremely advanced technology and are using it now to control, manipulate, and better themselves and their friends/family, resulting in a "breakaway" society. The wealthy elite are not seen or heard from anymore...they are not subject to the same laws that the rest of humanity is. Everything they do is in secret. Amschel Rothchild's famous quote comes into play: "Give me control of a nation's money supply, and I care not who makes its laws." Right now, banks and government control the nation's money supply...any small wonder why the government doesn't tend to listen to the general public, and why the big banks get bailed out instead of having to declare bankruptcy like any other, smaller bank or business would? I feel that banks and governments are far too close for comfort.  I came across a clip of what was supposedly the inside of an Earth-made flying saucer and they've just landed at Mars and the people inside are, quite understandably and believably, freaking out about finding life and the implications if anyone ever saw this, etc. In the clip, there are big windows and the the video does indeed capture naturally moving objects, and the video feed gets cut off every so often when the craft seems to change direction, which may point to interference from the craft's propulsion. I'm not entirely convinced because this could have been created on Earth, but given the secretive nature surrounding the clip and its extreme rarity, and the recording's contents, I'm chalking it up to "definitely plausible".  TL;DR: I always try to keep an open mind and entertain the possibility of "what if?" If you hear of a situation, think of ways of proving it true, and then think of ways of proving it false. Do research in both directions, and come up with an intelligent opinion. I've tried to do that as best I can - even going to the darknet - and I think that given the abundance of information pointing towards alien existence and contact, UFO's and aliens should stop being treated as "fringe science" or simply "not worth investigating." There's so much that we can't explain, so there's no reason to not try to explain it.
To me, "Big" is not necessarily based on size. "Big" means the capacity to have political power.   I always read it as "Too Powerful to Fall"
Leet speak it. Zi0n1st
when you are helping killing other people, you are just like them... well actually you are even worse, because you are coward who can't look into other person eye before shooting him.  So even when you are just a military cook, you still help with murder and blood is on your hands too
That made him crazy. Doesn't mean that he was active in the CIA and doing missions for them. 
Nice job all up and down this thread.
&gt; Usually a person who delights in hurting animals has deep psychological issues.  How about people that volunteer to join a military that wages constant wars but that has not been attacked by another country in decades and decades?  Whether we want to admit it or not, the core mindset of the soldiers of infantry and combat arms units at the company level has not really changed all that much in thousands of years.  In Germany in peacetime I've seen US infantry grunts do worse to German kids than the video showing US soldiers teasing Iraqi kids with a bottle of water to make them run after a truck. The only difference is that the grunts then were not taking video.  Members of the US military (and all militaries) are trained to hunt and kill humans -- it's that simple. When that is your training, such training does not produce empathetic or "nice" people no matter what the TV and our mass media tells us.
YES. ALL of THEM. Fuck them, monsters the lot. This planet will be better off. Each of them, struck from the record. Without their money they would be dead already, murdered in alleys and from small cuts by those who recognize that psychopaths have no place in this society but to serve themselves.  Murder those who work for them too. Murder the bankers and their families. Murder the mercenaries who protect them. Fucking do it. Save the planet for the good.
What about all the ones standing outside of Home Depot?
The gloating of Harkonnen soldiers, nothing more.
I'd say the *vast* majority. Considering its the only building to collapse by fire damage, its a point of interest for those whose career is based are buildings.
"The only reason they disagree with me is because they don't know about it!" 
Its actually teeming with pedophiles according to Cory Haim and Cory Feldman.
This is exactly the reason I keep my opinions and knowledge to myself in this subreddit.
Was is the Israeli Secret Intelligence Service?
i dunno korea is bad but america is far worst in terms of citizens jailed and used for slave labor and in foreign wars of aggression and mass theft...
As mentioned, a sub woofer would probably be your best bet, a higher quality sub woofer will probably produce better results than a cheap one. You can take off the casing around the speaker and just use that part (which is the actual speaker).   Also, maybe a sub woofer isn't the best option for higher frequencies, you'll just have to experiment, maybe pick up a few different speakers on the cheap from craigslist or a flea market or something. Also will need to experiment with what type of material that's set over it will transfer the waves the best, I'd try different types of metals to see what works best. 
&gt; convince me to grab a tinfoil hate  Number one sign of deep conditioning/brainwashing is when someone pulls this term out.  It shows that you don't really care what I have to say and your mind is already made up.  &gt; What about how when I drop my phone it hits the ground?  It's very simple, the phone is heavier/more dense than the surrounding air so it falls.  something like helium that is lighter/less dense than the surrounding medium will rise.  You don't need a magic word called "Gravity" to explain that.  Like I said though you are using the "tinfoil hat" term though so you are not serious about anything I have to say so I won't go on.  
Lots of Rage against the Machine 
Check out The Forecaster doc.
Scientific doctrine is a problem, but a refutation of the notion of climate change is neither widespread nor meritorious.  The world's climate is changing because of an excess build up of hydrocarbons in the atmosphere and the dissolving of those chemicals into the ocean.  Human beings have understood this for half a century.  The real conspiracy is that oil companies fund disinfo proclaiming climate change to be in contest as a theory thus preventing any actual legislation that would limit pollution or address any other valid environmental concerns.
&gt; By telling you that many folks do whatever they can to avoid involving themselves  I think what youre missing is the fact that they even signed up shows they are not 'doing everything they can to avoid involving themselves' as that is as simple as not joining military. You can still get a job, support family, and go to school without having to join a murderous organization. 
Yes I agree - I think their intelligence is reasonably high but seriously restricted to a very narrow, selfish, group-centric, conniving focus
Because it always *WON'T BE* what it *WAS*?????????    By definition any 'all out' War on The Great Beast of Metamorphosis IS IS *always* going to be BECOMING an increasingly non-linear war.  Why?  You don't hate trans people do you OP?    
And the will of the "powerful" will be to continue to enforce that ignorant fog of fear, confusion, complacency, cupidity, delusion, and demoralization, and that common man's degeneracy is a continuing result of the actions of those who would hold dominion. 
Apparently much is "news to you". 
The denial is strong over there. 
&gt;the neighborhoods look more like projects  You talk out of your anus.
Per the Zetas, 9/11 justice will happen because proof lies in many hands.  &gt;What should be born in mind is that the goal of the Council of Worlds war is not to unveil every lie or correct every injustice. The goal is to allow Obama to announce [the passage of Nibiru]. That said, peripheral crimes that are incidental to this process may get exposed.  The benefactors of the 911 crime are many, and include a number of individuals formerly in the Bush administration who still have tentacles into the federal bureaucracies such as the DOD and CIA. They pull strings. It is no secret that Jewish owners of the World Trade Center buildings benefitted from 911, and Jewish bankers are part of the cover-up crowd.    &gt;What does it imply, that the truth about 911 was creeping into the US media last Summer? Global Research is correct in guessing that no more than Saudi involvement in 911 will be revealed should any currently classified documents get declassified. The truth about the Bush family’s involvement, and in particular Dick Cheney’s central orchestration of events, was never investigated, so cannot be declassified. Putin was threatening to release 911 satellite images during the Ukraine standoff, and all this was in process well before the October 20 announcement date was missed.  We have mentioned that the rats are starting to turn on each other, and even **though 911 is not central to the cover-up, proof lies in many hands, it is likely that by this process 911 justice will result.**  &gt;--[ZetaTalk Chat Q&amp;A for January 10, 2015](http://zetatalk.com/ning/10ja2015.htm)
Thank you. Keep not mincing words.
im not trying to debate you, im just saying this isn't the place to try to convince people to follow your ideology
That might even exceed Rick Perry
Well this is obviously all nonsense.  "you have been banned from r/subreddit" is a meme, you get notifications when you're banned, happenstance coindence yadda yadda whatever r/thatHappened, dude.
One answer Brietbart. A dead losers legacy.
[deleted]
I used to be dubious of people when they said the US government is dumbing down its populace.   I don't feel that way anymore. 
have you seen/heard this? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9CIIc3pY51w  That's ZetaTalks leader in 2003 telling her followers to kill their pets
Google is tough.
Nice try GCHQ
Well yes and no. If it is a all wheel drive car and the engine is in the front then I think that the front wheels would in fact still work if the drive train was cut. The performance would suffer greatly however. 
A car hitting a tree at high speed will definitely send the engine and drive train flying, shearing off bolts.
Nope, we sure wouldn't.  Up until this article,  it was a conspiracy theory,  now it's in their own words. Thanks for posting this.
You realise that the only reason you are giving her any credential is because she is saying that fits your ideas right? Funny how it goes both ways ain't it?  The truth is simply that she's got none, and people doing what you stupidly call "propaganda" actually know the science they're putting on real peer reviewed papers.  What's even funnier is that it's very apparent I'm the only one here who actually looked up who she was what she had done. And here you are calling her a top researcher for bullshit published in papers so shitty she herself admits aren't worth much.
Thanks for your input, there's weird hostility taking place on this thread that's attempting to paint each service man/woman with the same brush. Don't get trolled. 
That's kinda scary, not having a direct link to the brakes and power to your body.
&gt; There's a difference between "not completely accurate" and "completely made up".  It's true that the numbers here are made up, but the basic categories and relative proportions of "terrorist groups" are relatively accurate -- though I'd say the "CIA pays me well" one should be on-par with "I'm a pissed of father of a droned child".  This cartoon is definitely based on real-world events.   &gt; a political cartoon showing Obama barbequing children and claiming that this it what he does in his spare time  Well, he does personally approve the kill lists, and those drones do seem to kill a whole bunch of kids. So even your example, while hyperbole, has a grain of truth.
&gt;go around posting stuff like 'Hitler was right'  You are in a conspiracy sub.  Nothing is ever as it seems.  I never know if the people posting that shit actually believe it, or are trying to devalue the conversation.  Here is an example of what happened on a different site.  I have always found it interesting.  http://www.commondreams.org/hambaconeggs  &gt;Like many other news websites, Common Dreams has been plagued by inflammatory anti-Semitic comments following its stories. But on Common Dreams these posts have been so frequent and intense they have driven away donors from a nonprofit dependent on reader generosity.  &gt;A Common Dreams investigation has discovered that more than a thousand of these damaging comments over the past two years were written with a deceptive purpose by a Jewish Harvard graduate in his thirties who was irritated by the website's discussion of issues involving Israel.
&gt;Let's take your original analogy and extend it. What's the danger of teaching someone about schizophrenia if they don't have schizophrenia in the first place?  But this isn't the analogy anymore.  The extension would be teaching children about "headmates" and how it's important to always listen to and respect any voices you hear in your head, because they are a real part of your identity and that it's insensitive to recommend treatment for others who have "headmates".  &gt;Yes, because you are following outdated models of the mind where you think the will unconsciously decides everything.   I doubt it, since I have no idea what you are talking about.  &gt;In fact, the human mind, gender, and everything else that goes on in a person is a complex interaction because physiological, hormonal, cognitive, biological/neurochemical, behavioral, social, and introspective variables.  Actually, it's not.  While transexuals and transvestites have been around for a while, the concept of transgenderism is a relatively new rebranding of the issue.  Can I be a biological boy who is sexually attracted to women, has high testosterone, loves guns and trucks and sports and beer and [stereotypes, etc] and still claim to be a woman on the inside?  If so, then your concept of "gender" is meaningless.  If not, you are oppressing me, you shitlord.
That is hardly evidence, and it run entirely counter to reality.
by Graham Brown / March 31st 2011  Libya: 42 years of oppression?  Having lived and worked in Libya from 2 weeks after the Revolution (or coup, as opponents call it) of September 1st 1969 for several years up until 1980, I feel I am able to provide some testimony as to the nature and achievements of the new regime that swept away a corrupt monarchy which condemned the majority of Libyans to poverty.  Whatever may be said about Gadaffi, I cannot understand how so many are referring to 42 years of oppression when, as I recall, the new leadership was greeted with something like euphoria in 1969 especially by the young some of whom I was teaching. I clearly remember my classes being cut short by my pupils eagerly streaming out of the classroom to join massive pro-government demonstrations. The new authority calling itself The Revolutionary Command Council initiated a socialist programme- first nationalising the oil companies, fixing a minimum wage, extending the welfare and health systems and slashing the obscene rents being charged by property owners. A limit was imposed on the rents that landlords could charge, fixing maximum rents at about one third of the pre-revolutionary level.  Tripoli untill then had been the most expensive city in the Middle East. Many large properties were taken over and let to the people at low rents. The vast sprawling shanty town just outside Tripoli was torn down and replaced by new workers' housing projects. The Kingdom of Libya became The Libyan Arab Republic and shortly after was re-named The Libyan Arab Socialist Jamahariyah (or State of the Masses). Later, a law was enacted making it illegal to own more than one house. I can recall an argument in one class with a student who attacked Gadaffi for this, with myself defending the law saying it would solve the housing problem in my country. With only about 20% literacy in 1969, by 1980 this had increased to over 90%. Education was given priority with a large proportion of the oil wealth being spent on new schools and colleges.  The new government quickly demonstrated its anti-imperialist credentials by kicking the Americans out of the huge Wheelus Air Base for which they never forgave Gadaffi as it was their key base in the Mediterranean. Similarly Britain was expelled from its military base at El Adem, and the days on which these events happened became national holidays. In the first year the large Italian community which owed its origin to the fascist occupation was expelled from the country, and the commercial life of Tripoli which Italians had dominated came under the control of Libyans. Libya joined the socialist countries in giving support and aid to anti-imperialist movements, especially to the Palestinian cause and the struggle of the ANC against the apartheid regime in South Africa.  It should be noted that Colonel Gadaffi was the first national leader whom Nelson Mandela visited after his release. When criticised for doing this, he countered by saying that Libya above all other countries had given the most support to the anti-apartheid movement and he wanted to thank the Libyan leader for this. Gadaffi outlined his concept of government in 'The Green Book', which essentially was an attempt to establish a form of government not based on representative institutions but on Peoples' Commitees which are supposed to deliver a form of grass roots directly participatory democracy. How effective this has been is difficult to assess, but it appears to have been a genuine attempt to empower ordinary Libyans.  To say, as many in the media and Libyan dissidents are claiming, that Libyans have been enduring 42 years of oppression since 1st September 1969 is not borne out by my own experience of living and working in Libya. During the four years I spent there between 1969 and 1980 at different periods I never sensed any atmosphere of repression. In fact the few Libyans I did encounter who criticised the government did not appear afraid to voice their opinions and among the large number I mixed with, including the many Libyan friends my wife and I had, most expressed their support. There are claims that the east, particularly Benghazi, has not received equal treatment with the west of Libya and that a feeling of being discriminated against in more recent years has led to the growth of an opposition which saw the events in neighbouring Tunisia and Egypt as an opportunity to rise up against the regime. This may be the case, though it seems likely that Gadaffi still commands widespread support in the rest of Libya, especially Tripoli where the majority of the population live.  The army, unlike in Tunisia and Egypt, has stayed largely loyal to the government and continues to fight bravely in spite of the airstrikes by NATO countries. Some will say that my experience of life in Libya was 31 years ago and that a lot could have changed since then and I have to accept that my knowledge of the history of the new Libya since 1980 is very limited. But I think that we need to be very suspicious of some of the negative propaganda furnished by the Western media.  The conviction of Al Megrahi for the Lockerbie bombing is almost certainly unsafe as it is far more likely to have been the work of Iran and the evidence presented was totally inadequate, which is the view of some of the victims' families. Many of the stories we read about are unsubstantiated, though it does seem that an Islamist insurgency in the 1990's was put down pretty ferociously and that a number of prisoners taken during that conflict were shot during a riot at Abu Salim prison. The figure of 1,000 put out by dissidents is no doubt a huge exaggeration. The riot as far as can be ascertained started after some prison guards were held hostage.  The assault on Libya has nothing to do with 'humanitarianism'. It has gone far beyond Security Council Resolution 1973 in taking sides with the anti-government forces in what is clearly a civil war. Now Cameron and Sarkozy are clamouring to actually arm the rebels, or should we call them insurgents, and US officials have admitted that CIA ground forces have been operating inside Libya for several weeks.  This is an imperialist intervention, with the aim of regaining Western control of a Third World country. 
Always. I have a book shelf loaded with textbooks.  Paper information lasts longer than a Wikipedia article or blog post.
Oh wow, you're very confused, that's so embarrassing.That picture is from the USSR. Now, I know you probably don't know this, since you're so seemingly unaware of the world around you, but that was a communist country. They did not utilize socialism. If you're going to allow yourself to be spoon fed beliefs, at least pick better sources.   [Communism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Communism) and [socialism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Socialism) are two different things.  You don't even understand what it is that you're arguing against. How can you let yourself be so brainwashed by corporate propaganda? It's honestly sad that you haven't learned how to think for yourself    Western socialist nations don't have breadlines, but your neoconservative overlords don't want you to see the truth, so you probably never will.
I wouldn't say that something was found out. More likely in the recent spate of investigations, banks are probably cutting off lose ends.   Better to get a slap on the wrist, than.... well pretty much anything else.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If it was a closed system, which according to NIST it was, momentum cannot change or increase as it would need to do to continue to destroy floor after floor. Again, high school physics. 
[deleted]
ISIS is a false flag operation
OP-  I believe the buildings falling is a sideshow. Instantly, those that accept the official narrative point to the buildings falling as conspiracytards.  HOW ABOUT THIS:  Who cares how the buildings fell? Look at all that has happened since. A corrupt war. Our economy has dropped thru the floor. A secret law was passed, that we are only beginning to understand its effects 10 years later. Militarization of the police. "Homegrown" terror.  The US govt ignored credible info from allies of an impending attack. Most of the military was imperforming a drill on 911. The passport and engine that ended up on Church street. I mean, cmon.  Once you find out that these things have happened to other civilizations (ie Rome), you see the forest thru the trees.  Tldr;  The buildings falling, I think, is just a distraction.
I know that socialism and communism are like chocolate and mocha. They aren't the same, but they are similar enough. You advocate for the redistribution of goods by force. I advocate for individuality and freedom. That's the difference. Socialism doesn't deliver individuality or freedom. Venezuela is a socialist country and they have food lines. You can get caught up in minuscule details all you want. The reality is you're a baby. A baby with childish beliefs. You're religion is the guns of government. Socialism runs on force.
The biggest one bought his sad, pathetic ass.
People die over bullshit. If you draw on me at McDonald's I'm gonna do whatever to get home. It's not dishonorable for me to do so. It's dishonorable for you to draw in a public market. All the carnage is on you, not me.  Sometimes honor may dictate that I not fire back and rather accept my fate, but you simply deciding that drawing on me on McDonald's should put me in a subservient position doesn't qualify. I'll fire back, and most men would. Manlets won't, but they don't matter.
This whole persona is so generic.  It's like a script.
They marched, so what?! Non aggression pact? Other countries before USSR had such too. Photo with nazi general? There are photos of Chamberlain and Hitler - more convincing if you ask me. 
[deleted]
The us army is responsible?  Not congress or the senate?? Please be less uninformed. 
I was too. Only one of us keeps preaching fiction. [History](http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/German_war_crimes) though written by the victors and thus, dispute, so conspiracy, is acceptable, to simply blantely lie about what happened in history. Insult time and again, all while putting words into my mouth. You need to talk to your Stormfront buddies on how to present, because this isn't helping your cause. Just some friendly advice from someone that realizes the world's problems wern't caused by the jews, but people that blame all their problems on others so they don't have to deal with them themselves.
And that's your corollary? 2 cops shot a dangerous youth, like they're supposed to do.   I thought for sure you could find at least 2 gangbangers in a shootout where the cops gunned them both down. Yeah, cops shoot people. That's how it works.
I like the arrow labeling the engine. Hahahahaha...
This video is clearly fake, crazy conspiracy theorist. Baaaaaaaa Baaaaaaa (Those are my sheep sounds)  Edit: Apparently reddit doesn't get sarcasm...
So, I can't have one fact? Not one little one? In that case, I call bullshit on this claim!
The anecdotes I was referring to were the homophobic societies, though now that you mention it you didn't supply the study, making it anecdotal as well.  Perhaps you misphrased it, but a womb doesn't know it is making the "last" son, and I'm sure there is more than one gay only child.  I think you've misunderstood me with respect to a homophobic society making boys gay, I am not sure where you got that from.
I'm pretty sure any factory standard car can come to a stop with the throttle and brake both hard down.
I don't...but I'd love to see the rest of you signed up.
First time in this sub,and my mind is just in fucking pieces after reading 50% of this thread...I don't know how to comprehend who's saying what, and if I did,I might be wrong..probably.  EDIT:::that gif looks like a controlled demo
For some reason, "news" sources including "WTF" or any such internet abbreviation in their name do not exactly elicit credibility.
Thermite charge wrapped around the drive line. Thus the witness saying they saw sparks coming from under the car. 
You EMTs are so funny walking into the ER acting like you actually "know" things. Heres a tip: if you want anybody to actually take you seriously why dont you graduate college and get a real job as opposed to sleeping for most of your shift and watching paramedics do the real work for the rest.  edit: and yes. i would make fun of an actual cab driver if he had the nerve to use his profession as a means to talk about something way above his head like crash physics.
What does a yellow light mean?  When you figure that out, get back with me.
Or just the fact that I couldn't be assed to spoon feed you it. Its a google search away, don't be lazy. They cover the video evidence seemingly not matching their model, free-fall, physical evidence and more than likely an entire other list of tropes that you spew out from time to time.  Okay lets stay on topic, I know how Truthers love to get ahead of themselves. So elaborate on these 'bombs'. What is your best guess as to where they were placed, when they went off, what they were made of and how they dampened the sound to be almost non-existent on original video and audio evidence.  &gt;didn't look for evidence of explosives nor are they qualified to conduct an crime scene investigation.  Ehh.. Again, yes they did. And what makes you think that a group of engineers investigating the collapse of a building need to be trained to operate in a crime scene? Your timeline is also way off, NIST had no part in the initial handling of the wreckage.  But lets not get into that, we're talking about Building 7 here, stay on point and flesh out your ideas.
Are you broken? The exterior columns buckled, lost their capacity to support the loads from the structure above. There was no support from below, hence free fall acceleration. I've given you my explanation, now I'll ask *again.*  &gt;Okay lets stay on topic, I know how Truthers love to get ahead of themselves. So elaborate on these 'bombs'. What is your best guess as to where they were placed, when they went off, what they were made of and how they dampened the sound to be almost non-existent on original video and audio evidence.
Complete shit. If its orbit was so elliptical that it came into the inner solar system, but only once every few thousand years, it's first encounter with a gas giant would shoot it out of the solar system. There's no known method of planetary formation that would allow for a bunch of things to form in pretty much circular orbits, then one to form in a massively elliptical orbit. I could spend about an hour writing all the possible scenarios that could result in a planet with a massively elliptical orbit, then explaining why each one ranges from actually impossible to extraordinarily unlikely, but in each case we would've been able to detect it decades ago, if not centuries ago. Ceres reflects less light than coal and is smaller than Pluto, but we detected that a long time ago. Hell, even finding Pluto was a pain in the ass, but we found it almost a century ago.
There is nothing special about a Mercedes that makes the transmission not able to be manipulated by the drive.  In fact I believe it is illegal to sell a car that cannot be shifted into neutral at speed.  
There is no light coming out from under the car in any of those pictures.  If explosives or thermite were used it would be extremely obvious.
It can turn the wheel if the torque sensor malfunctions.
Why are you hanging around in a conspiracy thread that has zero points?  Loser
upvoted for research
Because him disagreeing with you on ONE issue is enough to discredit his lifetime of brilliant, uncontroversial works.    Might want to reconsider your position on that one...  
That is a cop out. Such a bullshit reason for their actions.  They could have some fucking pride in their heritage.
iran &amp; russia are in on it.     seems the western world leaders are all in on it with the possible exception of africa which i think we work to destablize to ensure lack of growth for continued exploitation.  africa is also divided into small countries to limit their power potential.
Path to persia. It's about regime change in iran. But the bigger strategy of destablization in the middle east on the grand chessboard is about eastern vs western world order. In the west,  It's royals and technocrats and academics who fled communist eastern europe, pushing western authoritarianism against what they see as asiatic totalitarianism. Also, the Russians supposedly don't like jewish academics and oligarchs, so they're drawn to asia. Clash of civilizations. 
&gt; Who's to Blame.  *ALL* of us.  We the people are to blame.  It is us - blacks, whites, reds, yellows - that make sure we all stay apart and disjointed.  Together we stand, divided we fall, and we have allowed ourselves to be *very* divided...so it's easy to beat us...easy to defeat us...easy to keep us against each other.  It's a shame really because if we all just put down all these racist, useless, indoctrinated differences, we would all be able to combat the manipulation by the .0001% elite above us no problem.  But we don't...and we keep fighting each other...thinking that it's each other that's causing these problems and that's at fault for the problem...all the while being totally ignorant of the fact that the fault lies in a secretive elite *above* us that sows and foments the dissent that we continue hating, fighting, and killing each other over.  All the while powers above us sit back calmly, quietly, and keep sucking in the rewards of the slave labor we unwittingly keep giving them.  Smh.
While fomenting and nourishing what could be called "integrated sectarianism", they maintain a rigorous grip over essential criticisms and dissent.   Technological innovation and progress, at the hands of those who the population considers "the providers" of such (but are in reality are those who took corporate proprietorship of the means of production early on), has effectively halted any possibility of future social advancement and progress because of the fear that rebelling would lead to their depriving from these "fake necessities".   Why?  Marcuse puts it quite well in The One-Dimensional Man,  " The power over man which this society has acquired is daily absolved by its efficacy and productiveness. If it assimilates everything it touches, if it absorbs the opposition, if it plays with the contradiction, it demonstrates it cultural superiority. And in the same way the destruction of resources and the proliferation of waste demonstrate if ts opulence and the "high levels of well-being"; "the Community is TOO WELL OFF TO CARE!"" 
He keeps on saying "repent, repent"... from 2:45 on he's literally full on defending pedophiles, with NO SHAME. This guy is disgusting    
The music definitely adds to it but it's really just the environment. I feel I can add more than the average person on here because I'm 1. black 2. aware of what's really going on (I'm in /r/conspiracy for example) 3. a person who listens to that ignorant stuff but knows better.   I'm fairly young (22) born in the trenches of Newark, NJ but I moved to the suburbs of delaware at a young age (13). Like I said I still listen to all that ignorant stuff but I know better than to imitate any of it. That's because I wasn't surrounded by the embracers when I went to middle school/high school. Only white kids who like you said impersonated it. Anyone and everyone is a product of their environment. My brother didn't move to delaware when I did, he instead stayed in jersey with my dad, we are the same age. I went on to go to college and he went on to be a drug dealer. The only difference is where we lived growing up cause together we were the same Mario kart football loving kids. Place a regular white kid in the middle of the hood with no dad, gun toting friends, and he's gonna grow up to be just like them, I've seen it first hand. I think the problem starts with the war on drugs and music is a smaller problem. 
And the only ones with the concepts of taxation and usury.
The middle east has been in turmoil for a lot longer than two decades.   How can agree with someone who thinks that Saddam wasn't that bad of a guy?? How can anyone in their right mind think that Iraq was flourishing before the US got involved?  Furthermore the OP was about how Libya was a great country even with Gadaffi in charge and then we overthrew him. No, we did no overthrow him. We allowed him to be overthrown and then allowed that country to turn into a shit hole. We smacked Gaddafi down after Pan Am 103 and he stopped being a huge piece of shit in the world. Then we let him get killed and now Libya is going to be a nice terrorist training ground for years to come. Like Yemen. And Somalia. And Syria. And probably Iraq, again. The book is still out on Egypt but they came close to being in the same boat as Libya.   
Roger that. Flytape is Voldemort. 
They were suppose to increase yield while using less pesticide/herbicide.  They actually did use less for the first 5-6 years of existence.  Then just like with anything else, mother nature adapted and resistant weeds and insects started to evolve.
&gt;http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Epigenetics - although the use of the term "epigenetic" to describe processes that are not heritable **is controversial**.  You're looking at the result. The result is based on the culture of the people who have created the atmosphere for themselves. Everyone has to live in this shitty, communist, slavery nightmare. The difference is, black people are the only ones who haven't been able to pull themselves up. We're all debt slaves.  Think back to segregation. Black people were mistreated more then than now. They had communities and were respectable, contributing members of society. But they were being held to a higher standard back then. White people ensured they adapted to white civilization.  Today, they have reverted back to their African tendencies because the majority let up and allow them to do as they please. Well, the result is clear.  &gt;If you arent familiar. Now lets talk about environment. Do you think its possible that growing up in a hostile environment (See: Racist) might affect the expression of certain genes?   Yes.  &gt;Culture is completely made up, it doesnt exist, its fake.  Culture used to be used to describe a nationality's behavior, values, desires and products.  Today, culture in the West is being destroyed by those who claim we are all equal and that individualism is king. Community was destroyed but it wasn't a made up thing. Nazi Germany was based around unified culture and race. That wasn't "made up." It was a threat to globalism. There was a war fought to stop it.
&gt; And who's selling them those weapons  who do you think? It's not Russia
The guy has one co-executive producer credit for one of the two episodes he wrote for.   I believe they are on season 2 of this shitty kids show. He had a role in 2 episodes out of 20 something.   How come everyone is glossing over his work on other kids shows? 
"No shadowbans for brigading if you're friends with the admins"?
Prime example that 'science' is paid for by government, and doesnt instill truth, ever. I'm glad science betrayed its handlers about a fucking earthquake. C'mon science, give us something else that we can actually use.   And yet people will still trust 'science'.
How would you explain my first sb then? But Nah you can set alerts for key words.  
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What I am saying is that the current justice system has failed. It does not work. People in positions of power - politicians in particular - can literally commit war crimes and genocide, and walk around as free men and women.  There is no legal remedy, then. If any form of justice is to be done, or more importantly if these people are to be stopped, then it will take the form of vigilante squads, militias, individual activsts, peoples courts, etc. 
[deleted]
The desire to murder political opponents is a defining element of fascism. That's why the American far right, most clearly manifest in the extreme libertarian / tea party / militia types, are the pure essence of American fascism. They routinely call for the execution of journalists who don't report the news the way they like, citizens who support the 2 parties, all of our past and present leaders at all levels of government. You can't go to any right wing web site, mainstream or fringe, including examples from Stormfront to Brietbart to Fox News, without finding conservatives tripping over themselves dreaming about violence and bloodshed.   They talk about "liberty." The pretend to be opponents of authoritarianism. But bypassing democratic solutions with violence and imposing political preferences by force are the classic hallmarks of fascism. The militarization of politics is historically exemplified by the Nazi Sturmabteilung, but finds a modern parallel in rightwing movements like The Oathkeepers, and the many, many Republican / libertarian spokesmen who have openly fantasized about killing all their opponents over these past 6.5 years. 
I'm not sure I understand your question.
If so, I would imagine 'differently advanced' would be more accurate. Perhaps with 'technology' we have never even dreamed of.
No we just happen to live near the pentagon during the attack
So we should ban any post advocating military action against ISIS?
ya dudes not mincing words mind ya he's not wrong...
Are you really that fucking dumb? Since when does a PHD in computer science give you any credential in life sciences?  Love how you ask other people's credentials but can't give yours and then hide behind another numbnut's degree even though it's irrelevant.  Again, what's YOUR degree in? Cause unlike you when I look at her shit I know the fucking subject. You don't even know what's epidemiology. 
Schlumberger is a very secretive company but they are not an oil company they are an oil service company.  Oil companies hire them to do service during exploration, drilling, and recovery but they do not sell oil.  The Houston campus of Schlumberger has some over the top security though.  When you get an appointment (if) you meet a guard at the gate who then follows you to a parking spot he assigns, then he drives you to a building full of meeting rooms where you sign in, then your contact meets you in the separate building.  You never get to go into the actual facility normally.  When you are done with your meeting he hands you back to the guard that drives you back to your car and follows you out the gate.    The most secure O&amp;G company I have ever called on.  
Clearly, I would assume that should be obvious. But it would be more concrete if there were at least some ideas or speculation as to what the motive was.
You should've continued with more evidence. ISIS now operate in Srt, Libya too right?? How did they manage to get into Libya to control the Srt area and execute the Egyptian and Ethiopian Christians? They were in there in the first place since the assault against Gaddafi. I'm just trying to add to your words because it all makes perfect sense. 
[deleted]
&gt;You're saying an atomic bomb was the only solution, and it was completely necessary to use it on the entirety of a nation for the sins of one government?  I never stated that dropping atomic bombs were the only solution. Violence obviously was the only way to reduce Japan's military capabilities to end the war without any further conflict from Japan. Nagasaki and Hiroshima were militarily significant cities despite being filled with civilians.  &gt;How is the US any better in this argument - I don't understand why you're so adamant on defending the US as the "good guys"?  Technically there are no absolute "good guys". I side with the US in this conflict because they were not the aggressors and Japan was obviously the more authoritarian regime which threatened the self governance of billions of people in their desire to conquer half of the world.  &gt;If you're doing to say that what Japan did to China or Korea warranted an atomic bomb, which affected every citizen in that small area of Japan, then you might as well say that the US should have been devastated long ago for what they did to the Native Americans, the Blacks, the Aztecs, the Mayans, etc.. Many, many more groups of human beings than Japan ever had conquered and committed violence against.  I never stated that the atomic bomb was necessary because of atrocities committed by Japan. The conquest and atrocities committed by the Japanese Empire's regime demonstrated the need to remove that regime by any means necessary. The atrocities committed by the US against Native Americans is more complex than you will likely accept but it was committed long before world war 2 and had nothing to do with it.  &gt;Understand that I'm not taking Japan or US as a side - I'm merely advocating that death is never the answer, that the atomic bomb was the wrong thing to do. If you can't agree with that, then I question the way you view human life. It is within that same way of thinking the cause for warfare and tragedy. We should have evolved past such a primitive concept by now...  Oh really? So you don't believe in self defense or a war done so in the defense of a nation? At times, death is the answer in the real world, we don't have the luxury of living in an ideal world. I cannot make a true judgement on whether or not the atomic bomb was the right or wrong thing to do, but I am certainly on the side of all of the actions that the US took to remove the Japanese threat.  &gt;We should have evolved past such a primitive concept by now...  The reality is, we have not. Luckily, things aren't so bad because despite having thousands of nuclear weapons, they have not been used since WW2 and there has not been another conflict even close to WW2. The real world is filled with violent people and groups and sometimes the only realistic response to these people is their removal.    
The first thing communists do when they come to power is nationalize the police force. That is the first requirement for a totalitarian regime. That is the point.
it is being enacted now, it is on your tv.     they removing the idea of truth.  pretending revenge works.   sarcasm is mean, nasty thing yet is is seen as funny.  look at britian, it is were we are going.     we'll all be mean and nasty yet proper and snotty in deliver as superiors (they'll give us a target)  they are cutting out the heart, at least want you to ignore it... they call your feelings liars, but they ae the liars.  much is done by omission, those of us that remember die so the next gen doesn't know any better, hence all true stars are shot down..  just look at the death toll in music/film.  all this is done based on what they learned in mkultra.     well that and programming patsies to pin shit on, they love that.
Probably saved her from getting raped or worse.
I have no idea why you think I'm duckvimes. Up until this morning when we happened to have a conversation on a different subreddit, I didn't even know who that was.
[deleted]
Monsanto is like the bat signal for shills. 
Glp?
[deleted]
That's his federal agent side.  When he plays biker criminal, the R Kelly tendencies jump out.
Why is the current scientific community always so opposed to any notion that these kind of theories may hold some value?
&gt;us  Hm.  You have an interesting account with an interesting (and short) history.  Are you trying to encourage discussion about blowing people up with bombs?  I wonder how many triggers you set off with that kind of thing.  I don't support the notion of carrying out such actions, myself.
I don't get the "listen" part.  Why do you keep saying listen? 
Tomorrow your shit will be pink. Now there are two of us throwing out random bullshit.
https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/36giws/what_if_the_entire_field_of_conspiracy_theories/crdte78
Professor Carroll Quigley, one of Bill Clinton's mentors summed it up nicely in his book "Tragedy and Hope";  "The chief problem of American political life for a long time has been how to make the two Congressional parties more national and international. The argument that the two parties should represent opposed ideals and policies, one, perhaps, of the Right and the other of the Left, is a foolish idea acceptable only to doctrinaire and academic thinkers. Instead, the two parties should be almost identical, so that the American people can “throw the rascals out” at any election without leading to any profound or extensive shifts in policy… [E]ither party in office becomes in time corrupt, tired, unenterprising, and vigorless. Then it should be possible to replace it, every four years if necessary, by the other party, which will be none of those things but will still pursue, with new vigor, approximately the same basic policies."
Good. Do it.
I think you can use archive.today to store pages that might change in the future too.
I have no credibility on this sub, or anywhere else on the Internet for that matter, but I'm a writer and I'd love to help out any way I can. PM me if you could use another perspective/set of hands. These kinds of collaborations are great because (as you said) mainstream coverage of this stuff is damn near undeniable. We need more citizens using these tools against the powers that be.
[your memory needs work](https://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/36exa1/the_vulcans_are_the_911_masterminds_if_isis_is/)
[Magnetosphere data is already being systematically deleted](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/36gopo/magnetosphere_data_systematically_omitted_this_is/) in order to cover up Planet X's magnetic influence on the earth
[deleted]
write a horror movie about the guy in the white truck and cast Tommy Lee Jones. or John Goodman.
Im sure if they wanted to end it. They could have destroyed ISIS a long time ago. 
correct, plenty of the weapons were chains, brass-knuckles, and knives.
[Eglin Air Force Base Busted Gaming Reddit](http://www.washingtonsblog.com/2014/07/eglin-air-force-base-busted-gaming-reddit.html)  I'm suprised you haven't heard about it. Being that this is /r/conspiracy.  EDIT:reread what you said. Yea you could be right.
C'mon guys. Let's not downvote the person asking for sources.
Why are we living in a system where war, chaos and killing is rewarded with money?
That is what has happened in the previous 10 years it's not the beginning. I call it the totalitarian tiptoe. It is happening now all over the world, can you not see it? It is inevitable. It's more of a changing of consciousness than a revolution, but a peaceful revolution will follow.
[deleted]
ok. how do you still explain the situation of the mammoths? What **ZetaTalk** says is that there is a crustal shift that happens in under an hour, thereby changing the axis of the earth &amp; its poles. And placing areas that were formerly near the equator by the poles &amp; vice versa  Does our science have an explanation for how mammoths were found frozen in Siberia with tropical plants still found in their digestive tracts? Mind you @ this time France was in an ice age. So were tropical plants growing in Siberia during the ice age?.. How can this dissonance be resolved?  (FWIW, **ZetaTalk** says that this coming "pole shift" will place the new north pole off the bulge of Brazil &amp; the new south pole off the tip of India..)
You are completely full of yourself. You would not know what facts and journalism if it bit you in the ass. FFS Newbie Kid
Crap, now that I'm rereading what I wrote above, I guess I worded things a bit weirdly. I'm sorry.  What I said regarding my judgment of my own experience was intended as just that -- my judgment, my thoughts, about what I personally experienced. I did not intend for my post to be construed as possibly being judgmental of how others think/feel/believe regarding their own experiences.  Your experiences are your own, and how you interpret them, what you believe regarding them, are ultimately for you to decide for yourself, for the most part.  (I say "for the most part" there because I'm sure that there's an exception to this rule. Like if a friend told me something crazy like "the voices said I should kill your cat," I would probably react in a rather appropriately judgmental manner. But I digress...)  I certainly did not mean for someone to read what I wrote and think "dude's trying to tell me I'm irrational!" or "dude's trying to tell me I dreamed the whole thing up!" or anything of that nature.   Please forgive me if you read my post in this manner, as this was not my intent.  I'll now edit it to clarify this point.
Wow. This is the most ironic reddit comment I have ever replied to. You say I ignore the good and focus on "pop culture topics" yet you completely ignore the topic I spent the most words on. Where in the world did you get the idea that he wants to tax the 1%? Rand Paul is in favor of a flat tax, literally the opposite of taxing the 1%. Rand Paul struts down the Republican line when it comes to taxes. He wants to repeal tax hikes on capital gains and the death tax, a sentence that gives the 1% a raging hard-on.   &gt;He's pro-life - That is not a political platform we need to be addressing.   And yet, he benefits from the votes of many single-issue voters who vote solely on the issue of abortion.   &gt;"Supports banning homosexuals in the military." (Aug 2010) This is also somthing that is not important, at least not right now.   This is a potential COMMANDER IN CHIEF we are talking about, making this very much important.   &gt;He undermined negotiations with Iran by signing that dumb partisan letter Yeah, this is a very complex issue, and we need to halt nuclear weapons production all over the world, and our selves.   Way to give a great non-answer, maybe you should run for office. He displayed an incredible ineptitude for foreign affairs by signing that letter. He literally undermined his own country's position in an ongoing negotiation.  &gt; Pro-Israel - "As only democracy in Mideast, Israel is important ally." (Feb 2011) Shouldn't we be trying to make EVERY ONE an ally? You know, world peace and all that?  Yet another fantastic non-answer.   I added a 6th point, if you want to check it out. Apparently, Rand Paul doesn't like a free and open internet.
After they burn it for the gold, what's left of your cellphone will sit in a landfill.   If anyone comes looking, they might find it a million years from now.  Moving rocks is hard, so that makes them more advanced?  Not doubting the whole theory, just your dumbass reason for believing it.
you mean the calls on other subreddits right?  I dont really see that kind of rhetoric here.  
Heh. Sure, sure. 
It is the mercury in the vaccines that causes calcification of the pineal gland. Don't be misinformed 
[deleted]
Yes, a federation of small communities would be a good solution. It's definitely worth a try.
Carlyle group who is partner's with bin Laden's is modern emanation.   Prescott obvs had to change the name at least.  Us govt seized his assets under trading with enemies act in ww2
[deleted]
The internet should call for regulation of John Kerry et al.
Please. You know nothing of which you speak.
Smart people.  Labs destroyed in Brazil and India as well :D  tis a good day
I'm open minded, I really am. I know the "Kufu" pyramid is different than others. What do you believe the stone sarcophagus shaped thingy is for, if not for a body? 
something something selling loose cigarettes... fuck it i'm tired
Except Socialism doesn't mean egalitarian or "everyone equal". It means worker ownership of the means of production. Mutualism describes a system in which the one most work an MOP to own it but that the goods produced by those MOP are traded in a free market economy.   &gt; The issue is that in the implementation of any egalitarian economic plan, a central authority is necessary.  Mutualism is necessarily more egalitarian in that capitalists (those that simply own but do not work a means of production) do not extract profits out of workers. However it is not a system that guarantees equal distribution of anything.
40 seconds was all i could take of that.
Mutualism, as you defined it, can exist in capitalism, it cannot exist in socialism. A socialist society must be totalitarian or else somebody would own something and hire someone else and it wouldn't be socialism so the anti-economic laws must be enforced violently and absolutely. 
Eyewitness testimony, despite being viewed on TV as the best evidence at trial, is notoriously unreliable. There are many people who have been sentenced to life in prison or even death based only on the word of an unreliable eyewitness.   The article does not even name those "multiple sources." No doubt they were either all from a biker gang drumming up support for killing cops, or the author pulled it out of his ass to advance a political agenda.   Can't believe this crap is getting upvoted. As usual, impossible to verify bullshit on the front page. 
I would have to say probably not. The Romans were considered an advanced civilization too. I would say something more akin to that. 
lol the Batavia, New York Wikipedia page refers to Morgan as a ["local ne'er do well"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Batavia,_New_York)
If you factor in the money they suck out of the world every day it could account for at least a couple hundred deaths a year, this is not including the funding of both sides of various wars, the loss of many jobs, and the misdirection and enslavement of the entire planet, in conclusion what you consider crazy is not that crazy, if we dragged them onto the street right now and slaughtered them then many lives would be saved, I know its not ideal and there is no due process, but the problem is that they are above due process, and all that "evidence" u talk about is gone for a reason, so that people like you can say that believing they own the world is crazy nazi talk, they want you to keep looking for proof so that they can hide themselves in the defenders chair in the supreme court
Agreed, poverty is the root cause. Not only do these people feel the need to escape by using them, but selling drugs is also easy money for the "motivated" addict. If people weren't so desperate for jobs/cash these communities wouldn't be saturated with black market startups.
These hops taste a lot like weed...
 OD on lorazepam. Curious on how much the two inject-able doses of lorazepam did they inject him with. they said they found now illegal drugs. what about the legal lorazepam they used? he got really weak at the end.
Okay please enlighten me how the decades long parade of GOP dumbasses as improved the state for the better?
Please!
I would love to have flat taxes, but only if every body paid, including legal entities.  If coorporations has rights like a human being they should be taxed like one. Income tax for every one.   
&gt; No to the reptilian humanoids and death star moon.   He has never even made this argument. 
Those explosions look thermobaric. Whatever they are I feel sorry for the civilians that are caught up in this shit.
It's just confusing because people elsewhere talk about having seen the real thing...And specifically distinguish it from the documentary.  Why would anyone make up having seen a rough cut of the movie?  However, what is even more odd is that it isn't even in IMDB. I mean if some porn films get into IMDB, then this movie should have had an entry.
The last person talking about America who actually was speaking the truth was Woodie Guthrie and he was talking to each of us.  "This land is your land, this land is my land"
And... why would they bother? They already sell the majority of crops in the region, and legally, for that matter. What benefit would they gain in having a single farmer smuggle in a small farm worth of seeds? Does that honestly make any kind of sense to you? Or is it more logical to think that a farmer might have smuggled in what he thought was better seed in order to gain a market advantage over his competition? 
Circumvent. Who's with me?
Patents are publicly available. What are you implying?
That's great! He's not backing down in the face of having no proof to support his claims.  
You were that weird neckbeard. People didn't come there for your insane views. They came for a museum. No one cares what you think. 
There is literally nothing she can say that can be believed. If she said the sky was up, you'd have to look to be sure.
Yoyo, attack is not the answer. I think skepticism is healthy as fack here. I.e. do not eat! I smell shills everywhere!
The other side of someone's argument presented in reasonable context! STOP IT BURNS!
I think you mean the Democratic People's Republic of America
Then rise to my challenge and answer my question:  Define in very specific terms the types and sources of evidence you would accept.
It's a loooong con
None from you, you put words in my mouth and create conditions with the intent of bringing some kind of 'rules' which you can 'win' an arguement by, instead of having a discussion. I have already decided that you're not a source of anything but hate and insults. Why would I care about your perception of me, or what I believe? You're just a little hater. Clones like you are a dime a dozen.
Same goes for pretty much the entire population.
You have a serious misconception of Americans.
what do you mean?  The landing section of the lunar module stayed on the moon, which means the portion that came back never actually touched the ground.
They want to be the MSM of the Internet. Can't be that if you can't control content and the discussion of that content. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
They are not beliefs, that is for the ignorant. What I am telling you are logical observations. I'm going to trust my own brain and senses and math over the current paradigm of enslaved people who think they are free and believe in absolute utter bullshit because a television told them it is so. I have watched dozens of flat earth videos and read several books on the subject. I'm not here to prove flat earth I an here to spark interest into others looking into it. I'm as truthful and honest as I can be that we are on a flat plane with two objects that encircle us. I'm not going to convince anyone of anything that is the job of the self not me, I can only offer truth it's up to you to figure it out.
No worries. We're all on the same team here.
Consider the source.
&gt;because Hitler  Why didn't I think of that.
Because Sanders is "controlled opposition." He's that sliver of hope common people are looking to, when in reality, he's as bad as the rest of them.
They're both illegal but the same way moonshine was more profitable in the prohibition days, so is heroin. It's about risk vs effect if the drug. The stronger a drug is the less you need.
You say that as if nature has some kind of agenda. If Monsanto crops get out into nature, they'll thrive whether you like it or not.
[deleted]
We produce enough food to feed 10 billion people a year.    http://www.huffingtonpost.com/eric-holt-gimenez/world-hunger_b_1463429.html  Just more asshollery from uneducated shills.
I haven't been vaccinated since grade school. I rarely get sick and never felt the need to get a seasonal flu shot, however, my employer was giving them at no cost so I decided.. what the hell. 3 days later I became so severely ill I need to be hospitalized for 10 days.. fuck that shit. never again.
Does that mean we can leave the poppy fields in Afghanistan and leave Afghanistan to China after all first the UK, invaded then the Soviets, then U.S.A. it must be China's turn.
Who could have written this book? There's only one answer...
Careful, you are bordering on ignorant generalizations.  I say this as a biology student.
[deleted]
Shill?
Wait? Am I on /pol/?
Why you so hostile? You know, when trying to engage someone you shouldn't result to name calling. With that being said, I've watched the video and I never saw him:  &gt;put a fucking bomb behind a group of children  Surely, you have more insight into this and can provide video or pics?
I'm noticing a lot of shills the past week, something big is happening.
*This message was sponsored by the Monsanto corporation.*
Unelectable.
This is what will start the death of reddit. 
Actually, that's not called a group difference. And they weren't "proposed". 
[It's elevent o'clock. Do you know where your kids are?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Do_you_know_where_your_children_are%3F)
5153 and still at 94% now. Fishy stuff.
&gt;There's just no way to confirm that beyond personal anecdotes.  There are many, many studies that show this, I didn't just pull it out of my ass. Here are a few out of the multitude available.  **75%** "Heroin dependence: Consequences and precursors related to route of administration" NORD J PSYCHIATRY · VOL 53 · NO 2 · 1999  **67%** "Routes of drug administration, differential affiliation, and lifestyle stability among cocaine and opiate users: Implications to HIV prevention" Journal of Substance Abuse Volume 13, Issues 1–2, September 2001, Pages 89–102  **58%** "Routes of drug administration and multiple drug misuse: regional variations among clients seeking treatment at programmes throughout England" Addiction (2000) 95(8), 1197–1206
I never said that the CIA actively created ISIS. The information is well presented and from reputable sources, which is more than I can say for some, if not many of the submissions here. If it's such poppycock, then why don't you submit a well thought out post rebuffing / debunking it?      .... I'll wait ....
What business would you help them start? Any advice would be helpful as I'm on the cusp of taking another stab at starting my own business or getting a job.
Source on that statement? 
Sure, and t-tests are a tool for analyzing two different samples and not for describing some outlier in one class of some grouped data, which is what I was 'proposing' (errrrr, directly pointing out the data supporting) in that case. What, are you just googling terms like "significance" that you vaguely remember from that one stats course you took, trying to sound smart now? Pro: tip have you to understand them to argue against someone who actually knows stats using them and not just ridiculous.   
That stopped so many moonshiners, you can't get moonshine to this day!
George orwell is a prophet.  Are the 2 min of hate targeting whatever terrorist faction that is trendy at the moment?  And most smartphones have audio and video recording devices that can be activated remotely over a wireless network by the NSA or other agency... Just like big brother...   
lol at your comment history 
Didnt give a shit about safety glasses
Why would you come back? 
Legitimately curious, who would his master be?
This video isn't good enough to prove anything. Prove that's from Wendy's. Prove that's actually ice. 'Ice' wouldn't char when burning if it actually had enough gas in it to burn. It would just melt as the water and flammable gasses were consumed. Ice for pop is never that big and shaped. Sorry, don't believe for a second. 
they fuckin ODd him on lorazepam,GG piglets.
Wie still don't know the long term effects oft gmo consumtion...
If you feel like it :)
You mean *you* aren't getting paid? Dude...
Why not own the food industry and the ecosystem?!
Ty
So Dark matter is just junk algorithm ?. 
These are people who run the world. You know like where you, live and breathe, and shit, how much more does your mind need to be open?
I'm surprised Reddit has lasted as long as it has. The only way to run a site without liability is via a hidden service, or in a radically decentralized/distributed application way.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What, one side that gains immense amounts of money compared to the other, which gains nothing? Hmm, let me think which one would hire shills... 
Conspiritard gives people who believe in government narratives/spoon fed media crap a hugbox where they can feel all warm and cushy about their lack of skepticism. No way they take that down.   
Yes, I know. Slovakia is better than America
Why are you trying to stir up some sexist bullshit?
Can I get a tl Dr for that sub.  I don't get it.
Fuck this bot. 
[Correct.](http://fc06.deviantart.net/fs70/f/2010/182/8/4/Meg_Griffin_by_seniortwinkie.jpg)
[deleted]
I'm aware of that, they took the lower jaw of the first whale a couple days after it washed up.  The only thing is, those pictures were from the 1st day it washed up and there weren't any tracks from a truck or 4 wheeler.  I don't think they took it, but fell off since it had decomposing for 5 day out at see.  I figured the head weighed so much it fell off while floating from the gasses inside.  But I'm no scientists,  so it very well could have been taken when it 1st washed up.
As a Black person, Out of pure curiosity, How can you convince me that Egyptians weren't in any way "negroe"? You make it seem almost like they werent in a continent basically littered wth Africans that couldnt have lived in the city of Egypt or even have a small community within the society it self.
&gt;Another shady less than a year old account.  Lol nice trolling
#jesus  I have been kinda glossed over the whole thing for a while. I thought the Gamegame/misogny thing was like the usual issues in games. I didn't know the cloak and dagger stories behind it. 
Your making me feel unsafe bro.
Okay.    Where are the "cool kids" now?
That would be a RICO like you heard 50million times on SOA. 
Actually, yes, it really is limited to government interaction. You don't have a right to say what you want on Reddit, just like you don't have  a right of "freedom of assembly" on private property either and you can't just gather on somebody's lawn. They're a for-profit company. Arguing otherwise just exposes your ignorance. 
Based on it's name, Slovakia is likely in eastern Europe.
very nice that people here have seen ancient knowledge, i recommend it to everyone here!!
The most annoying part in all this is she is a fucking sociopathic scam artist with a sham marriage to another scam artist. Why the fuck would Reddit even think of hiring someone like this? Get her out! Bring back Yishan or anyone else just get her out!
In a very primal, eye-for-an-eye sense, yes, I think a high percentage of people who lost a family member at the hands of a terrorist or a murderer would want to see that person die as a penalty. But if you're looking at it from a numbers and tax dollars perspective, it is much more expensive to execute someone because of all of the legal fees and special circumstances involving the death penalty:  "Capital punishment . . . is more expensive than a life imprisonment sentence without the opportunity of parole. These costs are not the result of frivolous appeals but rather the result of Constitutionally mandated safeguards that can be summarized as follows:  -Juries must be given clear guidelines on sentencing, which result in explicit provisions for what constitutes aggravating and mitigating circumstances.  -Defendants must have a dual trial--one to establish guilt or innocence and if guilty a second trial to determine whether or not they would get the death penalty.  -Defendants sentenced to death are granted oversight protection in an automatic appeal to the state supreme court.   Since there are few defendants who will plead guilty to a capital charge, virtually every death penalty trial becomes a jury trial with all of the following elements:  -a more extensive jury selection procedure  -a four fold increase in the number of motions filed  -a longer, dual trial process  -more investigators and expert testimony  -more lawyers specializing in death penalty litigation  -automatic, mandatory appeals."  So, it's prohibitively more expensive to sentence someone to death than life in prison. Many would also argue that a lifetime spent in prison (especially solitary confinement) is worse than death and a more effective punishment.
Ya, tonnes of anti-vaxxer stuff eh?
 Exactly. When they reserve the right to censor what is deemed uncomfortable then any idea could be too dangerous to allow. The religious respect for authority in this society is beyond disheartening. No one has the right to determine what is not okay to discuss. All opinions must be respected in order for truth to prosper. In order for debate to be possible. In order to actually have productive conversation.  Someone said that if you want to protect free speech then you have to protect the exact opinions you abhor. If ideas weren't powerful then they wouldn't need to be regulated. 
Voat.co  8chan.co  The strongholds stand, we just need valiant men and women to populate them.
Of course!  That's how all of this works, isn't it?
[deleted]
*sigh*   I'm not telling anyone not to "want" freedom of speech. I'm pointing out that it doesn't apply to Reddit and never did. That's why it's not a "conspiracy". It doesn't apply to *any* website that is run by a private entity. Where the hell did people get the idea that it does? If any of you actually understood this extremely simple principle, then this thread wouldn't exist except for a single response of "duh" because that's the fucking law! That's why *you* get to say whatever you want on *your* website, and *your* users can't somehow complain to make you do what they want, and why it's not a "conspiracy" when *you* control *your* website's content. That's how the Web works (at least in the U.S.), it has always worked that way, and the fact that this comes as a surprise to anyone frankly blows my mind. Where the hell have you been for the last 20 years?
The show is called "The Newsroom."  It's a very good show (especially season 1) done by Aaron Sorkin (if you've ever seen any of his work this is similar).  Plus Olivia Munn
That is a real CEO!
Love my country as well but if we bury our heads in the sand and just keep repeating the mantra we will never improve. 
Why would bin Laden be interested in conspiracy theories on 9/11?
Wait until this entire sub is removed ...
Lol looks like conspiratards are already flooding it. Do they even know why they hate free thought and defend the status quo? I doubt it, since that would require a degree of insight that won't be found in people blindly defending the elite who would gladly trade their lives for cash. 
Found this post intriguing, but....Your photo suggests aloof contempt. If you are not motivated by love and justice and fairness, I can understand why you believe humanity is the greatest evil on the planet.  But it doesn't work that way, as even your own explanation of the cube shows -- humanity has the capacity for great goodness and love and evil and hate (or indifference).   Perhaps evil holds sway at the moment, but I believe a lot of that has to do with so many good people just not willing or able to conceive of such horrible evil as what provides the foundation for so many of our ruling elite.   Do not be so negative about people. I know not your past, and pardon me for presuming it is a dark one, but the world is not so one-sided as you think. It is balance. 
Since no one will actually leave Reddit.
Hold on, I can still just barely read that text.  OP, please re-save this image a few dozen more times.
 ok, so this isn't a "bit thing" but the bottom line is, change is happening, maybe not fast enough; the wheels of justice turn *slowy*, but *they turn*.
Blockbusters, mostly. I know a lot of filmmakers who really do make movies as creative expression. 
Oh so I guess that all of the black people who are succeeding in America are just anomalies.  They jokes too because they follow the law and work within the system and it works for them the same way that it works for white people and Asian people and Latino people and every other race and creed in the country?
After watching this documentary...  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U1Qt6a-vaNM  But as always, if you follow the money, the money will lead you to the answer.
&gt;Confirmed autism.  Thank you for the diagnosis doctor.
What's so sad is that I believe that is his library. I also believe the man had nothing to do with 9/11. But I understand the twisted dark logic of releasing this. "OBL had numerous conspiracy books which discredited the narrative that he blew up WTC. Which means... ANYONE ELSE WHO READS THAT STUFF IS ALSO A TERRORIST!"
 &gt;In any logical data system, if new logic is added to the system after the initial conditions are set, then the system will become unstable over time and tend towards chaos until either a new equilibrium state is established or catastrophic failure collapses interconnected systems.   This is the most fear mongering way to say if you change it either it works for the best (new equilibrium) or a little bit worse (new equilibrium) or a lot worse (catastrophic failure).   In the best is that it hold true in literally every single situation
[deleted]
Thanks for your reply. But this is going to sound trite, but I can't reveal my sources, sorry. In reference to some of the people involved is Operation Hydrant in the UK. More will come out later.
Osama bin Laden was a politician. All politicians are terrorists. 
sounds like they'll be more concerned with making sure he succeeds.
Pedophile rings 
Honestly people sensor themselves. Same with any big issue, 911, whatever. They won't believe it because they simply don't want to believe horrible things, regardless of facts.
That kind of stuff has being going on for decades
Is this your mix tape or something? Hit the road.
We have been reposting this fucking thing for years now. Can we move onto something more current, please?
A safe space, free from white cis men, just like goldsmiths university.  http://www.standard.co.uk/news/london/goldsmiths-student-diversity-officer-bans-white-people-and-men-from-antiracism-protest-meeting-10198693.html   http://www.theguardian.com/world/2015/may/20/goldsmiths-racism-row-divides-students-bahar-mustafa   Her response, which contains this gem "“I, as an ethnic minority woman, cannot be racist or sexist towards white men, because racism and sexism describe structures of privilege based on race and gender,” she said.  “And therefore women of colour and non-binary genders cannot be racist or sexist as we do not stand to benefit from such a system.  “In order for our actions to have been deemed racist or sexist, the current system would have to be one which enables only women and people of colour to benefit economically and socially on such a large scale and to the systematic exclusion of white people and men who for the past 400 years would have had to have been subjected to colonisation. Reverse racism and reverse sexism are not real.”  speech here   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y9uMArSeg38   Looks pretty damn white to me, and she is from money lives at home in her parents half a million house. Oh the tears.  This is the world now. Tumblr overspill.  
If you are a gay jewish black woman, you have nothing to fear.
Father* He* All* x2 and* it's okay, I believe you. Christ's salvation is grand, indeed.
He meant he was killing his account you obtuse moron.
Actually....  * "7th in literacy" - If you break it down to rounded percentages, we're tied for 2nd at 99% literacy.  * Life expectancy - US is now at 36 - it's a comeback!  * Infant mortality is actually at *32*. No idea where they came up with 178. 
We ain't going nowhere 
Do you really think Christ is going to send me to hell because I used the common name for Him? lol boy that would be a bitch.   Scene: The Perily Gates  W42W: Wow! Look at this, and that! *falls to knees* Glory to God! Thanks be to Jesus!  Christ: What chu say?  W42W: *nervous as all hell (get it?)* Um...Wow.. look at..  Scene: Christ goes all Revelation Destroyer Mode  Christ: What did you call me!?    W42W: J.. Jes...   Christ: Ain't no 'J' in hebrew, swine. Go to Hell!   Scene: W42W falls to hell. There, others come to greet me.   Damned Soul1: You said the 'J' word didn't you?  W42W: -.- Yeah...  All the Damned in collective chatter: That'll do it. Yep. Wish someone would've told me. etc. etc. etc.   I wouldn't want to kick it in that Heaven anyways, fuck that asshole. My God is Love, not Stupid.
But the reality remains because it's out of context. 2016 - file exempt #vote
[deleted]
It wont last forever but the iPhone is undeniably the best device of them all. Android will eventually overtake it and Windows Phone is a nice marketing distraction, but the iPhone has it now.
bbo
***Ted Cruz, is fucking scaring me!*** wtf i have never seen such ballsy wording, cant we just have hillary? 
My pleasure!
Well thats sucks.  Its got to be documented somewhere  
And whites. Harvard also discriminates against whites.
The story is unravelling, time to throw out as much misinformation as possible.
Why is the military flying drones around in Denver?
They lent 90% of other people's money to make that 2.5b, not right is it?
http://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/2o9og7/why_cultural_marxism_isnt_a_thing/  &gt;The third problem is, in my opinion, the most devastating. That is that the entire concept of "Cultural Marxism" as described above --the "subverting traditional western values and a means of shifting bringing about socialism or communism"-- is a contradiction in terms. If we take Vladimir Lenin's "The Three Sources and Three Component Parts of Marxism"[2] seriously, then one of those parts is Historical Materialism. Historical Materialism itself is based on the "Base-Superstructure" model[3] pioneered by Marx. The theory being that there's an Economic Base, in our time it's a Capitalist Mode of Production, on top of which arises a "Superstructure" which comprises our politics, culture, art, religion, science, philosophy etc. The base shapes the superstructure, and the superstructure maintains the economic base via ideology. For example, think of a feudal society where the mode of production maintains feudal society by producing goods and services to keep society going and the superstucture, the culture, religion, and politics of a feudal society exist to maintain that base by convincing people that the feudal system is the best thing for everybody. The fallout of this argument being that you simply can not change Capitalism by getting everyone to be "Politically Correct". It simply doesn't make sense in terms of Marxian theory.  and   &gt; The first problem is that the Frankfurt School and Critical Theory more generally had no real focus on "Political Correctness" as a field of study, nor do their major figures write on the topic in any systematic way. Generally speaking, the Frankfurt School's prime focus was in applying dialectical methodology to both philosophy and the social sciences to locate "contradictions" within ideological and sociological systems. The most famous strategy, known as "Imminent Critique", focuses on locating internal contradictions within an ideological, economic, or sociological system. This method was pioneered by philosophers like Hegel and Marx, and has been used by figures all over the political spectrum to analyze this or that topic. To oversimplify how this works, you take an object of study --In Marx's case it was 19th century Capitalism and Classical Political Economy. In Adorno and Horkheimer's case it was the entire Enlightenment tradition through Modernity-- you then locate within that object its various features and trends, and then you take these features and attempt to explain how these features come into conflict with one another.
[This guy](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mb9WdXGNlns) has a couple of things to say.
Your post was made 4 hours after this was posted to be fair.
They WANT it, and they WILL have it. Watch.
I think sometimes this sub needs, not a conspiracy but just some facts. The doubters and the pre awakened individuals who peek at this sub to see what the fuss is about are better served with difficult, if not impossible to refute,  tangible content.   This sub certainly often provides it, but whether through attempted discrediting ( which, i think this sub does an amazing job at fact checking and shooting down as quickly as possible ) or through just the more, "out there" members of this sub, posting somewhat unproven or atypically over the top cliche content, i feel that sometimes those submissions work towards discrediting this sub for its true value.  I rarely post here but i appreciate this sub for its concept of freedom of expression and uncensored content.  This documentary is wonderful, im sure all the veterans have seen it.  But i think being a critical thinker is more than just being awake and better able to assess the barrage of bullshit that gets shot gun blasted at you by society every day.   Its about helping others start to throw off the shackles of the psychological conditioning infilicted upon them by the system.  I think this content helps do that. Thats how i fight. I protest sure... But i think the real social and political and overal global change that i crave, stems first from awakening others.  To change the system, to form real positive movements for humanity, we need the populace to better understand whats happening to them and their environment.  Im rambling but i guess i just wanted to say, we are winning. There is hope. People are waking up.   If your new here, your not subscribed and you are just kind of curious about whats up here.   You sense something is wrong, You can see it everywhere, you can feel it somewhere deep inside yourself. "the worlds fucked and something is wrong"  This documentary will give a glimpse down the rabbit hole of how far gone the oligarchy has destroyed the concept of democracy and freedom. This gives you a hint, at the scope of the power hold that the wealthy elite of this planet have over our systems of governance.   I first attempted to put this up at r/documentaries but they have a 1 submission policy which i found incredibly odd, as content which becomes more applicable to modern culture or events which have more relevance now, are buried in the past regardless of their increased significance in the present.  ENJOY
Hold on, I'll get some [water bottles](http://vignette1.wikia.nocookie.net/fallout/images/2/21/FO3_dirty_water.png/revision/latest?cb=20130531201649)
Zero Dark Dirty.
Nation Programming Resource
There are things you're not allowed to do, things you're not allowed to possess, no matter what your "intent".  There are privileges, such as driving or flying, where you have to obey extra rules or not do them.
how long do you use computers?
And they don't want people to wake up to the real truth! People need to start thinking for themselves and stop relying on government and others on what to believe or think.  Free your mind people by [doing your own thinking](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6EsmlzbIU2M)!
The longer I'm on Reddit, the more this sub lines up next to /r/news and /r/worldnews. I take that as an encouraging sign. I don't care where people get real information, so long as they get it.
Lies about Ukraine?
They have been [training](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4YXQSrOCeKQ) us for a while now.
I think the writer of this "article" may be full of shit.  Can you or anyone else explain how this bill is supposed to help the TPP and how a vote for it would knowingly or willingly help the TPP?  The text of the bill appears to be exactly what the title says, and not what the author says it is.
its about as true as the story of his death they tell you
Tell that to a man who struggles to feed his children and is without work.  Bases provide work and wages to those who cannot find it elsewhere.  All the shops, restaraunts, and services on bases are run by locals.  Even in Iraq and Afghanistan this is normal.  We also allow venders onto bases in war zones; it serves both parties.  The locals make money to feed their families, and worn down soldiers have a source of entertainment, gifts, and things that they otherwise could not access.  I'm not trying to argue with you, I'm just telling you how it is.  I am both a U.S. army veteran, who spent a lot of time oconus (out of the U.S.,) and an anthropology major.
Anyone who thinks that is a reasonable argument to make should be stripped of their license to practice law
&gt; post had been hidden  r/askscience doesn't like questions that out of the norm.  I agree that it is messed up that they hid your post, but that being said your question smells of religious dogma and the main subs don't really like that stuff.  Same applies to a bunch of fringe stuff in the main subs.  Go try and post something talking bad about the oil and gas industry, that will get you shadowbanned there as well.  But your question is weird.  You are trying to ask if dinosaurs muscles were not strong enough to walk around under gravity in the present day?  Gravity is constant.  It was the same 65 million years ago as it is today.  If dinosaurs muscles could not handle the weight load of the bigger dinosaurs, then that species would not have been able to reproduce to make more dino skeletons to find.  If the bones exist, then the muscles were able to handle the weight load.  In the past or present.
Well, when you put it that way, the SWAT team is lucky the infant didn't rip their throats with his non existent teeth.
&gt;I'm fuzzily aware of the fact that no indeed, not everyone in the dark ages believed the earth was flat.  The Dark Ages are a myth; they never existed  :)  I think they were invented by history-rewriting Protestants trying to belittle the cultural advancements of the Medieval Ages through the Catholic Church in order to make their so-called Reformation look more impressive.     I mean seriously, how can the Medieval Ages be 'Dark' when that was when universities like Oxford were being founded?  P.S. Reading the writings of the 'Fathers' of the Catholic Church (certain Saints in high regard among Catholics that lived between 100 AD and 750 AD) prove that the Catholic Church was overwhelmingly in either support of, or open to, the globular Earth concept.  I say Catholic Church but I assume they represent most of Europe back then, and probably the Muslims too.    However the Far East wasn't so lucky, as I mentioned earlier.  &gt;Sorry for the mess my history is for the past few weeks  It's okay, it's fun to read, lol.  &gt;How did that narrative develop then that Columbus met so much resistance against his idea of an western route to Asia?  This one dude (his name escapes me at the moment) a century ago or so wrote a story about Columbus and embellished a few details... the real reason for the resistance from the skeptics was not fear of Columbus sailing over the edge due to a flat Earth, but fear that India was way farther than he thought.  And they were right.  Columbus was lucky that he ran into America.  &gt;And the final argument: the photos of ground zero in Hiroshima.  This has always bothered me, even when I was a little kid.  &gt;I think it's very possible it's just a hoax.  I have to agree with you now.  Another thing about the "everyone is doing this on an industrial scale with a few centrifuges" point... it's a bit puzzling that all these supposedly batshit insane, primitive barbarians are in possession of these high-tech weapons-- and have been for years-- yet nobody has actually used them yet?  Either these barbarians have amazing self-control (in which case they aren't barbarians) or they don't have these weapons after all.
There's no fucking way somebody said or wrote that in an official capacity.    Still fucking horrible though.  
Thank you!  Rand Paul is every bit as bad as the worst of those crooks in DC, wish people would examine his actual history and stop blowing RP smoke up everyone's asses.
lol wow...how stupid do you feel now after making that ridiculously over dramatic rant, only to find out the OP is completely sensationalized?
You're the one propagating an insane theory that makes 0 logical sense. It's people who don't know how to analyze logically and objectively that give this sub a bad name.
"Statistics are for communists" - Republican candidate, 2015
This country needs more cop killers.
Bernie takes campaign funds from labor unions. Who gives Rand his campaign funds? Based off that, I'd say Bernie is more in line with the working person in this country is getting screwed by. 
I'd replace "The Franklin Coverup" by John DeCamp with Nick Bryant's "The Franklin Scandal." Better written, more and newer sources and just a flat out great piece of investigative journalism. http://franklinscandal.com  The Sinister Forces trilogy by Peter Levenda should be here, definitely. http://www.amazon.com/Sinister-Forces-The-Nine-Political-Witchcraft/dp/0975290622 http://www.amazon.com/Sinister-Forces-A-Warm-Gun-Witchcraft/dp/0984185828/ref=pd_sim_14_1?ie=UTF8&amp;refRID=1RP9XGS3PX3FQR1BJKH6 http://www.amazon.com/Sinister-Forces-The-Manson-Secret/dp/0984185836/ref=pd_sim_14_1?ie=UTF8&amp;refRID=1KXMAZ71XC452EP7T1GR   Also found S.K. Bain's "The Most Dangerous Book in the World," about the occult ritual behind 9/11, fascinating.  http://www.amazon.com/The-Most-Dangerous-Book-World/dp/1937584178/ref=pd_sim_14_3?ie=UTF8&amp;refRID=0FZC67JJ365MKN1691KR  Finally: Couldn't Vaccines be rolled under Medicine? 
Yea, yea, I've heard it all before. Actions speak louder than words and that is all Sanders is doing, speaking. If he would've been there in support of Rand, I'd probably vote for Bernie. But, nope, he was a no show. If we want to change anything in this country, we need to reign in the intelligence agencies. They have dirt on all the politicians and all you have to do is look at history. The KGB, the Stasi, etc all controlled the state, not the politicians.
&gt; Paul Craig Roberts is kind of a retard, he wrote some good pieces but lately he seems to have gone off the deep end. Assad's use of chemical weapons and the Russian invasion of Ukraine are confirmed facts.  I kind of disagree with:  * Paul Craig Roberts is kind of a retard claim  **Relevant insight:** *attacking the man*  * Assad's use of chemical weapons claims  **Relevant quote:**   &gt;*"Syrian rebels have been entrusted by US intelligence to collect information to show that the Syrian government has used chemical weapons against its own citizens and, surprise, they have come back with the “evidence” the warmongers have sought to satisfy rebel demands for a US attack. Secretary of Defense Chuck Hagel, in a stunning about-face, has dutifully reported back to Congress these “findings” as fact and in so doing has shifted the US war machine from “neutral” into “drive”."*  * Russian invasion of Ukraine, "the aggressor" claim  **Relevant quote:**   &gt;*“The Russian aim, one Western official said, may possibly be to seize an outlet to the sea in the event that Russia tries to establish a separatist enclave in eastern Ukraine.”* &gt; &gt;*This of course hasn’t taken place. So what happened to all these Russian soldiers 30 miles inside Ukraine? What happened to all the armored vehicles, weapons, and equipment?* &gt; &gt;*“The United States has photographs that show the Russian artillery moved into Ukraine, American officials say. One photo dated last Thursday, shown to a New York Times reporter, shows Russian military units moving self-propelled artillery into Ukraine. Another photo, dated Saturday, shows the artillery in firing positions in Ukraine.”* &gt; &gt;*Where are these photographs? And how will we know that these are Russian soldiers? And how will we know that the photos were taken in Ukraine? But most importantly, where are the fucking photographs?*   
Yeah.  I put maybe 3 minutes into this post.  I was bored and did it as a joke.  It's still more thought out than the conspiracies on here.
its supposed to, and it has before. cops HAVE been sent to prison before.
[deleted]
Well, you're on just about every list now.
Great. Thanks to Reddit, I am reluctant to visit the USA, try and meet a partner, and many other things.
old twilight tv show did something on this. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/A_Matter_of_Minutes
I was speaking more specifically towards the excuses they come up with, not their motivations.
i love this post, i can feel you man
[deleted]
You haven't been paying attention if you think the system delivers anything remotely like justice. 
If the baby had been somewhere else then she wouldnt have been hurt. /s
Oh, no, they are real.  Really working for the CIA to cause disruption so other groups can swoop in and "save the day".
The collective, not the state.
Dear God.
Do you realize Rob Skiba accepts that the earth is round?   It says it right in the article you posted.  &gt;I do still believe in a globe model myself.
Polio and small pox will tho. No need for name calling btw
According the the Report from Iron Mountain, (1967 war is good for the social and economic status of a country and space exploration, using "unattainable" goals, isn't nearly as efficient as war that must waste at least 10 per cent of a nation;s income.  Aliens are mentioned as a common "world" enemy and claims some recent sightings have been tests to see if the people would buy alien invasion as a new enemy.  It also discusses a modern form of slavery, similar to the pyramid building of Egypt might be necessary.  The point is... we're right on schedule to become economic slaves. 
Bingo. Seems this is getting lost in the legal boilerplate noise and flavored editorial writing. The injuries to the child were due to the no knock being issued based on the statements of a "confidential" informant.  The no knock process, which has little oversight and is increasingly common, is what led to the child being injured and needs to be scrutinized to hell and back.  /edit aaaand i just realized I'm not in Kansas anymore. i need to pay closer attention to cross links. *coughs*
Not exactly, I appreciate your input. Actually asking real questions. It's not just because they died and believed in conspiracies, but the circumstances surrounding their death.  https://youtu.be/qFtVnctv-Ko  How would I investigate? I don't know exactly. But I can bring some attention to this and maybe someone else can help put some pieces together.
This is a damn good point.  We need to consider speed vs. space.  Hate to devil advocate, but no one from Apollo has suffered from cancer.
&gt; I come here sometimes so i can laugh. Thanks for making me laugh ;)  *Picks Dorito crumbs from the folds in his T-shirt*
No, but you have Asperger's
the only comment that matters
Hmm, If i was a bettin' man... B.
Look to the right. There's a facebook link (that I can't figure out) and a twitter link. If your lost, just go to their official website then the official twitter then see how they are turning Snowden into le ebin meme. Wish I was joking but they really milking it haha  Edit: Click take action scroll down THEN look to the right
[deleted]
interesting that no one mentioned Port Arthur
Sounds like a set up, weeks ago it was "we'll take your DL if you dont pay your student loans"
Hersh,  now 78 years old,  is acting as disinfo in this case,  whether he knows it or not.   What good work has Hersh done since 2006?   This piece on Osama was not investigative journalism.  This was the last good work Hersh did,  when he was still only 69 years old:  &gt;In August 2006, in an article in The New Yorker, Hersh claimed that the White House gave the green light for the Israeli government to execute an attack on Hezbollah in Lebanon.   This work on Osama by Hersh is out of character.   What a sad end to a guy who was a decent journalist in his day.
Let's all unquestioningly upvote something from "thedailysheeple.com"  Good job guys.
42.
My God... such evil... such madness... and these are cops!?!?  They're not the good guys in my eyes. They're monsters with badges! 
to smoke weed, find your soul mate, have a family, be happy and die
As cars become more fuel efficient, the state needs to make up for lost tax revenue at the pump.   Looks like the idea of electric cars costing you nothing outside of maintenance is going to fizzle out.   Somehow though, those roads need to be maintained and it's not really free.   Maybe if they did more toll roads and not make you pay per mile would be a better way to capture back lost tax revenue at the pump?
[deleted]
God damn I know this is wrong to say but the last few days have been really interesting. In the saddest way possible.
I'd wager that the majority of people claiming things are in or not in the Constitution have actually never read the document.  "But mah pursuit of happiness is in the Constitution!" 
See also:  - [Christopher Bollyn details Zionist (Israeli and US) involvement in 9/11 (from 27m04s)](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Nbh_Z6lU4QU&amp;t=27m04s).
speak for yourself
The moon's gravity is 1/6th Earth gravity.  So in order to put the 30,000 lb lunar module down on the moon surface and get back up and back to Earth, one would need a 500,000 lb rocket...which needed to be brought along...either on the Saturn V, or separately, robotically.  Yet NASA shows us merely the 30,000 lb lunar module as being able to launch itself magically back to lunar orbit with miniscule fuel mass...an impossibility.  Also look up Dave McGowan's Wagging the Moondoggie web page...
[deleted]
Larry *"Pull It"* Silverstein and Bibi *"Bomb It"* Netanyahu were buddies?  Nothing to see here. Just another coincidence on 9-11 *"National Coincidence Day"*.
The occult religion is a mysterious one and they do seem to value the "magic" of the ancient Egyptians. "As above so below." It is a form of astrotheology, study the orbit of our sun around its binary star Sirius in a Great Year, the passage of the earth around the sun in a year and the rotation of their earth in a day across the backdrop of the constellation galaxies. IF you do you'll find that their magic is actually one the purest forms of science that they have endeavoured to keep for themselves and use to manipulate the masses. The great ancient culture preceding us knew these things as common knowledge and built civilizations that we are still in awe of.
Please tell me you are trolling me, im losing faith in humanity. :(
Personally, I don't think we can speculate too much on how much they should be speaking. Apparently they were friends, so maybe they made sure to speak regularly. I really don't know how much time politicians have for personal calls.  What I was trying to do is get across that there are far more plausible possible explanations than "they were planning a false flag" Of whatever OP is trying to imply. 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-uGWut6IRfA
No vote manipulation is using multiple account to vote yourself up, or using a brigade via metaposting to direct traffic to yourself.
because the users account was deleted an hour after
filibusterers don't work anymore, they have closed sessions to approve behind closed doors
&gt;Then how were they attempting to contain the fire?    It doesn't appear they were.   &gt;...many members of the Fire Department of New York are on record as having been confidently waiting for the building to come down. [13] For example:    Firefighter Thomas Donato said: *“We were standing, waiting for seven to come down. We were there for quite a while, a couple hours.”* [14]    Firefighter James Wallace said: *“They were saying building seven was going to collapse, so we regrouped and went back to our rig. We went to building four or three; I don’t know. We were going to set up our tower ladder there. They said no good because building seven is coming down. We waited for building seven to come down.”* [15]    Assistant Commissioner James Drury said: *“I must have lingered there. There were hundreds of firefighters waiting to — they were waiting for 7 World Trade Center to come down.”*[16]    Chief Thomas McCarthy said:*“So when I get to the command post, they just had a flood of guys standing there. They were just waiting for 7 to come down.”* [17]    Paramedic Steven Pilla said: *“We walked back. We didn’t do [sic] any further because building number seven was coming down. That was another problem, to wait for building seven to come down.”* [18] http://www.consensus911.org/point-wtc7-7/ 
It is 100 if you have teh golds.  Edit: No idea why RES is now inserting that UN when I reply...
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What was your post/comment about?
happy cake day!
 The FBI is similar to the TSA, useless.
But can't a Reddit administrator or someone delete his username?
This is where the rainbow ends.
&gt; "Being in power means never having to say you're sorry"  the corollary being if you're not in power you always have to say you're sorry.  HSBC can pay no taxes, get a tax rebate, launder drug money and face no serious consequences.  if i dont pay taxes for a few years the IRS will rain down on  my ass with the fury of a greek god.
Most people are weak minded and immature. It's done on purpose. I find most people are well trained and poorly educated.
Look into the open letter he wrote to the black community.  He basically told the youth to value education, pull their pants up, and speak intelligently.  He was destroyed for speaking the truth.
Thing is, it's now on 3 different subreddits all over /r/all
It's not that surprising.  The idea is a part of popular culture now.  It's been the punchline of jokes for years after the billions of YouTube videos trying to link everything under the sun to their influence.  
I don't want to destroy a country, I want rabid animals put down.
http://www.opengovtv.com/index.php/blog/sdvosb/item/4971-saudis-have-israel-nuke-yemen-for-them-veterans-today
Bullshit. Post proof or there is no reason to believe you.
No discernable source? IIRC It was a personal photo of a bridesmaid's dress, posted after a wedding. I don't know the name of the person who posted it but as the viral event unfolded the original poster also provided some clarifications and confirmed the actual dress color but these developments were probably not as viral as the original post.  It's not impossible for the event to have been planned to that level but for a bunch of reasons I don't think it was. On the other hand, I am not the only one who studies the spread of information, Facebook employs data scientists for this too. Embedding a variable within facebooks algorithms that could be adjusted to either encourage or discourage viral memes is quite possible. the government could pick a day, and the algorithm would select whatever new meme is most viral on that day, and supercharge it by giving it higher priority to appear in feeds.  In this way organically viral content could still be used to distract the public whenever necessary, without having to plan anything. Just set distraction level to high and that's that. I am almost certain that something like this is actually being done.
Clarify, please?
i am so confused right now
Because they are mentally ill and think their money will protect them from biosphere destruction. 
Why did he get shadowbanned? 
yeah fuck it, I'm scared
 &gt; "And I believe that's two states for two peoples, Israel and Palestine, living side by side in peace and security. Just as Israelis built a state in their homeland, Palestinians have a right to be a free people on their land, as well."  That's actually a pretty bold stance to take on Israel during this event. It sounds like he was received well, so maybe the tides are turning on US jewish perception of the occupation of Palestine. He also advocated for deal with Iran, rather than all out war. This sounds a lot more positive than the title indicates.
&gt; No, the way to do it is to be a professional and make it correctly the first time.  What?  What do you mean "make it correctly the first time"?  Wut?  What constitutes "making it professionally" to you?  &gt; O shouldn't have to watch it in chunks.  If there's a *lot* of information?  Yes.  You actually *do* have to watch it in chunks.  It's like reading a 500 or 1,000 page book.  Does the book lose credibility because it couldn't wrap up what it had to say in 5 pages for your convenience?  Does the reader lose credibility because he or she can't finish a 1,000 page book in *one sitting?*  Again, *wut?*  Is Harry Potter, as but one example, a "pointless endeavor" as a story because it wasn't "professional" enough to wrap up what it had to say in small, convenient, bite size chunks?  I imagine J. K. Rowling would be willing to bet you her *billion* dollar fortune that what she did was *very* professional.  &gt; They loose credibility by being such amatures.  No.  The viewer or reader is who loses credibility by being such an amateur that they don't have the necessary patience to understand that some things can't be taken in convenient, 30 second wrap up sound bites.  Come on, man.  *Think*.  smh.
None.  My comment was an attempt to illustrate how a building can be cased and wired in advance very, VERY easily.  
Just like the concept of good and evil.
I don't need a conspiracy to convince me not to go to these shams  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0qt2P8cWoqY
can agree on this, did a study in engineering, still do not understand how this physically happened 
OMG. I AM. SO. SHOCKED.
Well, we don't really know the nature of space.  We are told that we have an atmosphere, and at some point that ends, and then there is a vacuum.  But really, we know what we can see, which is stars, planets, the sun, the moon.    The sun and the moon are both much closer to us than we have been told.  They are also the same size.  The movement of stars actually proves the flat earth, although that is a little more complex to explain.  As to the shape, it is flat as far as we know.  We don't have public knowledge too far into Antarctica.  I am very curious about that myself.  The explanation for the motions of the sun, moon, stars and planets, with images can be found at the link I gave.  It would take me too long to type out the whole explanation here.
Because they have space ships.
[deleted]
Beyond all of that: This is a poison pill for democracy and will destroy nation rules/law/sovereignty. We can't even expect to fight back against job loss or the environment if it becomes legal for corporations to sue nations (and win) over their own laws. Corporations will become above national laws....legally. Bye bye labor laws. Bye bye environmental laws. Bye bye democracy as we know it.
That was a leaked video. We were never supposed to see it. 
Thank you for your contributions here. Free fall *is* the smoking gun.
I'm personal to mutton &amp; mead, personally.
So this can suggest unnatural means?
Also, harry potter was told in multiple books. Which is exactly what I'm asking for. Thank you for a great example.
Smack-o's Rozar*
Yeah I listen to radiolab, adam's voice sounds like that one guy that does tales to terrify. Smodcast is with kevin smith right?
/u/iscuck_bot papipapichulo
&gt; Who the fuck cares if it is Christians or Jews? You did in your original comment to me when you said I was singling out an entire ethnic group and then proceeded to rant about how I'm talking exclusively about Jews.  It's ONE GROUP OF PEOPLE with a SHARED IDEA, it's IRRELEVANT what term you use to describe this group of people, they are no different than all the other groups of people with shared ideas who "want their own state", and make their own state, etc.  &gt; Fuckin George W Bush said he brought us into Iraq because God told him to end tyranny in Iraq and that would fulfill a prophecy from the book of Ezekiel and we'd end the threat that Gog and Magog posed to Israel.   want to link me to a source for those exact words please? Because right now I think your head is filled with a lot of bullshit.  if you think the leaders of the world actually believe in the bible literally, you are going to be in for quite a disenchanted, scary, and ignorant life.
First of all, you know Netanyahu wasn't PM in the time period in question right? Did you bother googling it before you continued to bug me about it? Nope, he was actually in the private sector from 1999-2002. But, the article says that they kept in contact even when he was PM, so I didn't bother bringing it up.  So, the article also says they kept in touch on Sunday afternoons, New York time. Now, by my calculations, That means somewhere in the region of 7-10pm in Israel. Now, when I look at Obama's schedule, it doesn't even show the schedule Sundays! And look, it says that on most weekdays, he was back at the Whitehouse by that time! The idea that even the president couldn't set aside 10 minutes a week for a good friend is absurd. Pulled right out of your ass and unsubstantiated to support your beliefs. I'll bet you didn't even look at that schedule or the article did you? Just worked on assumptions all the way through...  So thanks for trying to get your kicks at someone you thought wouldn't defend themselves. Please fuck off now. I don't give a shit about any rebuttal you might pull out of your ass to save this desperate little angle you as trying to hold onto.  
be done, but leave here knowing that everyone in this thread thinks you're really shady.  Think about switching accounts.
No way.  The building was cleared hours before hand.  I gained so much respect for Luke Rudkowski after watching this video:  http://youtu.be/wJsEGgc5L2c  This guy was even in the building &amp; it was virtually spotless:  http://youtu.be/uLqGRv7CQlc  Sorry for the obnoxious links, on mobile.
&gt;1- Are you aware ALL the video from ALL the moon expeditions has been "lost" by NASA? ALL of it?  No, that isnt true. Even the link you give below says it was only the Apollo 11 footage (which for various reasons, may have been the only one that was faked imo).
This isn't necessarily on the topic of mind control but I have been noticing a lot of UK festivals occur on so called ley-lines, and those that do most often have a main stage in the shape of a pyramid, or other sky-reaching shape which I imagine is used to harness energies. This may sound like a load of rubbish but I see it at nearly every festival I go to. The one that comes to mind is Glastonbury with the pyramid stage, but I have also seen it at Green Man in Wales where the main stage is under a mountain and on a ley line. 
They are avoiding talking about the 'big taboo' issue:  the drought is being intentionally geoengineered for profit. Take away the natural support system so there is no other choice. Same shit, different lies. Politicians are paid off, media is controlled, average Joes and nature are left to pick up the tab once again. 
&gt;This is where you (and many other "alternate sources") lose me. Reddit has millions of users, the organized effort to "hide the truth" would be overwhelming.  I have more but this is already too long.   Air Force pdf Air Force seeks software http://www.scribd.com/doc/51066167/Online-Persona-Management  U.S. Military Launches Spy Operation Using Fake Online Identities   http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2011/03/17/online-persona-management_n_837153.html  US military cyber force activated Operation Screaming Fist is go  http://www.theregister.co.uk/2009/08/19/24th_air_force_activated/  Astroturf and manipulation of media messages | Sharyl Attkisson | TEDxUniversityofNevada - [10:37] (youtu.be)  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-bYAQ-ZZtEU&amp;feature=youtu.be  JTRIG online persona's  How Washington and its Allies Use Social Media to Topple Governments &amp; Manipulate Public Opinion   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MqUztAX7ozw#t=12   Revealed: Pentagon spent millions studying how to influence social media  http://rt.com/usa/171356-darpa-social-media-study/  http://politicalblindspot.com/leaked-intelligence-agencies-running-mass-number-of-propaganda-accounts-on-social-media/  http://www.theguardian.com/technology/2011/mar/17/us-spy-operation-social-networks  http://boingboing.net/2011/03/17/us-military-launches.html  http://www.rawstory.com/rs/2011/02/18/revealed-air-force-ordered-software-to-manage-army-of-fake-virtual-people/  http://www.dailykos.com/story/2011/02/16/945768/-UPDATED-The-HB-Gary-Email-That-Should-Concern-Us-All   http://www.rawstory.com/rs/2011/02/22/exclusive-militarys-persona-software-cost-millions-used-for-classified-social-media-activities/  Air Force Releases ‘Counter-Blog’ Marching Orders http://www.wired.com/2009/01/usaf-blog-respo/    Persona management, Operation Ntrepid Operation Earnest Voice http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ntrepid    Glenn Greenwald: [How Covert Agents Infiltrate the Internet to Manipulate, Deceive, and Destroy Reputations] (https://firstlook.org/theintercept/2014/02/24/jtrig-manipulation/)  Glenn Greewld: [Hacking Online Polls and Other Ways British Spies Seek to Control the Internet] (https://firstlook.org/theintercept/2014/07/14/manipulating-online-polls-ways-british-spies-seek-control-internet/)  [GCHQ’s “Chinese menu” of tools spreads disinformation across Internet-  “Effects capabilities” allow analysts to twist truth subtly or spam relentlessly.] (http://arstechnica.com/security/2014/07/ghcqs-chinese-menu-of-tools-spread-disinformation-across-internet/)    [The Guardian: Internet Astroturfing] (http://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/libertycentral/2010/dec/13/astroturf-libertarians-internet-democracy)  [BBC News: US plans to 'fight the net' revealed] (http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/4655196.stm)  [BBC News: Pentagon plans propaganda war] (http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/1830500.stm)  [Buzzfeed: Documents Show How Russia’s Troll Army Hit America] (http://www.buzzfeed.com/maxseddon/documents-show-how-russias-troll-army-hit-america#.ki8Mz97ly)  [CENTCOM engages bloggers] (http://www.rawstory.com/news/2006/Raw_obtains_CENTCOM_email_to_bloggers_1016.html)  [WIRED: Air Force Releases ‘Counter-Blog’ Marching Orders] (http://www.wired.com/dangerroom/2009/01/usaf-blog-respo/)  [Military Report: Secretly ‘Recruit or Hire Bloggers’] (http://www.wired.com/dangerroom/2008/03/report-recruit/)  [The Guardian: Israel organizes volunteers to flood the net with Israeli propaganda] (http://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2009/jan/09/israel-foreign-ministry-media)    [The Guardian: Israel ups the stakes in the propaganda war] (http://www.theguardian.com/media/2006/nov/20/mondaymediasection.israel)  [Israel To Pay Students For Pro-Israeli Social Media Propaganda] (http://www.huffingtonpost.co.uk/2013/08/14/israel-pay-students-propaganda_n_3755782.html)     
Information on the Los Angeles, CA march [here](https://www.facebook.com/events/476970795793660/).  &gt; will meet up in Los Feliz near Sunset/Vermont at 1 PM &amp; then March to Griffith park. If you plan to join us in Los Feliz, plan to arrive at 1PM for a march that will depart at 1:30 PM. The exact address of this meeting location is 1500 North Vermont Avenue, East Hollywood, Los Angeles 90027
[deleted]
it cannot be true because they didn't use physical evidence. Instead they used a model and kept modifying it until the model partially collapsed in a manner inconsistent with the actual collapse. And their modifications consisted of removing fasteners, stiffeners, altering the size of the beams, adjusting the temperature of the fires, adjusting the physical response of steel at the temperatures. When you watch the simulation, you see the initial momentum to generate the scenario for their collapse has a beam falling several stories unimpeded to knock a column off its footing. This looks nice in a frame model, but the building had floors and it would have been impossible for the beam to fall unimpeded and gain the necessary momentum to initialize the collapse. The collapse would then be partial and non-symmetrical.  Free-fall in itself is not the smoking gun. Global symmetrical free-fall through the path of greatest resistance is. This is what the evidence shows.   But this is all nonsense. In determining an engineering failure, we don't model it, we use the physical evidence. NIST had to jump through a lot of hoops to avoid using physical evidence. In order to avoid any evidence of explosions, NIST made an arbitrary measure for explosions: the explosion would have produced 130-140 decibels at half a mile. They then determined that there was no evidence of an explosion heard at such a magnitude. This is wrong on many levels. Primarily because in forensic investigations, we use evidence, not find ways to avoid examining evidence. By their standard, they can dismiss videos of first responders reacting to a huge explosion by saying it failed to meet their criteria for an explosion.   In short, NIST altered known attributes of WTC 7 until they could produce a model that fell. The simulation does not reflect reality and does not explain anything.   But what it does do is show that they went out of their way to avoid conducting a forensic investigation according to accepted standards. They went out of their way to avoid using the physical evidence. And they made unsupportable claims (no explosions) using arbitrary methods.   It's like saying JFK was killed by a meteorite. 
I see what you mean. On the other hand, Cosby has been Mr. Nice Guy for decades. So there's a novelty factor that comes into play when someone makes an accusation.   Now you've got a former(?) celebrity, sex scandal as well as novelty. That's gotta be good ratings for your news show right? Ratings equal money and TPTB are all about making money.
Stop using the term 'self haitng jew'
Israel, now also have the largest military force in-proportion to its [population](http://i.imgur.com/Vb1eMGg.png), too.
Because they are made of silicone and botox, normal rules do not apply.
&gt; It doesn't seem logical to doubt a team of trained military operatives could take out any building in the world on a moments notice.   Why doesn't it seem logical?
The people who control the media in America (the Jews, for anyone who doesn't know this already) exalt the physical and mock and denegrate the intellectual. They present physical appearance, physical feats, sports, and physical violence as important, while ignoring intellectual achievement and ability, or mocking it.  Why would they do this, when the intellect is such an important part of Jewish life and culture?  Because they want to degrade white Christian society. It is part of their general program to make whites hate themselves and their history, their heritage, their achievements as a people, their culture.
30%?  More like 50% plus expenses
So that makes sense, but only if the sun is more like a spotlight and less like a fireball. 
I wasn't the person who started the thread, the OP seems to have abandoned it.  But I should say that asking for any question and responding to it is probably more difficult than just presenting some proofs.   But here a couple anyway:        1.  The horizon always rises to your eye level no matter how high you go. If the earth was a ball, at some point going up you would need to look down to the horizon.  Think about the last time you looked out the window of an airplane.  You can test it yourself. Get a camera, stick it on a balloon, let it go. People have gone up to 20 miles with balloons and always see the horizon rise to the level of the camera. That is only possible on a flat plane.  Do keep in mind though that air has moisture and other particles in it, so the distance you can see is not infinite.  2.  Consider how much water should curve using Pythagorean theorem.  A copy of the book “The Lighthouses of the World” and a calculator are enough to prove that the Earth is not a globe, but an extended flat plane. The distance from which various lighthouse lights around the world are visible at sea far exceeds what could be found on a globe Earth 25,000 miles in circumference. For example, the Dunkerque Light in southern France at an altitude of 194 feet is visible from 28 miles away. Spherical trigonometry dictates that if the Earth was a globe with the given curvature of 8 inches per mile squared, this light should be hidden 190 feet below the horizon! 
/r/conspiracy also has a ton of facts interwoven with fiction. The fictional aspects are unavoidable (because some people intentionally spread lies to discredit the truth). You just have to use your mind and doubt everything.
What you are saying should be easy to prove.  A person looking through a telescope from a NYC apartment facing east should be able to read the time on Big Ben in London.
Never forget /u/OCDtrigger
[deleted]
If they aren't doing anything wrong they have nothing to hide.
*sigh*, its sad, but you're all too right...  I guess all we can do with this reddit medium is try and take knowledge of this kind and get it out to as many subreddits as possible...
Most schools are too chicken shit to show you whats really happening around them. I don't understand why they want to shield people from the truth other then to hide the fact the world is fucked up.   Its like all the stories you are told and believe when you are little and when you get older you realized most of those stories are made up BS to control or fool you in to believing something that was never real.  So strange it is!
They don't.
&gt; Flu season will soon be here, I will get a flu shot.  Why?  Every year they say " ooops the flu vaccine this year wasn't the right strain and actually wasn't effective"  If you eat correctly and fortify your immune system then you won't have to worry about getting the flu.  If your answer to health is expecting and trusting companies that  [knowingly sell HIV and Hepatitis infected blood](http://en.wikipedia.org /wiki/Contaminated_haemophilia_blood_products )  to give you a magic health shot so that you don't get sick, then your going to be in trouble.  Almost everyone that I know that gets the flu had the shot, yet people still line up with blind trust in these multi-billion dollar corporations like the are concerned for our health.
I think you all give them way too much credit for thinking they're actually taking over the world, and it's paranoid and delusional.  They might *imagine* themselves as rulers, but that's only because no one else is doing it. If people were able to rule and control themselves, no one else would need to (nor be able to) do it for them.
Look into the aluminum-vaccine research that allowed for them to be deemed safe... The control-group was given an ALUMINUM-BASED PLACEBO! If I find the link again, I'll post it. 
your article is from 3/8/91.  which was 1 week after the golf war ended.  ever consider they activated a ton of forces in case of an attack?  to bring it to present numbers, according to wikipedia there are 176k active duty personnel with a population of 8.2m.  which makes it 21 per 1000.
Its a white man being arrested because he was carrying a gun, same concept, different colour skin. Now show me where the racism is in these videos.
&gt;Why you can't accept that Muslims are ideologically and instinctively driven by their religion to be savages  It's nice that you think you despise racists, but I'm sorry I have to be the one to tell you that you fall into the same idealogical camp of bigotry.  Have you even bothered to look into the 60 years of history that US intelligence/military groups have of fomenting insurrection via arming rebel factions? This is how they consolidate power in uncooperative nations, in order to further subjugate them and control regions.  You sound like you're completely uninformed as to how these organizations operate, this is business as usual
and i wait, because i will be told how this system would be effective.              wait wait wait.     r/conspiracy has become an mockery unto itself
Just because you want something to be true doesn't make it so.   Faking, making up and using wrong words is a good way to have people discredit you before they even start to read what you've wrote. If you can't articulate what you're trying to say without making basic grammar mistakes, and then *admonishing* people when they try to help you realize and correct yourself, how do you expect anyone to take you seriously.   Edit: ironic typo 
Quite possibly, however a pretty good off the cuff retort would be to point out the government's own admission that the use of this mass dragnet surveillance has thwarted nothing to date, and specifically the Boston marathon bombing occurred without any restrictions to the NSA's use of mass surveillance, which would make it difficult for them to argue that a successful attack could only occur without all of the surveillance abilities the current Patriot Act bestows upon them. 
Does anyone have a link to the actual DIA report?
I absolutely support what Rand Paul is doing, and I imagine he's already thought about what the establishments next move will be also.   We all should support what he's trying to do,  regardless of what may or may not happen.   I think the fact that a majority of Americans are now against the Patriot Act speaks loudly about how many people have now woken up to the fraud of the radical Islamic terrorism threat which was the catalyst for enacting the Patriot Act in the first place. In fact,  it is a very good possibility that even if the establishment were to try this,  enough people are awake that even another staged terror attack might not work,  and even backfire.   Another staged terror pysop on the American people is my red line.
Danny Jowenko, world authority on controlled demolition.  Says WTC7 *for certain* CD before he even knew what he was watching.  Danny Jowenko dies in mysterious single-car "accident" soon afterwards.
Non sequitur.  Not every building is like WTC7.  WTC7 collapsed because it had a shitty design because it was built over a ConEd substation.  And lessons from 9/11 have been learned and found their way into building regulations.  
I would buy such products in a second...but how is this different from what Big Pharma is doing? They are charging for a proprietary product. There's nothing wrong with that, but you make them sound altruistic. They are NOT...any more so than GSK or Roche. They are doing the *precise* same thing.  Now...if they GAVE this information away it would be a different story. If they GAVE it away to specifically take down Big Pharma I would send them $50 right now (if it worked). In fact, I'll go as far as to say that NOT giving it away is worse than what Big Pharma is doing!!! They are capitalizing on the misery (and hope) of people...just like Pharma pushing their OCs and Opanas are doing. Six of one, half-dozen of the other.  Most opiate addicts can be cured with one dose of Ibogaine...easily available in Mexico and Canada.
They do this ALL THE TIME.  Try putting up a copy of one of Yoav Shamir's films like *Defamation* or *Checkpoint--Israel*. They'll be removed in minutes. Luckily I ripped them, and have them.
"Look, we understood we couldn't make it illegal to be young or poor or black in the United States, but we could criminalize their common pleasure. We understood that drugs were not the health problem we were making them out to be, but it was such a perfect issue...that we couldn't resist it."  John Ehrlichman, White House counsel to President Nixon on the rationale of the War on Drugs.  Nixon,  not Reagan.  
I've tossed this idea around before. Check out thermobaric weapons, they look very similar in design and taking video compression into affect could be doctored by a professional to appear similar to an airliner. 
I live on US mainland (San Diego), and our gas at $4 gallon, is still more expensive than that of an island. WTF
Ahhhh, I remember back when I still had faith that change can come from within the system.
aka: Alex Jones.
No your absolutely right,  this is a win and it should be celebrated.  I don't think It's unfair however to speculate what the establishment will do if they really do end up "losing" their beloved NSA spying grid, which they've used now for 14 years to gain and consolidate power.   People like Lindsey Graham,  John McCain, Diane Feinstein,  and Jeb Bush will not just accept the American people saying no to them and their surveillance lightly.     
Building 7 collapsed at 5:21 pm on 9-11-2001 - it was first and only steel skyscraper in world history to collapse because of fire.  Exclusive interviews with qualified professionals demonstrating the fact that the reports produced by the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) on the destruction of the World Trade Center (WTC) are unscientific and fraudulent. Fire did not bring down WTC 7 — demolition did.  Steven Dusterwald, S.E. - Structural Engineer: https://youtu.be/I7oti6KGEf4  Mr. Dusterwald presents contradictory evidence between the NIST model and the actual sequence of failures within all the WTC Buildings.  Kamal Obeid, C.E., S.E. – Civil/Structural Engineer: https://youtu.be/3WCcSHpvAJ8  Mr. Obeid, a 30-year structural engineer explains how NIST's analysis actually disproves it's own theories on how WTC Building 7 collapsed, thereby confirming the use of controlled demolition.  Ed Munyak, FPE - Fire Protection Engineer: https://youtu.be/c0QEutd1Unc  Mr. Munyak uses his considerable experience as a 25 year Fire Protection Engineer to expose the NIST reports of WTC 1, 2 &amp; 7 as fraudulent.  Tom Sullivan - Explosives Technician/Loader: https://youtu.be/u5IgqJXyLbg  Former Explosives Loader for Controlled Demolition, Inc. (CDI) Tom discusses the complex process of preparing a building for controlled demolition and sites the reasons why WTC building 7 had to have been a controlled demolition.  Richard Humenn P.E. - WTC Chief Electrical Design Engineer: https://youtu.be/gJy7lhVK2xE  Mr. Humenn gives us quite a unique perspective inside the elevator shafts in the twin towers and how access to the core columns could have been gained.  Robert McCoy - High-Rise Architect: https://youtu.be/4-3FQtZnk2A  Mr. McCoy expresses his doubt abut the official story and from NIST as to how these 3 skyscrapers were destroyed and calls for a new investigation examining he hypothesis of controlled demolition.  Kathy McGrade, B.S -- Metallurgical Engineering: https://youtu.be/Q6ziLE23Soo  Kathy McGrade explains how normal office fires cannot melt steel and how the symmetrical collapse of all WTC skyscrapers, according to the official story violates the laws of physics and thermodynamics.  Dr. Bob Bowman PhD, Lt. Colonel (ret.): https://youtu.be/CROB5p-1GjE  The former head of the Star Wars program under President Ford &amp; Carter, has multiple engineering degrees and agrees that NIST is conducting a massive coverup.  1999 Pres. Medal of Science award winner, Lynn Margulis PhD: https://youtu.be/O0fkDmi78Og  Famed scientist, Lynn Margulis, provides crucial rules and elements within an investigative scientific analysis to procure an accepted hypotheses vs. what's depicted in the NIST report.  Rudy Dent, 9/11 survivor and former Fire Marshall: https://youtu.be/nQrpLp-X0ws  32 year veteran of NYC fire department and the NYPD, about his incredible first hand experience of the lies surrounding WTC 7.  Ron Brookman, Structural Engineer: https://youtu.be/TM_l_4sJ-sY  Mr. Brookman discusses his direct inquiries with President Obama and NIST on NIST's responsibility to find the cause of the collapse of WTC Building 7 and their responses.  David Topete, MSCE, S.E.: https://youtu.be/v9WB1A9j8f8  Mr. Topete discusses how WTC Building 7's column 79's failure could not have caused the symmetrical and simultaneous collapse into it's own footprint.  Tony Szamboti, M.E. - Mechanical Engineer: https://youtu.be/4V3WdpzaA4o  Mr. Szamboti provides a comprehensive analysis of the undeniable discrepancies between the NIST report, their modeling and their findings compared to what factual-based evidence exists.  Casey Pfeiffer, S.E. – Structural Engineer: https://youtu.be/V4y6cweaegI  Mr. Pfeiffer provides a in-depth look at what actually happened to the top portions of the WTC towers prior to collapse and how WTC 7 could not have experienced simultaneous connector failure without the use of controlled demolition devices.  Scott Grainger, FPE - Fire Protection Engineer: https://youtu.be/5nvWh2aTdCs  Stephen Barasch - High-Rise Architect: https://youtu.be/eeWNITKBFto  Mr. Barasch discusses his skepticism of this theory of collapse by fire and talks about how one might expect a collapsing high-rise to behave.  Les Young High-Rise Architect: https://youtu.be/zceJhfYV69M  This high-rise architect expresses his suspicions that the explanations provided by NIST speculates how the Towers might have fallen if they were to have fallen at all. Further, he analyzes the fire in the buildings.  Jerry Lobdill, C.E. - Chemical Engineer, Physicist: https://youtu.be/7P3_TboFltI  Mr. Lobdill presents an in-depth explanation of why the resulting chemical component elements found in the WTC dust, deflagration and steel deformations indicate that incendiaries were used to destroy all 3 WTC skyscrapers.  Their series of twenty-five provable points which clearly demonstrate that the reports produced by the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) on the destruction of the World Trade Center (WTC) were unscientific and fraudulent. Therefore NIST itself – including its lead authors, Shyam Sunder and John Gross - should be investigated.  C-SPAN Interview: Architect Richard Gage talked about his group, Architects and Engineers for 9/11 Truth, which claimed that the World Trade Center was brought down by explosive demolition on September 11, 2001. The group was founded in 2006 and said its mission was to “expose the official lies and cover-up surrounding the events of September 11, 2001 in a way that inspires the people to overcome denial and understand the truth.” Mr. Gage spoke via video link from San Francisco, California: http://www.c-span.org/video/?320748-5/washington-journal-architects-engineers-911-truth  Notable interviews:  Danny Jowenko - Demolition Expert: https://youtu.be/0f4w8iJmn08  Mr. Jowenko concludes that WTC 7 had to have been a controlled demolition without a doubt.  9/11 Survivor Barry Jennings Uncut Interviews (WABC-TV, 2001, LC 2007): https://youtu.be/OmeY2vJ6ZoA  Discusses the explosions in Building 7 and his escape from it after tying to enter the office of emergency management area on the 23rd floor.  Erik Lawyer – Firefighter: https://youtu.be/KsbbpUA9FHM  Mr. Lawyer presents investigative directives from the National Fire Protection Standards Manual that were never followed by NIST or FEMA for the fires they claim caused all 3 WTC Buildings to collapse.
Hahahaha keep going
After a very dangerous and lengthy high speed chase around town with a deadly weapon (late model Chevy Malibu).  Which apparently backfired causing police to think they were gunshots.     The two innocent angels were just trying to get home from the library to finish writing their term papers.     Ftfy and everyone else reading my stupid commentary.
Why is that even an option? I am in the US and I can't pay my mortgage with anything but a bank account, check or Cash.   Seems predatory to allow debt to be paid with debt. Hell, most places around here you can't even by lotto or scratch tickets with credit cards. Has to cash or debit. 
Actual full quote:  &gt; I remember getting a call from the, er, fire department commander, telling me that they were not sure they were gonna be able to contain the fire, and I said, "We've had such terrible loss of life, maybe the smartest thing to do is pull it." And **they made that decision to pull** and we watched the building collapse.  So, if you reckon "pull" can only mean explosive demolition (which it doesn't) and also believe without question what Silverstein said (which only seems to happen when he's confirming conspiratorial thought), it was actually the **New York Fire Department**, not Silverstein who brough the building down.
That's why I love this [presentation by Lars Schall](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NCTb_SkjjF0)
&gt;So yeah, not really a source of illumination.   I think you don't understand what those words mean.  &gt;Yet, on an apparent flat earth we can't even see a beacon order of magnitudes larger and brighter, and closer. Because..hallway?  Again, you don't understand the model, or the law of perspective.  The entire hallway analogy is to allow you to visualize the law of perspective with flat surfaces.  You keep trying to apply a curvature to the flat hallway for some reason.    For an understanding of the sun, moon and stars check out some of the resources I have linked in this thread.  Your arguments are becoming more and more outlandish as you grasp at straws.  You are starting from a place of "this can't possibly be true", that is not a good way to consider evidence.  &gt;Weird that my telescope doesn't let me see these "doors" or "walls". &gt;Because they're obscured behind the curve not because "they're really far away".  Are you serious?  We are talking about a flat hallway!  There is no curvature!  &gt;Myself, and that guy you asked in /r/askscience are still waiting for your paypal money.  As I said, I have never visited askscience.  The censorship in that place is obscene.  You tow the party line or what you say will be seen by no one.
You sure don't mind embellishing - or making up - facts as you go along.  The pursuit began because a car, driving by a black person, backfired as it passed by a police station.   No running of a red light, no continued backfiring, no clunker.  Two black men pursued by over 100 angels of the military death squads cops and shot at 137 times including 15 shots point blank from the hood through the windshield after the UNARMED men were already riddled with bullets.     Pardon me, but I think your anti-black bias is prominently on display.  
I'm not obsessed with race. I'm tired of liberals being so obsessed with it that they play the race card any time a republican disagrees with them. And I'm tired of the double standard in how it's applied. When democrats vote for this train wreck, the metric used to assess racism is suddenly a different one. Democrats are obsessed with race. It's all they've talked about for the last 7 years. 
Hate to say it....but it looks fun to burn.
Yeah but you can't trust what NASA says. They're controlled by the government. 
Would you like proof that the games you play are created by DoD contractors and Intel connected entities.
This
It is used as a preserving agent. 
It was never not sick. Their "nation" was a stolen plot under British military tyranny handed over in exchange for war with Germany. Their nation was built on the backs of innocent Germans. Their nation was accepted out of false-guilt by the west for letting a fake, second holocaust occur. Their nation is supported by the cancer of Western media that is controlled by the same people. They are a race of people who've always been notorious, in every nation they've inhabited, for being parasites who alter their appearance and names to dig their way into the lives of majorities who are just trying to live their lives so they can manipulate thought, education, art and behaviour to suit their perverted natures. They are a nation of sex-traffickers and organ thieves and rapists. The nation was built on the displacement and genocide of their semitic brothers out of religious fanaticism and ancient hatreds. They are a petty people with a religion that tells them that business is holy and a major artery of hebrew culture. Their culture is greed and revenge and pornography and they spread this to every nation they inhabit. They con other nations into killing their nonthreatening neighbours simply because they are hateful and protective of the lands they stole and their supremacist communities. They treat all immigrants with severe disrespect while encouraging immigration in other nations to fit their gentile view of everyone else and to encourage the mixing of other races while they stay pure to theirs. israel is a cancer born out of the Western desire for colonialism against the Central Powers and into genocide and hate. They are nothing more than a racist military state funded by the guilty, gentile-inhabited West to create as much space for jews as possible and to eliminate any Arab progress.
When a story does not make sense I have learned to be suspicious. The Sony hack story made no sense but implicated North Korea. This water drought story makes no sense. What happens if California runs out of water? Will all the taps run dry? It is an incomplete story. So I reject it as factual. Any surrounding strange stories are always suspect. 
We are being subjugated and obliterated. Only once we are on our knees, and have sold all of our property, and are morally, financially, and culturally bankrupt will the onslaught stop. One need look no further than 'The Protocols' to understand exactly what's happening.
Do underclass white women have babies as well?
Where is this proof then?
Exactly how many people in Berlin or Germany have died from this measles outbreak?
You are a liar.
They have their uses.  Literally a week after the Colorado shooting, the Christians were the [only ones](http://standupforthetruth.com/2012/07/demonic-influence-latest-colo-shooting-one-of-many-joker-crimes/) pointing out the strange Joker theme, which they alone followed through the rest of the false-flag shootings.  Of course, that does make them worthless when it comes to having a rational conversation about what to do in response to these kinds of things.  As far as I know, prayers and holy water have never put a crimp on highly-organized government tyranny, and usually make it worse in the long run.  But they're no more worthless than, for instance, the leftist hippies constantly posting here that we are "all one" and that doing drugs and meditating will solve all of our problems.
&gt; And you know this how?  This guy, for instance, spent 5 years in prison for holocaust denial.  http://thelede.blogs.nytimes.com/2007/02/15/holocaust-denial-crime-or-free-speech/  &gt; The holocaust happened, and there's quite alot of substantial evidence to support this.  A blatantly false statement. The 'substantial evidence' amounts to a handful of eyewitness testimonies and confessions extracted under torture. Physical evidence, either on the ground or in terms of paper...mass graves...allied aerial surveillance photos...enigma intercepts...no, there is no evidence in any of this. Particularly, of the gas chambers, and of an organized plan for mass extermination. If you believe this, I invite you to skeptically examine your beliefs and see how true they are.  I encourage you to watch, for instance, the Majdanek Gas Chamber Myth. Or the Treblinka Archaeology Hoax, documenting how the BBC completely fabricated a recent documentary.   [This document](http://fotos.fotoflexer.com/ca69996d3b271f1922d70bece806d9e6.jpg) is illuminating as well.  It's a big topic, but don't assume that everything you have heard about it is true without heavy skepticism.   This is a decent summation:  http://germarrudolf.com/germars-views/an-introduction-to-historical-revisionism/#5  also this:  https://cigpapers.wordpress.com/2013/11/16/holocaust-or-holohoax-21-amazing-facts/ 
Turd in the punchbowl.
Check your inbox. ;)  Also, maybe edit your comment to reflect if there's something that appears there. That would be very honest of you. ;) Also, regarding the message that may or may not be there, to Give you an idea of the timeline: I was banned probably 6ish weeks ago, in comparison to when that post was made. 
As above, so below.
Oh yea, let me pull up a website that tells you all this directly, so you can believe me. 
Good. Now, do you live somewhere near a large body of water or a really flat plain? If so, go there, make sure the level is parallel to the ground and stable, and look down the level, straight towards the horizon. Can you see the ground/water? Maybe.   Now do the same thing, only hundreds of feet (large building), or thousands (airplane). Can you see the ground/water?
Pretty relevant when you consider the story was written over 50 years ago.
Not I.  I think it's counterintuitive to be a skeptic, for lack of a better word, and still buy into religion.
please seek the outdoors.  you appear to be suffering from lack of original thinking and completely buying the bullshit authoritarian view of the world.  most likely tho.. you are just a sell out, i  either case re-evaluate your life choices before you die being a zero.
no young son. this is a part of god's plan. 
"It seems like it would conveniently make sense... so theres no possible way it happened despite my lack of evidence pointing towards  anything else!"  You cant disprove something because you think its convenient. 
[And that's not all.] (http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/36dmkn/_/)
My point is pretty basic, Jews are supremacists who act like a chosen people, but in reality Jews in the Jewish State of Israel have borderline dull IQs and are not the least bit special. What part of that is bullshit and what part don't you understand?  
Link me to another article by another source.   I refuse to generate any traffic for this god damn mother fucking fear mongering shitbag oil snake salesman.
He existed. Let's continue...
Following the obtuse premise in that video, then short men like Kevin Hart &amp; Michael J. Fox are actually women.
Your picture out-of-context proves nothing because Ed Harry, Jay Leno, and Robert Gibbs are looking at her phone.  http://www.cnn.com/2010/POLITICS/05/03/first.lady.tweet/   It is ludicrous to believe Michelle Obama is waving alleged man parts at the very public Correspondent's Dinner.   
What a fucking coward.
I'm not sure if this is good news, really? Perhaps those who realize ISIS is controlled by the west will create their own, new supergroup. Kind of like Powerstation in the 1980's
Man...making the Eglin AFB guys work Memorial Day weekend. That's cold.  
It seems you have submitted a link to Facebook. The community has voted in favor of universally removing all Facebook submissions to /r/conspiracy. Please feel free to upload any Facebook hosted images to imgur.com and resubmit them. Sorry for any trouble.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Sounds like media is just setting a narrative. I don't believe it.
First, you do realize that you are the one slandering him and he kept his views on your racism private and just banned you and only mentioned it in mod mail when you asked why he banned you, right?  Do you feel a tad hypocritical.  This guys an ass, but he just banned you, you've obsessively stalked him.  Second, I can't read the post since you didn't link to it, but the title does sound racist.  Why mention that someone of African descent attacked the girl?  Why not just say a girl was attacked for wearing a crucifix?  Does it actually matter that it was by someone of "African descent?"  Also, do you realize that "African descent" is almost always not the right way to refer to a black person unless you're referring to someone who literally migrated from Africa in their lifetime and are acting in a way informed by that?  Giving you the benefit of the doubt I'd imagine it's just a misstep, but realize that specifically calling out race is race-bating a bit when it has nothing to do with it.  Why not call out the other kids religion?  This is like saying the girl was attacked by someone of Irish descent...unless it's a protestant/Catholic English/Irish related attack it serves no fucking purpose.  You should ask yourself why you'd mention someone of African descent and not if they were of Irish descent.  Tl;dr: The mods an asshole and so are you.
Who would believe or find him. What if when u refresh your page right now, you get logged out. And can't create an account with the same name. That's quite fucked.
There needs to be a rule that you cannot be a mod of more than 3 subreddits on the same IP.  It's like some goofy cartoon where the cop that arrested you is also your judge, lawyer and prison guard.  Is this guy Q?
[deleted]
Haha. Suck it CIA/Mossad/house of Saud, pervert assfucks. 
Why don't the mods delete this whole thread? I don't get it.
Doesn't surprise me. Jesse Ventura's Conspiracy Theory show did an episode on FEMA camps and the network wouldn't show it.  The Military has been training with the police forces of several major cities for years now. They were just here in LA a few months ago training with Blackhawk Helicopters and Osprey tilt rotor, repelling down onto the rooftops of buildings downtown. I'm guessing they're training to  evacuate the elite from the cities while they send in ground troops to suppress the population. Many of these FEMA Camps are near rail lines so I'm guessing they plan on putting people in boxcars just like the NAZIs to move them to the camps. The NSA has been collecting data for a few years now so they know who to take in the beginning to remove all of the trouble makers. The 2nd amendment people, ex military, etc. Now they have Jade Helm going down in September. That could be the start of the plan. Whenever they run these operations, they disguise it as a " training exercise" and once they have all of their men and equipment in place, they go live and execute the plan.
Its been the same way with the Mavs for years. The only reason they got any media attention is because they beat Lebron in the finals. Still then it was about Lebron and the Heats failure to win it all. ESPN is uber biased.
I'm just appealing that they don't downvote based on the Tl;dr or the first sentence, just hope those who disagree read it.  I'm editing out of there though since it probably is tacky regardless.
I have to go soon so I only read through your first 2 rebuttals and I have rebuttals for you.  1. If you message the admins, they can just say no and there's not much you can do. Nobody else is going to see it. Also, the admins decide what messages to prioritize, but with /r/reddit.com the voters decided what got to the front page, and thus what the admins usually dealt with.  2. Sure, anyone can create a subreddit. But all the good ones are taken. It's like with business ideas, or domain names. A subreddit created today will never compete with /r/funny or similar.
Distance between Perth, Australia, to Johannesburg, South Africa is 5,173 miles.  This is equivalent to 8 325 kilometers or 4,495 nautical miles. http://www.travelmath.com/flying-distance/from/Perth,+Australia/to/Johannesburg,+South+Africa  And yes, in response to your question, there are direct flights from Australia to South Africa and have been for years.    If flying from the eastern coast of Australia (Melbourne) the flight time to Johannesburg will of course take longer, because Australia is a vast landmass and domestic flights from Melbourne to Perth (Western Australia) takes several hours.  I've flown from Melbourne to Perth (and return) and can attest to the fact the trip is lengthy (approx. 3.5 hours these days, used to be longer)  Flights from Melbourne, Victoria, to Cairns in Queensland is sightly less in distance and takes almost three hours, for comparison  Were you under the impression there exist no direct flights between Australia (either east or west coast) and South Africa?  There are, of course and people fly those routes all the time   
1. Just because it's their rules, doesn't mean I can't complain about it. That couldn't be less relevant. "North korea isn't bad, it's kim jong's country and he can run it like he wants"  2. They were alternatives, sure. But that's just power getting passed around. I'm talking about a completely new subreddit that isn't a repeat.
So, if you had a daughter and someone rapped her would you be filled with love? The way to enlightenment is not to fill yourself with only loving thoughts, because it's impossible. You are totally missing the point here and should maybe try reading the Shobogenzo or something alike.    Be honest with yourself, it's impossible to have only loving thoughts, and no matter how hard you try you won't be able to do it.  But as the Buddha said go ahead and try, you will have many lives to find out just who you are, some may find enlightenment in 3 seconds, for some it make take 30 years, and others may never see it, even on their death beds.
The op was reposting a more thorough post from a structural engineer and left a lot out.
[deleted]
&gt; So, what then? You think spammers should still be allowed to post?  No.  I think that reddit and reddit mod cunts need to quit promoting reddit as this great place that is all about freedom, and then censoring people. Period.  Especially in such a dick manner as shadow banning.  You wouldn't know a racist if it invaded your home and raped your wife and children while you watched helplessly having been beaten and hog tied.
Don't be so sure of this. i though all that "Bush Did 9/11" was all just a joke untill I saw this and now i'm actually entertaining it as a possibility. Good physics can change minds.
Memorial Day was created to honor the soldiers lost in the civil war and was under a diff name back then, iirc.
I'll never understand why people invest so much into this website. Who cares, it's reddit. It's going the way of digg any way.   Just make a new account. Who fucking cares about the mods. It's so stupid easy to make another account and spam the shit out of them if you so desired.   This is the only power those dork mods have in their lives. Why do you think they act that way? Just make a new account and move on. They are instantly trivialized.   That's the funniest part of this. Just make a new account and you bypass all their power tripping. Seriously, they think they are bad asses and banned you... Oh no not your precious karma. It takes two seconds to make a new account and go back to posting wherever the fuck you want. Posting in /r/conspiracy, you should have more than one account for various things. You shouldn't rely on one single reddit account.   Mods think they have power on this website. It's a false sense of entitlement.   Also, your post history is questionable (wonder how much you deleted?) Not only are the mods on this site untrustworthy, so are the users and their stories.   Don't believe anything you read on this site, 99% of it is bullshit. 
 &gt;Did everyone who voted know exactly what the official story stated?  I literally just answered that exact question in my last reply.   You're embarrassing yourself.  Is that all you got? We about done here?   The score remains 3892 - 160. 
Join us at /r/coontown for the facts
Making up terms to twist logic and fact to suit your wackadoo anarchist SJW argument and agenda doesn't change the truth.  au·thor·i·ty  əˈTHôrədē/  noun  noun: authority; noun: auth.; plural noun: authorities  1.  the power or right to give orders, make decisions, and enforce obedience.  "he had absolute authority over his subordinates"  synonyms:power, jurisdiction, command,control, charge, dominance, rule,sovereignty, supremacy; More  influence;  informalclout  "a rebellion against those in authority"  the right to act in a specified way, delegated from one person or organization to another.  "military forces have the legal authority to arrest drug traffickers"  synonyms:authorization, right, power,mandate, prerogative, license,permission  "the authority to arrest drug traffickers"  official permission; sanction.  "the money was spent without congressional authority"  2.  a person or organization having power or control in a particular, typically political or administrative, sphere.  "the health authorities"  synonyms:officials, officialdom; More  government, administration,establishment;  police;  informalthe powers that be  "they failed to report the theft to the authorities"  3.  the power to influence others, especially because of one's commanding manner or one's recognized knowledge about something.  "he has the natural authority of one who is used to being obeyed"  the confidence resulting from personal expertise.  "he hit the ball with authority"  a person with extensive or specialized knowledge about a subject; an expert.  "she was an authority on the stock market"  synonyms:expert, specialist, aficionado,pundit, guru, sage  "an authority on the stock market"  a book or other source able to supply reliable information or evidence, typically to settle a dispute.  "the court cited a series of authorities supporting their decision"   Regardless... your incoherent bantering about hierarchy and authority is irrelevant to what we are discussing. 
They should limit the number of places you can mod, for subreddits you do not own, and make it person based, not account.  I run and help out on a few subreddits, but doing anything worthwhile takes a lot of time, and all of the subreddits I'm part of are small, and I have very little if any responsibility. I couldn't possible imagine doing anything useful on more than 20 subreddits at one time, and that's if I wasn't actively participating on most of them.
The biker gangs, most notably the hells angels, have a very powerful and decentralized organization that is well armed and motivated, and highly skilled at smuggling and resource allocation. If shit hit the fan IE revolution, a lot of the guns that the people would be using to fight back would probably come from them.   I don't talk with any of those guys anymore, but IF i wanted to get my hands on an assault rifle, they'd be the ones to talk to. Put enough money on the table and they can probably score you anti-material rifles and rocket launchers. Maybe even some mil-grade shit like anti-armor missile launchers.
Oh god no please don't send me back to middle school like that
The fact remains, using the Manhattan project as an example of perfect secrecy is wrong. It was far from perfect - even in a circumstance where secrecy was clearly in the national interest, and with the enforced co-operation of the entire media, in the name of the war effort.   That is certainly not the case here: journalists would fall over themselves to break legitimate information showing 9/11 was an inside job. It would make Watergate look like a bungled burglary.... 
Because william Randolph hurst didn't want competition with his paper business?  I did t watch I just know the history. 
The measurements are not correct, it was an instrumentation error.  http://www.news3lv.com/mostpopular/story/Lake-Mead-says-reading-showing-8-foot-drop-was-an/6qKnDtRdLkW45_pJhjTPkw.cspx
Read the youtube comments
https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=me.cesarbrie.versa
id say you will see the first leg of this in 2017. i expect to be rounded up myself. this article needs to be STICKIED ASAP because its the most true, in my opinion.  they are going to turn the USA into the largest open air prison the world has ever seen
Sanders also voted 'yes'  on the NDAA, the Cybersecurity Act, Iraq War funding, and to limit firearm magazine capacity, among other questionable things. 
Or 2001...
I can't believe that a video put out by the SPLC demonizing conspiracy theorists has made it to the front page of /r/conspiracy.   This is not a positive video that is meant to make this sub look good.  Don't up vote this garbage put out by Hate Watch
Did you forget to take your pills this morning, retard?
&gt;I can't take it anymore. This sub is getting infected with nonsense  Yeah I know, where the fuck did you come from and please go back there, your uncritical thinking and mindless absorption of slickly packaged bullshit isn't welcome here.  A 16 day old account with an insistence that /r/conspiracy stop talking about conspiracies, what's new.
This is the sad part about reddit, and what it has become. All it has turned into is a giant circle jerk. So many post have distorted the truth or statistics involved to fit their agenda.
But you forget the fact the government, pays for your education, maintains infrastructure. It is easy to blame for everything, but since you have profited from your respective government(assuming you're american) in some shape or form, you(collective population) are also responsible for the crimes that were committed.  Nothing was done, critical thought is lacking, you appointed the leaders, the fault lies greatly at the hands of the lobbyists politicians, who all seems to be profitting from all the spilled blood, broken dreams and other misery. meanwhile while not paying their fair share of taxes. That's ignorant arrogant and just insane  Not taxing the rich is a good way of keeping money out of the government. These guys are addicted by money and eventhough, they are wealthy.  They just hate the fact that they must give a portion of that to the masses. What hurts these psychopaths the most, who foreclose houses without any remorse, gave out peoples money without their knowledge. In their bank accounts, this is not conforming to the war machine, this is justice.  If you think that these scumbags, who I bet see everyone of your population as scum. Should not be punished for the ways they have impacted and fucked up your society. Is well stupid on it's own.  Okay so let's take your standpoint for a minute, so in the case the the US stops feeding their war machine, where does the money comes from? That deficit clock keeps ticking, so what do you next, oh yeah tax the wealthy since that is the most logical solution...  Not condoning war efforts at all I despise it actually, and have you actually read the article..    
It has been hacked to disguise the fact the car slowed almost to a stop for the headshot/s. 100%  https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=5Am4qdl9PTA
For who?  If we go by the 2008 crisis, those who caused it, the banks, were rewarded for it. Those causing our economic downfall have the most profit from it, the means to manage it and the prep time to jump ship. It will be more of the same. When they are good and ready, they will show how fucked we are, lay the bill on us and pop up in their newly established control structure that has been created as an excuse to prevent the very problem they engineered to bring it about.  For the rest of us, work on your food.
And just how unprofessional can /u/Creesch be? What an asshat. A good example of how the mods are becoming more and more immature and act like small mini dictators. 
Wow. 
Why do you hang out with people you disagree with all of the time? Isee you comment frequently but it's all negative.
Ted Kaczyinski was an unwilling participant in MKULTRA in the 1960's while a student at Harvard. 
These fairy tale books keep us from talking about what's really going on in the world, which is what the elites want. It's no secret that the 1% have the same wealth as half of the rest of the world and that this is unfair, but it doesn't mean they're evil reptilian creatures. Open your eyes!
I've been checking out "VOAT" it has a shitty name and it looks like it's from the 80s but the principal looks pretty good.   https://voat.co/
That'd be great, but with the pwned media, Americans will think it's an invasion and fight. Most Americans have no idea what's going on.
It isn't.  https://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/35vido/til_in_1850_42_of_free_negroes_in_charleston_sc/cr8b6dq  https://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/2e4850/til_that_sweden_pays_high_school_students_187_per/cjw3nj7  https://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/2noixx/til_in_a_south_philly_high_school_asian_students/cmflnkp  https://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/35rwpa/tony_robinson_got_high_assaulted_multiple_folks/cr79cgm  https://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/35vay4/black_miss_japan_fights_for_race_revolution_i/cr8efe0  And so on. That's just from the first page of their "Controversial" overview.  You're either very bad at reddit or you're literally defending racism.
What assertion? I said it makes sense that it was.
This better be Johnny Depp's comeback vehicle because his last half dozen movies or so have really sucked ass. 
Protests with less than 100 people make the nightly news even in Phoenix. If there is a protest of 100 people, especially if it's part of a larger global movement, then they most certainly would show it on the news.   If the protest were something like protesting Joe Arpaio, then you KNOW it would be on the news.  This is a corporate media agenda, straight up.
The story is different in some countries, but I was told 6 million. Thanks for the links! :)
Exactly. I don't want to be offensive towards Jews but I think its all just propaganda, as you stated. Since its now illegal to be a Holocaust denier in Europe, I always had suspicion of its factual base. 
"Terrorists" concerned with DDOS.  Interesting.
Maybe the molten metal was not actually steel.      (crickets...)
Removed. Rule #6 of the sub. No Caps Lock. 
/u/karmasutur3 post history contains participation in the following subreddits:  /r/TheRedPill: 2 posts ([1](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/2dmw7f/asktrp_crosspost_alan_the_alpha_bob_the_beta/), [2](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/1tyfwj/on_my_front_page_right_now_more_trying_to/)), **combined score: 340**; 21 comments ([1](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/36vyiw/_/crhugmf), [2](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/35uwlh/_/crb7t4z), [3](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/35uwlh/_/crb7mrt), [4](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/32w2f7/_/cqffws1), [5](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/32w2f7/_/cqf6v9u), [6](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/32gcqe/_/cqb13f8), [7](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/31l1ft/_/cq6wnnn), [8](http://np.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/31l1ft/_/cq3snp2)), **combined score: 519**.  /r/conspiracy: 10 comments ([1](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/377mx1/_/crke2oo), [2](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/373rr2/_/crke0ds), [3](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/33pfof/_/cqr4ima), [4](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/33pfof/_/cqolm9c), [5](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/33pfof/_/cqnzda2), [6](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/33pfof/_/cqnpubg), [7](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/31w56e/_/cq66co6), [8](http://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/31w56e/_/cq61jqd)), **combined score: 47**.  /r/pussypassdenied: 10 comments ([1](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/36zhi9/_/criqy0e), [2](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp37y4j), [3](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp35714), [4](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp31zi4), [5](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp31wki), [6](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp2xq8b), [7](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp2xeia), [8](http://np.reddit.com/r/pussypassdenied/comments/2xno0r/_/cp29zhw)), **combined score: 59**.  /r/DarkEnlightenment: 2 comments ([1](http://np.reddit.com/r/DarkEnlightenment/comments/36397m/_/cradm7m), [2](http://np.reddit.com/r/DarkEnlightenment/comments/2y9exd/_/cp7i0qc)), **combined score: 6**.  ___  ^I'm ^a ^bot. ^Only ^the ^past ^1,000 ^comments ^are ^fetched.
It's clear you have no idea what you are talking about.Let's take the word of a chiropractor with no sources.You guys make me laugh.
Nah. If they were really remotely controlling the planes which they probably were it would be impossible to retake any of them. This is because the planes had specific anti hijacker tech as all planes nowdays do. Retaking is out of the question. The point of flight 93 was entirely about inspiring patriotism. 
[deleted]
my most frequented ones disappear i've noticed. but perhaps they all disappear occasionally and i'm only noticing those specifically because they're the subreddits of most interest at the time 
ROFLMAO!
I've always hated that quote, "If you don't vote, you can't complain!" Yes I can, I'm not going to vote for someone because its the lesser of the evils. Fuck that, I'll vote for who I think ideally represents what I believe. 
It appears pretty easy to tell people to shut up.    ["...the air-traffic controllers in Cleveland who tracked the last minutes of Flight 93 on radar have been forbidden by the authorities to speak publicly about what they saw on their screens."](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/unanswered-questions-the-mystery-of-flight-93-173206.html)
this is the second time I have heard Alien Blue... What is it?
I replied to everyone who honored the military on my news feeds by sending them pictures of Abu Ghraib.
&gt; Distances quickly become prohibitively large.  200 years ago, supersonic jets had not even been conceived of. These distances you speak of may be rendered irrelevant by new or alien technology.   
Not to live in rubble.
Keep it up then. Keep it right up.
brain damage 
Epic truthful American Jimmie rustling! 
I heard your advice and am enquiring as to what you would need for me to prove to you I was in the right.
huge if confirmed, is it?
You can still build with rubble.
it was mossad agents living across the street in florida  i personally think all of the dirty work was handled by the mossad, disappearing the original flights, wiring the buildings, piloting with joysticks, etc.  but saudi arabia was responsible for providing the patsies, and bush sr. and murdoch controlled the cover up.  this same alliance is obviously behind isis, as well as the recent revolts in arab countries, terrorism in iran, and who knows what else.  but the plan was to strengthen israel and saudi arabia and keep the oil and weapons flowing, and to recreate all their least favorite regimes with client states like egypt where followers of islam can be controlled.  if they hadnt done 911 and these things, isis would still have happened but they wouldnt be in control.  its the biggest cabal in the history of the wirld and if you join the us military thats who will sign your check.
Yeah reptilians or whatever you call them, there are many dark entities...nice post. It's true..love and light is the only way.
What percentage of the Chinese population is that? 1%?
  There is no difference  between speculating about mini nukes and your speculations. They are both have no roots in any evidence.   The problem is the mass number of "conspiracy theorists" who think that their unfounded speculation must be true because it makes sense to them and confirms their biases .  If youre going to make a statement about an event saying that you believe something happened for whatever reason, cite some evidence and proof,  otherwise there is no reason for and no weight held by that statement.  
says u
Not really... He was completely off-topic.
[Anthony F. Mazza Jr.](http://imgur.com/7rsw9ZJ) said it.    
"The main beneficiaries of the new admissions policies, Karabel notes, were "the children of families that, while lacking the wealth of the old upper class, were richly endowed with cultural capital." In 1956, the sons of business executives outnumbered the sons of professors by four to one at Harvard. By 1976, there were nearly as many freshmen from academic households as from business households.  All of which suggests that human nature hasn't changed. People who possess privileges try to protect their own, even if they do shop at Whole Foods and drive Volvos."  
I wish I was being paid. I'm someone who has observed certain diseases being eradicated if it weren't for some gullible sheep.
It's a line from the [Barenaked Ladies song 'If I Had $1,000,000'](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V8zdNe_l3M8).
Well it's almost as stupid as assuming you know everything about evey situation. I'm not even fucking american and I see why they hate people like you.
Go to the ruins of a battle field and ask the dead how much they care about remembrance.  
&gt;it's because fucking shills sit on our new tab and downvote anything on certain subjects with certain key words.  Nasty shills everywhere.  
&gt; you ignorant piece of shit!  &gt; ignorant
By all means feel free to message the modmail if you would like to have a few other mods review the warning. 
I have not read every word he wrote. I am not a racist. I read &amp; if something intrigues me that may be of benefit to others, I share.  I have been called an Anti-Semite; although this /u/ pays homage to a [brilliant Jewish lady](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mae_Brussell) , who I will always admire.  I guess if I share this (Mr Brann), I am a racist in some eyes; but not in the eyes of those who know, trust &amp; understand my core being &amp; my credo.  On national decline: "When Rome began to mock her gods, she found the barbarians thundering at her gates. When France insulted her priesthood and crowned a courtesan as Goddess of Reason in Notre Dame, Paris was a maelstrom and the nation a chaos in which Murder raged and Discord shrieked..." "Character no longer counts for aught unless reinforced by a bank account... Men are sent to Congress whom God intended for the gallows, while those he ticketed for the penitentiary sprout inanities in fashionable pulpits. The merchant who pays his debts in full when he might settle for ten cents on the dollar is considered deficient in common sense... Why is this? It is because the old religious spirit is dormant if not dead; it is because when people consider themselves but as the beasts that perish, they can make no spiritual progress, but imitate their supposed ancestors..." "To the American patriot familiar with the rapid development of this country it seems that the hour must assuredly come when its lightest wish will be the world's law... but... despite the rapid increase in men and money there are startling indications that Uncle Sam has already passed the zenith of his power. 'First freedom, then glory, when that fails, Wealth, vice, corruption—barbarism at last.' "Freedom we have won, and glory, yet both have failed—we have become, not the subjects of native Caesars, but the serfs of foreign Shylocks."
I couldn't find anything in wiki about the event in April.
Welcome to the /r/conspiracy [Controversial tab](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/controversial/) -- 9 out of 10 posts here are vaccine-related. Enjoy your 0 vote total. Nothing to see here.  Ya know, I was pretty much pro-vaccine a year ago until I saw the aggressive PR campaign shouting down very valid concerns. Now, I will never allow a vaccine from the US in my blood for the rest of my life. Never.
Such biting wit
Dahboo nuff said.   I stopped watching when he brightened the video and a black guy was him.   So now he is grouping all black folks to be tupac?
Don't you have another yellow ribbon bumper sticker to put on your car?
Yep, which goes to serve my point. They aren't thinking critically.
this surprises you?
And..........     What's your point?  Even if you're right?  Are we supposed to care less about the holocaust?
all the youtube comments are designed to make you look at the characters they have set up. You try and comment on the actual reality of it. You cant. When you realise its all setup then it becomes more obvious.
last week wideawakeNWO posted a video of a bomb going off and said it was a neutron bomb dropped by israel. I asked him to prove it and his reply was to decide I as a secret  shill or something? IDK He likes fear mongering about war but hates being questioned.
Just Say NO To The Military Industrial Empire!  By Phillip Farruggio | May 25, 2015 |  Interesting how this empire of ours operates through its embedded and controlled mainstream media.  This is why so many of us go to the internet to get our news, even though a portion of it is not vetted  and sometimes questionable.  What choice do we have when the mainstream is so full of ****?  Here’s an example of hypocrisy in reporting by our empire’s corporate run news:  The Thursday May 21st USA Today Money Section ran a ‘puff’ piece entitled  ‘New PayPal CEO gets his hands dirty’.  The story then went on to report (huh?)” …. while running Virgin Mobile, Dan Schulman, 57, hit the streets of New York without a penny to his name to better understand the plight of homeless teens the company was trying to help.”  One wonders if Schulman, who the Wall Street Journal reported earned over 40 million dollars from the split of Pay Pal from E-Bay, ever gave a sizeable portion of that ‘found money ‘ to some of the homeless teens and their families that he ran across.  After all, Schulman was homeless for gee whiz one whole day!?  Imagine the nerve of not only Schulman but a paper like USA Today to laud such a joke!?  To add insult to injury the article goes on to report that Schulman “As head of American Express {how much did he learn while there one wonders?} spent a day trying to cash checks without the benefit of his true financial background.”  I kid you not- this is what they had the gall to write about:  A mega millionaire who ‘slums it’ for 24 hours or even less!  I will bet that so called ‘rich liberals’ like Schulman will be standing in line to fork over cash for Hillary 2016, just as the phony so called ‘conservatives’ like the Koch brothers and their right wing compatriots will do the same for the Republicans 2016.  Either way, the corporate Fat Cats win and we serfs lose!  Scholar, scientist and parliamentarian reformer Francis Bacon (1560- 1621) understood the nature and failings of empire: “Upon the breaking and shivering of a great state and empire, you may be sure to have wars.”    Sadly, it will be we working stiffs, who carry the load of our current Amerikan empire, that will first shiver and break.  The Fat Cats always have buffers to keep the wolf from their door… until of course the buffers run out… or run away!  Here is the $ 64 Trillion dollar question:  How much longer can our infrastructure, schools, libraries, social services and first providers see major cuts or no upgrades while we fight these phony wars?  Add that to the fact, not the theory, that over half of our federal taxes goes for military spending.  Does anyone care anymore that to keep one soldier in Afghanistan (illegally and immorally by the way) at a cost of approximately $ 1.2 MILLION a year, we could have used that money to subsidize the hiring of 25 school teachers or policeman or fireman at $50.000 salaries for one year?  Imagine that instead of ordering another (not needed) Boeing Apache Helicopter at the cost of-[are you ready for this?] $ 52 MILLION, we could fix the teeth of hundreds of thousands of us out there who have NO dental coverage.  I mean, how many drones with how many missiles are costing taxpayers each time we continue in this so called ‘War on ISIS’ ?  Let the nations of the Middle East join together and defeat ISIS without our interference.  After all, well, we all know why groups like ISIS even got born, if it wasn’t for our empire’s foreign policy decisions… by both Republican and Democrat administrations.  Are things hopeless?  My buddy and street corner compatriot Jim R. says YES.  I waver back and forth on that question.  I will say this, though:  If the overwhelming majority of working stiffs out there do not wake up and see the light concerning our Military Industrial Empire, and demand a pullback of it…  https://www.thesleuthjournal.com/just-say-no-to-military-industrial-empire/
You know, I have problems with a lot of liberal counterculture that I believe to be subversive to white countries specifically, but I'm no natsoc. I think you may have taken too many bites from the old shit sandwich if you believe the hours of film and countless documented cases of murder and abuse were simply *constructed* by the Allies to "pin something" on Germany (as if WW2 hadn't already started). All of these different accounts of systematic murder by one group, from camps spread around different countries of conquered Europe oddly all share very key details. These details also corroborate film *shot by the Nazis themselves* prior to any allied invasion, but yeah, I'm sure it will go away if we just shout our magic word: ***CONSPIRACY CONSPIRACY CONSPIRACY***!! It worked! I don't remember the Holocaust anymore!
Yep, same here. I get that a lot with political videos but never with a philosophy video.
There is most definitely a conspiracy the world over to privatize water rights.
This was widely discussed in the media in the days, weeks, and months after 9/11. It's not a secret. In fact, when the US invaded Afghanistan shortly after September 11, we allied with the Northern Alliance this killed leader was the head of.
May I ask what pissant country you are from?
Seems very well-said to me.
&gt;if I can work hard and succeed, anyone can.   https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Selection_bias
Very much appreciated.  Thanks!
Speaking of [ignorant assholes](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wg-52mHIjhs).
"silence is violence" LOL, so it seems this sub has been taken over by liberal sjw tumblr retards. 
The Chinese holocaust is well known in the EAST. Just like the Jewish holocaust is well known in the WEST. It's no surprise that most here aren't familiar with the Chinese deaths, just as most Chinese never heard of the Jewish deaths. 
Let me be more specific, I know you have no background in physics beyond a high school education.   &gt;but if youd like to talk about terminal velocity of steel girders, or air resistance minus the z dimension, i bet youd bow out first ;)  Why are you even bringing up terminal velocity? It has nothing to do with what we are talking about. But if you want to talk about that stuff, that's fine by me. I'll leave the floor open to you.
[deleted]
Unless they are on a different planet. The tilt would change for everybody. All the observatories would observe it. They didn't.  Old people. Glaciers move.
Worked damn well for the Scientologist 
I didnt get an H1N1 vaccine, and i didnt get sick with H1N1. It must be because you got the vaccine and thereby prevented me from getting sick huh?
Yeah, if anything, right when people are driving home from work in the winter is probably the worst time of day. Its dark, people are exhausted or excited, there's A TON of cars on the road..... whereas in the middle of the night, which is what I'm guessing they referred to as "too late," there's barely anyone on the road. In fact, I do most of my road trips that way. It's nice to arrive somewhere new as the sun rises.
To their families yes. I agree. As humans they matter. As family members they matter. I don't believe we, or anyone really matter to our government or more especially some of it's particular members who profit from war. It's hard to understand and even harder to accept, but there it is. War is a racket and soldiers are fodder for the games of those in power. Sounds cliche and contrite, but sadly, it is true as well. 
Never locked it once.
&gt; So, what do you think? Plausible?  No. Nukes would kickstart WW3 instantly. The outrage from the UN and every nation all over the world would be insane. China, Russia, the US... do you really think these people would just quietly let the war in the mid east go nuclear and all agree to cover it up and not talk about it? Nukes are not tactical and you can't keep a nuke secret.   It's ludicrous to think that the only evidence of a neutron bomb would be an anonymous, blurry video on youtube that only a few select conspiracy theorists like you and I would know about. Meanwhile all of the major nations of the world would either be in the dark or keeping it a secret. Like think about the reality of that situation.   &gt; one very good reason. Iran  Well, I'd buy Israel preemptively nuking Iran. Absolutely wouldn't not put it past them. But not Yemen. That's just a proxy war.  And either way it wouldn't and couldn't be a fucking secret. It'd essentially be this centuries version of Archduke Ferdinand being assassinated or Poland being invaded. It'd be world war 3 real fucking fast.   Besides neutron bombs are a lot more aggressive than the bomb in that video.  The footage itself was also thoroughly debunked in a few of the threads he posted it in. It turned out to be a conventional airstrike on a weapons depot. 
EXACTELY what I try to tell people when they think I "hate the army" or talk down about the war. Most people just don't seem to realize this . 
[deleted]
If you're not familiar with Pastor Anderson then I think you might like to be.
Voat has  pretty much already been gamed by the worst of the redditors. There are others.
! 
Who are l&amp;l?
Yes and yes
So those who are not in power (the 99%) and will never be in power- or influence over government because they dont own huge oil conglomerates- are using global warming as a fear and control mechanism against the oil companies and right wing media who push the idea that global warming is a myth (the 1%)- people who have stakes in non renewables companies and who do actually control our governments through lobbying/ trade deals?  Is that what youre saying?  Not trying to insult you, just exploring your point of view.  Cheers for the input :)
Exhibit A:  [Race Related White Hate](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/37a1u6/you_dont_hate_white_people_or_rich_people/)  &amp;  Recent Post about [White Genocide](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/37cbib/yes_diversity_is_about_getting_rid_of_white/)  Simply have a look at these replies / comments &amp; who showed up to chat...  From ~~diff sub~~, ~~perhaps the link that was on r/conspiracy was deleted...~~ [HUFFPO White Minority Video](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/379ckc/after_you_watch_this_tell_me_again_how_theres_not/)  EDIT: Correct r/conspiracy Post linked
Sources?
[deleted]
Hurrrr !Hitler did da same thing!!! Hurrrrr  That means it's comparable to Hitler!
The Pacific War was much larger than most people realize.
&gt; The issue is that these organisms are being modified to survive extreme drenching of pesticides and herbicides.  Are there crops that are pesticide-free? Organic food has pesticides too. A lot.   http://blogs.scientificamerican.com/science-sushi/httpblogsscientificamericancomscience-sushi20110718mythbusting-101-organic-farming-conventional-agriculture/  
Isreal wont stop until every Palestinian is dead.
Care to name a few? Want to see if I am guilty of falling prey to such unfounded theories.
The shareholder invested in a website that's sole purpose is to propagate a forum whose content is completely user based. By putting the users first, shareholders will win regardless. 
GPS satellites are (to coin a phrase) Di-geosynchronous - each of the 24 satellites in the network orbits the Earth twice a day. They are not geostationary like tv broadcasting satellites.  https://www.cfa.harvard.edu/space_geodesy/ATLAS/gps.html  
I've only seen a couple interviews with him, but he seems like a no nonsense kind of person. 
The bullshit argument, we're killing children!  Meanwhile doctors prescribing drugs (adverse drug reactions) is the 3rd or 4th leading cause of death but for some strange reason it doesn't appear in any top list.  WEIRD ISNT IT 
Obviously there are natural things in nature that are harmful and synthetic things in our environment that are beneficial.   But, when it comes to my food, I would rather it be sprayed with pesticides and herbicides that are derived from natural sources, rather than synthetic chemicals.   I know about the few natural pesticides and herbicides that are more toxic than synthetic ones, like: Pyrethrums and Rotenone.   That's why I always attempt to purchase produce from brands that state which ones they use, specifically non-toxic: Insecticidal Soap, Neem Oil and BT.  Cheers!
[deleted]
yea hopefully we can avoid that kind of bullshit, although i do understand their pain given how the media portrays asian men vs white men
$erious business you mean.  Keep up the fear porn, hope you get paid well...and make sure your kids get their vitamin mercury!  
TIL this.  Thank you.  
[deleted]
So, in other words: Turkey and US agree to assist in the Israeli air strikes while coordinating with the "Syrian militants" (ISIS) on the ground.  
Yes.  That scaffolding would be as effective as a paper condom.
Its because the heads of U.N. are also peados just like entire British Parliament
What's this about people who take it out of context likely being terrorists? What the fuck are you talking about?
And after the past few days we're good on water. Maybe not a drought in Texas but a major flood, wipeout maybe? 
It's pretty pervasive and international, but I think there are still a few decent people even in government. Otherwise we would never hear about any of this.
Yeah. If you dig the digital panopticon concept you should check out some Foucault and place the concept of biopower into our contemporary context.  &gt;At some level even we the conspiracy theorists might give up?  Probably when people start getting disappeared over that kind of stuff. Some people think we're not far from that point, but hopefully we are. 
Straight from the Bill: https://legiscan.com/RI/text/H5480/2015  Its for the state of Rhode Island for the lazy people.  &gt; -- GEOENGINEERING *** This act would define and limit the use of geoengineering in the state. The act would define geoengineering as activities specifically and deliberately designed to effect a change in the area climate. The act would further provide that no person would implement geoengineering in any area of the state without first obtaining the permission of the director of the department of environmental management to do so. The process to obtain such permission would require a minimum of two (2) public hearings prior to any decision being issued. This act would take effect upon passage.  There is, and always has been proof for this...People just need to open their eyes.
Hopefully they'll put that settlement money to good use and do just that
Better than i expected. Solid article would repost. 
&gt; for unbiased news information  I'm here waiting for unbiased information.  So far I got nothing.
[deleted]
Could you kindly explain the "42" reference?  Jackie Robinson wore jersey #42  It was somewhat sarcastic in nature.  Intuition tells me it references a date &amp; historically significant event(s).
Rainfall correlates with a lot of things. There are historians who would attempt to explain to you why divergence in rainfall was at the root o the cultural divide which led to the Civil War. 
i live in denton, right in the middle of it and it literally hasnt stopped raining for like a month 
lol
Maybe it's limited to animal blood? I have not clue honestly
Which is why i told OP to go back there. I was being sarcastic when I "insulted" conspiracy theorists, and implying that OP made this thread so that he could go on his alt account and point and laugh in their circle jerk of trolls.
I understand PBS is co-opted, but I found the frontline [TOP SECRET AMERICA](http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/pages/frontline/topsecretamerica/) series rather fascinating.  [The Secret Government: Bill Moyers (1987)](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=28K2CO-khdY&amp;list=PL40oUvaMBcamqpzhRr8l-xHlAKx5nEao3&amp;index=1) is of interest even though BILL Moyers is CFR &amp; LBJ's press secretary.
Well, that picture with lines drawn over it proves it!
He probably used the photo as a template or is this supposed to be proof that the nazis didn't execute anyone?
But Roundup is unsafe, even in small amounts.  Are you getting this list of rebuttals from your PR firm or from Monsanto directly? I feel like we have a right to know. People's health is at risk here.  I'd like to speak with your manager. I'm not kidding.
Burning Man sanctioned event. You sound like you'd fit right in.
And you are useful idiot.  Keep tha faith!
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm not sure they need to kill many people though.   The magnitude of what's going on is scary enough to send a message plus they get to send "aid" in. 
i shower every day but i don't use soap, and shampoo just once a week maybe, i do scrub a lot and make it a point to wear a fresh set of cloth every single day though, also i have next to no effort all day and i'm in a ac environment... no backlash either from my uptight coworkers. For deo a tiny tiny (no really, it irritates if you use too much) amount of baking soda under the armpit right out of the shower while it's wet, absolutely no smell then, and cheap as fuck (haven't finished the $2 box I bought when i started two years ago lol)
Im in lake dallas like 5 miles south of denton...this shit is cray
Why would the police want to raid an innocent family's home and throw a flash bomb in a baby's face? Serious question, really.
Yeah we're doing pretty good right now as far as emulating Dubai goes.  We just don't have everything all in one city.  
This seems to show that there's big money coming from both sides
Exactly. If the majority of parliament wasn't peados, then the number 1 priority would be to clean house and bust the lot of them.  This just goes to show they're all in cahoots
I'm not saying that it certainly happened, but you did get it right.  I'm saying with an open ended contract, and lot's of offshore anonymous holdings, it would be easy to do.  
Haha if that makes you feel better, sure.
This is so typical. Corporations start with a product before there is a need, top down instead of bottom up. You see this all the time in the BigPharm, they're so eager to sell a drug they already own that they invent an application for it that it wasn't even invented for. And end up killing a lot of people in the process.  The pesticide that is supposedly killing all the bees is derived from tobacco. They had to find something to with tobacco after Americans stopped buying cigarettes.
interested.  link?
Why is it that God has to exist in the same universe as Satan?  What if it's always been only Satan the whole time?  *What if we're already in hell?*
[LaVeyan Satanism](http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/LaVeyan_Satanism)  Anton LaVey *Church of Satan*
solution=live in a tent in the woods then corporations can't get our money :ooo
You guys are literally good for nothing but being a good laughingstock and shaming every human on the planet with your warmongering, rascism and fanatic religion.
If ISIS were the hardcore Islamists they claim they are, they would've tried to mop the floor with Israel.
&gt; Dahboo777  Guaranteed misinformation.
http://www.globalresearch.ca/editor-in-chief-of-worlds-best-known-medical-journal-half-of-all-the-literature-is-false/5451305 . Your "science" is a bit derpy. True science is objective.
I can avoid toxins just fine. Why can't they? I only eat organic food, food from the garden, or from the woods. I eliminated all food containing large amounts of fluoride and all fluoridated water. It's not even that hard to do. I also avoid all vaccines and don't take prescription or over-the-counter medication.  As far as chemtrails and all of that, I'm not convinced, but I also haven't spent a lot of time on that subject. There's plenty of evidence that living in a city will lower your IQ because of pollution. That seems like a much more important topic. 
No, that's literally why they're pushing for it. [Theyre very open about this being their intention.](http://www.geneticliteracyproject.org/wp-content/uploads/2013/10/GLP-right-to-know-infographic.pdf)
How old are you? What do you do or a living? Was your father a nationalist? What does an ideal world look like? Where do mixed race fall in your world view?
The world does care. The media outlets that inform them, however, are controlled. [The guardian,] (http://davidduke.com/media-control-top-jewish-supremacist-takes-britains-guardian-newspaper/) recently, for instance.  "Omission is the most powerful form of lie." - George Orwell 
Why wouldn't you wash your hair?
The ol' Ron Paul strategy.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I no read so good.
Anyone else remember the so-called "power outage" that shut down Schiphol int'l airport in the Netherlands a couple of months ago?  Now this.   Feel free to try and convince me it's just a coincidence though.
[~~Less than~~ Exactly 2 months ago](http://www.euronews.com/2015/03/27/power-outage-hits-amsterdam-and-northern-holland-area/)  Sorry, working overnight shifts sometimes makes me forget what day it is.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Oh right only "my" Science is derpy.  Top minds.
Easy fix.  Start your own site.  Talk about anything you want.  Stop coming to reddit.  Or stop letting them ruin your day.  Is flippin reddit.  Its not like it matters.  Anywhere.    There is a whole real world out there where people cant treat you like the mods do in this cyber bs world.  Cause if they did, they would probably get punched in the nose.   Hard.  
There is about a two week adjustment period. Three days in you'll feel homeless, but it is worth it, I swear. 
What viable alternative solution can you offer to crime and criminals?
This place is somewhere between heaven and hell, a material mixture that captures the balance between the two. There are good and bad spirits, in conflict, with each holding sway at different times. We are in the days of rising darkness but it will not always be so. 
An equivalent armed and trained citizenry.
Wouldn't you just end up with armed and trained criminals too, though? 
That's not the NoPoo movement at all - NoPoo means wash your hair with conditioner or baking soda and ACV/lemon juice/some other PH-fixing thing.  You appear to be really, really bothered by people who are using alternative hair products. Why? Why do you care what others are doing as long as you're not standing next to them in the bus (and actually, even if you are - the methods described here work fine for many).
[deleted]
This needs more upvotes.
This place is fucked beyond repair. Time to voat
In your face sheeple!  Co-incidence?  Suck the Zionist teat of denial at your own peril. 
borax, baking soda, ACV, and some high quality some once a week is all you need. 
And why was there literally only one thermite charge on the outer supports? 
&gt; ‘cause if you dropped a screwdriver, it would go right through the floor.”  [Dat Van Allen Radiation.......](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dyl1LsB7Xr8)
I better do what my neighbors do, or they'll call me Edward Snowden and/or Jenny McCarthy! Everyone knows how important fitting in and keeping up is! No one wants to be carelessly tossed down the memory hole! So shut up and comply, because this is the Land Of The Free!^^TM
So, now when a planes mysteriously fall from the sky....
[deleted]
The false pretenses mean there was not a war.  Just murder and resource control. 
I know Reddit is very anti Muslim as it is, but I think what he says screams Isis today. This was recorded in 2003, and the man knows his history. Anyone believe that Israel is motivated to fulfill a particular biblical prophecy?   
Do you pretend posts like this mean anything to anyone but you?
Some conspiracy theories turn out to be true.  Some turn out to be false.  So conspiracy claims should be questioned just like everything and everybody else.    http://www.rawstory.com/2015/01/there-are-some-crazy-conspiracy-theories-about-light-bulbs-and-then-there-are-some-real-dangers/  http://www.alternet.org/5-most-insidious-conspiracy-theories-2014  http://www.motherjones.com/politics/2012/10/chart-obama-conspiracy-theories 
yes on public mod logs.
While i am not a fan of being manipulated, I consider this creative more than disgusting.  It also reinforces my belief :  Fuck democracy, long live the republic!  A tyranny by the masses is still a tyranny....just a popular one.
Yup, not only that but people have been conditioned to associate prison rape with it being funny. In the end, laughter is how most Americans miss the fact that they live in a society with a de facto gulag system. 
If this type of analysis is possible then it should also be possible to show past earthquakes that coincided with planetary alignments. Then we could assign a probability to future events. Unfortunately I think this guy is full of crap. 
No silly, the technology to make calls in flight.
It is what unions have been reduced to.
[deleted]
A lot of the stuff that turned up seems to have been deleted.  I remember some connection to possible CIA gunrunning or something.  but I cant find anything solid anymore. 
Read a clinical psychological profile on psychopaths and sociopaths. By nature they come to dominate and control whatever group they become a part of, as it is a distinct social advantage to be relatively or completely free of emotion when dealing in human resource management. 
Thank you sir, I had no idea that sub existed and I'm gonna check it out now. 
What's the conspiracy?
hells ya
Democracy Now! Is zionist propaganda? Can you cite me some sources or any info related to that proposition?
YES I want public mod logs!
She alone exemplifies everything wrong with our fraudulent representatives in government.  If you have time [PLEASE READ THIS](http://olivebiodiesel.com/Feinstein-Durbin-McCain/)
Suppose the soldiers are paid with special money that is valued independently. I believe that was actually the case in the American civil war, which was very similar to what we are talking about here.
Challenge accepted. 
[You'd be wrong.](http://www.usatoday.com/story/tech/columnist/komando/2014/06/20/smartphones-nsa-spying/10548601/) This is public knowledge. 
And so is everyone else.  Target can look at your purchase and figure out if you're pregnant.  We live in an age of zero privacy. Even if you could somehow not give up the goods via metadata, doesn't matter.  Did you get tagged in a photo, go to a store?  Did you search google or post on the Internet?  That stuff is for sale.  Traded.  If you interact in society, you are a giant dataset.
[deleted]
Yeah, that was described in The Franklin Scandal.  A house fully outfitted with hidden cameras and they throw lots of parties for Senator and Governors.  After the "squares" have left, they bring out the cocaine and the children.  The men start disappearing into bedrooms with the kids and it's all filmed (the kids getting raped that is). They (the men) are then a slave to the person owning those tapes. 
I wonder if there is a more sober rendering of this.
I have been thinking the same thing. I live in DFW. This much rain is so unnatural here and it is POURING, not just raining. 
Yeah. At this point I just assume if it has an input (camera, microphone, keystrokes, etc) it's being logged. In all honesty its better safe then sorry. Have you ever seen the device they use to sense vibrations on an empty bag of chips and extract the vibrations and translate it to language? It's just absurd. And that's just what we know about. The whole "brain initiative" thing the government is championing as research that will benefit humanity is ultimately going to be used to skip metadata and go right to your brain waves.   Edit, here's the chip bag thing I mentioned http://www.idigitaltimes.com/can-potato-chip-bag-spy-you-mit-researchers-show-how-object-vibrations-can-be-used-reconstruct
How manages such a small country to butt-fukk america so hard? Take a real hard look at the USS liberty incident and 911
~~Hailnwo~~ /u/HaltNWO* is my favorite. His wit is sharp like a bowling  ball. I get a chuckle often over the what the defination of "we" is.
Black Knight: http://mysteriousuniverse.org/2014/02/the-black-knight-satellite-bracewell-probes-and-phillip-k-dick/  Samsara: http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saṃsāra  
Well so much for the UN-Illuminati naysayers !!   Yes the UN is did functional, but it is this that kept the world from the bring of WWIII. And irs probably UN's instability that probably keeps us from a OWG.   This of course unless you believe that all countries are in this together, everything is a lie, and its just a matter of time until OWG takes hold. Because redundancy is impossible to argue with.
when you think of french and swedish girls you imagine rotten flesh and boiled meats??
He only got a week. 
i don't disagree with you, but you're applying what i would argue is the analog of *classical* evolution to what i would call *special* evolution (analogous to relativity, of course).  and i also agree that there is no general progression for complexity, but i take issue with *fitness*. even if you mean for that to mean adaptability, i'd still argue that the pinnacle is efficiency.
I hope her husband goes as well.
As a European, I wouldn't feel safe to be honest - but it's part of your constitution, isn't it? Well, when you live in a nation you should be pretty informed about the fundamental laws.
If you can't think of ways to profit from this you aren't trying hard enough. Buying extremely cheap land is an obvious one.
Two reasons to collect metadata  Locating Dissent  Recorded Future  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kvo1u3OALPg  Conditioning sheep Social Credit SYSTEM http://www.ibtimes.com/china-use-big-data-rate-citizens-new-social-credit-system-1898711
actually, she's one of the 5 or so people in the state allowed to conceal carry.
This comment is dedicated to Dianne "Banker-Buttlicker-Margaret-Thatcher Feinstein": the Dragon Lady with no fucking heart
That says they make the most money. It doesn't mean they produce the most food. 
But [George Clooney told me](http://www.westernjournalism.com/george-clooney-will-back-hillary-clinton-in-2016-whatever-she-wants/) Benghazi was no big deal, so. 
Yes, I know that you have no argument which is quite embarrassing for you at this point. Again, can't click on links. :(
I already won; you have zero arguments.
You have no idea what real oppression looks like!!! You live in the U.S.  immigrants from all over the world (including my family) have come here and have become wildly successful. Yet certain black culture still chooses to play the victim and want government benefits and payouts. Then turn around and say fuck the U.S. gtfo with that garbage. The difference is a lot of people are openly tired of the same rhetoric spewed to society and how we should feel bad for what happened in the history. Move on, better your life's. Stop living in the past and using it as a crutch.
Here is a non-mobile link: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Novus_ordo_seclorum   ^[Sourcecode](https://github.com/Kharms/untouchedURL) ^| ^[Feedback?](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=untouchedURL&amp;amp;subject=untouchedURL%20feedback)
I'm not sure this is a fail. I suspect it was the goal all along.
Unfortunately crime controls the voting booths.  The man  who wrote vote fixing software testifies.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JEzY2tnwExs  However if a Bush or a Clinton wins,  the cat will be even more out of the bag.
what did they say
&gt; people from all over the world  But immigrants get locked in concentration camps.
I don't get it... if we're being told that our military sent anthrax to our people... how is that a scare, terrorist activity, or even a pretext for the new patriot act?
I got mine!  Every responsible gun owner should have one.
As long as we all know where you are on the topic.  Lastly, I say Wolfgang Halbig and you say......what?
Do you have anything to confirm that?
Yes I did becuase you posted a topic about it 30 minutes ago.
They are not government.  They are as Federal as Federal Express.
The legal system is illegitimate.
Even though I find the aliens a bit corny, the rest of the movie was truly awesome. Totally new perspective for people that haven't thought about these things yet.
[deleted]
So why, after all off this time, do planes, whose engines make it very hard for contrails to form, all of a sudden start making more than ever? And why are the contrails lasting all day when contrails usually last a number of minutes? Why all of the aluminium and barium being found in water, soil and human bodies? It makes no sense
I did read what you said, but given that Sputnik 1 was launched in 1957 it isn't saying much. The NOAA satellites have been in polar orbit since the late 60's.
["Power tends to corrupt, and absolute power corrupts absolutely.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stanford_prison_experiment) Great men are almost always bad men." - John Dalberg-Acton
Or that you shouldn't put spaces between parenthesis and it's contents.  What my Mississippian high school English teacher would say about that...tsk tsk...
You know what they say when you assume things :p
Jello for President
Common good is collectivist propaganda.
Investigate Clinton Douchebag Sydney Blumenthal while you're at it.
Largest city in the heartland of america, not on either of the coasts, a port city as well, super corrupt politicians that would facilitate such an event etc. etc.
This...the folks in charge have such a stranglehold, why make waves with an obliteration war? 
[deleted]
They may be unrelated events consciously but subconsciously those two attacks are completely intertwined. 9/11 was a mind control exercise (amongst many things) that was so overwhelmingly traumatic that it can now be subconsciously refreshed to create a low level background fear state that makes us more pliable.  
Everyone I've met have called it Edge
It's more scary to legislators. Remember 2001 when anthrax from a government lab was sent to people opposing the PATRIOT act.
When is the vote? 
I dont care what nationality you are....you are a moron in every language.
&gt;You're too late. Humanity is a lost cause.    FTFY
Thanks for that, some really good points.
That's gonna be a yes
Educate before you vaccinate!
This has nothing to do with Poland.
Hey, weren't those guys in the bible?
Best quote from the article;  “I don’t know that I would say this is the big one where they sneak in under the guise of a training exercise and clamp down on civil liberties in Texas. It’s too early for that,” Dillon said. “But it’s conditioning. It’s getting people accustomed to having heavily armed, camouflaged soldiers on the city streets, ranches, farms, public roads.”
Peace.  World peace.
Okay....thanks?  /u/Mr_dong ...Honestly, it's embarrassing and ironic that Flytape is taking this subreddit by the reins--especially with this "transparency" meme after being secretly reinstated.  If he's not involved in some sort of reddit drama or mod conflict, he's pushing a sticky post or AMA.  Why is one person influencing and steering this subreddit so often?  Positive or negative, there's a conflict of interest here.  I do not want Flytape to represent this subreddit any longer, it looks bad for everyone in my opinion and I feel that this "your voice is heard" and new "transparency" meme comes across as disingenuous and I personally would like it if he tried his best to stay out of the public spectacle.   No matter how justified, his actions cannot be taken seriously due to his reputation.  Whether it's a simple ban warning or an announcement such as this sticky, his credibility is completely gone and he can't be taken seriously. The fact that he has been demodded, reinstated, and involved in controversy so many times over the years really hurts the community and I would like it if he did not influence this subreddit any longer, no matter how "noble" his cause.  [**In my opinion, the huge problem before us here is -- no matter how great Flytape is, he is tainted with so many scandals just having him as a mod creates massive disruption in /r/conspiracy.  This recent charade of his feels like a cover for his past.**](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/31scko/flytape_has_officially_been_reinstated_as_a_mod/cq4wpqr)
Meanwhile, they go after soccer instead. 
Here is [**ZetaTalk**](http://zetatalk.com/ning/10ja2015.htm) on the 28 redacted pages of the 9/11 report  &gt;What should be born in mind is that the goal of the Council of Worlds war is not to unveil every lie or correct every injustice. The goal is to allow Obama to announce. That said, peripheral crimes that are incidental to this process may get exposed.  The benefactors of the 911 crime are many, and include a number of individuals formerly in the Bush administration who still have tentacles into the federal bureaucracies such as the DOD and CIA. They pull strings. It is no secret that Jewish owners of the World Trade Center buildings benefitted from 911, and Jewish bankers are part of the cover-up crowd.    &gt;**What does it imply, that the truth about 911 was creeping into the US media last Summer? Global Research is correct in guessing that no more than Saudi involvement in 911 will be revealed should any currently classified documents get declassified. The truth about the Bush family’s involvement, and in particular Dick Cheney’s central orchestration of events, was never investigated, so cannot be declassified. Putin was threatening to release 911 satellite images during the Ukraine standoff, and all this was in process well before the October 20** [Nibiru] **announcement date was missed.  We have mentioned that the rats are starting to turn on each other, and even though 911 is not central to the cover-up, proof lies in many hands, it is likely that by this process 911 justice will result.**  &gt;--[ZetaTalk Chat Q&amp;A for January 10, 2015](http://zetatalk.com/ning/10ja2015.htm)  (guys, you wont find nothing but the middlemen &amp; scapegoats in the redacted pages. Remember bush &amp; cheney testified without an oath. Cheney made sure he was in the room when bush was testifying. The entire commission was a joke. The whole 9/11 commission took place because of the victims' wives &amp;  Henry fkin kissinger was going to be the lead commissioner, instead we got a good friend of condoleeza rice)
What? You lost me.
As long as people are fed, watered and distracted it won't happen.
Well when you just parrot the opinions you here on TV without applying any critical thinking skills that's pretty close to brainwashed. 
Yeaaa
[Here's just the first source of several.](http://mentalfloss.com/article/17483/8-nuclear-weapons-us-has-lost)
Im a controversial member of the reddit community, and conspiracy is a controversial subreddit of the redditverse.  If you had nothing but mainstream noncontroversial mods here this place would not be the conspiracy sub it is today.    First things first, I don't know why all you 9-11 truth people are so angry with me, I didn't have anything to do with the Gage AMA you like to parade around about.  Literally never had a hand in it.  I've yet to have a hand in any of the AMAs.  You guys like to call me a Nazi Jew hater but the one person I tried to get to do an ama is an author who doesn't blame the Jews but instead blames the 4th Reich, that would be the Nazis latest incarnation.   Honestly its kind of selfish that you guys turn everything into a soap box for your vendetta, literally every sticky post we've had for any reason has been inundated with you and your friends shouting about this same incident.   Axol was duped with the Gage AMA,  he has apologized profusely time and time again.  At this point the only thing ruining /conspiracy is this never ending witch hunt.    I'm truly sorry you feel this way, but nobody is getting fired.
now we kow why the USA just went after FIFA arresting some in one of their puppet regimes.
Interesting way of suicide prevention.
Only for $12/hr scientists. 
Make a trap so when he comes back, wham.
Or is it caused by [Fukushima fallout](https://www.google.com/webhp?sourceid=chrome-instant&amp;ion=1&amp;espv=2&amp;ie=UTF-8#q=california+drought+caused+by+fukushima)?
Please don't do this again.  Read the rules.  This is your only warning.
Tusko? Is that his original name?
I like Wyden,  He is smart, friendly, and respectful.  If this happens I'll be very impressed.
ya catching up more like under the thumb of... consider a cia think thank called R.D.I. put our current PM in power. And some of you thought he was just another ziotard I bet.  makes you wonder why he sold out all our resources to China in the back room of a Russian hotel a few years back. Sure he did it in secret but after we found out but our equally sold out high court says its legit nothing we can do. you think the 6 billion nexton deal that gave em most of the land in alberta was something they made it so anything under 2 bil doesn't even get a mention and anything overs done in secret court. 
Rule 10. No personal attacks. Removed.
&gt;Refuses to provide evidence because "there's so much evidence he can't keep track of it."  You want me to go through months of discourse across 2 user accounts?   Like the time you lied about the credentials of your denialist saints? Or the time you couldn't be bothered to fact check your sources about a made up or irrelevant person of whose quote you continued to copypaste? Or how you willingly posted an article from a newspaper that didn't exist?   right....  &gt;Alludes to KKK, asserts posting about taboo topics with a separate account equates to "obsession".  Separate account? All of your postings are about jews. Sounds like obsession to me. One can't make only and entirely racist posts and insinuations and then say "oh im not a racist because i never said the K word". That's not how that works  &gt;How long before your current account gets banned, too?  You'll have to ask your cronies that you're probably messaging as we speak.
Yes. I believe that too.
The main reason your post has so few upvotes is because it is a massive wall of text with absolutely no formatting to speak of. I skimmed through it and you seem to be thinking along the correct lines but I am not going to read that wall of text unless you format it correctly.   On a related note, I don't see what his post has to do with yours?
Here's a nice little rabbit hole about that house.  [Friends of the Benjamin Franklin House](http://hsp.org/sites/default/files/legacy_files/migrated/findingaid3118fbfh.pdf)  [Mary Bessborough](http://articles.philly.com/2013-04-18/news/38619268_1_world-affairs-daughter-lady-mary)  [House of Munn](http://www.newyorksocialdiary.com/legacy/socialdiary/2006/11_24_06/socialdiary11_24_06.php)  
lol, every few months
Ross Perot ruined it for third party candidates forever.  He got on stage with George H.W. Bush and Bill Clinton and made them both look like assholes who were beholden to special interests and Wall Street and the American public responded to him in a big way.  He had billions of dollars of his own money.  He couldn't be bribed or bought.  After the Reps and Dems saw that they immediately made their move to ban third party candidates from the debates.  
Yeah I always ask the same thing lol. I do believe though, on a few occasions I've seen ufos
lmeo
The major issue here seems to be that you do not understand perspective.  This is not something I made up you know.    Here is a resource that explains how lines of vision and perspective work.  Please read it carefully.  http://perspectiveresources.blogspot.ca/p/principles.html  
Obama is a pawn recieving his orders from another power.
&gt; Sorry,  How canadian of you. 
No seriously, you can tell the future, that's a pretty awesome power. Does anyone else around here have powers?
But we all learned that story as little kids, remember -- the boy who cried 'Wolf !  Wolf !  Wolf ! '.   Finally, no one paid him any attention.  The powers that be don't live in a real world, which is why they do such dumb things all the time
All I can tell you is it's been seen. 
why not point him the right way, one book he can read is Caesars messiah
Won't that have those chemicals in that planes disperse?
The ministry of truth 
Because their ethnically Russian they should leave Ukraine? If the majority if Hispanics vote in Texas to leave and become part of Mexico why should we let them? I believe you doesn't make Russia's actions ok.
Just writing something here so I can find this post again. 
Err...... no?  How did you form that conclusion from what I've typed so that I may avoid confusion in the future?  Did you miss the 'yay independent search engine' bit? Or was it my inability to commit fully to an idea that I've heard little to nothing about, by someone who sells sugar water to dying people?
**EDIT: The OP of the post has deleted all his comments, cleaned the insults out of his comment history, and the original /r/conspiracy post. I'd say that's the definition of "caught on his bullshit."**  **EDIT2: account is now deleted** Also, r/worldnews definition of "personal attacks"  &gt;&gt;Attacks on other users - **attacks shut down discussion.** Accusing another user of being a "shill" is considered a personal attack. **Stick to the issues and remain civil.**  Well... referring to the entire userbase as "most of these fucktards" and "reading the stupid in these threads" is pretty much insulting people who are there. It's no different than when /r/conspiratard comes here and starts attacking us.   If you're in a community just attacking everyone, that's pretty much just trying to incite a flamewar. It's low-value comments that contribute nothing positive to the discussion. 
Now listen up you puppies, if TPTB says Jeb will be your president, he will be.    *TPTP/TPTB
How does that justify a ban? Yeah, the OP shouldn't of generalized and could have been more civil, but that doesn't mean he should be banned. The mods could've warned him or removed the post. Instead, he went against the grain and was banned. You do not think that's a problem?
You realise that Israel, the heart of this conversation, has declared itself "the home of the Jews"?  Heh, two comments full of insults? "I always love when they resort to insults..."
I was talking about the Saudis, how the fuck does that equate to the jews?
This is why every single site gets a different email address from me.
Persuaded? Funny I just happened to watch a video today on how intimidation is more effective than bribery. 
&gt;I already said I was astounded by your logic. No need to repeat myself.   ...Yet you did. You've just gone out of your way to do just that, whilst telling me that it's not worth your time, to do, what it is, YOU'VE JUST DONE.  Are we arguing for the sake of arguing now? I don't get your  point, you seem to be under the impression that I'm naive and I can't possibly understand how an industry works. Where it seems to me that it's you who are confusing a few powerful companies with influence in government, with an entire industry with many tens of thousands of employees, both private and public.  Sanitation workers, manufacturers of equipment, machinery &amp; tools, doctors, analysts, technicians, lobbyists, advertising, testing, regulation workers, catering, maintenance, construction,  management, research &amp; development, machine operators, sample collections, 'General Practitioners', specialists, consultants. These are some of the many resources that 'big pharma' uses to make money.  This is small selection of an industry, all working together toward the same end goal, the goal of producing a product for consumption, that can be sold for profit.   There is a desire/need/requirement for 'x'.   Together as an industry, with public and private funding, 'big pharma' develops product 'y'. So they can sell it to us/you/them. It doesn't matter if that product comes from the boils on the anus of a pig, or from a laboratory, if it works, they'll sell it.     If we're going to argue about stuff over the internet, can you at least *try* please.
[deleted]
zeigeist isn't fact, but the love and salvation of Jesus Christ is.
No she should have provided identification when prompted.  http://www.flexyourrights.org/faqs/when-can-police-ask-for-id/  It states that in some states if an officer has a reasonable suspicion that you commited a crime you have to provide ID. It is a arrestable offense if not. Having the police called on her, and having someone state she threatened her and her child that is right there suspicion.  Now could it be a false accusation? Yea it could. Though it's still in your best interest to cooperate by at least providing ID when prompted.  You can hand I et your ID then say you'd like a lawyer. That's not self incrimination.  So maybe you should "give a shit" about the woman because she was completely in the wrong here. 
It's called "being human". 
"*adding that his client wasn’t “consciously thinking of what he was doing*.”   He looks pretty fucking conscious to me. I love the "he just wasn't **himself**" defense, priceless.   edit: fuck, hes even holding the dudes head up, must have been an "accident". 
I am prob shadow banned but, OMG the words they hurt so much.  No really your worried about words?  I worry about bullets, sticks and stones.  Not words.  Most of the people on this planet need to grow some skin.  
It was the first chapter to one of his books. The one that was published in 2010 IIRC.
Well you like to make assumptions about me so I thought I'd just return the favor.
Those weren't assumptions.  They were observations.  Terminology.
I also liked how they stated that the media were painting him to be a lone, disturbed individual and yet they thought he seemed highly intelligent, as if the two things are mutually exclusive. You can be intelligent AND deranged, as seen by many other mass killers over the centuries.  I love me some conspiracies but this isn't one of them.
just think, we catch isfake for calling in bomb threat and kick them out of fifa... win.win
arrest is not equal to conviction, and cops don't choose what is legal and illegal, the fuckers you vote for do  stop blaming cops and look in the mirror  don't like the system, then actively work to change it in the legislature 
you are FAR more likely to be killed walking down the street by a dumbass on his cellphone or driving while under the influence running you over than anything else
Not really, we mainly just need to require completely open-source  software and hardware.
Dude, they can't even tall about this worthless bitch Hillary on the nightly news.  She has a snowballs chance in hell of gathering even 3% of the vote.  Talk to people in real life.  NO ONE backs her.
[deleted]
If I'm ever a bankster lackey I am going to try and get an office on floors 1 or 2 so that i don't "jump" out the window.
Sure they do.
I was microwave beamed by the US Government and now work for them. They use electromagnetic energy waves to control me.
Currently the number [belongs to Academi Training Center in NC](https://www.academi.com/pages/facilities/moyock-nc). It's basically just another paramilitary group by a different name.
waste time? Fuck off, I have a right to pleasure and happiness, what sad person doesnt respect that?
I know that shitposting isn't explicitly against the rules, but it should be. 
I agree. If people knew how many city governments &amp; police departments were beholden to reaching monthly financial quotas for Goldman Sachs &amp; Chase. There is a reason you see cops writing tickets like there is no tomorrow when the 1st of the month comes. Reach your quota of hit the door.
and I basically just rephrased what I wrote you dumb fuck.
Well its a lot easier to transfer drugs around when you know one will will ever look at the cargo unless they're supposed too/freak accident. 
we are on the [cusp of an announcement on Nibiru](http://zetatalk.com/ning/30ma2015.htm) by world leaders. After the announcement there is the possibility of disinfo. Now that you've seen plenty of ZetaTalk material related to Nibiru (i.e. Planet X) &amp; the war taking place behind the scenes in getting an announcement out, you'll know that zetatalk was right in warning about Nibiru (aka Planet X) since 1995.  relevant ZetaTalk:  &gt;Why would an Executive Order on cyber-security be necessary at this time? Hacking of government websites and databases has long been an issue. Where Obama and his announcement team have had to work to get access to the Emergency Alert System, long blocked by the cover-up crowd to prevent him from making his announcement, the war in this regard will shortly be over. **The worry will shift to use of the Internet and various fuming media outlets with a vested interest in the status quo that will try to control the information the public gets in order to arrange their private kingdoms.** It is this that will result in a heavy handed federal response.  &gt;--[ZetaTalk Chat Q&amp;A for April 4, 2015](http://zetatalk.com/ning/04ap2015.htm)
These ideas are the real occult meaning of the allegory! He was 'in' on the illusion of physical reality, awakening spiritual abilities, secret societies and the control matrix of humanity. He is describing seeing and striving for the divine light from which our physical illusion manifests.
The workforce participation rate has dropped from 67% to around 63%, so 4% of adults who were working are not. This is a workforce participation rate last seen in the last 1970s when a lot of women were stay at home mothers.   Assume 5% unemployment (which is understated by since full time people dropped to part time are still employed), another 5% of adults (4 divided by 67) are unemployed but no longer counted as such (retired at 62 instead of 67, moved to disability, gave up and said "I'm a stay at home parent).   The work force numbers have dropped, while the population has actually risen due to immigration. We have growing poverty because of those who used to work now on SSDI or early retirement, and many of the rest only part time or intermittently employed.   Given that we don't have enough paying jobs for natives, there is absolutely no reason to allow anyone else to come in. We can't take care of our own, much less the rest of the world. 
Well, the thing is - a lot of this stuff is in plain sight. The Franklin scandal has been extensively documented, we know a little bit about what goes on in DC, but not a lot, a lot's still underground, but dig around and you'll see plenty of newspaper stories that cover this kind of scandal. Then there's the UK, holy hell...Great Britain appears to be riddled with a cancer that sounds impossible to be cut out. Who's *not* involved in government and the BBC there? And that's the big stuff...poke your nose around local police departments wherever you are, in old money areas specifically...  I wish this stuff wasn't true. I hope it isn't true. But evidence keeps appearing. No one does anything about it for why? We do so much to "protect children," we use that as a banner for all kinds of atrocious things, yet we still allow children to be victimized by these monsters because they have money, they have power, they have connections, and the whole thought that this stuff is actually happening, that it is commonplace in certain high levels of Western society, is so repellent it hurts us to look at it.  Another thing to think about, another thing I often think about is - we have this "surveillance state." They interrupt and record our phone calls, they look at our boobies and laugh, they monitor our network transmissions, filter and sift and cc: foreign nations...and yet no one appears to lift a finger to stop the most repellent crime committed by the elite (and the murders of whistleblowers who have tried to do something about it).  The system is complicit in the cancer and the system is composed of people. Very compromised people.   So I don't think it's odd that someone told someone else everything - they literally are not afraid. As you say further down, "that unstable lady," right? No one wants to believe this kind of evil is true - tell that unstable lady anything you want, no one will believe her. They'd rather believe she was unstable than that such evil is real. I know I would.
I'm aware of the news. Even mentioned it in my post. Thanks for the link though!
Did Nick Berg have any ties to Blackwater?
Clinton was an asset of the intelligence community. Recruited when he went to Moscow as a student and paid his dues running cia coke from the Mena airport as governor. Post Kennedy it all goes back to Dulles brothers and their network.
Yeah, but I fee, better. That was like in 2012.
Trying at becoming free?
Video is blurry, obviously lizard people.
&gt;You've merely asserted that the material exists  And you're free to read it. But you won't.  &gt;You've provided a source who testifies that there was hunger in the camps.   I've provided *multiple* sources who attest to a little more than "hunger".  &gt;Fine, but this is not what we are looking for.  Keeping moving those  goalposts bud.  &gt;I can provide sources who testify to hunger outside the camps, within the German civilian population for example.  LOL  comparing German civilian population and enemies-of-the-state held in prison camps. Classic.  &gt;So once more, I ask that you (a) quote a specific primary source which (b) proves that there was a (c) intentional policy of starvation implemented in the labor camps. That would probably need to be a German document, but just try to do the best you can.   Oooooh! More ignoring everything I've said. Classic. Repeating yourself doesn't make you look smarter.  If gilded script sign off in Official LeaderInk were the only way things worked, well, we wouldn't have a whole lot of anything these days.  There aren't documents attributing to force-labourers being fed the 3,000 plus calories required for such work either.   Instead, as noted by numerous camp officials and worker testimonies, workers were provided a significantly diminished, barely sufficient (and almost completely devoid of nutritional value) ration. Ignoring of course others, who didn't receie workers' rations.  That is starvation. That is intended and malicious. That is a *direct* result of all the actions undertaken by the Nazis.   "Work them to the bone then feed them this tiny piece of bread" is a policy of starvation. One does need to state "let's starve them" then have it signed off on by ten different officials and locked away in the Reichsvault.   &gt;This actually isn't contested, except by mentally-ill, German-hating hasbara.    Lol good one.   What's with the deniers and thinking their two or three mouthpieces speak for the historical community?  Pretty funny that you have no idea about the continued debate about this topic that goes on from both sides of the coin.  Oh I know. It clearly has something to do with your  delusional viewpoint and ignoring a literal dozen works on things.  &gt;Some 400-800k German civilians died due to the Allied policy of starvation blockading, depending on the source.  A blockade of course being perfectly legal. Maybe Germany shouldn't have used all its fertilizer for munitions, converted its productive civilian enterprises, wasted its agricultural land and had all its working age men killed and pillaged its neighbours and stolen their food.  A nation has no duty to make sure its belligerent feeds itself.   Sure, if you're going to include influenza epidemic deaths in this figure it could go above 500,000.   I wonder if it had anything to do with Germany refusing to use its merchant fleet for aid after the war? Or with Romania, who used to export to Germany (who wasn't terribly reliant on food imports in 1914) losing just about all ability to produce it during the war. Last I checked Romania wasn't involved in the allied blockade. Romanian and Poland too I believe were no longer food-secure by 1918. Why would they export surplus which they didn't have to a former belligerent? (Sort of like America did)   &gt; The starvation bloackade was even continued after the Germans de-mobilized in good faith, as a way to force acceptance of the Versailles diktat.  The blockade ended once Germany agreed to terms of surrender and singed the treaty.
What you think, you become
Changing sides is hardly a conspiracy. Dude either played the system or had a change of values.    Happened all the time in Afghanistan with ANA.
lol
I love seeing people be in 'awe' of software and how it works. "If the code is in modules, then the code can eat itself".... "Shocked gasps, and awes!!!" This is why automated voting systems should be publicly available open source software. The most secure encryption algos are open-source. The least secure... the ones run by companies.  The biggest Snowden revelation was the one where he discussed the NSA messing with the random number generator software at encryption companies. If you are a programmer, understand PGP security, that will chill you to the core. When random isn't random, you have a 'skeleton key' algo that will pick any lock. :-(
But what you saying on internet represent your soul.
His Website  http://experimentalvaccines.org/
He is the new Ron Paul. And i don't mean that in a good way. 
The question I have for the flat earthers is, why do other celestial bodies - that can be seen through a telescope - appear to be spherical but the earth is flat?
[deleted]
too late , been out there running for a long time, the people do not trust anymore
Open elections requires open code.
go check the new survey, they already claim she would win if the vote happened today. but the voting is rigged, whoever they want to win will win, just how ron paul was excluded from winning last time.
Nope.  Never bothered to learn them fancy book skills.  Why do you inquire?
You must live in the Boonies...
Thanks. Stay strong as well and persist in this wicked time!      "But small is the gate and narrow the road that leads to life, and only a few find it." (Matthew 7:14)
I definitely don't believe in the jeudochristian God. And I don't know why some God would set out this kind of causal chain to prove his own creations suck. 
Whoa, thanks for this. A few people are even calling out Scahill on Twitter for not mentioning Nick Berg.  Always really appreciate your research and input.
I've been watching this very closely:  http://www.nytimes.com/2015/03/17/business/blackstone-group-purchases-landmark-chicago-tower.html?_r=0  Do you know who owns/founded blackstone?  &gt;Before serving as Secretary of Commerce, Peterson was Chairman and CEO of Bell &amp; Howell, from 1963 to 1971. From 1973 to 1984 he was Chairman and CEO of Lehman Brothers. In 1985 he co-founded the private equity firm, the Blackstone Group, which went public in 2007. Peterson was Chairman of the Council on Foreign Relations until retiring in 2007, after being named chairman emeritus. In 2008, Peterson was ranked 149th on the "Forbes 400 Richest Americans" with a net worth of $2.8 billion.  http://www.blackstone.com/the-firm/overview/our-people/randall-rothschild  and of course... the arch scumbag:  http://www.blackstone.com/the-firm/overview/our-people/jacob-rothschild
Go team jew
Yup
Shell company
you guys posting this bother to notice this has been posted like 20 times already?
That's the easiest way to get rich.
Iceland, but it's hard as hell to get in. You either need a work visa or marry a native. Seeing how you have a family, marrying a native is out of the option, unless you're cool with polygamy, lol.
Resorting to insults makes it easier to know who should be ignored. Thank you, kind sir.
At least, they don't pm each others, yet. 
That moment when you're batshit crazy
welcome to the real world. Nothing in real life caters to all citizens simply due to the number and differences of people. We don't allow certain people to vote by law now. Remember, the only right protected under the constitution we have when voting is for one office...President of the US. All other voting is a privilege. 
Probably you.    Turning location sharing does turn it off. The receiving party doesn't get your location. The extension won't work either.    What Facebook knows is a whole another story. 
&gt; How do you sleep at night?   Lol. My man. Reality shows are pure entertainment. They are usually labeled in the TV guide as "Docudramas", meaning they say on the label it's fake. Do you drink Coca-cola and then get mad when you find out the sugar in it isn't real sugar? The fact that people aren't aware reality TV shows are staged and manipulated still blows my mind. No one in the reality TV show industry will try and say what they are doing is real, entertainment is literally the only thing that matters when a show is being cut.  &gt;  Is it so guaranteed that these shows wouldn't just be popular without all the manipulation?  Yes. There is a lot of money on the line and a very short window of time to have everything finished. If events weren't staged, a camera crew would show up to Honey Boo-boos house and they'd just sit there and watch TV the whole time. There would be nothing to cut and the producers of the show would be fired. When a film crew shows up at the house, they need to know exactly what will happen on that day otherwise you have to figure it out on the spot and that's a waste of time and money.   The real problem is that this is done with the news just as much as it's done reality TV. But the News doesn't admit that it's manipulating things in this way. You have to understand that *literally everything* you see on TV is "fake" in this way (manipulated by an editor). Never take for granted anything you see on TV and if an interview is cut up, always remember that an editor decided what you were allowed to hear from that person being interviewed. This is just the nature of media and it will never change. It is up to all of us to use our own judgement and discern the truth for ourselves. 
Hopefully...
Hillary 2016! God, were so fucked.
the message is resounding, just as well if not more today and it will continue until the issue is resolved, which doesn't seem to be anywhere on the horizon, unfortunately.
at least it likes me
To anyone who is intrigued by the quotes from Zinn's book: *definitely* check it out!
There have been Bird's team went, saw and then fell silent. And all the nations agreed that you can't even bring a certain amount of fuel withen so many miles of antartica as well as the flights that go over are never avaliable and could easily just pass the ice sea wall (icywall..that's awesome) and create the illusion. You're assuming it's legal to fly to the edge of the world, and it's not. Your plane will shot. You're lil convoy through the tundra will be bombed. This is UN law.
[Tikkun Olam!](http://www.algemeiner.com/2013/06/07/the-fallacy-delusion-and-myth-of-tikkun-olam/)  Comment from that article:  The Mitzvot are just as bad as Tikkun Olam. We had a credo engraved on two tablets of stone, and it served us well for 1500 years.  Then Rebbe decided that Moses was not clever enough, and turned our credo of Ten Commandments into 666 commandments, and later 613, for fear of Gentile massacre.  Tikkun Olam is one of our shocking national stupidities that come from the Talmud and the Mitzvot. These two monstrosities will put us back in the gas chambers unless we get rid of them.
Is a video available?
I guess it depends on your phone. 
[deleted]
The OP is joking, surely..?
I too enjoyed my first semester of philosophy.   I didn't say the "victims" are at fault, but rather are ignoring any possible personal responsibility to prevent. If my car is broken into and stolen, I am a victim of auto theft. If I left my laptop on the seat, the windows down, and the keys on the ignition, and it gets stolen I still am a victim. But I also didn't take appropriate and reasonable steps to prevent it from happening. All I'm trying to say is that expecting individuals to practice a certain amount of personal responsibility is not "blaming" the victim for the crime against them.   Personal responsibility is a trait we are losing as a society, and I see the term "victim blaming" as one that removes that personal responsibility even more. 
&gt;Come on, you know it would be no different in a world without money - some other kind of currency would take its place. The wealth gap must not be of monetary nature for sick people to abuse their power. It could be a few guys upstream building a dam, without asking about your fishing grounds first. Let me rephrase your argument. The wealth gap is not inherently bad, and the gap is the origin of (relative) power. It allows people to entice others into doing their best out of need or desire for a better world. I agree it is each persons responsibility which concept he will let himself be enticed to support - by reason, a share of the wealth, or intuition. And if the person is rich enough, and there are enough people having nothing better to do, one person could start some bullshit project like making the deserts green.  The difference without currency would be that building an army, large dam, or turning deserts green would be rather unfeasible. You would have to find a bunch of people who all desired the same thing - which you had alot of. Or you would have to find a bunch of things people desired on an individual level. Way more difficult than offering something that is universally accepted and letting them fill their own desires. I'm not saying it would be impossible, it would just be unfeasable.  I don't think it would limit people form making 'improvements' to the world such as your example of making the deserts green.  That would be done because people wanted to. There would be plenty of time as producing enough food to make a whole family fat takes less than 40 man hrs a week. Having no currency would drastically cut back on 'projects' that people don't want to happen though as currency wouldn't be a necessity.  &gt;What improves the circumstances of the greater part can never be regarded as an inconveniency to the whole. No society can surely be flourishing and happy, of which the far greater part of the members are poor and miserable.  He uses the word greater with regards to population twice in those two sentences.  Advocating that whats good for the majority can't be bad for the whole.  Then that a society can't be happy/flourishing if the majority is poor/miserable.  So if the majority isn't choosing, who is?  &gt;Now we have learned from game theory that there is no way to negotiate with a win-win outcome if there is a huge difference in power. A power gap, like, means or information withheld, enforces a win-lose. Because the weaker player's information is incomplete. In the long run, he must always lose. Like in a monetary system where a private body takes interest on interest for money he prints and people have to use to keep their asses poopin'.  Which is why I'm advocating to not play.   &gt;Before I go on - how do you define pure anarchism?  I'm not really sure. lol. You said democratic anarchy, so I felt compelled to add something. My view is that if there are no laws, everything will work into a nice balance. If there are no laws against murder/stealing/whatever, people would try to have only friends. People would also stand up for them-self in the moment rather than chasing a paycheck in court. Which would in turn lead to less and less people willing to risk their life trying to steal a wallet(hahaha - people wouldn't have them).  
&gt; The 767 flew consistently on the very edge of its capabilities  The capabilities should, by definition, be higher than the safe design limit.  You have been arguing that the 767 flew at the design limit.  &gt; This is impossible for an amateur pilot  You will need to demonstrate that.  &gt; and fully consistent with remote control.  Please explain how you think a 767-200 could have been successfully remote controlled into the tower.  * What modifications have been made to the 767-200? * Where is the pilot? * How does the pilot get telemetry? * How does the pilot send commands? 
The media can only do so much for so long. 88% of Americans own guns. I'm surprised there hasn't been a revolution. 
It's part of the greater Israel operation.  Israel looks to it's lapdog, the US, and says, "SIC 'EM, BOY!, and the US abides.
there are telescopes on Amazon for under $1000 that allow one to see all the way to Jupiter's great red spot
You are going to have to think harder and give us more than saying "are not correct".  I have watched the ball of the sun, and the moon, rise from behind the horizon and set behind the horizon dozens of times if not hundreds.  In your flat-Earth model in the video, that would be impossible. The sun and moon would always be *up*. How would "the distance involved" make that possible???  Dig in, my friend, and give me your reflection on that.  Maybe you would claim that as one gets further away it gets lost in the haze, can't shine through that much atmosphere. Okay, but like I said, I've seen it go behind the *land* and the *water* on cloudless horizons, I recommend trying to take a look someday.
Lol!!!
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Didn't watch it, don't need to, already know porn is an addicting drug that ruins relationships. Not sure it's a conspiracy, though anything that prints money usually gets sucked into the conspiracy. 
It can though! Assuming all the "normal" variables i gave in my post are true to you, which granted you might disagree, i would appreciate it if you would outline how our view of the world can't be true. This is all going off you viewing the world as everyone is more or less the same. If you take into account that everyone has a diffrent chemical makeup inside, and certain positions attract certain individuals, it is not very hard to imagine a group of greedy, intelligent, and sociopathic people getting into power, and then letting herd mentality take over to perpetually continuing that even after they are long gone.      Also there IS a lot of 1% known 99% unknown, but there is also well thought out and researched 99% known, 1% unkown theories. All it takes is a little leap of faith to decide that theory #2 which builds off theory #1 is probably true too, becuase that would mean theory #2 has a 98% known, 2% unknown, and so on. obviously not all theories are 99% to 1%, some might be 80-20 or even 50-50. Its hard to assign the "Fact content" of these theories numerical values, but i think you will get what i am saying. 
What?
Holy shit. That's a terrible story. I'm so sorry.
It was bound to happen one way or another. Unless the cultures are both sufficiently armed and are able to keep each other at bay, they can not coexist together. One will always move to dominate the other until they are subjugated or gone.   The native americans know this better than anyone. They had been doing this for hundreds, if not thousands, of years. They just didn't keep as good of a history as Europeans did. 
You don't need a chip to control. They've already won
Sorry if I seemed aggressive in that comment, I didn't mean it that way.  Have a nice day
Cuckhold spotted. It's pretty blatant dude, it's cool though, you let the bull into your bedroom ;). I'm libertarian, to each their own.
Thank you for the interesting video, I will definitely give it a watch tomorrow (it's late now). I often wondered how the cameras (filming the blast) survived, I always assumed that they were inside of sloped reinforced concrete bunkers, but they don't seem to shake [in most videos] or be disturbed/destroyed by the supposed extreme heat and radiation). :)
I've studied the bible and the KJV version is far more corrupted than the Catholics. I'm a former Catholic and I can tell you, it's all bullshit. They weren't guided, they were paid. Research history of the book. Jesus was a philosopher, not the son of God or a Savior. The Way is you, what you know and natural laws that we are all born with. Old books serve no purpose, what you need to do is look within, not outward. The power is you, not a paragraph in a book. If you need a book to tell you right from wrong, you are already lost. We are all created in his/it's/her image right? That's the point.
What? Why are you relating your personal experience with a 200 year prediction?   Seriously, people 200 years ago would never in their wildest dreams have imagined what we are capable of today.   You've got to be absolutely kidding yourself if you don't think we will be capable of merging with machines in 200 years. History has proven that humans absolutely are too conservative with long term predictions.   Frankly, I'd give it 80 years at most. 
[deleted]
No, this is bullshit that inorganically pervades a thread whenever Chomsky is mentioned in this subreddit.  Nobody believes this shit.  He is a preeminent intellectual.  People should start by reading [*Manufacturing Consent*](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/37wa2v/noam_chomsky_the_new_york_times_is_pure_propaganda/crqn64n "another post").
nice  title.  "There is no state in the union where a full-time, minimum-wage worker can afford to rent a one-bedroom apartment for less than 30 percent of his paycheck"  That's a HUGE difference. 
Everything on the TV is trying to fuck your mind
Think whatever you want, but unless you are willing to test my statement by "doing the research" that's all it will be... your opinion. And seeing as everything you just said is just stuff you pulled out your ass, it's not a very educated opinion. BTW, If you are really getting high levels of metals in soil then you should worry more about industry as the pollutant.
(man I always get the shills)    a human didn't do it.  They govt wouldn't have found anyone to commit suicide for them. also a human couldn't have sustained that level of performance.   Its pretty simple.
[deleted]
Ok. So tell me how i can stop it
Tell me, at what point in a "real" socialist country are the means of production "nationalized" vs owned by the majority of laborers?
I think its spam.. Trying to get more views on video. He just added the murder thing as clickbait, and dropped it into conspiracy. That's the only thing I can think of.
[deleted]
[deleted]
No shit. I couldn't believe my eyes when I saw this story.  You fat white northern Europeans who have been raiding the wealth of other countries for the last 400 years, want to complain that people from starving bombed out former colonies are ruining your vacation????  I have never seen such insensitive entitled people in my life. This tops it.  Fuck all.  
Military industrial complex, again betraying Americans
What is "the Jewish problem" ?
Oh yeah. The federal government needs MORE POWER. Great argument.
Most people I know that get a conscience either turn what they know toward good or change careers. Think maybe they believe working against that system is hopeless? Serious question.
I agree. Re-read my post. It was sarcasm.
Did you seriously not watch it? There is a segment that talks about the bots that make music, and paint.
"MISSION ACCOMPLISHED" - ~~Pamela Geller~~ Zionist Troll
It certainly whipped France into a racist fervor.
To me it looks like the mods removed a provocative comment that didn't add anything relevant to the discussion.  Good job by the mods.
You have said absolutely nothing about the content of the image posted.  You have no point, and are entirely wrong about everything you have said.
Every website starts from the bottom.  Facebook used to have "all 300k of them" and at some point MySpace was probably laughing at them.  Honestly, I haven't really been there much or made an account or anything, but I've been given the impression that it's building pretty rapidly.  I don't know if there's a "mass exodus" the way some people claim; I'd think it's probably a matter of users using both websites, not just giving up on this one altogether, but I'd be interested to see how fast that 300k number grows over a short period of time.  I read a lot of people talking about it more and more frequently lately, and I suspect that if it becomes a thing people will go from using both websites, to just quitting one of them altogether eventually.  "Not with a bang, but with a whisper", if I'm saying that correctly?  I don't really follow politics/world news stuff, so I don't see myself angrily migrating to the other one.  The subs I follow here are mostly trivial subjects not too important enough to censor information, and certainly not on a scale that could potentially control information to millions of people.  I don't see Wizards of the Coast getting /r/RPGs mods to start deleting GURPS posts.  So if I was ever to go there, it would have to be bigger with already established and active subs of all the dumb and trivial stuff I follow on this site.
I'm more disturbed by the bull as Baal symbolism 
I like the cut of your jib 
How can you ban ideas?
&gt; It is seriously the equivalent of thinking McDonalds poisons their food and still eating there.  No, it is the equivalent of living in a country that is becoming more and more out of control and actually trying to do something about it, and then the little minds come out with their pathetic excuses to attack the person reacting to the injustice.  Your argument is invalid, and tired, and it pops up 1000's of times. It makes zero sense and is basically boils down to one of the worst attitudes that anyone could ever take when confronted with a problem.  You are literally bashing the people who try to change a system from by saying "if you don't like it then nobody is keeping you here" which is an excuse that remains valid regardless of how far the authorities turn up their corruption.  "Yeah, people are being taken out of their homes and shot, but hey, if they didn't like it, they shouldn't have lived in a country where that happens, they should have just moved away".   
We understand energy very well. Physicists understand the universe much much much better than people give them credit for.  for example, the Higgs boson was proposed using math, and properties like mass, spin (etc) were all calculated to make sense of some findings. And when the Higgs was finally discovered, it was exactly what physicists had predicted decades ago.  High frequency signals take more energy, does not matter how they are produced, it's just fact.
Start your own worldnews mirror sub
"No Nation Building"
Oh for God's sake pull yourself together.
&gt; The sooner people realize that the better.  Been trying, majority don't care. FUCK THEM ALL. Let this place become whatever the hive has dictated to them.  It will be fun and intense at the same time!
[deleted]
To be fair, the post is pretty dumb. It's a building that's closer to WTC1 &amp; 2 than WTC7. The OP posted what we call, in the real world, a "loaded question".
Uhhh... the one where Israel welcomes all Arabs? What proof do you have that says otherwise?
It wasn't a firing squad.  They drag crying and pleading boys and men onto a blood covered dock and shoot them in the head and throw them in the river.  Over and over and over.  It was fucking horrific.  Stop making apologies for these ISIS fucking savages.   Here ya go.   http://youtu.be/PDe5dfxzBHg
i like this idea. it *could* work in the US, but TPTB wouldn't allow it.
Yeah this whole story is a fake. Even the man in the picture has nothing to do with the story or the claim.
How much would it cost to fix Detroit?
If you could have any one food for the rest of your life, what would it be and why is it spaghetti?
[deleted]
There is no doubt you were the victor in this argument dont let this troll get to you man:)
At least they had one. What has AE911truth done so far, except give a ton of money to the not-particularly-impoverished advertising industry for some billboards and an unimpressive website?  I want to see them at least take a stab at a simulation!
[deleted]
C.I.A. = Christians In Action
[deleted]
Then I 100% agree with you
And you know I dont give a fuck but you still persist in harassing me?
What if the money made from shorting AA on the market that day was used to pay any insiders more money than that just to keep quiet?  As the saying goes, follow the money... Well it's hard when the records are sealed or destroyed. 
Definitely threatened a false flag.
Through some dirty politics, roughly $1 per poor child went to these despicable people who maybe had technical or scientific information. How much harm was done?
It proves that there was next to zero resistance from what is supposed to be a solid steel framework that was over engineered to support multiple times the amount of stress generally encountered in daily situations. The only way that a building like this could crumble to the ground with so little resistance is if the supporting structure was purposefully compromised.  Steel buildings do not simply crumble at free fall speed because of fire or any other kind of localized damage.  It takes a demolition team to cause this kind of catastrophic collapse.   And it doesn't take a fucking engineering degree to recognize this simple fact.
Here is the leader of Pakistan saying the same thing.  http://edition.cnn.com/2002/WORLD/asiapcf/south/01/18/gen.musharraf.binladen/  Here is another one based on the same dialysis statement, the head of FBI for counter-terrorism says he thinks he didn't make it to 2011 either http://content.time.com/time/nation/article/0,8599,1819280,00.html  "Quoting a CIA memo that said that based on the drugs he’s taking, he only had six to 18 months to live."  In March 2000 the Chicago Tribune reports that an Afghan witness and “Western intelligence official” say bin Laden is suffering from severe kidney and liver failure. Link: http://articles.chicagotribune.com/2000-03-25/news/0003250085_1_laden-bin-religious-militia  This story was also picked up by CBS News in 2000, who outright lead with the title that “Bin Laden Reported to be Dying” from “kidney disease.” Link: http://web.archive.org/web/20010212010328/http://www.cbsnews.com/now/story/0,1597,172666-412,00.shtml  In July 2001, the South Asia Analysis Group reports: “Bin Laden, who suffers from renal deficiency, has been periodically undergoing dialysis in a Peshawar military hospital with the knowledge and approval of the Inter-Services Intelligence, (ISI) if not of Gen.Pervez Musharraf himself.” Link: http://web.archive.org/web/20011007021426/http://www.saag.org/papers3/pap  In September 2001, PBS’ Frontline interviews the former general counsel for the CIA, mentioning reports from 1998 that the DEA found out Osama bin Laden was undergoing kidney dialysis with a doctor in Peshwar. They mention further that the DEA wanted to poison bin Laden through his dialysis machine, but the CIA allegedy rejected this due to the ban on assassinations. Link: http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/pages/frontline/shows/terrorism/interviews/smith.html  In November 2001, The Guardian is reporting that French intelligence officials say bin Laden was flown to Dubai for kidney treatment in July of 2001, where he also met with several CIA agents and the head of Saudi intelligence. This story is also picked up by several French newspapers. Link: http://www.theguardian.com/world/2001/nov/01/afghanistan.terrorism  In his first interview since 9/11, in November 2001 bin Laden talks to a Pakistani newspaper and claims that his “kidneys are all right” and denies visiting a hospital in Dubai the previous year (note that he may have visited one in Pakistan). In the same interview he also asserts, clearly lying, that he has “nuclear weapons.” Link: http://dawn.com/news/5647/osama-claims-he-has-nukes-if-us-uses-n-arms-it-will-get-same-response/2  This is a pattern. Something is reported, then magically it is backed off on when it does not fit the narrative. Like when he died-- http://www.foxnews.com/story/0,2933,41576,00.html  And again http://www.theatlantic.com/national/archive/2013/09/osama-bin-laden-is-dead-long-live-osama/280106/  And again http://topinfopost.com/2013/05/06/osama-bin-laden-died-of-natural-causes-according-to-former-cia-agent  And again In December of 2001, the New York Times reports on “high-level murmurings that bin Laden is dead.” Link: http://www.nytimes.com/2001/12/26/international/asia/26LADE.html  In late December of 2001, after reports of bin Laden’s funeral, a new video appears of a gaunt, sickly Osama bin Laden. The London Telegraph reports, verbatim: “The recording was dismissed by the Bush administration yesterday as sick propaganda possibly designed to mask the fact the al-Qa’eda leader was already dead.” One aid further concludes that the video was created earlier in the event bin Laden is dead, who by December of 2001 was so heavily surrounded he would have been unable to escape to obtain kidney dialysis. Link: http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/afghanistan/1366508/US-casts-doubt-on-bin-Ladens-latest-message.html  At this time CBS news also runs a story on bin Laden receiving kidney disease treatments in Pakistan the week before 9/11. Link:http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kmhXSUIFLZ4  In January of 2002, The Guardian reports that the president of Pakistan speculates that bin Laden is now dead of untreated kidney disease based on video and photographs of a gaunt-looking bin Laden. Link: http://www.theguardian.com/world/2002/jan/19/afghanistan.oliverburkeman  In January of 2002, based on his analysis of video and photographs of bin Laden from December 2001, CNN’s Dr. Sanjay Gupta says that bin Laden seems to be having renal failure. He notes kidney dialysis is expensive, and suggests bin Laden would need help in obtaining medical treatment. Link: http://edition.cnn.com/2002/HEALTH/01/21/gupta.otsc/  In March 2002, the BBC reports on an interview with bin Laden’s wife, who speaks of bin Laden in the past tense, notes his failing kidney and frequent use of pills and other medicines. She says she has not seen her husband since September 2001, but holds out hope that he is still alive: “I feel deep inside me that he is still alive.” She also notes that bin Laden’s wish was to die in Afghanistan and nowhere else: “He never spoke to me about his intention to leave Afghanistan and always wished to die there. He told me once that if he ever left Afghanistan, it would be to meet his Creator.” She also says that bin Laden “always suffered from kidney and stomach pains and that he “told me once that he was going to Pakistan for treatment.” Link: http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/world/monitoring/media_reports/1871182.stm  In March and April of 2002, U.S. officials downplay the threat of bin Laden, with Rumsfeld even saying the bin Laden threat has been “neutralized.” Even Bush, called out for rarely mentioning bin Laden in 2002, admits: “We haven’t heard from him [bin Laden] in a long time… I don’t know where he is. I really just don’t spend that much time on him, to be honest with you.” Link: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4PGmnz5Ow-o  In May 2002, ABC News reports on a new spliced-together tape from unknown time periods in which bin Laden appears “about the same” (that is, sickly-looking) as in the tape from December 2011. ABC News also says they have “learned intelligence reports indicate bin Laden had received a kidney transplant in Pakistan,” but do not know when. Link: http://abcnews.go.com/International/story?id=79973&amp;page=1  In July 2002, the BBC reveals a bombshell: the FBI’s counter-terrorism chief Dale Watson says bin Laden is ‘”probably dead.” Conveniently, bin Laden’s followers’ claim that bin Laden will “not make more video statements until his group launches another attack on the United States.” Link: http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/south_asia/2135473.stm  In July 2002, CNN reports that bin Laden’s close bodyguards were captured in February of 2002, but not bin Laden. The article also quotes mentions some high-level officials: “Some high-level U.S. officials are already convinced by such evidence that bin Laden, who has not been seen or heard from in months, is dead.” Link: http://web.archive.org/web/20021204040117/http://www.cnn.com/2002/US/07/30/binladen.son/  In July 2002, Time Magazine reports that “intelligence officials are not certain whether Osama bin Laden is alive or dead” but that “they have found a tantalizing document that suggests he was living at least as recently as the last days of December [of 2001].” Link: http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,1002840,00.html  In July 2002, The New York Times runs another article on how Osama bin Laden is likely dead. The author notes how unusual it would be for bin Laden, known for his constant desire for media attention, would be silent for over half a year. Link: http://www.nytimes.com/2002/07/11/opinion/the-death-of-bin-ladenism.html  How about when they found his will!! Also in October 2002 the D.C.-based news service The World Tribune, citing Israeli intelligence sources, reports that the United States and Israel have concluded that bin Laden died in Afghanistan in December 2001. They note that additional bin Laden messages are “probably fabrications,” and that bin Laden’s heir has been chosen. Link: http://web.archive.org/web/20021205223313/http://216.26.163.62/2002/me_terrorism_10_16.html  The president of Afghanistan also concludes that bin Laden is probably dead: “The more we don’t hear of him, and the more time passes, there is the likelihood that he probably is either dead or seriously wounded somewhere.” Link: http://edition.cnn.com/2002/WORLD/asiapcf/central/10/06/karzai.binladen/  In October 2002 CNN reports that U.S. intelligence officials have obtained Osama bin Laden’s will, which is dated December 14, 2001 (approximately the same date as has been reported bin Laden’s funeral in Tora Bora by Fox News and other outlets). CNN also reports that there has been no evidence of bin Laden since December of 2001. Link: http://edition.cnn.com/2002/WORLD/europe/10/26/binladen.will/ 
Is that surprise you're registering with that headline?  Seriously....... do you seriously think  the wealthy people of this planet don't have a plan just because the rest of us don't.  and their plans really don't involve the rest of us, either... unless of course you understand what morlocks mean.
[Here's video of the quote](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t9c0rbVqrss).
Immunity clause......   In real life,  did Hoover need an immunity clause?   No,   in real life the chips being played for keeps were not the chips on the table.       That is really a shame for the rule of law.    There is a rule of law by which losers can be hauled off.    But the lead players have means to escape the rule of law.    Many carry their powers to the end,  most do.    But that is due to a consensus.    Loyalties.    Favors continued through generations of dynasties.    The ship holds together by this consensus,   and punishments are reserved for those who threaten the ship.  Unfortunately for the ideal of democracy,   this consensus is operated in secrecy.   The greatest need of secrecy and privacy is by those with the most to lose.
Worth noting that under this definition, white genocide is taking place in every white country on the planet right now - especially places like Sweden.  Also worth noting that Barbara Spectre openly stated that she and other Jews can and will lead this 'transformation'.  In other words, what they are doing to Palestine is horrid, and we should also look at what is happening closer to home.
Another murder by cop.
Yup.
Actually it's worse than serfdom. Serf's during the feudal times actually spent most of their time lounging about while crops were growing, the most work was during spring/seed spreading time, and during fall/harvest time.  Today people get maybe 2 weeks to 2 months of vacation, not 6 months like the serfs had it. 
Sacred Geometry = real  Spirit Science = weird cultish bullshit
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
http://i.imgur.com/dBp34Gj.jpg
[deleted]
K   I didn't know that.
I always laugh when I see stuff like this from RT. I mean I know it's a propaganda piece and they almost have to put it out there and sure CNN and FOX will put out their own versions of this stuff over the years but it makes me wonder what Russia gave Nazi war criminals over the years.   You have to know that they have probably spent millions themselves to Nazi war criminals especially when you take into account everything and by that I mean the whole big picture and consider secret programs that they ran to counter US programs like [Operation Paperclip](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Operation_Paperclip).  
Do you agree that power corrupts?  The people in charge of these organizations are not elected officials.   Imagine that they had this technology 50 years ago.  You don't think mlk wouldn't have been dealt with much sooner?  He was certainly "anti government" (jim crow).   By handing over all the privacy, you're saying "America is perfect, and will never need another social revolution of any kind that the current government didn't approve of".     And your not just saying that about THIS government, but ALL future governments.  Because this privacy will NEVER be returned once relinquished.    Are you 100% sure that there will never need to be another revolution of any kind for the indefinite future?  Because without privacy, one wouldn't be possible.
Microsoft are scum. Use GNU and store data on a home server, which is laughably cheap to build now. I also recommend Plex, as a tool for serving data (preferably illegally obtained via torrent) to mobile devices. Fuck this cloud shit, and the shitbags that sell media.
DMT showed me enough. 
They censor one side of the study, they know they can't argue against it, so they just censor it
These beings who hold office are dark as hell, It's  almost as if they feed off of the misery of these people. 
and what defines "something to hide"? 
Just because we know what evil, worthless fucks the Israelis are, don't ever fall into the trap of thinking the Arabs are the good guys. There are no good guys in the Middle East. Both Israelis and Saudis are murdering bastards.
Where did I say or even imply that?
I want to sit back with some popcorn and count the whites getting out of Baltimore with their small businesses and their families and their money.  You blacks wanted an all-black city? Well, you got your wish. Now you just enjoy the hell out of it, you hear?
Authority Schmauthority. They've been doing it for LONG before they had permission. I don't see why they'd stop just because they lose it.
Generally that means shill. In this case it means justifiable fear.
Your murderers will pay one way or another everyone bites the dust but their deaths will probably be slow and painful. Karma never rests.
Was he a former CIA dude or NSA?  http://www.tweaktown.com/news/45503/woz-described-edward-snowden-a-hero-me/index.html
The way I like to explain to people it this. If you were to take a shit in a busy public bathroom, would you close and lock the stall door?  Shittings not illegal and everybody does it. You literally have nothing to hide, but most will still close the door.
You can hear the overt implied racism just drip of the article. 
How are you going to reach out to them if media is controlled?  Alt media is already discounted by the average American, especially 'tard sites like InfoLiars.com and Veterans30%IsLiesToday.com
No, its more like a blatantly obvious attempt to distract from the fact that US citizens are being hit with 90% US sponsored propaganda and 10% Russian propaganda.  On the other hand *Russian* citizens are being hit with 90% Russian sponsored propaganda and 10% US sponsored propaganda.  But as we are currently on a US-based website, pointing at the Russian troll armies seems silly when the real fight (from this side of the fence) should be against the US troll armies.
This is why I avoid vaccines. 
Coming from a previous job in the industrial HVAC industry, this kind of stuff happens all the time in abandoned buildings. It has nothing to do with actually removing the WHOLE unit, but more to do with removing what's inside. The compressors, refrigerant lines, coils, etc. aren't that heavy by themselves, and entire roofs with ten or more 15-25 ton RTUs could be scavenged in 1 night.   More often than not, it's actually local HVAC technicians who have been on the roof before performing maintenance who are the ones doing the stealing. So, even though some of your points are correct, it's very likely that the razor wire could very well be there to protect the roof. They could have just removed the ladder(s) that get you up there instead though.
Of course.  If you're implying that The Spirit Science has all the answers, though, I'm going tell you that I'm not interested in their half-baked ideas. I read books and I'm over 22 years age.
It's illegal to question that, so I don't.
[deleted]
Fuck Windows.  Use Linux.   1. [Select which distro](http://www.linuxlinks.com/Distributions/) is right for you.  If you're new to Linux I would suggest [Elementary](http://elementary.io/), [Mint](http://www.linuxmint.com/download.php), or [Ubuntu](http://www.ubuntu.com/download).  I personally like Ubuntu for everyday use and Kali for technical use.  Follow the links and download the iso file of your chosen version. 2. Get a thumb drive, and plug it in.  I would suggest 4gb or higher. 3. Download either: A. [Universal USB Installer](http://www.pendrivelinux.com/universal-usb-installer-easy-as-1-2-3/) (single boot) or B. [YUMI](http://www.pendrivelinux.com/yumi-multiboot-usb-creator/) (multiboot).  I prefer YUMI. 4. After downloading, execute UUI or YUMI and follow the instructions. 5. When YUMI or UUI completes restart your computer and enter bios.  Typically hitting the f2 or delete key on startup should get you there.  If that doesn't work check online for your specific computer. 6. Navigate to boot and set the USB drive as the top selection on the list. 7. Press f10 and then enter.  This should save the settings and restart the computer.    If you did everything correctly your Linux disrto should begin to load.  Test out the OS on the live USB drive before installing.  When you are satisfied, click the install link on the desktop and follow the instructions.  Welcome to the world of Linux.
Looks like they're wrapping it up and bringing it home. I wouldn't be surprised if in a few years the government does to the Muslims what it did to the Japanese in WW2.  Edit: Stop downvoting me you dicks. And try to converse with me.
Conflict of interests. The Marxists need the borders open. The Neo-Cons want to wage war against terror and need the theatre of constant threat. 
If you didn't pay for Univeristy (or better said, it is taxpayer funded) then there is not really a correlation to this situation is there...
how do you know they were guilty??
It's supposed to be Trotsky. 
Such irony
As a true revolutionary, Rand Paul revolts against  his own  policies every other day.  
Chomsky describes a result of what happens when you incur large debts for no gain but doesn't explain why college is expensive. College is expensive because the federal government gaurantees student loans and makes them widely available regardless of the probability to repay the loan. 200k to study underwater basket weaving? No problem says the federal government. This cheap access to credit has allowed colleges to increase tuition at a ridiculous rate. Take away government guaranteed student loans and the price of tuition drops through the floor. 
Come on, you know the entire soundtrack will be removed.  So 70 minutes of black screen, zero sound, with the word REDACTED in white text across the screen.
If we was wrong, would anyone today recognize it? Slow degradation...elimination of sovreignty...sounds pretty accurate to me.  Does anyone know where to find the 1947 publication he is referring to that basically admits the plan?  eDIT: Found some of it http://www.endofinnocence.com/2013/05/the-future-of-socialism-by-arthur-m.html  
I understand that each sub has their own rules and the interpretation is left up to the mods.  This is a problem because it makes the poster think that they are posting while secretly censoring them based on their message, while also giving no justification or reason, even after asking a mod.   If you don't see a problem with that I dont know why you're on this sub. 
They're gonna stop the thing they said didn't exist.  Sure. 
You wouldn't call vaccines autism shots and expect people to take you seriously.
[deleted]
The regulations were fine until Bill Clinton personally put pen to paper in 2000 and repealled the very regulations that directly made the crash of 2008 possible.  - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Commodity_Futures_Modernization_Act_of_2000  - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Glass%E2%80%93Steagall_Legislation  It took less than 8 years to burn down the system once the above gutted the key regulations in the 1933 Banking Act that protected the U.S. Financial System from 1933-2000.
&gt; Nonsense !  Was this a title for the following 3 sentences?  .   I dont need Jesus to believe in freedom, the birds above are just as convincing.
[deleted]
Not when I just made it up. meep meepb:P:P:P:P:P:P:Pvroooshh
Excellent. The more people who advocate for transparency, the harder it gets for them to ignore us. 
You're welcome thanks for taking part
Oy Gevalt
Texas here. Lived here my whole life and have always enjoyed watching storms. I have NEVER seen lightning as frequent or powerful as I have these past few months. 
No. Regulators will be bought. What we should do is let the banks fail. Capitalism cannot be without risk. Your definition of capitalism suits your ideology; your argument. it is this narrow definition that is often spouted by shameless socialists that bring weak arguments.
These posts are worthless and getting duplicated in the main queue. Stop up-voting this partisan crap people, nobody cares what rand paul is doing, its just another politician trying to ride on the popularity of the negative press of the patriot act.
So come on down to Speaker City! We sell guns now too! 
Why did they go after this woman?  I'm sure there are countless "bad" ones not complying with state law.  I have no idea why you would go after this woman.
I think you forgot to click on the links, or you may have had your eyes closed. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'd much rather see him get 5 billion than israel.  he's one of the few people on the planet pushing the envelope of what's possible 
Its a complex issue with a lot of potential profit and power plays to be made by economic, governmental, and military interests.  Disaster capitalists (thieving relief/aid groups) , weather derivatives (Enron legacy, betting on the weather), consolidation of the food and water supply in corporate hands (and not the farmers of quality food in CA) to name but a few. The now infamous high pressure ridge over CA could be in place by ionospheric heaters surrounding the sierras. There have been a few posts about this recently on Geoengineeringwatch dot org that can explain better than I can here.  The haarp report on youtube is great for providing weather data analysis.  Also the Corbett report has some interesting  segments on geoengineering.
It gets better. The part of the pentagon that got hit was housing the people who were investigating the missing money.  You really couldn't make this shit up. If you did, your reviews would be so terrible because it's all just too convenient, and nobody would find it believable.   
And somehow people don't think this is a severe problem. 
&gt; They are spending $50+ million a year against labeling   I didn't know this. It is possible that it's worth 50mil to get a largely misinformed public from blacklisting their product. Here's an example  "Aspartame is one of the most studied food additives in the world. It has been a common food additive for over 30 years, and there is a strong consensus among scientists and regulatory agencies that it is completely safe."  Pepsi removed this chemical because an ignorant public thought it was unhealthy. Chipotle removed GMOs from their ingredients and cited this:  " pseudoscientific fears of GMOs as their justification. (But that’s another story.)"  Now if there is scientific reasons backing this up why wouldn't they say it? Would be great PR removing harmful ingredients.  Full article:  https://www.sciencebasedmedicine.org/pepsi-removing-aspartame/  Thoughts?   
Good. 
I dont think any normal person wants conflict.  It's only those with something to gain that actually cause/want these things to happen. 
B-b-but they're *heroes*! Don't you have any respect for your *heroes*? I bet you hate the troops too. 
That might be the why but the how is all because of government backed loans.  Student loans are the only loans that you can't bankrupt out of and the government are damn good at keeping track of you and making sure you pay it off for as long as it takes.  With guaranteed money coming through schools there is only incentive to out compete other schools for all that fat cash so they expand to compete.  It gets more expensive because of guaranteed money.  If the government couldn't do such a thing, schools would close and prices would eventually correct themselves to market prices.
You're right.  Experiments that you can perform yourself are the ultimate proof.  You only get so far debating on the internet and watching videos.  Here is a pretty good video of a cam on a balloon:  https://youtu.be/pnzUgKZ8m2k
Just watched the video, wow. Powerful stuff man. Thanks for sharing .
I'd disagree, rather it was World War 2 that ended the British Empire. The Empire disappeared with colonies becoming nations and "the crown jewel of the empire" India gaining full independence. Not to mention the war drained the British treasury. I'm on mobile so I'll have to look it up later but Churchill told the British treasury "damn the cost we need to win the war." And while they won, the Empire the British fought to preserve disappeared soon after. Personally, the Suez Crisis was just the nail in the coffin for British prestige.  Edit: And I agree Gallipoli was a huge waste of time, resources, and men for the Entente, and only gave the Ottomans a "chance to tweak the lion's tail."
[deleted]
LOL
You get radiation from the scanner at the airport, that's more than you're going to get from anything that you are allowed to buy, genetically modified or not.   Banana's are a single strain, that's the whole idea. Banana's are a genetically modified fruit.  And I eat them every day. But they are all clones. They are one type of one kind of banana. And if a disease hits them, yes they will all be wiped out.  But the bigger picture is not all GMO is bad. It's "Genetically Modified Organism", and that's too broad.   To the point about diversity, changing a gene doesn't have to mean ending diversity, i.e. a tomato that is cold resistant.  I don't think you have to worry about that being the only type of tomato on the market, but it's still genetically modified. And we'd all do well by having tomatoes that stood a frost better.   Fun Banana fact: the banana flavor you taste in candy is different than the banana you buy from the market.  There was a mass extinction when a disease hit, and thanks to a lack of diversity we're eating a less tasty banana today. Or more tasty. The main part of the argument's the stuff about GMO's and such. 
Another news article     Maine Tribes Withdraw Legislative Reps in Historic Break with State  http://indiancountrytodaymedianetwork.com/2015/06/01/maine-tribes-withdraw-legislative-reps-historic-break-state-16055
Don't attribute to malice what can be explained by stupidity. This "info"graphic is incredibly dumb. 
that is pretty crazy...
Yes, but traitors and degenerates are no longer considered human and part of your group to any normal human.
He is half Arab though, no joke
^but he's right 
Sure, I've gone full retard. Whatever floats your boat and gets you to link me to those threads that the OP is referencing so you can clear your name and prove to me that you didn't make the claim I'm *claiming* (heh) you did.
You are surprised that something stupid with no real supporting evidence is upvoted on this sub? Seriously? 
[deleted]
Yes. Both of my grandfathers travelled to Antarctica, one of them was one of the engineers who built the Polish Antarctic Base, the other was a chief meteorologist during that time. If there was anything "fishy" going on there, they would have known.  You are free to believe in what you want, I can only offer you compassion.
Have you looked into NASA?  Did you know that all astronauts are masons (the ones that aren't happen to blow up on the launch pad)?    If you are willing to spend the time, there is a lot to look at in this area.  Try googling "photo of earth".  What do you get for results?  Ignore for a moment that you can't find any actual photos and you just see a lot of the same images over and over.  Just consider the shape that you are shown.  Now listen to Neil Degrasse Tyson (who is also a mason) describe the shape of the earth: https://youtu.be/SoCKapivHGM  There is a problematic contradiction there.  He says that below the equator there is a bump out larger than mount everest.  That is, it should be wider below the equator, than at it.  This is a fairly obvious contradiction.  It should be enough to get you interested in looking for more.  To dismiss these topics without investigating them is a shame.  This video can be a start, but there is lots more:  https://youtu.be/5e-RnKAN9qY  &gt; Also the flat earth theory is the absolute worst conspiracy theory I have ever had the displeasure of reading about.  Why do you say this?  Also, what did you read?  There is a huge amount of disinfo on this topic.
[deleted]
&gt; You were a teen after curfew  Jesus christ, that is some orwellian shit. Why shouldn't people be allowed out late at night.   
 NIST claims that WTC 1&amp;2 collapsed due to jet fueled fires (just normal offices fires for WTC7) which were not hot enough to produce molten steel or iron, but also claim that if there had been molten steel or iron in the debris afterwards, it would have been irrelevant to the cause of the collapses. The evidence of molten steel or iron cannot be called “irrelevant,” given the fact that the building fires, as NIST pointed out, cannot explain it.  -----------  **Physical Evidence**  -----  * [Early in 2002, Barnett and two WPI colleagues published an analysis of a section of steel from one of the Twin Towers, along with sections from WTC 7, as an appendix to FEMA’s 2002 World Trade Center Building Performance Study](http://www.fema.gov/pdf/library/fema403_apc.pdf) * [Their discoveries were also reported in a WPI article entitled “The ‘Deep Mystery’ of Melted Steel,” which said:](http://www.wpi.edu/News/Transformations/2002Spring/steel.html)  &gt; Steel – which has a melting point of 2,800 degrees Fahrenheit – may weaken and bend, but does not melt during an ordinary office fire. Yet metallurgical studies on WTC steel brought back to WPI reveal that a novel phenomenon – called a eutectic reaction – occurred at the surface, causing intergranular melting capable of turning a solid steel girder into Swiss cheese.  * [Stating that the New York Times called these findings “perhaps the deepest mystery uncovered in the investigation,” the article added:](http://www.wpi.edu/News/Transformations/2002Spring/steel.html)  &gt;A one-inch column has been reduced to half-inch thickness. Its edges – which are curled like a paper scroll – have been thinned to almost razor sharpness. Gaping holes – some larger than a silver dollar – let light shine through a formerly solid steel flange. This Swiss cheese appearance shocked all of the fire-wise professors, who expected to see distortion and bending – but not holes.  * [In May 2004, the RJ Lee Group issued a report, entitled “WTC Dust Signature,” at the request of the Deutsche Bank, in order to prove \(to its insurance company\) that the building was “pervasively contaminated with WTC Dust](http://web.archive.org/web/20131204202627/http://www.ae911truth.org/documents/WTCDustSignature_ExpertReport.051304.1646.mp_.pdf) The report listed five elements in this signature, one of which was: “Spherical iron and spherical or vesicular silicate particles that result from exposure to high temperature  * [In 2005, the United States Geological Survey \(USGS\) published a report entitled “Particle Atlas of World Trade Center Dust,” which was intended to aid the “identification of WTC dust components.” Among the components, it reported, were “metal or metal oxides” (which could not be distinguished by the USGS’s methods). “The primary metal and metal-oxide phases in WTC dust,” the report said, “are Fe-rich \[iron-rich\] and Zn-rich [zinc-rich] particles](http://pubs.usgs.gov/of/2005/1165/508OF05-1165.html) * [Extremely high temperatures during the World Trade Center destruction](http://journalof911studies.com/articles/WTCHighTemp2.pdf)  * [Journal of the American Society of Safety Engineers](http://911research.wtc7.net/cache/wtc/analysis/asse_groundzero1.htm) &gt;The debris pile at Ground Zero was always tremendously hot. Thermal measurements taken by helicopter each day showed underground temperatures ranging from 400ºF to more than 2,800ºF * [Sources related to exceptionally high temperatures, and/or to persistent heat at Ground Zero](http://911research.wtc7.net/papers/dreger/GroundZeroHeat2008_07_10.pdf)  * FEMA documents in their [Appendix C of its May 2002 WTC Building Performance Assessment Team study](http://www.fema.gov/media-library-data/20130726-1512-20490-8452/403_apc.pdf), for sample 1, “evidence of a severe high temperature corrosion attack on the steel, including oxidation and sulfidation with subsequent intergranular melting.” A “sulfur-rich liquid” containing “primarily iron, oxygen, and sulfur” “penetrated” into the steel.   -----  **Testimonial Evidence**  -----  **Testimony from Firefighters:**  * [New York Fire Department Captain Philip Ruvolo said: “You’d get down below and you’d see molten steel, molten steel, running down the channel rails, like you’re in a foundry, like lava.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uQyIN6OTMyY) * [Joe O’Toole, a Bronx firefighter who worked on the rescue and cleanup efforts, reported that one beam lifted from deep below the surface months later, in February 2002, “was dripping from the molten steel.”](http://fallenbrothers.com/community/showthread.php?2062-Recovery-worker-reflects-on-months-spent-at-Ground-Zero&amp;p=2948) * [New York firefighters recalled in the documentary film Collateral Damages, “heat so intense they encountered rivers of molten steel.”](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3_G21B2qiQM)  -----  **Testimony from Other Professionals:**  -----  * [Leslie Robertson, a member of the engineering firm that designed the World Trade Center, said 21 days after the attack: “When we were down at the B1 level, one of the firefighters said, ‘I think you’d be interested in this,’ and they pulled up a big block of concrete and there was a, like a little river of steel, flowing.”](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rjmHqES_lto&amp;t=40s) * [Ron Burger, a public health advisor at the National Center for Environmental Health who arrived at Ground Zero September 12, 2001, said: “Feeling the heat, seeing the molten steel, the layers upon layers of ash, like lava, it reminded me of Mt. St. Helen’s and the thousands who fled that disaster.”](http://web.archive.org/web/20060909104247/http://www.seau.org/SEAUNews-2001-10.pdf) * [In late fall 2001, Dr. Alison Geyh of the Johns Hopkins School of Public Health reported: “Fires are still actively burning and the smoke is very intense. In some pockets now being uncovered, they are finding molten steel.”](http://www.jhsph.edu/Publications/Special/Welch.htm) * [Joe Allbaugh, the Director of FEMA, said in an October 2001 interview on CBS: “It’s just too hot for rescuers to get into \[some\] areas. So we do not know yet what’s in those areas, other than very hot, molten material.”](http://web.archive.org/web/20130730103131/http://911encyclopedia.com/wiki/index.php/Publication:20121014014812) * Dr. Keith Eaton reported in Structural Engineer: “They showed us many fascinating slides . . . ranging from molten metal which was still red hot weeks after the event, to 4-inch thick steel plates sheared and bent in the disaster.” * [Don Carson, a hazardous materials expert from the National Operating Engineers Union, said six weeks after 9/11: “There are pieces of steel being pulled out from as far as six stories underground that are still cherry red.”](http://web.archive.org/web/20060818074723/http:/pqasb.pqarchiver.com/nydailynews/87451160.html?did=87451160&amp;FMT=ABS&amp;FMTS=FT&amp;date=Nov+1,+2001&amp;author=GREG+GITTRICH+DAILY+NEWS+STAFF+WRITER&amp;pub=New+York+Daily+News&amp;desc=FIRE+MAY+SMOLDER+FOR+MONTHS) * [OSHA respond to the underground fires and potential steam explosions](http://imgur.com/CCqRzAo)     &gt; Underground fires burned at temperatures up to 2,000 degrees. As the huge cranes pulled steel beams from the pile, safety experts worried about the effects of the extreme heat on the crane rigging and the hazards of contact with the hot steel. And they were concerned that applying water to cool the steel could cause a steam explosion that would propel nearby objects with deadly force. Special expertise was needed. **OSHA called in Mohammad Ayub and Scott Jin, structural engineers from its national office, to assess the situation. They recommended a special handling procedure, including the use of specialized rigging and instruments.**  -----  **Testimony from Other Credible Witnesses:**  -----  * [Greg Fuchek, vice president of a company that supplied computer equipment used to identify human remains, reported that “sometimes when a worker would pull a steel beam from the wreckage, the end of the beam would be dripping molten steel.”](http://gcn.com/articles/2002/09/09/handheld-app-eased-recovery-tasks.aspx) * [Sarah Atlas, of New Jersey’s Task Force One Urban Search and Rescue, arrived at Ground Zero on September 11 and reported that “fires burned and molten steel flowed in the pile of ruins still settling beneath her feet.”](http://www.sas.upenn.edu/sasalum/newsltr/summer2002/k911.html) * Tom Arterburn, writing in Waste Age, reported that the New York Department of Sanitation removed “everything from molten steel beams to human remains  -----  **Videos**  ---------  [WTC2 South Tower, Molten Metal pouring out the North-East Corner](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OmuzyWC60eE)   [Pouring molten aluminum into a pool](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JEEOkMW1CYI)  [Molten aluminum into cold water](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2qJzDYsQfck)   [Evidence of fused molten metal and concrete]( https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=1WWAnCd_6lg) of extreme heat.  --------  The fact that the rubble contained steel or iron that had been melted shows that the buildings were destroyed by something other than fire and airplane impact.  When all of this physical evidence is combined with the testimony about explosions from many types of professionals, the claim that the Twin Towers were brought down by nothing other than the airplane impacts and resulting fires is simply not credible
If you were a doctor, you'd have a licence to give medical advice. But you don't, so...don't. 
Well they've helped me out alot....
Maybe they are looking for the Clinton Cash!
[deleted]
It reduces fertility rates, that's the real reason for the HPV jab, to bring the population down
I've listened to him for years. He's a fascinating character. Here are a few things I've noted about Alex:  * He appears to suffer from attention defecit disorder. Seldom is he able to finish a complete sentence, or a complete thought. His mind jumps around from one topic to the next in mid-sentence.  * He tends to make connections between topics in his own mind that don't exist in the real world. For example, he'll be talking about fluoride in the water, and then will jump to GMO crops, as if there is some connection. But the only link is the over-arching meta conspiracy theory in the mind of Jones himself.  * He's very insecure about his manhood. Almost every show, he boasts about how tough he is, and how he would physically beat down anyone who tried to mess with him, all the while saying, "I'm not bragging about how tough I am." But that's exactly what he is doing, over and over, on every show.  * He's emotionally immature. He's really a young boy in a man's body.  * He never really says anything of any substance, except when he's reading some article he plucked off a legitimate news service or outlet.  * We never get to know who, exactly, the "globalists" are or what they are doing. According to Jones they are responsible for all our ills, but exactly in what way is not made explicit.  * Jones never criticizes Jewish power in America. He almost never has a critical word to say about Israel, and when he does criticize Israel, it's some throwaway line making a vague general criticism, such as, "I'm not saying Israel doesn't do bad things as well. They are guilty along with everyone else." That kind of thing. But he always quickly heaps more criticism on somebody else.  * He says nothing at all about Jewish control over the US mass media. To listen to Jones, it might as well not exist.  * Every show is the same exact thing -- a vague overview of topics, with Jones bouncing from one to the other like a hyperactive rubber ball. No focus, no in-depth analysis, and never any solutions.  * When Jones makes predictions, he is almost always wrong. Even so, he will claim that his false predictions were correct. He likes to backpedal and revise and edit what he actually said to make himself sound more accurate than he was.  * Every show is a fear fest. Danger, danger, danger, fear, fear, fear. This is done to sell his "survival" products.  * His staff are yes-men and yes-women. If they were not, they would be fired. Jones runs a tight ship.  * He never allows a phone caller the chance to make a complete argument, and he never engages in a real discussion with anyone who disagrees with him.
I'm pretty sure you put too much credence into what twsmith is sayig.
&gt;You aren't too bright are you?  Hey, I elaborated and explained my position and posted a video that contradicts fly over and you reply and just insult me and provide zero evidence and just keep repeating "The FDR shows it". Give me a source or some proof maybe instead of just relying on the "you're not smart" retorts.  &gt; It isn't  a theory, it is what the FDR shows.  So you've reviewed the data yourself? Or are you taking the word of a conspiracy site that says that's what the FDR showed? Did they review it first hand then? Because that's not what anyone says what the FDR shows except conspiracy theorists who have never gotten to review the data themselves.  So, tell me, where does that FDR data that shows a flyover come from. Link me a source of someone who says that's what it's showed that has reviewed the FDR data themselves. The beauty of the conspiracy world is it's easy to just make stuff up, make statements, and have people believe it simply because it's contradictory to what anything official says. Doesn't mean what is official is right either, but that doesn't mean that the opposite of official is automatically true either.  
Blatt was hired by the Cavs toward the end of June in 2014. They had been scouting him closely since March, if not earlier. There were a lot of rumbles about it since they knew they were going to fired Mike Brown at that point. In fact he was also contacted by the Warriors over the same time frame.  The man was widely considered to be one of the 3 best coaches not in the NBA prior to coming over and had connections with many foreign players in NBA due to his work with the Russian Olympic team. Just because Blatt wasn't in the NBA does not mean he wasn't associated it with it.    Trying to force your narrative down the throat of people who follow basketball at all levels is a terrible idea because it's just not true. That team Blatt was coaching did something historic in regards to Euro B-Ball by winning all 4 major titles. This would have always been big news due to the nature the basketball community, team did not matter. If it was CSKA or Real Madrid that accomplished the feat similar articles would have been written.
Shills only fan the flames of what they call the "giggle factor" in the science community. The giggle factor seems to be a near universal reaction to anything that attempts to amend or contradict established norms. Black Holes, Terrestrial asteroid strikes, even the ascent of man was laughed at and mocked by most in the science community over the years. And these are are educated, supposedly enlightened people.  Think how easy Joe Sixpack must be to lure into a good laugh at the expense of the truth. 
[deleted]
When more than half the country is on these medications it's easy to relate them to killing.   I would start with the Antidepressants first.. Opiates and other drugs have been around a long long time.. and Murder and or homicidal rage was not part of their listed side effects.. Now SSRI and SNRI happen to have those "side effects" listed as Possible..  I understand what "Pain" meds they are talking about..   things like Lyrica. Neurontin and of course their favorite new pill for wide spread pain..  Cymbalta..   Opiates are not as bad as everyone would have you believe when compared to SNRI drugs.  
It's weird that anybody would downvote this. It's a link to the announcement of the closing. 
Is there really a point to this sub just being an echo chamber? Don't we want dissenting viewpoints?  Disagreement allows us to strengthen our position and dig for more evidence.  Yes I'm sure there is vote manipulation going on but not all.  The reason it doesn't happen in some other subs like /r/woodworking is because they are not posting anything controversial.  I imagine if someone said **SPRUCE IS THE WORST WOOD EVER**, there would be comments disagreeing with that near the top. 
They don't want us to make informed choices, they know if we do we'll all be anti-vaxxers  http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/389y70/forced_vaccination_vs_rape/
I work with satellites on a daily basis.  I need to know where they are located and how to aim antennas at them.  Stop trolling.  
No, not at all. Yet, suicidal thoughts are a disturbingly common side effect anti-depressants. This irony doesn't instill confidence in psychiatric medicine.
Conspiracy theorists, right again......drinks redemption juice while tipping cowboy hat
&gt;To sum up: Soros is basically lobbying on behalf of Ukraine, pushing for cash and guns, to oppose Putin in every way possible.  &gt;If genuine, and based on their meta data, they appear to be just that, these lettes show how Soros is trying to weasel around the Minsk agreements (for instance, how to train Ukrainian soldiers without having a visible NATO presence in Ukraine). The documents link up Nuland with Soros, and clears up who is truly pulling the strings of the US State Department.  &gt;Finally, while the documents don't mention what Soros has in store for Ukraine, one can use their imagination.   
Dick Cheney has been getting this treatment for years.
&gt; Have you not been in a plane cruising at 35k altitude and been able to see the actual curvature of the earth?  Do you really think that the view through a curved window flush with a round fuselage wouldn't introduce curvature? If there was so much curvature so easy to observe, surely you could produce examples that aren't with a fish-eye lense, right?  [Flat horizon is flat](https://imgur.com/CSo0Fnm) wherever you go.
/r/iamverysmart
Please educate us: what exact biological process requires fluorine? Thanks professor.
The entire 9/11 commission report was a lie, a cover up, a fraud. The "classified" pages will be more of the same ol' garbage and something that we've all learned about over the last 14 years. There really aren't any secrets left after all this time. So prepare for a lot of nothing when they finally do release the "secret pages" ...but do prepare for the big media show, that should provide for a few laughs.
The moon landings were a hoax as all the material NASA puts out is to create the heliocentric mythology. I've been to the beach and even spent years out to sea, where the horizon is completely flat in every direction.  Or do you have some curved water to show me?
No.  Fuck you shill.  Nobody believes your sob story.  Straight out of the fucking NSA/GCHQ playbook.
So is it in bile? Please festoon me with your luminosity. Even a lowly jackass gets a carrot. Would all life cease if we didn't have serum fluoride? Don't do it for me, do it for the little people.
&gt; When you navigate at sea by Polaris, the pole star, which you can see anywhere north of 23.5 latitude, you always end up in the Arctic, regardless of where you start. If the Earth were a sphere this would be impossible.  Polaris is hundreds of light years away, there is no parallax going on here, no matter how far away from Earth you would be within the Solar System, it would always appear to be in that direction.
You're a fucking idiot.
Who is "all you"?
[deleted]
What about having CLEAN FUCKING WATER THAT ISNT FLAMMABLE?   Maybe they don't like clean water ?   And fracking affects well water also morons , so don't gimme shit like "I don't drink city water blah blah blah". 
I would not be surprised. The RCMP in Northern BC have a long history of deeply questionable actions.  Y'know, the "suspect shot himself in the back of the head with officer's gun" sort of things.
You are not a scientist. This is such a stupid comment its untrue. Everything is full of chemicals. Go back to school.
&gt;Jacobs, who serves on task forces for the World Health Organization, the American Heart Association, and the Society of Thoracic Surgeons, recommended that St. Mary's not perform any heart surgeries on babies under 6 months of age. For older babies and children, he said the hospital should not perform complex procedures -- those that fall into categories four and five on the scale devised by the Society of Thoracic Surgeons.  &gt;Just 11 days after the state sent these recommendations to the hospital, Black operated on Jashnide Desamours, not yet 3 weeks old. The surgery to fix her broken aortic arch was complex, a category four out of five on the Society of Thoracic Surgeons' scale.  &gt;"The night of the surgery, she coded," Jashnide's mother, Judelande Damas remembers. Her baby was in cardiac arrest.
&gt; So, that's the speed at which neutrons vibrate under normal circumstances  Not true at all.  Why do you assume I've made some sort of amateur mistake?  Check yourself.  &gt; or when they have been specifically slowed down to aid controlled nuclear reactions.  Only sort of true.  &gt; But when released in an uncontrolled fission reaction, as in a bomb, they go a significant fraction of the speed of light   That's not correct, either.  When released from a fission, they travel at the speeds you cite (which aren't really that close to the speed of light, but for the purposes of diagnosing the film, might as well be).  The neutrons released from a nuclear explosion have been moderated by the device.  Without getting too far into it, they are more useful that way.  3km/sec is a good figure to use for them.     
&gt;I knew one of you chimps would strawman it.  By strawman you mean quote you directly, right?   You got your facts wrong bozo. Own it.   &gt;34mins is a lifetime for the worlds biggest military machine. 4mins, even 15mins i could believe but no, it's bullshit, sorry.  Find me a single instance prior to 9/11 of the military responding to a hijacked airplane over US soil that fast. 
Adding a 2005 example to the list.  I remembered a similar story appearing in a nearby town's newspaper. In 2005 a "terrorist cell" was "broken up" in Lodi, CA. The local paper there did a story on a mysterious plane that was circling the city. Many people thought it coincided with the FBI investigation. The article actually has information as to the equipment possibly used. Cessna 182's being recommended and in use in the recent occurrences.  [link](http://www.lodinews.com/news/article_61ce38da-1835-5c97-a11b-896ed8205a09.html)   
What the fuck are you even talking about? You need professional help, and lots of it.   Have you even seen a dog before? They're friendlier than most people as long as you're friendly to them. Where the fuck did you get me beating my dog from? Seriously man, what the hell is wrong with you? Is someone bullying you at school?
Question: If a muslim calls a jewish man names, is he than regarded as a anti-semite ?   Schoolbook answer: YES  Why ? : just... because...  Real answer: NO! Arabic and Hebrew Languages are BOTH semitic!!  Study, Observe, and Learn:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Semitic_languages  The ones who dont speak a semetic language are a anti-semite (or non-semite) but from now on we will call anyone who is a racist and who speaks a semitic language a anti-sanskrite mkay ?  This whole calling names is BS.
As a Jew, I really can't wait.  I'm going to make you mow the lawn so much.
No sir, it is not real. It's real in the sense that it was created by the CIA to be the boogie man the American public is scared of. But in the sense you're thinking of, a terrorist group, no, it is not real.  
This isn't a conspiracy...  Well the story itself isn't, but the fact that it relates to Israel is.  With such censorship of Israeli criticism around reddit, it's almost as if Pao &amp; company are conspiring to keep anti-Israel chatter to a minimum.  So so sad.
[deleted]
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=WpSqADAur-w
Huge massive pile of bullshit.
[deleted]
The empathy I possess is almost excessive. I like this concept you're referring to, and I've been trying to explain it to people for a long time.   I'm referring to your skepticism of my opinions and what I'm doing to help.
I think it's pretty reasonable to expect that a person who is willing to commit murder has serious mental and/or physical pain. Pain that they would attempt to treat with drugs prescribed, over the counter, or illictly.
Its already on /r/undelete. Fucking bastards. There is a new thread rising with a link to csmonitor about it, though right now only with 21 votes.   Not that this is *news*, but nonetheless sad.
Yeah I agree.
My water still just cost $200. My first one cost $100. Course it doesn't help get it out of the water you use for showering and back in the 30s they believed that suppressed thyroid function as well. I hope they were wrong. But most of the commercial filtering systems specifically don't remove fluoride.   Fluoride has also been linked to kidney damage and headaches.
False choice. It's neither. It's a book of legal discussion.
also connected to the bushes via carlyle.. you cant make this shit up
https://np.reddit.com/r/undelete/comments/38a73p/rnews_fbi_spy_planes_5000_points_removed_at_about/?sort=hot  BTW excellent discussion there on the subject 
Sigh...  I see your point, and I agree that the time has come to call out this problem and confront it. So, I will do my best to speak up and dispel what you may call "my silent consent".   Now then, you can help by stopping to perpetuate the nonsensical stereotype that every single poster here is part of the problem, because you are talking to someone who is trying to help.   So why is it exactly that you aren't engaged in this kind of behavior in the hundreds of other subs that are racist by their **very existence**? Some kind of special thing happening here that isn't directly on the tin in **many** other subreddits as opposed to being just the results of a small group of SS?   So why aren't you directing this at **OVERTLY RACIST SUBS?** 
interesting. . . this is new info (to me, anyway)
Dick *War Criminal* Cheney.   Just call him what he is, works for me!
That's not what the authoritative-sounding people I quoted on my web page are saying.  They are saying major technical issues, and just writing the rules could take a decade or more.
The Isis threat provides excellent cover for Mossad to slip in and assassinate Hamas leadership.
Copernicus was. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nicolaus_Copernicus
Don't trust anything but your logic
[deleted]
We, the citizens of this country and the world, will change it in just a few years.  Brace yourselves.
[deleted]
Rule 10. No personal attacks. Removed.
Neither of those would be truthful, so no.
First line of the article:  &gt; American Ford Motor company used forced labour from Auschwitz concentration camp during the Second World War.  Here Nazi Germany bestows on Ford the [Grand Cross of the German Eagle](http://www.orange-papers.org/orange-Ford-medal2.png) for his support for the war effort.  &gt; Beginning in 1940, with the requisitioning of between 100 and 200 French POWs to work as slave laborers, Ford-Werke contravened Article 31 of the 1929 Geneva Convention. At that time, which was before the U.S. entered the war and still had full diplomatic relations with Nazi Germany, Ford-Werke was under the control of the Ford Motor Company. The number of slave laborers grew as the war expanded although Wallace made it clear that companies in Germany were not required by the Nazi authorities to use slave laborers.  &gt; Ford is the only American mentioned in Mein Kampf. Adolf Hitler wrote, "only a single great man, Ford, [who], to [the Jews'] fury, still maintains full independence...[from] [the controlling masters of the producers in a nation of one hundred and twenty millions."](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Henry_Ford#The_coming_of_World_War_II_and_Ford.27s_mental_collapse)
nytimes must be getting desperate to let the interns write such blatant propaganda...and whales speak French under the sea!. 
[deleted]
You don't have to stick an active warhead in a missile, they even use concrete as payload.
Me again? I wasn't aware I've made many comments regarding this before. As I've said before in the thread; I'm a skeptic of the missile theory, but given enough evidence I'm open to it, and there has been some pretty good evidence posted here, I will admit. Alot of the points you've posted do make sense.
[This](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GLvXaclRlHs) clip includes the video and doesn't have the sensationalist bs at the beginning. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
And these tactics are used namely by who we refer to as shills, nowadays I would say there are less of actual hired shills and more into the voluntary misinformation however it appears as paid shills are also prevalent especially in regards to pharma and aeresol-spraying("chemtrails") to name a few, examples of voluntary are JIDF, Megafon, et cetera they all use these tactics.
Quality post.
i guess
You're scratching at the walls of the matrix.
This is Epic! Good work!
Thanks for coming here, it makes all you FLAT EARTH DISINFO agents easier to RES tag :)
Those names on the last one you linked \^\^  Harry Hoe, John Doe and Paula Poe
*NSA Credibility sinks further*  Watson, what have you done?
ive personally seen this same people all over the web lol - they are stock photos for web design templates
Since the earth does not rotate I am calling BS. When the Zetans can tell the truth maybe I'll listen but not until then.
I can't say how postimg works, but wouldn't something like Imgur's compression screw with this? Unless they had the raw picture from the camera, I would imagine it would be hard to do. I don't actually know shit though, just a thought.
Either these are all NSA fronts... or NSA just hired cheap labor.
[You're welcome](http://media.giphy.com/media/WzFASkjiW2W4g/giphy.gif)
Lol
This is a pretty interesting article that popped up in my local sub relating to Feds and business fronts....http://www.startribune.com/nighttime-flight-circles-low-over-twin-cities-for-hours/305398901/
You give me too much credit but thank you!
no but its just common sense. if they all moved what are the chances that there would still be constellations. come on bro give me your opinion or a link. im open.
The team photos are common stock portraits used for dummy WordPress template content.   http://designova.net/themes/wordpress/next/   
Correct. The more you try to stop it, the more attention it garners.  
Seems like you've already made up your mind. 
lets just say that the official NASA photos are complete crap and we can at least start from scratch
Only fast boats are covered in SHT. It just would be impossible to cover SSGN and SSBN in the stuff. It requires absurd maintenance and is constantly coming apart. 
&gt; Lost count the number of redditors you guys doxxed in that link.  You do realize that r/moosearchive has never been open to public posting. Every post on there is from one person, not "you guys". 
Looking through a majority of these planes some of the spots they're focusing on are:   * San Diego * Houston * Dallas * West of Chicago * Huntsville, AL * Queens, NY * West Portland * West LA
This should be on /r/bestof dammit!
Its been 2 hours... RIP in peace /u/Plan2Exist18
Then I suppose we have an understanding.  Big Bang theory (which I agree is silly) may have been developed to compliment Christian creationist beliefs, but it is not the only theory that Christian creationism can use to explain the origins of the universe.  In which case your original statement was a clear Ad Hominem.
Russia aka ''Death Camp'' has not as much jailed as the ''Land of the Free''.   Laughs on you 'Murica
At least they don't appear to have lowered the physical standards to try and get women to pass. If a woman or man passes this they're basically in **really** good shape!  To bring up a parallel example of this situation, where the standards *were* lowered... the fire service.  http://nypost.com/2014/12/11/fdny-drops-physical-test-requirement-amid-low-female-hiring-rate/  I don't believe physical standards for something like fire-fighting and the military should be lowered. A lot of men also fail these demanding physical tests.  But imagine if I really, really wanted to be a fireman, but not being supremely fit I can't make it through the tests.   Reason would give me two options - try harder, or face facts that not everyone makes it, and look for an alternative goal.  What would be blatantly and obviously **wrong** would be to start lobbying the organisations involved to lower standards, just so I can achieve my personal fantasy of becoming a fire-fighter! People's lives are at risk here!  ^^This ^^is ^^just ^^an ^^example ^^by ^^the ^^way. ^^I ^^don't ^^*really* ^^want ^^to ^^become ^^a ^^fire-fighter, ^^but ^^I ^^have ^^a ^^lot ^^of ^^respect ^^for ^^people ^^who ^^do!
Yeah, but usually not right in the middle of negotiating nuclear treaties with Iran.
Well I guess we'll see if our culture has been so debased and degraded by those who run it that a perverted freak like Jenner can get away with calling himself "the new normal."
Beaches aren't fun.
OP just wanted to fool /r/conspiracy and get some of that sweet karma :P
The story of Noah's alleged deeds is not the same as evidence.
I'll see what I can do.
Dark
Aaand it's hacked...
It just seems funny that you seem so outraged on internet websites, yet I would bet money that you dont do shit in real life to do anything about it. You are what they call a keyboard warrior. If you really care that much about constitutional rights, you wouldnt be bitching on the internet, you would be doing more important shit in the fight against the government. So shut your gay little whiny mouth and go do something better with your time than saying "fuck you" to random people on Reddit you loser lol. 
But why delete things if they get upvotes? So you delete your drunk posts when sober? That makes even less sense. I've never deleted any of my posts; if someone misinterprets what I'm saying I just reply to clarify. I usually get some downvotes but I don't care.
[deleted]
What's up with the Dickbutt on the lower rear driver side of the van? 
Lay down our lives for people who are oppressing me to such a tiny degree I can't really feel it or a fictional character?  Pass on both counts.  There are exactly two people I would lay down my life for: wife and daughter. If you would lay your life down for anyone but your closest family and *maybe* closest friends, then you are being controlled. Free your mind.
I haven't heard this one before, can you link?
[deleted]
&gt; if this turns out to be BS, I'm as taken as you folks are.  This was a good troll. Not just because of teh lulz, but because you actually made more people aware of this program with your prank. I bet you'll be feasting for days on [popcorn](http://rockrivertimes.com/2015/06/03/made-up-fbi-company-says-its-not-made-up/).
[deleted]
Anything you might want is here: specific articles, easy-to-watch videos, detailed technical studies, etc:  /r/holocaust/wiki
Interesting.  But probably just smoke and mirrors or else government would have taken it down.  Nice find though.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Can someone analyze the domain name and look up its history? I know there's a way to do that but I don't know how. 
[deleted]
You are technically correct -- the *best kind of correct*.
[deleted]
You were a poet and wasn't aware of it.
&gt; Are we stupid or blind?  Both.
Sure they are, molten metal was raining down from the sky that day, possibly containing thermitic material which would be from the numerous cutting devices.   Drops of it raining down can be seen in some of the videos.   The result? Burned out cars and firetrucks.   Please for the love of God, stop it with the Judy Wood and no planer BULLSHIT!
I hate these comments...   At least try to give a reason and not just comment "Photoshop" or "Chinese Lantern".  Makes you look stupid.
Not quite right.  [Joint **Assistant** for **Deployment** and Execution](http://www.dodccrp.org/events/5th_ICCRTS/papers/062.pdf) (PDF)
Methods are a flawed concept.  It's just shill Jewish conspiracy to turn the commoners against the Catholic Church and support the Scientific Revolution.  Prove me wrong. Also, dae holocaust is a lie. 
Rule 10. Removed.
[deleted]
&gt;Can you imagine a life when going to a cafe or on a bus is a daily danger?  lol, ok. When was the last attack in Israel and please do not tell me about the dud rockets that came in that killed no one and didn't even do damage. Hasbara much? 
This article is from 1993
Nice!
It's funny because /u/PostNationalism is probably the least Nazi, far-left person on this entire site. His sub (called Postnationalism funnily enough) advocates the dissolution of borders and globalism.   If even this guy knows the holohoax is BS, then you guys are in trouble.
[deleted]
so it's possible this was a ruse due to the registry date of fvxresearch.com being june 2  it's also possible that fvxresearch.com was made for damage control of the recent AP article (would explain the laziness) and OP could either a) say it was a joke or b) get v&amp;  nsa.gen.in is something real (feb 2014, bluffdale utah), and OP either discovered it or he knowingly linked to it
Nice to see a contrary opinion on sanders. I was beginning to think there was nothing wrong with him. 
[deleted]
yeesh, worldnews has become fucking terrible. it's worse now than it ever was  i haven't been on a main subreddit in a long time, i had no idea how much the hivemind has changed. where did all these docile, apologist fucks come from?
Israel.
I really don't know :(
You are now on "the list."
Sadly he lost.  It's the Dews who are winning. We'll let you take a moment to catch up. 
Cuba was on that list too. Just Iran and North Korea left to flip.
whois info for web sites is different. you're supposed to verify it, but in reality, if you use something like godaddy, you can bs the hell out of it, which I assume OP did.
So, long story short, you've been talking out of your ass. Thanks for your honesty.   &gt; And you got my /u/ wrong.  Sorry!
Um holy shit. Thanks for sharing. Yea.. though I think there is a good chance we cannot stop it. Bitcoins will rule online but I think silver is going to become the de facto local currency.
It looks like a spider got crushed on the lens and the water beam is its web....
i dunno the stuff i read about treblinka looks pretty damning.. 
Dennis Hastert and his deep state corruption.   Look up the old Vanity Fair article about him re:  Sibel Edmonds.    There is so much there there, including illegal arms trading including black market WMD trading, involving Pakistan, North Korea, and others, with Turkey as the proxy enabler.  Hastert was in deep with the deep state players in Turkey.   So now, the government is KEEPING SECRET the details of Hastert's blackmailing.   They're helping him.  While at the same time prosecuting him.  It's a huge story, and it's barely a blip in the news now, it's all about a 65 year old man who decided to act like a woman for a new reality show, yet another society destroying trainwreck from the Voldemort-like mind of Chris Jenner.     http://www.syracuse.com/opinion/index.ssf/2015/06/why_are_prosecutors_keeping_dennis_hasterts_secret_commentary.html  
Fixed. Thank you. 
So, ELI5?
[deleted]
That goes for Poland. Not sure how much in the U.S. that is implied
http://www.sheldrake.org/about-rupert-sheldrake/blog/rat-learning-and-morphic-resonance
Porn is not your answer. Be the change you wish to see in the world. 
Well, Gawker believes itself to be an important outlet of very serious social issue news coverage, so to admit that /r/conspiracy has more journalistic integrity (on some issues, sometimes) would be antithetical to it's main goals of spreading hate and disinfo.   It'd be like Donald Trump admitting that the ACA works for some people. 
Just thinking it is a red flag now!
I don't think a charge lead out of ignorance and violence would be a good thing. Yes that would come in the uneducated parts of inner cities but I believe a movement lead by a person who can speak with intelligence but on a level that the common man can understand would be the best. I don't think most people comprehend really how bad it is, if they were informed through a more easy to understand fashion i believe they'd feel a little more of a drive to want to make a change 
Implying it's not.
Very well done, I applaud your efforts!
If you were in middle school, you'd be 3 years older. 
&gt; Maybe the plane isn't an ambi-turner.   Haha. Maybe it's training for Nascar?
According the article HAARP was dismantled in the summer of 2014
Thank you! Finally someone who understands what the ionosphere really is. 
[deleted]
The title is wrong.  &gt;While the proposed Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP) has become well known in recent months in the United States, the TISA is the larger component of the strategic TPP-TISA-TTIP 'T-treaty trinity'.  In other words, Wikileaks still doesn't have the text of the TPP. This is a separate treaty.
Wow, and you don't know what mongoloid means either?   http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=mongoloid nobody throws the word mongoloid around in a racial context anymore you idiot.  I'm going to die of cringe from this.    There are a few from 2013 actually, look I'm just going to leave it at this.  I have multiple studies behind me saying conspiratards are dumb/more gullible than normal people.  I have 99% of the scientific community behind me saying you're wrong.  You have a single poll that asked a loaded question to get the answer they wanted, nothing more.  In the end the truther movement fizzled out after managing to get every single claim they threw out debunked.  https://sites.google.com/site/wtc7lies/home  Debunks literally every 9/11 conspiracy you can possibly think of, with citations from actual experts.  I can't believe I even got into an argument with a person that thinks Israel killed princess Diana, what was I thinking. 
so whats your response to what i provided which shows the author misleading the reader about the EPA data and making inconslusive conclusions from the data eventhough the EPA correctly attributed to the existence of the compounds to fuel and plastics but yet the author misleads the reader to thermite
&gt; Sounds like an easy fix, don't you think?  The correct answer is 'yes.'
&gt; There are a few from 2013 actually, look I'm just going to leave it at this. &gt; I have multiple studies behind me saying conspiratards are dumb/more gullible than normal people. &gt; You have a single poll that asked a loaded question to get the answer they wanted, nothing more. &gt; In the end the truther movement fizzled out after managing to get every single claim they threw out debunked  Yeah so you can't link them. Smh.  Anyways I am going to tell you what the world thinks about 9/11.  Canada earlier this year presented a 9/11 petition from the 9/11 Families victims when the US government wouldn't. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xX2dWCN1zhc But this wasn't the first time Canada did something 9/11 related. In 2011 there was a resolution presented to Impeach Dick Cheney for war crimes. He will never go back to Canada again. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=X-RkZqz2oNg  Japan's Parliamentary Diet had a 9/11 Truth Discussion led by Chancellor Fujita and how the increased security is affecting Japan. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mOF_pXW84io  In Denmark they have professors from the University of Copenhagen who come up to explain 9/11 truth all the time. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=irOj1QYjVvc Actually this Professor has gone on numerous interviews across Europe from BBC to CNN.  Francesco Cossiga, former President of Italy (1985-1992) and former Prime Minister, told Italy’s most respected newspaper, Corriere della Sera, that the 9/11 attacks were run by the CIA and by Israel’s spy agency Mossad and that this was common knowledge among global intelligence agencies.  In November 2007, Cossiga declared:  “…All the [intelligence services] of America and Europe … now know well that the disastrous attack has been planned and realized by the American CIA and the Mossad with the aid of the Zionist world in order to to falsely incriminate Arabic countries and to persuade the Western Powers to intervene in Iraq and Afghanistan.” http://www.globalresearch.ca/ex-italian-president-intel-agencies-know-9-11-an-inside-job  Andreas von Bulow—former German defense minister, cabinet technology minister in Helmut Schmidt’s administration, and member of the German parliament for 25 years—wrote the bestseller The CIA and September 11 (still no English translation from the German).  http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/europe/germany/1447232/German-Sept-11-theory-stokes-anti-US-feeling.html  The UN even just blatantly said 9/11 was an Inside Job during a UN conference! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=k4phNuwx8Hs  Russia on the other hand isn't as shy like the other nations about 9/11 Truth. They promote it on a daily basis. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mQjTYmDKPaI  Back in the US it is not just the majority of citizens that know the truth. The 9/11 Commissioners already admitted it was a conspiracy. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qrqq2KxyWAs  Former Bush Cabinet members testified 9/11 was an inside job. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=reQZT9Hzvt8  Former CIA agents admit it. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mQjTYmDKPaI  Senators admit they were ordered not to investigate 9/11 by Dick and Bush. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aEvpZ8SM9L4  Here is Trans. Sec Norman Mineta's testimony on Dick Cheney giving the Stand Down orders to Norad during 9/11. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bDfdOwt2v3Y  Here is a list of  220+ Senior Military, Intelligence Service, Law Enforcement, and Government Officials 250+ Pilots and Aviation Professionals 400+ Professors Question 9/11 300+ 9/11 Survivors and Family Members 200+ Artists, Entertainers, and Media Professionals 400+ Medical Professionals who want to reinvestigate 9/11. http://patriotsquestion911.com/  So with all of these government and scientific officials from around the world testifying about the fraudulence of the official story, why do you still believe it?  Are you some weird kind of autistic person who only believes fake online sources and not what comes from government officials or scientists?  &gt; I have 99% of the scientific community behind me saying you're wrong.  Lmfao 99% bullshit detected.
Okay, so I've had a read through the "Mechanics of Progressive Collapse". From what I can tell, all of their argument is either standard mechanics or self-evident.  &gt;Nope, this is not how any of this works.  When one posts a quote saying (paraphrased) "evidence trumps theory" as an argument against a theory, it implies that one has the evidence required to disprove the theory. Otherwise, the theory stands. You ask me for evidence, and I say this: the theory will have been built upon current evidence, it will have been moulded by it, and when they presented their paper to a journal for peer review, it should have been tested and proven to be accurate.  &gt;The absence of a confirming experiment is all the evidence in the world.  What, like the various examples of progressive collapse mentioned in the paper you yourself linked to? Or the highly accurate computer model which they used to show that all the conditions were present in the twin towers for the collapse to become inevitable?  The plane crash is sufficient to cause collapse. Causing collapse without requiring the plane would take the effort of may people.  As for my allegation that causing a single floor to collapse can lead to a snowballing failure: It takes an amount of energy to cause the floor to break. If breaking the floor leads to an overall increase in kinetic energy (due to the extra moving weight) rather than a decrease in the kinetic energy (since some will be lost due to the slowdown caused by the floor), then the floors will continue to break, and complete failure will occur. Did this happen? If there was no CD, then yes, it must have.  In your proof that F=mg, you assume that the energy of the system is E=Fd. But, you're neglecting two big energy sources: potential and kinetic energy.  And you're right: the potential/tensile/structural energy of the *whole* structure underneath must be much larger than the weight above it. Unfortunately,  most of the load is directly applied to one floor rather than the whole structure. [This](http://imgur.com/NlurlIY) image shows what I mean by this, where you can see that the lower floor takes none of the loading applied to the upper floor. [EDIT: If you want, I can probably manage to get an ANSYS archive of this model to you so you can play around with it.]  &gt;So we agree that /u/IAMAnENTAMA's bullshit experiment is bullshit  Nope. His experiment is a good demonstration of why you can't neglect the kinetic and potential energy of the falling mass when you're determining the applied load. Just because it doesn't prove that the twin towers definitely collapsed "naturally" doesn't mean it's bullshit, in the same way that any experiment showing that evolution is true isn't bullshit because it doesn't also prove that gravity is true.  &gt;All that has nothing to do with the experiment required to meet the challenge. It's an evasive straw man argument.  I'll agree with the first point. Unfortunately, it was never meant to have anything to do with the experiment. I was illustrating why a *computer model* of the situation would be incredibly complex, which you asserted would be "simple". 
I wasn't ignoring what you said at all.  You didn't ask any questions, so I didn't feel there was anything to respond to.  You just said that you felt the title of the video that I presented you with was misleading.    Because of that I continued with more examples where history that is learned in school isn't necessarily what happened.  I noticed that HaltNWO tried to tell you I was a religious nut.  I strongly encourage you to look at that user's post history to see what he is about.  I have never been involved in any organized religions as I view them as just systems of control.  
So...
dude it's a picture! and the title i chose is from the quote!  clickbait is a title that grabs your attention and makes you click, only to find out that the link had nothing to do with the title..you're just in a bad mood today &amp; handing out downvotes..  smoke a bowl &amp; lighten the fuck up man
But no one believes me!! :'(
Link and source, I asked someone else on the comment section this as well. No proof, no true. 
Did you ask for a link to where it had been posted before?
This is not just a political problem, it is an economic problem as well. It's Capitalism *and* government working together that have done this. They feed off of and support one another. You cannot change the figureheads in government and expect change if you don't remove the power structures that government exists to support, and is thus controlled by. Capitalism needs to go with them.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Just in case you're skeptical of the photo.. Here's more..  https://mobile.twitter.com/FVXResearch/status/606325030486573057
Err...There is that big issue about NSA surveillance.  
FYI for anyone else here, HH stands for "Heil Hitler", and 88 is another way of saying HH.   You wonder why everyone thinks /r/conspiracy is racist? Thank OP. 
the old testament is a jewish book it has zero to do with jesus
I recall a particular door dissappeared that would have been the damning piece of evidence for the federal organizations. The door would have shown a bullet that entered the exterior facing side of the door, that would have proved the agents did indeed start the attack and the Davidians were defending themselves.
Aliens.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Go look on your Facebook and tell me how many crazy articles you see. Even if something is real, people have to want to click it and read it. Otherwise the article will be passed over as the racings of a lunatic or moron. Look at reddit. Someone can post a scholarly article and be called a shill or a moron. You can disprove someone no matter how solid their argument is, and even the slightest bit of doubt destroys the image. 
 
This sub needs to get its head out of their asses.  When a cop is approaching you with weapon drawn you do not stick your hands down your fucking pants and then pull them out.  How was he to know it wasn't a gun?  If the kid was trying to mute his headphones he should have just pulled them off his fucking ears.  This cop will not be punished for this and rightfully so.
Have you not taken high school physics yet?
Still downvoted, shameless karma grab detected
admit that the researcher misleads
Currently there is a twice as expected demonstration in germany in preparation of the g7 meeting with anti-tpp on their banners. There are also bigger figures involved, some eu parlament guy was their speaker. People do organise and work. It's been happening probably for more than a year already within numerous different groups.
No, not really. The Universe, karma, God, or whatever you'd like to call it, will almost certainly exact some sort of punishment on this person. Every action has an equal and opposite reaction.
Ya... Sadly I think your right. Had I been the cop I wouldn't have pulled the trigger unless he pulled a gun though...these trigger happy cops airways seem to be really scared too..
[deleted]
Some might not wait to take that chance of him actually having a gun or not. I can't honestly say what I'd do if I were in that position.
[deleted]
He*
Worse than isis
We're too fattened to fight, too ignorant to know and too distracted to care. 
The twin towers turned to dust in mid-air as they fell.  I find it difficult to believe this was caused by thermite---was thermite sprayed over the entire exterior and interior surfaces, as well as all the contents?  I've never sat through Judy Woods' presentation.  Having said that, I do not know what was used.  If we're talking nuclear weapons, shouldn't there have been some sort of electromagnetic pulse which would have rendered electronics in the area unusable?  That didn't happen.  But when we get right down to where the rubber hits the road, the exact method does not matter.  We know enough to see that the "official" story is a lie.  Our focus should be on arresting the individuals who perpetrated the crime, not the method used.
I don't think it's "boarder line", however.  "Full retard" is more like it.
I don't understand how down voting this will help, but ok. I down voted this posting of yours.  What is step 2? 
yeah so now you have to organize a defense, those guys gotta be pros but they have to eat and they can't farm and train so now you have to have division of labor yadda yadda and sooner or later a tribal system emerges, just like practically every other group of humans has ever done... don't kid yourself and think you're better than everyone who's come before.
Because every rich man is a peach and every genius is well know. Every celebrity is meaningful and cripples get all the bitches. Clearly in 3 to 4 years time the cops will just shape up on their own!
&gt; A mugger appreciates the reality of your fear, confusion, disorientation as their advantages, not as a laundry list of excuses to kill you.  Absolutely this.  God damn yes.  I understand cops deal everyday with uncooperative, probably criminal, people, but have such an abject lack of understanding for how a potentially innocent unaware person might be confused or afraid (and hence slow to respond), is, in my opinion, a great Evil.  I personally consider it a significantly greater loss to lose a single innocent person than to allow a guilty person to go free.  And the cops need to act accordingly.  They need to be so far beyond certain that their lives are in danger, that it's more likely they would die than to accidentally kill an innocent person.  It'd be better for our society overall long term if such was the case.  Cops should required to put their own lives fully in danger before pulling a trigger (as in, actively being attacked).  They shouldn't be allowed to fire if someone "acts suspicious" or "seemed aggressive" or "I couldn't see his hands", etc, bullshit.  You have to weigh the costs of taking a human life on all of us.  It leads to massive distrust of all police officers and of law enforcement in general.  I don't think people (in power) really understand the sheer magnitude of the math involved here.  One innocent life taken is worth, to the public, more than 1000 drug dealers going free.  That's why we have such a visceral reaction to this sort of abuse.  It's far worse for the cop to kill someone like this, than if he were really a criminal and allowed to go free.   I've seen lots of stats recently of people trying to remind the rest of us that not all cops are bad.  That there are millions of police-citizen interactions, and that only a tiny fraction of a percent result in death.  The thing is, it doesn't fucking matter.  This sort of math doesn't work.  The loss of those innocent lives begins to outweigh whatever good was done in the other 99.99999% of interactions.  
See this is really, really hilarious because what you're suggesting he do is literally one of the whitest things he could do.  Other cultures actually venerate their ancestors...you know at like very great time and money expense to themselves.  They honestly believe that the past/present are dependent/resultant on the favor of those that came before them.    White western people are the ones that developed a culture that placed money before family, alive or dead.  So you're suggestion he become a rugged self made individualist...its just really in line with his worldview.  Its really great advice!  Im not tryin to explain your own joke to you I just want you to know why I find it so grand.
This is a good example of why you can't trust government agencies. /r/Libertarian 
There have been many independent investigations. Hell, we're doing one now.  I guess the question is: How do we get the federal government to respect and respond to the results of an independent investigation?  The answer, unfortunately, is to have bigger guns than they do.
Like the American's had any freedom anyway.
I'd love to read the article, but I'm not taking a fucking survey in order to do so (mobile). Fuck you, WaTimes.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I had the exact same idea. Except I am lazy and you beat me. Well executed, nice job.
I forget /r/conspiracy is a part of reddit. Stating that men and women are different will get downvoted automatically. 
Your missing the point. What does it matter that he didnt have a gun after the cop searched him? The cop wanted to search him for weapons as soon as he started to try to get away. The cop wasn't able to search him because the guy had his hands in his pants like he had the gun making the cop fear for his safety and everyone else around him. If you were there that cop was protecting you and your family from a possible shitty situation and it makes me furious because somehow out of all of this he is the bad guy. He is trained to recognize threats and neutralized them. Do you know the rules of engagement overseas?  Do you know how many soldiers have died because they cant react to situations like this in the same manner? And don't bring up the excuse that it's different because it's a war zone because whenever a cop has on a uniform it's a war zone. They treat everyone with suspicion because that's the smart thing to do. And don't get the impression I'm some gun toting conservative cause I'm not. I appreciate the fuck out of cops and they have gotten a lot of people I love out of real shitty situations that they probably wouldn't have made it out from if it weren't for those "homicidal maniacs".
Damn that was good.
I don't believe this story for a second.  If it was true then  I would have to believe this general  gave up top secret information to the isis about why they lost a a state of the art command post.  utter  rubbish.  this information is bad  disinformation, and you should feel bad. 
And still better candidates than anyone seeking the office.
I don't mean to criticize, it's just that, like, *really?* 
[deleted]
Sweet jesus.  &gt;But women can be just as strong as men???  No.  Just, no.  &gt; "Black men are stronger, faster, and all around much better suited for intensive labor, therefore they should be treated as such. White men should only do work that is non-labor intensive due to the difference in racial phenotype."  No.   Black men prove you wrong by being successful, and *being able to pull their weight* (which, when put in a masculine situation, the average female won't be able to do (or, more specifically, would rather be doing something else, probably less intensive (both, most likely))). "Business" as people tend to know it, is white and masculine, but, there are black CEOs. Black people sold other black people into slavery. There were "black CEOs" before modern business came along. We're all descended from Africa, anyway. Why am I even... /sigh  &gt;Equality opposes both this statement and yours because instead of attempting to create limitations it welcomes adversity and change.  No.  **Equal opportunity does not mean equal outcome.** You cannot change millions of years by telling people it was just in their heads the whole time... when ironically, the truth is literally in their heads, and has been, this entire time. Yet equality "sounds good" and "feels good", and of course, don't want to be excluded, or called bad names, so sure, let's defend it. Right?   No.
Well said. Now, if corporations want to play on the level of sovereign nations, countries should have the option of declaring war on them... :-)
This kind of shit just never ends. To me it looks like the state of affairs in America is at an all time low.
I can't stand dramatic music.
[deleted]
people can and do differentiate between 'entertainment' and 'news', some at least, some just don't like 'news'.  politicians need to have this abilitiy, same with social planners and others with a claim to science and/or thought.  as long as say a quarter of the population cares about reality, thats prob enough for society to survive.  
This is why I no longer give to Wikipedia. They don't mention Ruby worked for Nixon.   This FBI-document of 1947 recommends that "one Jack Rubenstein of Chicago" should not be called to testify for the Committee on Unamerican Activities, for he is working for Congressman Richard M. Nixon. According to the Warren Commission, Ruby had no connections with Oswald, Organized Crime or the Government. No wonder the header reads "This is sensitive". http://jfkmurdersolved.com/nixonruby.htm   &gt;Some other points on Nixon's involvement:  &gt;-Nixon was funded by Prescott Bush, whose web of connections connects him to the Nazis, CIA, powerful families (Harrimans, Rockefellers), Skull and Bones, and Kennedy killers (Allen Dulles, E. Howard Hunt).   &gt;-Nixon has given contradictory accounts for how he found out about Kennedy being shot. How is it possible that he couldn't recall how he got the news? Why would he give two different versions, one involving a man running around the street corner screaming about the assassination and the other involving a woman running out of her house crying and screaming about the assassination?  &gt;-Nixon had JFK perps George H.W Bush, John Connally, and E. Howard Hunt in the White House. He had E. Howard Hunt lead the Watergate operation. Hunt was busted and got jailed. While in jail, he told press that he was an assassin for the CIA. He demanded that Nixon give him $1,000,000 and a trip out of jail. He said that if Nixon didn't do these things, he would 'tell all' about the JFK assassination. Nixon panicked and told the FBI to stop investigating Hunt. This action was what ultimately forced him to resign. George H.W Bush's closest business partner, Bill Liedtke, paid Hunt $1,000,000 in hush money. When Nixon told the FBI to stop investigating Hunt, he told them that if the investigations continued, they would open up "the whole Bay of Pigs thing". According to one of Nixon's closest advisers (Chief of Staff Haldeman), this remark referred to the Kennedy assassination. So, why was Nixon worried about E. Howard Hunt blowing the whistle about the JFK assassination? Nixon's panicking shows that he was involved in the Kennedy assassination. He knew that if Hunt blew the whistle, he would be implicated .http://forum.prisonplanet.com/index.php?topic=74927.0
Odd. Most people I talk about this where I live clearly see a controlled, long prepared detonation. 
He was pulling his pants up.   He "pretended to reach for a Gun?"    Bro..  What the fuck are you smoking.  You didn't even watch the video.  
He probably would have been shot regardless. 
You, maybe. 
He acted in his own best interest.   Which is what you,  or I,  or any police officer would do in the same situation.   Yes,  he knew divulging his identification would get him into trouble.   We didn't know that before his death,  and neither did the cop.   So you can continually keep saying that,  but it's irrelevant.   He didn't HAVE to speak with the police.  He had no legal reason to stop and chitchat. The cop shot him anyway.   Again,  acting in HIS best interest.    You do understand the jump you're making isn't the correct one,  right? I'm assuming you're on the younger side..  But seriously,  telling us that a dead guy should have just listened to the police is so asinine. It's so fucked up. 
I'm only watching from my phone , but to me it looked like his hands were inside his belt loop, followed the by "Fuck no, fool".  the days of speaking politely to strangers is long gone, and this is what we get for it. 
It did look like the guy might be reaching for something, but definitely should've just used a tazer.
[The DA ruled it justified.](http://www.sltrib.com/sltrib/news/58472404-78/taylor-cruz-hands-gill.html.csp)  I don't think it was, though.
Pin a medal on the cop, good shoot. Some guy is dead let's go have a beer.
I don't believe in ISS/moon landing. What's this about the secret space program?
I have a question here for anyone that believes in chemtrails.  You believe the elite are behind them right? for population control, mind control whatever far fetched bullshit you want.  These elite also use our air correct? why is it they're immune.  
Now! No.. Now! Now! 
How did Biggie know?
So you admit you have no information or source to back up your claim. I already explained why the video you posted doesn't prove what you think it does.  I'm not sure I understand your point about the firefighters. Just because the Prime Minister of Denmark revived word the buildings might collapse doesn't mean someone knew for 100% sure they would. I'm not sure why you are locked into thinking there must be consistency between what the Prime Minister was told and what was done with the firefighters. Remember that this was a terrorist attack and no one knew what was going to happen. It is perfectly reasonable to be worried that a building might collapse but not know for sure. I remember watching it on television as it happened discussing the possibility that the buildings would fall before they did. I'm not sure why you are so sure that nobody had any clue there would be a collapse. You seem to think they would never send firefighters into a building that was in danger of collapsing but that's just not true. As long as there are people that could possibly be rescued you will have firefighters willing to go inside to find them. Again, no one knew for sure the buildings would collapse that day but many were worried about the possibility.
Thanks for your attempt at a logical and non emotional rapor.  I think what it boils down to is that cops are no longer trained to use (self) restraint. Their is something systematically wrong in the way they are being trained in as much that instead of diffusing the situation most cops seem hell bent on escalating any and all confrontations.  Now the fact that these incidents are steadily on the rise shows without a doubt that not only is the training lacking but no corrections to training are happening.  Any normal compassionate human being would seek to remedy such a disarray of police skills. The fact that an adjustment in training is as yet not forthcoming leads one to draw one of two conclusions.  1. Incompetence  2. WILLFUL neglect (by design, hence a conspiracy) 
Check your media outlets bud. Merica ain't that bad. 
I don't know about anyone else but a guy cutting off his cock has nothing to do with my own sexuality. Why would anyone care? If you think that you will begin to question your sexuality based on this guy's cut off cock, you've probably already questioned it before. People don't just "turn" into the opposite sex, or gay, those are the beliefs of religious whackos.   Also, who cares about the main stream media. Find a credible news source of your choice and and follow it, whether it's online, twitter, your friend that travels a lot. 
[deleted]
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Are you serious? That was literally every headline for months following the release of information about the NSA surveillance programs.   But no, let's just circlejerk super hard instead of discussing the merits of the post. 
[deleted]
The unexplained force responsible for the anomalous, total and complete progressive collapse can be traced right back to the vacuum.  The conditions were perfect on 9/11 for a spontaneous zero-point energy flux, causing a massive (*but temporary!*) violation of the most fundamental laws of thermodynamics. Space itself tore down the towers with the unfathomable quantum of energy stored in the ubiquitous aether, that untapped reserve capable of liberating mankind from his dependence on fossil fuels and sending him to the stars.  I can't videotape an example for you because this sort of thing can only happen on a large scale, under very specific circumstances that are virtually impossible to predict.  But it's extremely obvious that I'm right so why are you even questioning me?
I highly doubt that. 
[deleted]
One guy from 16 years ago. Got any more? 
&gt; But the majority of what people call chemtrails are just ice crystals formed when planes fly in the upper troposphere.  Wrong. There are actually a number of whistleblowers who have piloted these planes which spray this "shit" all over the place. I live 30 miles away from a major airport and am backed up to a large field, clearly there is a difference between labeled planes ascending or descending, and the silver unlabeled planes that fly in specific patterns in higher altitudes spraying this "shit" which sticks around, spreads, and turns a perfectly sunny day into a messy haze.  F0ck these poison sprayers
http://i.imgur.com/S6maZT4.jpg literally you
Id counter that the American Indian holocaust is the biggest cover up. 
Don't break the circle jerk.  8====D - - - -
NSFW warning!
[deleted]
Weve always been at war with Eastasia  
&gt;Your ancestors actions or accomplishments have nothing to do with you.  So your creation had nothing to do with your forefathers? Are you really that much of a cretin? Go to a doctor and get that brain checked out please.
The MMR vaccine spreads Measles, that is admitted.  Measles is not something to worry about in the First World, keep up with your Vitamin A.  However vaccine-induced diseases are lifelong and debilitating, certainly not worth risking a vaccine for.
[deleted]
What claim? My claims were that you are a fruitcake who A) misquoted me, and B) Took something I said a long ass time ago waaaay out of context, and tried to play it off.  That's my only claims goofawitz
Im not assuming anything, I posed all of this as a hypothetical. Was hoping for discussion in an ideal scenario. 
Apparently when it comes to cops you should be rude and ignore them, because that's how we treat anyone...oh wait we don't.  
[deleted]
So the creator of the gish galloping "9/11 in 5 minutes" video is going to give us a lesson on disinfo.   That makes perfect sense. 
About GDP...  Let's say there is a drug that cures cancer that costs $50. To cure 1 million people from cancer would add $50 million to the GDP.  Let's also say that chemotherapy costs $1 million. To cure 50 people from cancer would add $50 million to the GDP.  All GDP measures is the flow of cash, which is not an accurate representation of any concept of value, positive or negative, imagined or real, since prices are not set in a true competitive marketplace.
[deleted]
If you make for yourself it is not a job. Just like when roaming the landscape with a spear became obsolete, so will most traditional jobs. I think what the other poster was trying to convey is that in the future it may be that almost everyone is a "freelancer",. Certainly you will not just be a servant for those with a job - just as artists who sell $100,000 "artworks" to rich wives are certainly not their servants.
Oh yes. Cryptography is used by the nsa to spy on the world in order to "stop" terrorism (terrorism is actually just a cia created myth in order to control the population 
This. 
Actually, I had always heard that footage cuts away right before they lurch forward and run over him. 
Well, yes one ruling is legal precedence. It is the way our judiciary system works. If you have a problem with one ruling, you have to appeal it at a higher level court.
$60k ain't shit to live on?! WTF. I live in the capitol of the most expensive country in the world, Oslo - Norway, and I only made $24k last year, gross. With 25% VAT on **everything** and 35% income tax taking it's toll, there's not much left after. If I was making $60k a year, I'd be living like a fucking king. How much are you wasting, really?   .    [Most expensive countries in world #1](http://irisharoundoz.com/blog/2015/02/11/top-15-expensive-countries-world-2015/)   [Most expensive countries in world #2](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2015/01/21/map-expensive-countries_n_6510018.html)
So called Chemtrails are those long white traits across otherwise blue skies. They are all at 25 to 40,000 feet altitude. Cloud seeding is something completely different and involves aircraft flying in and out of rain clouds at about 8 to 10,000 feet. Nobody doubts that it's taking place and it was used during the Vietnam War to extend the monsoons. So linking to a bunch of stuff like "Weather as a force multiplier" is not referring to chemtrails at all.
What the actual fuck are you talking about? Her husband was previously married and had children. That makes Dawn their stepmother. You know, I can buy into some of this stuff, but when you all step off the deep end into psychosis, I am out. 
Want to upvote because of the great reference but want to downvote since u/JustaDudeinaSuit's point was pretty sound. I will have to remain neutral.
[deleted]
Yea but I think that the British have been by far the worst. The scope of colonial suffrage caused by the British remains to be matched.   Also the fact that the British Empire is chiefly responsible for the creation of the 3rd world and the developing world.   Before the British conquered India, much of Africa and the Middle East, the poor arpund the world enjoyed similar living standards.   After England created their colonial empire, the poor and middle class in England had much higher living standards than British colonial subjects. Effectively creating a 3rd world in India, Africa and the Middle East.   To understand the modern world, you have to know the history of the British Empire. 
Cop shills are out in full force in /r/conspiracy 
Molestation is passed down.  Might not be the father, probably is though,  but it was something done to the boy to teach him that shit
[deleted]
Actually he wrote the first movie as a stand alone and left it open ended for the possibility of sequels
That link just takes me to googles home page mate. 
For me, it became clear that the president was just a spokesperson for the criminal elite when Obama took office.  He promised so much but just brought more of the same--which is funny because what he says always is in direct opposition to what he does. But I think Malalai Joya said it best: "The CIA runs things. Getting a new president is like putting a new saddle on the same old donkey."
And the stupidest?
If you want a basic introduction as to why people believe the "Nazi gas chambers" were a repeat of WWI atrocity propaganda (in 1916 it was claimed that 700,000 were gassed by the Austrians), aside from the [David Cole video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RHzWo79dCHs) the other guy mentioned, you could take a look at [this 30min video from a French historian](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bpjqf-vNq6I) (who was actually imprisoned for his research, and is about to go back again for a second sentence.)  Beyond that, there are revisionist books, articles, videos, etc in the /r/holocaust/wiki -- judge for yourself whether the evidence and arguments presented in them are are "anti-semitic".
Killing? Nothing has been reported yet but its always possible. 
Here's **ZetaTalk** on "Underground Installations": (Note: written on Apr 15, 1997)  &gt; &amp;nbsp; Between the time of Roswell and the present day, that portion of US government which the tentacles of MJ12 had reached absolutely were warned of the approach of the 12th Planet, and absolutely set about trying to protect themselves in underground installations. The CIA was front and center in this regard, with the military close behind. The underground installations were deemed the best alternative of the 3 considered -   &gt;- isolated underground communities,   &gt;- sculpting and reducing the Earth's population to a select few, and   &gt;- riding out the cataclysms on another planet such as Mars or the Earth's dead twin.   &gt; Not only did this alternative not require the CIA and military to leave their home planet with its comforts, it also avoided the steady spread of disease among the so-called undesirables which inevitably started infecting the perpetrators too.  &gt; &amp;nbsp; These underground installations, when discovered, were explained away as a cold war precaution in case of nuclear attack, but a quick calculation belies that explanation. The number of people to be housed, and the amount of food and water stored, would not support the residents for the length of time it would take for radioactivity to fade. The stores would support them for days or weeks at best. Clearly these installations were meant for a short term stay, after which the residents would emerge back onto the surface to scout about for supplies. With a safe and undetectable hideout, the plan was to send out raiding parties that would come back with supplies, and disappear in front of those who might be in hot pursuit of their snatched goods. Thus the government, sworn to protect and lead the people, would instead steal from them, but as this was in the main nothing new to those planning this escape they saw no philosophical conflict in proceeding.  &gt; &amp;nbsp; Today MJ12 is not looking to avoid the coming cataclysms in underground installations, as they realize these will be death traps, a fact the Service-to-Self aliens encouraging this alternative were well aware of. The underground installations are still being used, however, to house activities the military would prefer the public not be aware of.   &gt; -- [**ZetaTalk**: *"Underground Installations"*](http://www.zetatalk.com/govmt/g87.htm)  Also see [*"Bunker Government"*](http://www.zetatalk.com/govmt/g140.htm), &amp; [*"ZetaTalk Newsletter: Alternatives 1-2-3"*](http://www.zetatalk.com/newsletr/issue428.htm)
[deleted]
every pig in my city makes more than 100,000 dollars a year. 
Then you haven't been here long...
Windows 8.1 is already that bad.
There was actually a movie made about this. I forget the name though.
Where do I sign up?
[deleted]
The entire theory that the Twin Towers was brought down by planted explosive charges is completely absurd. I believe it has been salted through the Internet to distract attention away from the true conspiracy of 9-11, which is that it was planned by Israel and paid for by Saudi Arabia.
lolwhut?
Lehi is the name of a terrorist group that eventually became what is known today as the IDF.  &gt; Believing that Nazi Germany was a lesser enemy of the Jews than Britain, Lehi twice attempted to form an alliance with the Nazis.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lehi_%28group%29
This will be deleted.
Yea especially with the launch of this site the crash might happen well before the Shemita. Things are really rolling at this point with bank runs in Greece and the bond bubble bursting. I would recommend a diversification of the following hard assets:  Silver bullion, batteries, gasoline, guns, ammo, non perishables, a generator / solar panels. Maybe some common spare parts like alternators.   And the following soft assets:  Bitcoins, stock in companies that mine silver, stock in companies with hard assets: railways, mining rights, farms, that sort of thing. Crude oil futures. SPXU is also fun in a down turn, but make sure you get out at some point because it is bound to get overvalued, it might even be completely worthless in a complete breakdown of the financial sector. Pawn shops and dollar stores are bound to go up up up. Take a look at what Berkshire Hathaway is doing for more ideas (they just bought an *entire* railroad!). 
Boiling frogs indeed.
Not quite...  It's Zionist Germany
This should be on the front page.
And release it to national news agencies that are appropriate to the stories.  I mean... I can understand the snowden is a psyop mentality but... I don't know.  The supporters of such really lean hard on some points that have pretty easy and logical mundane explanations.  If all TPTB wanted to do was scare the shit out of the public than they would just have had Snowden be a Chelsea manning or whatever, and spoon feed the MSM the info.  We wouldn't have celeb news drawing attention away from it, it would have been 24/7 wall to wall news about how you are being spied upon.  At least just more coverage of it in general.
Enjoy your additional down votes. 
&gt;The Nazis were convicted at Nuremberg because the German records were quality evidence even though the quantity was massive.  You dodged his question, please answer it.   &gt;And, of those documents, how many mention gas chamber construction, orders for gassings, reports on gassings, photos of gassings, etc?  &gt;Regarding your article, the author erroneously believes the point of the Nuremberg Trials were to prove extermination which is wrong because they focused on Nazi war crimes.  Extermination is a war crime, isn't it quite obvious?   &gt;http://www.livescience.com/44443-treblinka-archaeological-excavation.html  You're kidding right? this [pseudo-archaeology documentary]( https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=47rbRNSGQUs) where they dig up 1 old bath tile (which they associate the star on it to be the star of david, when in fact it was the manufacturers mark) and digging near clearly marked Christian graves claiming to find new "hidden mass graves" is proof? you would be a laughing stock in court if you brought this in as evidence  &gt;http://www.nizkor.org/hweb/orgs/american/skeptic-magazine/skeptic-12.html  Nizkor doesn't answer everything by a longshot. If you care to compare various subjects with Nizkor and holocaust revisionist websites, you'll see that quite often Nizkor says little or nothing about a topic.   Most of Nizkor's sources are from the Nuremberg Trials, and if you've read enough on those trials, you'll see how shaky a source they are. There are many cases of shoddy evidence and "professional" witnesses, who went from trial to trial saying whatever the prosecution wanted for a conviction. Further, the Trials themselves had evidenciary standards that are well below what any reasonably democratic country would allow, and defendants were also hanged on ex post facto laws - laws put into place after an event which were applied retroactively against people. Further, there were many instances where prosecution witnesses were put on the hot seat by defending attorneys and retreated from the stand leaving only a signed affidavit of their testimony instead - which of course cannot be cross-examined.   In all honestly, it seems as if you just link websites at people without going in depth yourself to dismiss our findings and assertions ( The usual ushmm and Nizkor ). Try to explain your responses and expand on the points you bring to the table. 
Dude, I'm not insulting you. I'm insulting the video; it was shitty. It was way too dramatic, honestly it is a ridiculous video. Almost funny really.   
I'm all for you having conspiracy theories, but having all these just for the sake of having them? bit stupid buddy.
paging /u/IanPhlegming you don't want to miss this info either
guess, what  in the middle is missing the most important part. who owns those corporations.  hint, they are owned trough banks and funds, untraceable trough offshore companies by the same fucking people
Agreed as well.  Ideally, of course, it would be good to have as highly trained a force as possible, but it would also be very good to have as many of us as possible also.
harassment is like terrorism, you stick this label on things you don't like
Lol, you're such a crybaby.
The DOD first called it the Intranet, it was changed to Internet after going public, per say. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I hear you man, 8chan's layout (or image-boards in general) have a kind of clunky layout. It's easy to get used to it and once you got it you'll definitely enjoy 8chan man. You have the freedom to say whatever you want without ever having to worry about censorship anywhere. It's a pretty great website at the moment.  Your description of Tumblr is amusingly accurate by the way. 
its not the drip its the filter i object to  slow release allows for prioritzation and cherrypicking and damage control i have no doubt some of it will never see daylight
I don't think there *needs* to be a group in control - the simple objective of capitalism points everyone in the same direction.  Yet bizarrely I often see people one minute complaining about mega corporations and monopolies, and yet the next minute spouting out libertarian and conservative talking points about "smaller government", less regulation and the always hilarious *invisible hand*.   I don't know quite how to fix it, but at the moment I can't see any reason to believe it's anything other than the entirely predictable outcome of a system that places profit as the overall driving principle and puts a few limits on that as possible.
bravo much longer than a hundred years tho
syria is stalling the plan and has been for a while expect war with iran within days or weeks of that airspace opening up
Sadly I think that is too complicated for the avg person to understand.
&gt; Rule 4 ***&amp; 5***   &gt; 5. No politics  But let's just mention rule 4 because it sounds more conspiratorial. Even while 3 of the top 50 stories on /r/all today were about Pao's extortion of her past firm. But *NO*, this is *all* about some grand Illuminati magic designed to destroy the greatest political weapon in the word: reddit!  Way to keep yourself relevant, /r/conspiracy. If you're going to be weird and crazy, can't you at least keep it to issues that actually matter like the NSA and TPP? Why are you wasting your insanity energies on shit like Ellen fucking Pao cartoons on a terrible default sub? At least have a modicum of respect for your fucking ideals. God damn.
I'm a little clueless here, I haven't really kept up to date with this.   Who is Ellen Pao? Why does everyone hate her? I see comments saying "I can't wait for Reddit to die", "Reddit is done". Why do those people still use Reddit?   For someone that uses Reddit to catch up on gaming news, look at cool user submitted pictures and.. cats! Why is Reddit such a bad place?   To the people saying they are leaving Reddit, they've had enough. Why are you leaving?   I may get downvoted and shit but I just don't know what has been happening. 
But there are so many men out there
No, it doesn't.  Why would anyone kill Aaron Swartz, especially when he was already being prosecuted for a crime?  There is no reason anyone would kill him.  
Where did I say that he was killed by the man?
[deleted]
[deleted]
It would still be deleted from /r/funny because of rule #5.  This post would fall under that rule too, so it looks more like OP is angry because the mods chose the wrong flair when they deleted it.
[deleted]
Christ, the Reddit martyr complex sure is something. 
Depicting Pao as the Chinese government in a tank driving over a snoo as a symbol of the reddit community to protest policies related to censorship and free speech is explicitly politics. Non-governmental isn't inherently non-political. 
"Our government did 9/11.  Our media is covering it up."
When you become the face of an organization, and your actions don't reflect the community you're going to have problems.   Censoring our voices doesn't help her cause. If she wanted to make a difference she would start by treating all content equally, and not give privilege to her status as CEO by censoring criticism.   "Power tends to corrupt, and absolute power corrupts absolutely"
But muh conspiracy 
It's a word that sounds like a foreigner. 
No you're being down voted because you are defending this greedy bitch.  There is a method for dealing with bad users and it's worked fine for 8 years!  Now all the sudden, strangely at the same time this clown is trying to extort money from anywhere she can, mass censorship must be brought in to "protect the innocent"  This is the 2nd case she has brought forth that exactly matches the judgements against her "husband".   Fuck EP. 
I've read everything you've said. I'm trying to defuse the conflict here, friend. You're angry, and you're pissed off that I post things you don't agree with. Fine, but unless you can magically become someone who can engage in a detached and informed historiographical debate, there's not much further this can go.
&gt; Oh get off your high horse you self righteous cunt.  Can you explain to me how I'm being self righteous?  &gt;How the hell are you going to SEE censorship, and how dumb are you to not realize that's the entire point?  Because people complain about it.  If they didn't we wouldn't be here having this discussion.  Your argument is literally "we can't see censorship so it must be happening", yet you can present zero evidence it is happening in the subs I frequent.  When was /r/climbing censored?  /r/bicycling?  /r/slowcooking?  
Sorcha Faal is disinfo.   Google it.
We should actually do this tomorrow. Just flood /r/funny with Ellen Pao cartoons.
Go back to your hive mind and enjoy being controlling on what you can and cannot say. This isn't racist nor something offensive, it was a funny comic of how someone felt on the situation with Ellen.   It starts with this and next thing they're  censoring news you might or they find offensive,  and now they start banning offensive discussion and now all of reddit it just one big controlled flow of media to control and persuade you thinking a certain way or get you to invest in something. Example what if reddit starts to have a deal with comcast and everything you say about them they find offensive and they start to remove all related post and comments.   Just like all good things, it comes to end. Reddit was a site where you talk about or mention things that you can't bring up on your own personal social media or in person. Now that big companies are looking at reddit (google), you'll start to see some slight change they'll slow incorporate "user profiles", "connect to local redditors in your area" and "sponsored events"  Random acts of pizza will be hosted by papa John's, reddit meet up with be hosted by meet up and secret Santa will be hosted by amazon. It never going to end. You're just a cow in a herd.   Whenever there is a large gathering of people on a site, companies and media outlet cannot just us sit there freely, we're a huge hive mind with money and they'll pay reddit millions to allow them to have some level of influence on what makes it to the front page or better yet, what gets removed.   Don't know if you watched the google i/o event but on the stage and on the main floor you saw the reddit alien, if that's not a sign I don't know is. Those people who got shadow banned and content removed, think twice about it and start to ask questions. You'd be surprised how far a simple question will take you. 
[deleted]
I was quoting Voltaire as far as I know, you twit. Oh the irony. Lmao.  Well keep painting me as an antisemite my Jewish friends are finding it funny. 
[deleted]
Why? What?
It's actually grounded in FAKE equality issues, like women earning less than men.   They use ambiguous statistics (I.e. Women make $.76 to a man's $1. Really this statistic indicates the workforce is 76 women per 100 men and they make the same amount of money) and then conflate those statistics to be proof of the patriarchy or oppression. 
TIL the difference between 'oppress' and 'suppress' 
[deleted]
Do you still pay taxes?
Can you provide any reproducible proof of curvature of the Earth? It should be easy to document and yet...  I notice you didn't respond to a single point from the video.
Ridiculous ideas deserve ridicule. 
[deleted]
It's one thing to attempt to depict a fictional figure who was a pedophile, than deny a cultural genocide that had first-hand records kept by Germans.  Nice try though.
Easy, friend. All I've done is explained how removing Jews from the civil service was a primarily nationalist goal to the NSDAP and its supporters. They saw Jews as politically separate, and many German Jews saw themselves this way too -- thus, to the NSDAP it was an issue of sovereignty and indigenous control over the mechanisms of state.  There is plenty that is contradictory and surprising about the "Nazi" revolution, their reforms, the war, even the evolution of NS racial ideology -- but something tells me you would have some problems moving beyond the Haunted House version of the history.
I'm not your guy, buddy.
No, I get the reason. Youre just a bitch doing what a bitch does.
That reminds me of some levels of Donkey Kong Country on SNES.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tjxqmW3B2GY
Hey JIDF, hey Israel, Hey Netanyahu. We know the charades you've been playing. The trick you've been playing is outdated and we are onto your shit. No more. The ruse is up.   FUCK ZIONISTS!
If you believe in a spherical earth,  you literally believe down is up and up is down.  You have been indoctrinated into a state of helpless ignorance; you are already a slave to lies in your mind,  completely lost,  and easily controlled. 
Free Speech for [**Jews like Pamela Geller, and Jon Stewart**](https://yukonjack2013.files.wordpress.com/2015/05/pamela-geller-wins-most-disgusting-jew-award.jpg?w=720), but it's shamelessly denied to Goyim who question "The Holocaust".  The Jew owned media would go "antisemite" apeshit if some Goy attempted to give Pamela Geller the "Most Disgusting Jew" award?
&gt; The Nazis weren't especially good people.  Who would you view as good people during WW2?
I can't believe you people buy into this 'holohoax' nonsense. Don't you have better things to be getting angry about
Oh ok, I guess I can go back to sleep because you're not concerned with something you haven't researched.
No, I need you to provide evidence for your assertions.
How much does a 5 gallon reverse osmosis jug cost?  Does amazon sell them?
Thanks for acting like a typical redditor and assuming what I believe and automatically falling into the "you're wrong and I'm right." argument.   I don't believe in the flat earth. Nor do I believe in the globe. The reason I don't believe in either is because I have never seen conclusive proof for either with my "own eyes" and neither have you.   I have never been to space and I'm very confident you have not. We have never seen the earth with our own eyes and likely never will. The only reason I'm even replying is because you seem like a douche,   I'm most certainly not on a particular side of this debate. However being a douche is no way to win an argument. Respectful conversation is the only way to speak no matter how crazy the conspiracy or subject is.
Who's to say anyone bought it? The book appears to be a listing of eye witness accounts as found by or given to the author. Both the author and the reader are at perfect rights to decide for themselves whether they find it a reasonable account or not. It's the historical approach pioneered by Herodotus (with his reporting upon stories of fire breathing ants and the like) and which we continue to employ to this day.
Je suis Ellen Pao
No photos of the **public** "biking accident" is a big red flag for me.  (That would seem to be a political paparazzi wet dream.)
How fucking autistic are you? Can we please stop this shit? Posting on reddit is not brave. It's not a right. You're not standing up to anyone. You're not being censored, you're being moderated. Tank man risked his life (and most likely lost it) making a symbolic move against a tyrannical regime. You shitpost on a website for memes and pictures of cats then cry oppression. Get fucked retard. 
Limited Liability!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
its so sad how dumbed down society is today, it really is. at times it feels like its not even worth trying to spread the truth because theres so many people who will instantly attack you and call you crazy.
Good on you! 
they can't too much hangs on the narrative they've spun us...
&gt; Didn't realize there was a ridiculous agenda.  There isn't. 
[deleted]
This sub isn't a default sub.  Only those who are subscribed to it see these posts appear on their frontpage. There's not one general frontpage...
[Thanks for the criticism](http://i2.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/856/704/8b2.jpg)
This is as much harassment as a comment of mine which was removed once, because the moderator didn't agree with my opinion, and clearly stated so. Now and then, mods remove stuff for personal reasons (both here and other fora), rather than community reasons, and it's my belief that those kinda people shouldn't be in any position that gives them authority. 
&gt; The game is over, we can't win, it's rigged  So then why ever worry about saying "he won't be forgotten" - much less make any effort to try to actually remember him or anyone like him - if, as you're saying here, "the game is already over, we can't win, it's rigged", etc, etc, etc. ?  If that's the case, then fuck Michael Hastings.  Fuck him, fuck Chelsea Manning, fuck anyone who's trying to fight the power, no?  They're empty words at that point if that's the case.  &gt; if you expose it or try to fight it they kill you.  [So fucking what, man](http://cfs5.tistory.com/upload_control/download.blog?fhandle=YmxvZzExNDUzN0BmczUudGlzdG9yeS5jb206L2F0dGFjaC8wLzAxMDAwMDAwMDAxNi5naWY%3D)?  There are FAR worse things than death.
I have seen countless examples of your outrageous lies and distortions on the politics board. I am well aware of your character. You employ standard disinformation and trolling tactics.  Go and actually read the articles. The USA Freedom Act legalizes the Mass Surveillance State (which the Patriot Act didn't) to build a surveillance dossier on everyone for domestic political control and is effectively only subject to limitations by the kangaroo, rubber stamp FISA court - which are no limitations at all.  Again I refer you to the same linked article previously mentioned:-  The so-called Freedom Act would actually legitimize all spying all the time on all of us in ways that the Patriot Act fails to do http://ian56.blogspot.com/2015/05/the-so-called-freedom-act-would.html  Go and read it.
You do know that fluouride is good for the health of your teeth? It prevents decay in small doses (fluorosis is only a problem with quite a bit)
Then hes doing his job correctly.
The /s meant sarcasm. Anyway, his little trip over to the camps don't even mention homicidal gassings.
Read "Gideon's Spies". It's a fascinating account of Mossad. One story reveals Mossad added a secret back door to American spy software which was sold to other western intelligence agencies. They did this in the later 1970s. 
im a bad writer.. much better copy-paster 
And since it's a cyber attack, there's no way to prove it did or didn't happen.  So easy to just make shit up.  
This is amazing. How does she get away with it? How does the EU save face in a situation like that?
agreed. although, in retrospect, I think they shot to kill, and knew it.
Only to the people who don't want others to hold an opinion that conflicts with their own. 
If you try to pin down a mythology to an exact set of events, and you later find that some of those events are false, what happens to your mythology? It falls apart. In order to keep the myth of the Holocaust alive, it is necessary that the details of the Holocaust remain fluid -- that is to say, it is necessary that the details remain vague and mutable, so that they can never be pinned down. That's why it's so hard to define exactly what the Holocaust is. It's a great big beach ball of emotion floating on a shifting quicksand of changing "facts".
well it doesn't get much crazier than a 'western' propagandist unless its an 'eastern' one. so much money being made by both sides leaders off all this war and the only way to stop it is for all of us to turn our backs on them.
Not that I disagree with the message he's bringing up, but I've heard of this joke and I don't live in the US.
[deleted]
It seems you have submitted a link to a meme or a meme generator. The community has voted in favor of universally removing all meme submissions to /r/conspiracy. Please feel free to submit your meme to /r/conspiracymemes. Sorry for any trouble.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You should post what metaphor you are associating this with.
fo real. are you truly surprised tho?
Yes
You should question rationalwiki.
I do feel sorry for them - that they have caused themselves to be devoid of compassion, honesty, integrity, all things that men hold good. They will lead a life of fear, anger, hatred and guilt, and never know what it is to be truly happy, loving and content.  I am careful that they don't have the same effect on me - make me angry, hateful etc. They say when you stare into the abyss, the abyss stares back at you. I try to treat them in a manner, i would like other people treat me. That's all.  Peace
&gt;  all they did was show you this feed  So what, you think the ISS exists solely for the purpose of mounting a camera to it?
Ooooo, interesting, the reply train to you was deleted. How convenient.
please make a constructive comment
Wait, the peoples Republic of China in the 21st century is good?   
A 767 is incapable of flying at 600mph at that altitude, oh fuck it, all the theories including the official one are bullshit.  Nothing makes sense about 9/11.  The more you look at any theory the more holes you can blow into it.  Maybe it was the work of God. Look up Cipher 6 and see how important the numbers are - 11, 9, 93 - the attack has such deep rooted cipher 6 significance it's untrue.  Yet no powerful society or security service even fucking knows about cipher 6.  It seems the only people who do are very high up occultists (of which there are about 3) and a few computer programmer nerd types.  That's it!  
Wait, they're more brave for discriminating against people?  What Stormfront meetings do you go to?
Dont put that shit on me, YOU dont get it, homie. This few minutes is more than most juries have to go on. That guy's true colors were loud and clear, keep kidding yourself though.
Fun Fact:  William Calley, the only officer convicted in the My Lai Massacre, spent 3 1/2 years in cozy house arrest before being practically pardoned by Nixon, and is walking a free man.  Manning has been imprisoned longer than one of the participants of one of the worst modern US army war crimes.
Yes.  Your last USA President is Obama.
to fight the people with no arguments...
I stopped school once I discovered it was interrupting my education.
Mostly Republicans voted no?
And you haven't. You too. 
There are also hundreds of videos showing astronauts with their hair flying all over.  Some probably use hair products, some don't.  Some people's hair stays in place better than others.  They're just like everyone else in the world.
Don't resort to personal abuse. Say something that adds to conversation or fuck off.
Agreed 
K
I'm on SSRI's and I don't want to murder anyone, nor have I thought of suicide...they actually help me  **WHOA** who would have thought.
Silly question maybe...but can we also take a smaller space, say half mile, and then figure for 4 inches? Is it a constant? I ask because maybe these fellows could find a smaller space and still finally end this absurd conversation. Or, instead of constantly asking us to prove the earth is round, perhaps they could prove its flat? 
Ive only addressed you once and im always honest  Why do people like you act as if we are subversive? We don't advocate for hate speech and jailing people for denying dogmas.    Emotional appeals and disagreeing for the sake of disagreeing isnt a legitimate point its just saying that you are traumatized that im a National Socialist and adding nothing else.   Kind of like being brigaded by conspiratard/isconspiracyracist etc. While they say im the one organizing vote brigade.    Were tired of having Marxist tactics projected onto us
You have to square the distance, so at a distance of 2 miles the curvature would be 32 inches and for half a mile it would be 2 inches (approximately).  So yes, at half a mile the experiment would still work, but the uncorrected theodolite would miss its target by 2 inches.
Probably too big of a coward to have heard it.
The only illegal thing about that in common enforcement is accessing the closet. Do you realize that typing in reddit.com in your browser and hitting enter is a felony in some states because it constitutes accessing a protected computer without explicit permission? Nobody ever gets prosecuted for that, because everybody does it probably a hundred times a day. Accessing the network was the *least* illegal thing he did that day.  There's no point defending yourself against a crime you aren't accused of, especially if your lawyer suggests (assuming you don't want to take plea deals) the best way to get a not-guilty conviction is to keep your mouth shut about crimes you aren't charged with. 
It is actualy an accurate stereotype, tho. When i use sarcasm most of the people i talk to don't understand it.  Btw i wasn't offended in any way by your comment, i even find the surrender joke funny but i hate when people try too hard to be hateful.
As much as I hate apple I have to admit that they do a better job of keeping their users data from the NSA. Tim Cook even refused the government's request to put a backdoor in it's services and said it's something they aren't gonna do. I think this was article I read on it: http://venturebeat.com/2014/01/25/apple-ceo-tim-cook-talks-nsa/
Or #killallwhitemen.  Bahar Mustafa didn't even lose her job as a "diversity officer" at a university for promoting white genocide.
I think ultrasound is a lot safer than dub step.
Probably 
**WHOA** they dont do it to everyone, but it is on the side effects if you read the box label
Corroborates heavy metal spraying from geoengineering activities...  Poor bees! 
[deleted]
And it did not help that the Allied actually had to fight the french navy to prevent it falling in the hands of the Nazies.  http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Attack_on_Mers-el-Kébir
[deleted]
Again, your abstract logic is all but non existent.  You seem unaware of how devoid of basic math and logic your positions is. Everything you have presented is 2 dimensional.  I'm talking a 3 dimensional world.     
There was no "confession" video from 2001. It was "found" in Iraq in 2004 and clearly featured an actor trying to play ~~Goldstein~~ bin Laden.  So much misinfo and confusion re this topic. :/
Great, thanks
We shouldn't define what's going on in the world in absolutes, but there is definitely evidence of control, attempts of more control, and many types of it.
The fact that you've heard Polish jokes but not French jokes makes me very curious about what generation you're from.
[deleted]
Right. So where's your evidence again? EDIT: Downvotes for what? Asking for evidence? Really? I post a picture with evidence (however tenuous that might be) and get downvoted when I ask for anything competing? I can discredit any source, but if you don't have a competing source then don't downvote for me asking for it.  Talk about forum sliding...
There are dots to connect here. They’re real, and they’re spectacular. Let me begin with a brief exchange from a 1978 interview, conducted by reporter Jeremiah Novak. He was speaking with two American members of the Trilateral Commission (TC), a group founded in 1973 by David Rockefeller and his intellectual flunkey, Zbigniew Brzezinski.
[deleted]
Mine was   * Christianity * 9/11 * terrorism * mass media * left/right politics * jews * war on drugs * prison industry * the whole damn government * the whole damn culture * american exceptionalism * white exceptionalism * moon landing  and now I'm on the vatican 
Ew no don't fucking draw Muhammad. Why would you do that?  
haha I love the idea of a bomber called safe space   Maybe a bunker called safe space and she's shooting a 50 cal censorship bullets at words with arms/legs. 
It's an all too common story!  Here it's being censored by the Big Pharma Shills
[deleted]
Nothing :P  (Upvoted you) 
&gt; an improvised mobile gas chamber – a van with the exhaust pipe connected to the inside – shuttled between Mauthausen and Gusen.[37] &gt; Debunked &gt; By December 1941, a permanent gas chamber that could kill about 120 prisoners at a time was completed. &gt; Holocaust promoters don't even agree there was one, they've since abandoned that, you know this /u/shmusko01  Actually that's untrue. Most historians agree there were gas chambers of some sort at Mauthausen.  And that whole debate about CO2 and gas wagons doesn't favour the revisionist stance either.  However, you'll notice the language. Historians who attest to the existence of homicidal gassing facilities don't use the words "prove" very much.  One can certainly say, "It's unclear whether there were gas chambers "(it's not really unclear). One can also say, if one wishes "It doesn't appear there were homocidal gas chambers on the level of other death camps" which would also be true.   And then of course, you posted from Faurisson.  Which again, doesn't "prove" anything.   You could reasonably state something along the lines of "Faurisson suggests..." although it overstates the degree to which historians "debate" over the existence of said facilities and also ignores several other imporant pieces of testimony.
That cop is an idiot. Why does he have to push that girl around like that, SHE IS A GIRL. IS SHE GOING TO KILL YOU OR WHAT?!? This cop is such a fucking pussy. 
First and foremost, thank you for responding and delineating what about the OP link should put it in this sub.  &gt; The campaign to blur the gender lines can be seen as part of a depopulation agenda.  Perhaps, but I do think that one should be careful to not give too much energy to any gender inequality, gender stratification, or gender marginalizing in the process of trying to "not blur the gender lines" and keep them separate.  &gt; The New York Times might be the most extreme propaganda machine in the world.  Wouldn't disagree with this.  &gt; Please note that I have nothing against gay or transgendered individuals, but there is some serious money pushing this gender confusion.   I imagine that gender *confusion* - as with really *any* type of confusion - is certainly not a good thing.  However, I also don't see anything necessarily wrong with any individuals that are just as comfortable with one gender as with another if that's just how they naturally are or what they naturally prefer.  Trying to *force* some sort of "gender sameness" upon society is, of course, not good, but a society where each gender has a very good (even intimate) understanding of the idiosyncrasies of the other, it seems to me, is a *very* good thing, and one that can only help the society be stronger.  At the end of the day, it seems that it's *balance* that is the key.  Don't be too extreme in any end of the spectrum regarding this dynamic one way or the other.  Don't be some extreme "gender separatist" - this creates chauvinism on either side of the gender spectrum - but also don't try to advocate for some sort of "forced sameness" amongst the genders where the attributes of either side are effectively nullified.  Ultimately, it seems the *real* conspiracy here is not even one dealing with genders in general so much as it is the fact that what's being talked about is a form of *extremeness* that should be stayed away from regardless of *what* the topic or subject matter is.  Extremeness in almost any area should be something that one is wary of.  The "middle of the road" path - moderation - should be the general order of the day in many areas.  Not *all* areas or circumstances, of course, but it seems such a philosophy is wise to use more often than not.
Here is the concept in a nutshell. Very strange connections: http://imgur.com/MmBp6SQ
[deleted]
Oh c'mon! Rutherford is Kiwi! He's on our $100 note! Don't take that away from us mate
Nope.  They were swatted for **not having gas and power**  Not for not paying a bill.
Here's one account that agrees with your own hypothesis. I really don't agree with it  but I sometimes wonder how these fine folks can be so er... inhuman.   http://www.bibliotecapleyades.net/sociopolitica/sociopol_ponerology14.htm   I occasionally encounter young children who are already  full fledged sociopaths.   I'm more of the opinion that once they are successful at using power to punish others, they get more and more bold in their punitive behavior against their fellow man.
What about the rest of Arp's peculiar galaxies? all the same eh? kek
So it's a cancerous phenomenon that should be fought against. It's literal idiocracy.
OP its called "yellow face" and the oldest stereotypical drawing of Asians (OK not the oldest but certainly the most famous).   http://yellow-face.com  The picture was obviously done a computer. Why a Chinese stereotypical image ? I don't know, it can be anything, a signal or the only piece of paper they had at the moment !!   But certainly it has nothing to do with MacFarlane !!
Escape into fantasy land with Nancy "kill your pets because the world is ending" Leider : https://youtu.be/9B6QDSzq1A0  Her stuff makes for an interesting read, but it is just fiction.
[deleted]
Freedom ain't free...
Yep.  Pretty funny how in the top TIL posts you see things about Teddy Roosevelt and Abraham Lincoln, and those weren't flagged for politics.
Right, well that's the plan. See the current arming and training of ISIS. Why waste resources on killing them yourselves, when you can radicalize them and get them to kill each other. 
Those were the complaints yes but that's not what happened. One can easily call the cops and make up stories as we've seen being done right before several police shootings.  I'm very interested in your last comment. Are you saying the cops were specifically called to remove black people?
Why is that obviously not the solution? Do you have an alternative?  To clarify: an alternative *that will work*?
I'm not saying that the US didn't start it. I'm saying that the Iraqi people don't intend to stop it, we've trained countless military and police forces for their shitty country so they can defend themselves.   They were given the best weaponry and supplies they could have. and at the first sight of a terrorist they all fucking cower and run. They've abandoned entire bases, giving all supplies and control to terrorist groups. These people don't want their country to be a safe and good place. So why should we help them any more than we already have?
The term "joo" is a derisive slur and comments containing it will always be removed.
Well, pseudo hard. Better than dollars on the bank's ledger that can be devalued at will.
(deleted) Sure, only one.
Classic.   &gt;Uh, yeah, it's still 4 1/2 hours until 12. I'd like to know how he gave his midnight speech already.  How do you tell this guy that the sun rises in the east? 
[ISIS has 1B$ worth of US Humvee's](http://www.ibtimes.com/isis-has-1b-worth-us-humvee-armored-vehicles-one-was-used-mondays-suicide-bombing-1946521?utm_content=buffercbcf4&amp;utm_medium=social&amp;utm_source=facebook.com&amp;utm_campaign=buffer)
Doesn't matter Chaney got PAID, son. W ftw. 
Mostly because the US military hasn't invaded them...yet.
Of course you'd get down voted for that. Case in point.
Bad link.
Big dif was snow got the legit official documents to show for it, Bin just states what he saw w/o docs
This will have been a pathetically short lived empire. 
If you plan on scrolling through all the comment, I'd advise against it. I'll give you the rundown.  ITT: OP won't time stamp or give the source for either picture, and won't comment on it either. My guess is he/she is biased and no context = up votes. Or he just pick a few random pictures and made all of this up for points.  A few US military members questioning the validity (no answer) because it never looked like this when they were there.  A few people saying it's better than when Hussein/ISIS/AQ/whoever was in power. OP calling them dumb or some shit.  There's something about how this picture PROVES the U.S. is only there for oil? I don't know, I cringed reading pretty much every comment because there is absolutely no source to go off of. Don't waste your time, OP hasn't circle jerked enough America hate this week or whatever.
a simple google search can answer his question. 
I'm not talking about Jenner directly per se, just the larger message of issues transgender people have in today's society.  If it takes one narcissist celebrity trying to stay relevant to shine a larger light on transgender issues as a whole then it's a good thing.
[deleted]
I was not voting. I noticed there was not a down arrow and got interested in the circle. I did not click on anything. I "scrolled"&lt;--key word..over it and it automatically said it.
I'm doing that atm.   **EDIT:** Finished!
Europeans created USA. Africans and Chinese did very little to help to create USA. Zionist Khazars and Islamist Arabs own more African slaves than Europeans.
This is the kind of stuff that causes me to be nervous around police when I'm in the USA, I was there on vacation a couple weeks ago and everytime I saw a policecar or even policemen in general, it made me nervous.   Even though in the back of my mind I knew very well I hadn't done anything and thus should not have been afraid, but the presence of these people just gave me a bad feeling. It's probably because I'm reading way too many negative stories about the USA police, but still. Being afraid of cops is not a good thing, but unfortunately that is what happens when actions like these are covered by the media.   The thing is though, I don't live there, so I can't even begin to imagine what it's like to live in these cities knowing there's idiots like that with guns running around. It's sad...   ps; jesus christ, the way he pulled his gun and those kids started running, what went through their heads? I would've shat my pants, that's for sure. 
[deleted]
How often were you dropped as a child? 
Did you find my comment? :)
Fair point.  Maybe Social Security is an example of such a program ?  Set it up as a fairly separate program or agency, such as the Post Office, so it's easy to follow the money ?
Stop trying to justify the reasoning behind him resisting arrest and looking like he had a weapon which was his intentions. You don't keep a phone in you're waste band and reach in to adjust volume. He clearly heard the officer especially if he responded with "fuck you fool" I feel bad for the guy but if you do what you're suppose to when it comes to situations as that he would be alive.
&gt;Awesome false equivalency.  &gt;It's hilarious you retards really believe that Russia and America are equally totalitarian   ?? All I asked for him was to explain his statement. Where did I say what I believed? You're arguing against something in your head, nothing I said. Where do you even get false equivalency from? I only asked him to explain what he said.
Is the video he is talking about out?
I dunno. I always thought "anyone" being murdered was a big issue. 
i see
wat my ass.
[deleted]
Wasn't drinking, wasn't speeding. I see nothing here that degrades him as a person. I feel sorry for everyone involved.
Did you proofread at all?  This is a fucking mess. 
Looks more like the media is confused about science. Nothing new there. 
Check out the comments on world news.  Fascinating 
i live in palm beach county and i asked my palm beach cop friend about that sheriff coke deal on the golf course. he said "it shouldn't matter, it was a private party" 
I'm pretty sure every pilot and sailor in the world will agree the world is round,  because to date, even with all the shipping and traveling the world does, nobody has fallen over the edge.  No one has flown into the void or an "ice wall",  and several people have managed circumnavigate the world on fucking sail boats.  Let's move on. 
Fine. I can tell when I'm not loved :(
[Remember the USS Liberty, a distinctive and easily identifiable US Navy vessel which on this day 48 years ago was attacked by Israel in international waters, killing 34 American sailors and injuring 172 others.](https://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/390ym8/june_8th_1967_remember_the_uss_liberty_a/)
I have read a bunch of the flat earth stuff.  I think the most compelling argument may be the curvature in relation to distance.  But even that is half ignorant, as the earth isnt a perfect sphere...   I like to entertain the thought that maybe the earth is way larger than we are being told.  I think that is more plausible.  This too should be able to be disproven though...   
"Navy Research Vessel"  LOL!
Oh.  right.  Considering where we were, I went with the assumed earnestness.  Baleeted.
**abut the numbers** Israel build bomb shelters...and in every building there is a reinforced room...Hamas decided to build tunnels instead of shelters...priorities...i'm not going to ask forgiveness for having better protection...while they use the civilians areas for military purposes.  **about Hamas** it was the Intifada...and there was a free for all madness in the territories and the PLO was in Tunisia...Hamas was not created by Israel but Israel recognized it as the resistance movement in the territories and that created an order in the actions during the Intifada  now there are ISIS supporters in Gaza...and you'll see Israel dealing with Hamas again...  **about ISIS** is so hard to understand the will and initiative of the arabs that always have to be create the fault of a western country?...are the arabs so lazy to do anything on their own...  **Israel** Rothschild bought the land where the first kibbutz were build...  don't take the words of the haredi jews to much serious...in the dogma of Judaism...a jewish state can only be create by the messiah, not by a political movement...for them Israel should not exist...they also believe that the holocaust was a punishment by god...  i can only post one comment every 10 min...
Do you have any links or anything you can share?  This is mad interesting  
If you think it's round, a bunch of fallen angels could come in claiming to be aliens warning us of an impending asteroid and you'd be none the wiser. It also discredits the Bible, considering the scriptures are clear that our world is not a ball with other worlds existing "out there."  By the way, if you don't understand how people can sail around a flat world... that means you've clearly never even looked at the model or the evidence and you have no room to comment on the matter.
:] U MAD BRO?
No, Saudi Royal Family + Bush Administration + CIA + Israeli Mossad = 9/11
It would also explain the epidemic of breast cancer, which includes men now.
I am...  i have never understood how this began...
Well, that's interesting. But it still comes down to location. As long as the lawmakers of Texas are firm creationists, most people with differing perspectives are not going to gain much traction there, trans or not.  &gt; And just the general fact of having the right to live your life without being tormented for being different.  That's human nature. People fear what is different. I was tormented growing up for liking Dungeons &amp; Dragons and Magic: the Gathering and anime. Does that really compare? No, probably not, but everybody has something about them others don't like. The point is that you cannot make people accept you for being different. That kind of change has to happen from within the other group. The law won't change their opinion, but it does protect you from discrimination, especially if you choose to live in a progressive state where people are less likely to condemn you for who you are.
If you and I are both in agreement that the cops were called there to remove black people then you and I are both in agreement that this was racially based.  You are talking a lot of nonsense right now. Nobody got in a police officers face, there was no running amuck or destroying of property....are you even listening to yourself?  If I was one of those cops I would have done what the other cops did and calmly talked to the kids. Not what super trooper did rolling around and acting crazy towards black kids.  And did you really just link to Tommy Sotomayor, the biggest racist on the internet, whose very house is paid for by the KKK.  You need to look at your life guy.
[deleted]
No im not angrily dismissing something. A middle school Child could disprove the flat earth theori. But yeah keep believing NASA and every  goverment has been hiding the fact that earth is flat. For this conspiracy to be true thousand if not millions should be in on the big conspiracy to fool everybody on earth to believe the earth is curved. If you cant see how stupid that is you lost touch with reality.   I dont see how my post count in this subreddit is relevant to the discussion on flat earth.
i was not born in Israel...i arrived with 25 years...so even if the people here was "brainwash"...i was not part of that...  **because people disagree with what you believe** if it was the other way it would not be real...
Socialist paradise has produced quite a virile resistance.
Are you saying that Jim Morrisons dad being a naval commander and him being a rock star is not a coincidence?  I would like more info.  What other famous musicians had military connections and how is that important?
[deleted]
[deleted]
This needs a lot more shares and retweets. Brand says a ton of defensible, salient, compelling things, while yet another in a long line of statist / corporate propagandist shills regurgitates the same tired status quo stances.
That the human homosexual population has remained constant through history appears to defy that theory.
&gt;Motor vehicle accident knocks out power in downtown Vancouver  &gt;A large power outage that impacted several blocks in downtown Vancouver on Monday afternoon is expected to be over soon.     http://www.vancouversun.com/news/metro/Motor+vehicle+accident+knocks+power+downtown+Vancouver/11119185/story.html#ixzz3cVSPiTAw 
No one wants to put money where their mouth is. 
What if WW3 is to start on November 3rd(11.3) and end on November 5th(11.5). Considering it would be a nuclear war, it would be over very fast(2 days) with most of the world destroyed.   I could be wrong but that was just my thought.
C'mon people...Who really thinks that there is a Syrian Electric Army full of hackers with enough sophistication to hack U.S. government sites with impunity from overseas?    Is anybody really buying into this story?    Where are the best programmers in the middle east?  Israel.   Which country has practically unlimited access to our phone networks?  Israel.   Who benefits from the world getting pissed at Muslims?  You guessed it: Israel.     You are being manipulated.
Is tower triangulation accurate enough for a drone strike?
I called it the minute the thread went up.
And now the weather.
This right here. I think that's what it's all about. And to just make a small little Popup that goes right in line with what alternative media in the US has been saying about the Syrian war, they can use it to further divide the masses on this issue. The brainwashing is several levels deep.
I like Russell Brand but he doesn't come off that great in the middle part of this interview. He got too wound up but I guess he didn't want to caught in any traps.  edit: I thought he handled the 9/11 question pretty well.
He also oversaw the Gulf Of Tonkin incident that kicked off the war in Vietnam.
Those 401k programs, and most retirement funds, are not run as co-ops so the ownership of the bonds/debt is still not with the majority of the American people. 
Oh, sorry. Didn't realize you were talking to yourself.   It's okay I'll show myself out. 
Here you go.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Andrew_Wakefield  The mans name is Andrew Wakefield. His falsified study started the modern "Vaccines cause austism" belief. The study was never able to be replicated (which is the entire basis of science) and after being investigated it was discovered to be fraudulent.   So really, my point is, this entire discussion is fucking infuriating for anyone who actually knows the history of the movement. 
Top of the queue in /r/conspiracy. What is it you guys are always posting? "While you were distracted by" garbage?  Well while you were distracted by your pet story, the story about a man committing suicide after being held without charges for 3 years is nowhere to be found in this subreddit.  Distracted...   "BUT BUT BUT... It's RUSSELL!!!"
Over weight Americans with low blood pressure due to clogged arteries are far more easy to manipulate due to lack of exigences in the brain.
Eh. The main reason most people here want it labeled is so they can drop papers around that say "GMO = POISON!!". Obviously that would be damaging to the brand if someone without an earlier opinion or education on the subject was to see that (e.g. most of America who probably doesn't know or care atm).   IMO if someone does care that much, they shouldn't be buying anything not labeled "non-gmo" anyway which was what i was saying earlier. 
[deleted]
He was US backed but certainly not a puppet regime.
[deleted]
&gt;I have already posted evidence it was kiev.  You've have posted 0 evidence. The Dutch reports, you can read have already proven it was the rebels.  yes, www.globalresearch.ca I such a terrible site that it even is discredited by conspiracy theorist.  Only Putler propaganda agents post it as a source.
There is, you may not all agree on the same things, but you're in the sub /r/conspiracy so you're all conspiracy theorists, and that's what I was referring to, not only people in this sub, but all conspiracy theorists everywhere.
Everyone in /r/funny is funny?
Don't watch loose change, it's a terrible documentary full of holes. The above poster "imjonillling" is obviously sending you the wrong direction telling you to read snopes (a known disinfo site) to "decide for yourself".  A much better documentary to watch would be "9/11 a new pearl harbor". 
So a Zionist is a... reflection? For a subrediit for conspiracies y'all aren't very detail oriented.
Did he make a profit? 
&gt;I've been a fireman since 1993 and class one construction(the twin towers) has never before or since melted structural steel and collapsed a building at free fall speed(for you non-physics types).  And how many class one construction buildings have been hit by a 767 since 1993?   &gt; I'd where the same fucking patch if I rode with them.  lol
[deleted]
My god man, there are books on the subject. There are so many reasons. 
America was warned by numerous agencies and countries that a attack would happen -[the magnitude was impossible to imagine ... ](http://usatoday30.usatoday.com/news/washington/2004-04-18-norad_x.htm) oh wait... 
What about the chemtrails that all planes obviously spray everywhere? Could they melt steel beeams?
I think in a lot of ways we were. They just didn't realize what a nightmare they were inviting in.
&gt;...like a rubber band...we will snap back with exponentially more force than what was put on us.  That's not how physics works. That's how fucking *flubber* works, you witless gobshite.  
Yes i totally agree. you can see the whole earth concave as the craft wobbles. Massive fish eye effect.
Yes, [night piloting is proof that the Earth is flat](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v1ghbNISeW0).  When we look up at the stars, we can see that they rotate around Polaris, the pole star at the North Pole. [The star trails that we can observe are proof of a Flat Earth](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=afsb39_6QF0).  Meanwhile, the heliocentrists claim we are constantly moving through outer space at extremely high speeds, with our direction changing wildly regularly. And yet our view of the stars remains mostly unchanged, and so they have introduced orders of magnitude of more millions of miles in between their theories. The stars are just so far away now, that like everything else bundled under relativity, they don't appear to have the movement they should!
Nomination for the next sidebar picture!
That is how its implemented (still just scratching the surface). But can you try and describe the feeling in a way a robot can understand? :P
Dang. 
If you actually researched it you'd have no doubts - unless you're a lowlife shill cunt, "Considerable resource have been applied to investigate 9/11" - the evidence was disposed of immediately and more was spent investigating Monica Lewinsky. 
11 doesn't sound that surprising. 
It is becoming the majority. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A7tSfwkKaUo
all the stuff i found about autism had to do with the mercury which they have mostly discontinued using (without admitting any wrong, of course)  
[deleted]
I was amazed at what he does when he's not being an actor as well;  I had nonexistent respect for him until I watched some of his Trews material.  I certainly don't agree with all of his actions or view points, but my respect for him skyrocketed.  Easily the smartest actor I'm familiar with;  though.. that doesn't say much considering how much I follow the film industry =p
That's the stuff of which I speak.  It may be taboo, but that stuff ultimately saved a LOT more lives than it extinguished.
Dan Dicks is a great Canadian.  If you haven't, I suggest watching more of the videos on his youtube channel.  The 15 minute video featured on 'home' is a great intro to how false flags are used against us to create fear and take away our civil liberties.  It uses references to CBC news stories and so is accessible to people you might know who scoff at any conspiracy theory.
Wut
I'm not a defender or believer of any of these theories, but in the case of atc knowing where and how fast they planes were going, it's not so black and white. Transponders in aircraft are manually controlled for a myriad of different reasons and can be manually overridden, or even turned off easily. That is something that is taught to someone who is learning to fly a Cessna very early on. Anyone with any flight training would know how to do so.   I don't know if it exists or not, but I would want to see absolute indisputable evidence of atc knowing the heading, position, speed and altitude of the planes before I ever tried to use any of those facts to prove or disprove any theories on conspiracies regarding 9/11.
[deleted]
Probably hiding that there was no porn collection, because there was no Bin Laden.
Psyops Warfare...Become familiar with it.  
[Those are just fallstreak holes.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fallstreak_hole)
Jet fuel can't melt steel beams, so why was there molten metal at the WTC collapse sites?  NIST claims that WTC 1&amp;2 collapsed due to jet fueled fires (just normal offices fires for WTC7) which were not hot enough to produce molten steel or iron, but also claim that if there had been molten steel or iron in the debris afterwards, it would have been irrelevant to the cause of the collapses. The evidence of molten steel or iron cannot be called “irrelevant,” given the fact that the building fires, as NIST pointed out, cannot explain it.  -----------  **Physical Evidence**  -----  * [Early in 2002, Barnett and two WPI colleagues published an analysis of a section of steel from one of the Twin Towers, along with sections from WTC 7, as an appendix to FEMA’s 2002 World Trade Center Building Performance Study](http://www.fema.gov/pdf/library/fema403_apc.pdf) * [Their discoveries were also reported in a WPI article entitled “The ‘Deep Mystery’ of Melted Steel,” which said:](http://www.wpi.edu/News/Transformations/2002Spring/steel.html)  &gt; Steel – which has a melting point of 2,800 degrees Fahrenheit – may weaken and bend, but does not melt during an ordinary office fire. Yet metallurgical studies on WTC steel brought back to WPI reveal that a novel phenomenon – called a eutectic reaction – occurred at the surface, causing intergranular melting capable of turning a solid steel girder into Swiss cheese.  * [Stating that the New York Times called these findings “perhaps the deepest mystery uncovered in the investigation,” the article added:](http://www.wpi.edu/News/Transformations/2002Spring/steel.html)  &gt;A one-inch column has been reduced to half-inch thickness. Its edges – which are curled like a paper scroll – have been thinned to almost razor sharpness. Gaping holes – some larger than a silver dollar – let light shine through a formerly solid steel flange. This Swiss cheese appearance shocked all of the fire-wise professors, who expected to see distortion and bending – but not holes.  * [In May 2004, the RJ Lee Group issued a report, entitled “WTC Dust Signature,” at the request of the Deutsche Bank, in order to prove \(to its insurance company\) that the building was “pervasively contaminated with WTC Dust](http://web.archive.org/web/20131204202627/http://www.ae911truth.org/documents/WTCDustSignature_ExpertReport.051304.1646.mp_.pdf) The report listed five elements in this signature, one of which was: “Spherical iron and spherical or vesicular silicate particles that result from exposure to high temperature  * [In 2005, the United States Geological Survey \(USGS\) published a report entitled “Particle Atlas of World Trade Center Dust,” which was intended to aid the “identification of WTC dust components.” Among the components, it reported, were “metal or metal oxides” (which could not be distinguished by the USGS’s methods). “The primary metal and metal-oxide phases in WTC dust,” the report said, “are Fe-rich \[iron-rich\] and Zn-rich [zinc-rich] particles](http://pubs.usgs.gov/of/2005/1165/508OF05-1165.html) * [Extremely high temperatures during the World Trade Center destruction](http://journalof911studies.com/articles/WTCHighTemp2.pdf)  * [Journal of the American Society of Safety Engineers](http://911research.wtc7.net/cache/wtc/analysis/asse_groundzero1.htm) &gt;The debris pile at Ground Zero was always tremendously hot. Thermal measurements taken by helicopter each day showed underground temperatures ranging from 400ºF to more than 2,800ºF * [Sources related to exceptionally high temperatures, and/or to persistent heat at Ground Zero](http://911research.wtc7.net/papers/dreger/GroundZeroHeat2008_07_10.pdf)  * FEMA documents in their [Appendix C of its May 2002 WTC Building Performance Assessment Team study](http://www.fema.gov/media-library-data/20130726-1512-20490-8452/403_apc.pdf), for sample 1, “evidence of a severe high temperature corrosion attack on the steel, including oxidation and sulfidation with subsequent intergranular melting.” A “sulfur-rich liquid” containing “primarily iron, oxygen, and sulfur” “penetrated” into the steel.   -----  **Testimonial Evidence**  -----  **Testimony from Firefighters:**  * [New York Fire Department Captain Philip Ruvolo said: “You’d get down below and you’d see molten steel, molten steel, running down the channel rails, like you’re in a foundry, like lava.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uQyIN6OTMyY) * [Joe O’Toole, a Bronx firefighter who worked on the rescue and cleanup efforts, reported that one beam lifted from deep below the surface months later, in February 2002, “was dripping from the molten steel.”](http://fallenbrothers.com/community/showthread.php?2062-Recovery-worker-reflects-on-months-spent-at-Ground-Zero&amp;p=2948) * [New York firefighters recalled in the documentary film Collateral Damages, “heat so intense they encountered rivers of molten steel.”](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3_G21B2qiQM)  -----  **Testimony from Other Professionals:**  -----  * [Leslie Robertson, a member of the engineering firm that designed the World Trade Center, said 21 days after the attack: “When we were down at the B1 level, one of the firefighters said, ‘I think you’d be interested in this,’ and they pulled up a big block of concrete and there was a, like a little river of steel, flowing.”](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rjmHqES_lto&amp;t=40s) * [Ron Burger, a public health advisor at the National Center for Environmental Health who arrived at Ground Zero September 12, 2001, said: “Feeling the heat, seeing the molten steel, the layers upon layers of ash, like lava, it reminded me of Mt. St. Helen’s and the thousands who fled that disaster.”](http://web.archive.org/web/20060909104247/http://www.seau.org/SEAUNews-2001-10.pdf) * [In late fall 2001, Dr. Alison Geyh of the Johns Hopkins School of Public Health reported: “Fires are still actively burning and the smoke is very intense. In some pockets now being uncovered, they are finding molten steel.”](http://www.jhsph.edu/Publications/Special/Welch.htm) * [Joe Allbaugh, the Director of FEMA, said in an October 2001 interview on CBS: “It’s just too hot for rescuers to get into \[some\] areas. So we do not know yet what’s in those areas, other than very hot, molten material.”](http://web.archive.org/web/20130730103131/http://911encyclopedia.com/wiki/index.php/Publication:20121014014812) * Dr. Keith Eaton reported in Structural Engineer: “They showed us many fascinating slides . . . ranging from molten metal which was still red hot weeks after the event, to 4-inch thick steel plates sheared and bent in the disaster.” * [Don Carson, a hazardous materials expert from the National Operating Engineers Union, said six weeks after 9/11: “There are pieces of steel being pulled out from as far as six stories underground that are still cherry red.”](http://web.archive.org/web/20060818074723/http:/pqasb.pqarchiver.com/nydailynews/87451160.html?did=87451160&amp;FMT=ABS&amp;FMTS=FT&amp;date=Nov+1,+2001&amp;author=GREG+GITTRICH+DAILY+NEWS+STAFF+WRITER&amp;pub=New+York+Daily+News&amp;desc=FIRE+MAY+SMOLDER+FOR+MONTHS) * [OSHA respond to the underground fires and potential steam explosions](http://imgur.com/CCqRzAo)     &gt; Underground fires burned at temperatures up to 2,000 degrees. As the huge cranes pulled steel beams from the pile, safety experts worried about the effects of the extreme heat on the crane rigging and the hazards of contact with the hot steel. And they were concerned that applying water to cool the steel could cause a steam explosion that would propel nearby objects with deadly force. Special expertise was needed. **OSHA called in Mohammad Ayub and Scott Jin, structural engineers from its national office, to assess the situation. They recommended a special handling procedure, including the use of specialized rigging and instruments.**  -----  **Testimony from Other Credible Witnesses:**  -----  * [Greg Fuchek, vice president of a company that supplied computer equipment used to identify human remains, reported that “sometimes when a worker would pull a steel beam from the wreckage, the end of the beam would be dripping molten steel.”](http://gcn.com/articles/2002/09/09/handheld-app-eased-recovery-tasks.aspx) * [Sarah Atlas, of New Jersey’s Task Force One Urban Search and Rescue, arrived at Ground Zero on September 11 and reported that “fires burned and molten steel flowed in the pile of ruins still settling beneath her feet.”](http://www.sas.upenn.edu/sasalum/newsltr/summer2002/k911.html) * Tom Arterburn, writing in Waste Age, reported that the New York Department of Sanitation removed “everything from molten steel beams to human remains  -----  **Videos**  ---------  [WTC2 South Tower, Molten Metal pouring out the North-East Corner](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OmuzyWC60eE)   [Pouring molten aluminum into a pool](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JEEOkMW1CYI)  [Molten aluminum into cold water](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2qJzDYsQfck)   [Evidence of fused molten metal and concrete]( https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=1WWAnCd_6lg) of extreme heat.  --------  The fact that the rubble contained steel or iron that had been melted shows that the buildings were destroyed by something other than fire and airplane impact.  When all of this physical evidence is combined with the testimony about explosions from many types of professionals, the claim that the Twin Towers were brought down by nothing other than the airplane impacts and resulting fires is simply not credible
Don't make assumptions.
Forget the chemicals in the water...feminine primacy at the forefront of our culture is of itself the "ideological" neutering of men today...unplug at r/theredpill...the most serious conspiracy of our time is "feminism".
you mean the meme was made in response to this sub. you get that right?
You're right though, my hs was about the same size. My guess is, they evacuated most of the buildings while they were on fire.
FALSELY advertised. The Americans of color organized a cook-out and misled potential attendees by promoting it as a pool party, when in fact the cook-out patrons had no right to enter the private pool nearby.  http://theconservativetreehouse.com/2015/06/08/the-full-story-of-the-mckinney-texas-pool-mob-inside-the-craig-ranch-subdivision/
you should visit Israel and see it by yourself.
I enjoy reading his perspective and don't generally feel like I'm getting taken for a ride.   That being said, the depths of information control in this country never cease to amaze me, so I'm not here to defend his honor or anything like that.   Are there any substantive indications that he is a form of controlled opposition?  If so, is the idea that he is cynically in on it, or that he serves a useful purpose even if he doesn't think that's what he's doing?
Well, what about Nikolaj Coster-Waldau, he gave the world a pretty good Lannister :)
I just watched it too, but I don't recall hearing that quote?
Correct, I am just trying to show that it's plausible to assume a lot of the plane would be practically vaporized in an impact. 
How many deaths are you claiming were from radiation poisoning, and not the tsunami?
I called Chomsky out for being a gatekeeper in this sub a few weeks back and got downvoted. I guess he's popular among conspiracy theorists even though he talks shit about them.
[It's a Trick](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jUGVPBO9_cA)
&gt; The extreme weight of the very tall buildings caused it to collapse after they were heated up.  [The amount of jet fuel in relation to the towers](http://www.journalof911studies.com/letters/e/VisualizationAidsWTCTowers.pdf)  ---  #The Inevitability Challenge  ---  [**If it disagrees with experiment, it’s wrong. In that simple statement is the key to science. It doesn’t make any difference how beautiful your guess is, it doesn’t matter how smart you are who made the guess, or what his name is… If it disagrees with experiment, it’s wrong. That’s all there is to it.**](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LIxvQMhttq4)  ---    Let's make an experiment. We need a tower. And we need it to come down.   ###**The Tower**  - It should have at least 20 (twenty) floors.   - It should _somewhat_ fulfill the definition of a tower (in terms of slenderness ratio λ).  - It should be _somewhat_ stable.   - It must stand up on its own.  - It may have _any_ scale.   - It may be of _any_ material.   - It may have _any_ density.  - It may have _any_ structural layout.  ###**The collapse**  - You may initiate the "collapse" by picking up the top third of the tower and let it drop on the base. You may drop it from whichever height you like.    - **BONUS POINT CHALLENGE:** _initiate a delayed, sudden total progressive collapse by setting it alight with **any** amount of Zippo gas, kerosene or Diesel._ It must not move (non-negligibly) for at least ten minutes.   - The "collapse" must be complete, vertical and roughly [radially symmetric](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Symmetry_in_biology#Radial_symmetry) (no falling over) and happen within 300% free fall time.   - It must work 100%.  You are of course allowed to ask help from engineers, architects and experts (the folks in the engineering subs will surely be happy to help you out with some theoretical background)!
heh
Wrong  __________  [WTC 3](http://i.imgur.com/eFd5WOQ), a 22-storey building directly below the towers was split in half by the debris but did not collapse  [WTC 4](http://i.imgur.com/m3Ij5hn), a 9-storey building was almost completely destroyed but the structure remained standing  [WTC 5](http://i.imgur.com/j5v0Yvl) was 9-storey, suffered from a severe fire and damage caused by debris but did not collapse  [WTC 6](http://i.imgur.com/eKWVWAj), 8-storey building, suffered massive damages and fires but did not collapse.
I'm waiting for someone to claim they're in Wayward Pines!
Thats not proof. You referenced an act of congress, which was passed when the wealthiest people in the world were among the most anti-Semitic. Most if not all of the congressmen who passed this legislation were christian.  Then you post a pdf to a Michael piper book, how is he a credible source? None of his work is peer reviewed, he is not a historian, he is an entertainer, a talk show host.
&gt; I'm not opposed to implementing higher penalties and fines for those who aren't doing it properly. I'm pretty sure that once you get hit with a hefty fine, and pay to clean up your mistake, you'll be much more careful the next time. &gt; An outright ban on fracking though, which is what these environmental groups are demanding, is not a reasonable solution in my opinion.  We see time and time again that these sorts of mistakes are let of very easily.  The risks of fracking are too high to allow it to continue in my opinion. Leaving the welfare of your countries water supply to people who are only looking to make a profit is a terrible idea. Why do they care if they contaminate water? They can just move elsewhere.   It might not be fair to ban the practice, but sometimes being fair is  not the right option. 
`*DING DING DING*`  Seem familiar?  - https://www.reddit.com/search?q=author%3Afleshpeeler&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=off&amp;t=all   - /u/Fleshpeeler  That was one of many accounts used by the liar behind the hate-group /r/TopMindsOfReddit. You think he stopped his acting after that shadowban? I doubt it...  
If the lie they make possible is even more glaring than the two truths brought to light, then it is something that must be looked at *very* critically and seriously.  Using certain truths to possibly cover even more egregious lies is the very definition of what makes a limited hangout.
&gt; ...wasn't directed at you.  You apparently tried to attack my post history here.  - http://www.reddit.com/search?q=author%3Atheghostofdusty+subreddit%3Aconspiracy&amp;sort=relevance&amp;t=all  &gt; You're welcome to search my comment history and find my previous accounts pretty easily  Why not just spill your beans? It's obvious that you want to. Why the coy act? Tell us about your current username too!  You've never taken to time to go outside and spot satellites in a low-light area... and you make assertive claims that they are therefore an elaborate hoax. Why would *anyone* take you seriously for a second?   Your game plan here is so inept that I'm surprised you're still attempting it.
Naw, they have bigger fish to fry.   Besides, they have other ways to discredit/neutralize that don't require murder.
That and, "somebody would have said something by now" or "they would have reported about it on the news" smh.
Thats been going on a long time,   I actually saw a news report about a study that found if you smoke a cigarette 30 minutes after waking up, instead of right away, you were so much less likely to get cancer.   First off, who would do a study that would give incentive to smoke? And why would the news report it? I guess its more blatantly obvious now, when they started devoting segments to promising start up companies.
&gt;As long as people are happy to stand by and let it happen nothing will change regardless of deaths.  What are we standing by and letting happen?  There is NO widespread risk to the drinking water, that's what the EPA Report actually stated. The title is very misleading.  [EPA Finds Fracking Doesn’t Lead to Pollution of Drinking Water](http://www.claimsjournal.com/news/national/2015/06/08/263763.htm)    [EPA finds fracking poses no direct threat to drinking water](http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2015/jun/4/epa-fracking-doesnt-harm-drinking-water/)  [Fracking Doesn't Pollute Drinking Water, EPA Says](http://www.newsweek.com/fracking-339436)
/r/tsbd
Then ban it.
She made the mistake and that would be fine if that's as far as it went. She repeatedly ignored the cop and wouldn't shut the fuck up. That's not a mistake. That's blatant disrespect and refusing to follow orders of an officer who was trying to detain her. That's why the idiot was thrown to the ground.  Notice the other kids who made the same "mistake" were being courteous even while trying to plea their innocence were not slammed to the ground. And about the "child" thing. She sure acted like a grown ass adult, may as well have been treated like one. Remember we're not talking about a 5 year old who got in trouble for playing with a ball in the street . were talking about young adults doing something that the majority of them knew was wrong  . Then they all decide to run for the hills as soon as the popo show further proving they knew they were doing wrong. Fuck that "kid" and anybody that acts like her. She got what she deserved.
Chicken butt
Just the fact that you can see the horizon is proof that there is not an infinite plain.   
I don't understand why a small post on a smallish sub would gather admin attention at all. Except that it was submitted by a mod.
But you just said the advantage of a missile was that one person in the right position could do it ....ah ...screw it. .I really am done. 
Amazing. This is an interesting tactic, once faced with evidence he can't explain away, he just says, "You're not even a real person!"   He's either a troll, a shill, or in need of medication. 
This comment has been overwritten by a script as I have abandoned my Reddit account and moved to [voat.co](https://voat.co).      If you would like to do the same, install [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome, or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox, and install [this script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).  If you are using Internet Explorer, you should probably stay here on Reddit where it is safe.     Then simply click on your username at the top right of Reddit, click on the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top of the page.  You may need to scroll down to multiple comment pages if you have commented a lot.
bs stupid fucking bullshit, it just like a buffet of bullshit no matter what they always have more bullshit to give you... just turn the tv off guys if we dont watch they cant possibly still get paid.
Who knows why but its never happened before...
In fairness, I love Russell Brand and the Trews, but his knowledge probably is limited. 
Fuck you!  We mean it!
Oh, no, I'm not refuting that. In fact, I'm more convinced than not that the US govt is bullshitting at the very least and planned the whole thing at most.  I'm not sure if it's the lack of tone that wrongly portrayed a disbelief in the theory but, nonetheless, I'm with you.
What makes you say that? That's a huge thing to claim.
What argument in particular? Of course I can't sway you; your cognitive dissonance indicates that.   What is that anyway? An un-sourced image proving...what? Laughable. It sort of acknowledges curvature, then unwittingly denies curvature through acknowledging it. Would you care to paraphrase that 'evidence'? The ocean is curved; there's even an equation to determine/confirm where the horizon begins from your point of view (usually ends around a few miles, depends on your height/altitude). Go do some research now. Not going to waste my time confirming what I've already confirmed. Not going to convince you that you're wrong; only you can do that.   
They have the power of Lucifer and his followers backing them, rising them to power, and making them wealthy. [Check out this interview](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ird-BKuPRlw), A Trip Into the Supernatural. There's no such thing as aliens.
Seems like only you and your "buddies" are the only ones here standing up for Chompsky, a known gatekeeper.  We see the why and the how.  This is why your game here fails immediately every single time.
Yes, yes it is.
[deleted]
He doesn't know dick, and I believe him.   If they ONLY evacuated the press areas, why would they give the Press Secretary anything to feed them, even if he was unwilling to do so? Of course he was evacuated with everyone else.   Whoever April is, she brings up a good point. Listen to what she says between 7:47 and 8:14. It earns her a standard deflect, but it's a logical question if that's what happened. 
Obama is working on it. 
I guess Warner stole it before the leaders of Haiti could steal it. No wonder they are angry.
&gt;They King Kong hatin' like I'm James Holmes.  They want my brain blown, but I ain't done a thing wrong.
what about an answer to the question?
after the first few weeks i stopped hearing about the witnesses that saw a man open the emergency exit door and wave him in also.
I have to agree with just about everything you said.  Communism, or statism, or any political system in the history of the world that relies on a big, centralized government has always ended extremely violently, and in the end have always been overturned by the people.   The larger the government gets,  the more corrupted it becomes, and the more resentment people have towards it.    Communism and Freedom,  or communism and Liberty are like oil and water,  and absolutely will not go together no matter how hard you try.   Liberty to Communism is like black is to white.  I think anarchism has a better chance of succeeding in the long run the communism will ever have.    The more I think about how useless and destructive our bloated federal government has become, and continues to get,  the more appealing anarchism sounds to me.   
That is exactly why they do it.  JIDF gotta keep Israel on the front page.    P.S. acting overly concerned with others credibility here instantly exposes certain people for what they are.
Not really that simple of a situation.  A lot of stupid was going around that day; the cop is still a total jerk who was involving his irrational emotions in the situation, his amazing trip probably didn't help his mood any.  That doesn't mean that black girl was some harmless angel, she was the one who hosted the party I believe, and as causing a massive public disturbance.  The cop pulled his gun when a boy made some odd movements near him, not because of the girl.  That still doesn't make him right to do so, he could just have easily pulled his taser.
I'm not discounting your commentary but if this kind of thing is faked, like Sandy Hook for example, the reasoning I would see behind it is the "sick fuckers" that orchestrate these kind of things would have an easier 'sell' of their agenda to the people that actually need to participate in it.   You can imagine being told that you need to stage an event, "to put a good scaring into the American people so that we can put in place policies to prevent the REAL thing from happening" kind of discourse going on. Again, I don't know one way or the other, but I have seen some incredibly shady stuff surrounding Sandy Hook that definitely lead me to believe that something is up with that for sure, not least of all the second gunman they were pursuing through the woods afterwards, which relates to this report of a second gunman in the theater at Aurora. 
What are you doing about it, exactly? At least he is opening a dialog, all you are doing is attacking him for doing so. 
Math and science would help in all the lifestyles you listed far more than philosophy or history.
That's what I heard too but I can't confirm.
I'm not wasting my time with this literally doomed crusade for one thing. 
You can ruin the temper on the bit of an axe by taking it to a grinding wheel.
Yeah misleading title
Mountains  that are the height of mountains rather than your  marshmallow couch pillow,  mountains.  Have it your way. Go ahead and believe.
[deleted]
Cancerrrr
Did James Holmes act alone? 
If Hitler hadn't of invaded, Stalin would have. Those T-42's were well into production when Hitler started the Eastern Front, and they weren't defensive tanks.  Stalin saw how effective Blitzkrieg was, and was planing to do it himself, to all of Europe.
instead of trying to find the guy maybe oh idk fix some of the problems? ffs
Millions? Try close to 40,000,000  - about 20,000,000 in WWII and about another 20,000,000 after.
http://imgur.com/r/highqualitygifs/oNObxMf
[deleted]
The idea of wireless energy transmission
...causes gynocomastia - would be a better title. As it is it sounds like it's a step down, you know, being a boy is good then you suffer side effects and damage and end up as a girl.
I have not seen one ad since I have started using it. An yeah google still sucks IMO
NY and NJ not being the top two says to me that the study is fundamentally flawed.
Wrong, they use PR agencies.  Here is one such press release:  http://mum__brella.com.au/undertow-media-to-handle-pr-for-retail-giant-costco-7906  (remove underscores)  This company specializes in social media management.    If I go any further with sources I'm liable to get banned, as has happened to me in the past.
he did not figure on the usa supporting russia as heavily as it did also a deal was made freeing up russias forces on its eastern front ie china/japan
Roflmao. Look at how much this has triggered so many. If we were just crazy, you'd all downvote and move on,  like the other nonsense shitposts that flood this subreddit regularly. I invite everyone readying this to check out my [Flat Earth Primer](https://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/393icm/whats_all_this_flat_earth_stuff_about_anyway/) and see what the fuss is all about from someone who actually believes it, not someone who doesn't want you to look into it at all.  My two day old thread about Flat Earth, with zero points, still has active commenters in it, and even moreso, the nature of the accounts that showed up in the thread is extremely interesting, as most had never posted in /r/conspiracy before.  Whatever the true shape of the world around us, the evidence for it will be everywhere and abundant. The horizon is flat everywhere you go. I have [independently reproducible proof of non-curvature](https://i.imgur.com/IEcAo8G.jpg) in my pocket. No amount of lies or hoaxes can overcome simple observations.  The direction of swirl in a toilet bowl is based on many factors such as nozzle size and shape, flow rate of water, angle of incidence with the bowl, shape of the bowl, etc. Again though, evidence about the shape of the world around us will be abundant, and all reproducible observations point to flat. 
They are paying for it in stock price, https://www.google.com/finance?q=NSE%3ANESTLEIND&amp;ei=oj14VfGoAsO72Aa7h4DwBw 
I liked everything you were saying up until here.  How dare you speak ill of Pizza.  For normal healthy individuals when consumed in the properly moderated quantity, Pizza does no harm, and is a very nutritious meal.  Sure you are pushing yourself close to your government proscribed caloric intake rough estimate based on general figures, but at least in doing so it's actually nutrient rich.  Plenty of calcium and protein and fiber in that pizza.  Also, pizza tastes fantastic and is super satisfying and enjoyable.   I do a cost benefit analysis of pizza slices, because I AM GOING TO EAT PIZZA, probably in slice form, so when I go out to purchase a slice, I want to be sure I am getting maximal value out of my meal.
This 'article' is pure fiction, disjointed b.s. designed to manipulate the reader. 
skank
As long as it isn't in Maggi ketchup we are cool. That stuff is crack. 
Just Google "nestle"
&gt;&gt;How do you explain physics? Take a bullet as a very simple example. In long distance shooting it is necessary to correct for not only curvature but also rotation.  &gt;This isn't true, either. You do not have to correct for curvature at all.  Here's incontrovertible proof that you are wrong: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jX7dcl_ERNs  Oh and here's a video showing the curvature of the earth that you dont think exists:  http://blip.tv/SpaceRip/the-curvature-earth-from-space-in-4k-uhd-6579269
Seriously?  Who is actually shit stomping around the Middle-East, and Eurasia forming an empire atm?   An empire at the expense of his own domestic population's freedoms no less.
Follow the money and read mutiple sources for world history.   The puppet masters of the current world are pretty obvious if you look
Agreed.
Their diet advice is [hidden in plain sight](https://imgur.com/9t4kjWv).
I'm quite untrustworthy, being a kiwi and all, but as your self appointed business advisor I'd say pack as many Mi Goering in your bags as you can, shelf the excess up dangerous daves butt pocket (They're always bigger than they look), and book the next flight to India for you two. If you two hold hands going through security they won't think anything of daves odd walking style.
Huh. Well I concede the point.
I just went one step further. After cutting the cable (and TV in general) 5 years ago, this post motivated me to delete CNN from my "NEWS" bookmark folder. No longer will they be even in the skeptical bin. They just got transferred to the rubbish bin.  Can not believe they had the nerve to force a pop up that says "by being in a place where you can read this, you consent to terms of use that you can not read first".  so now, it is Reddit, Disqus, My local country paper, MSNBC (with major grains of salt to kill that fresh bullshite flavor) and The Guardian. That is all that is left for newsfeeds. Any other deets I just google search for the eventual source, and grace them with my presence and perhaps, leave a morsel of data for them to mine.  So now, I am 
They are not really courts. Some traitors are tricking the American people and carving up their country to sell to the highest bidder.  Americans are too blinded by propaganda to realize what is happening.
Hope that guy doesn't have a new Benz. They love trees at 90mph
I told you what I would do to help someone in that situation. What would you do?  To be more precise, if I were in the incredibly tiny minority of people who had one or more young children and absolutely no family or friends to help support us so that I could find a way to give them the opportunities they deserve without sticking them in a government indoctrination prison, and I had no savings or life insurance to support my family (which would be a pretty big lapse in responsibility in my opinion, especially for a parent), I would likely reach out to a charitable organization whose mission was to help people like me, like the [Mothers Abandoned or Widowed charity](http://www.mawcharities.com/).  As far as the gun, you do realize that if people don't pay for these prisons, other people in silly costumes will come to their house with a gun and ***murder*** them if they fail to follow orders and pay what they "owe"? You get that right? That's how "taxes" work, and in this case most "schools" are paid for via "property taxes", which is just a shakedown of local property owners.  Let me guess: you have children in school, or you are a school teacher. I bet you are not a widow though. You are obviously trying to justify your participation in this evil system. I'm not going to be able to give you a pass here, sorry. I will admit that the system and the social pressure to lock up your children are seductive, especially when we must work so much more than we used to in order to pay the ever multiplying "taxes" that we owe.  That is no excuse for shitty parenting. Neglect is abuse, and sending your children to these government prisons for over ten thousand hours is at the very least neglect, and definitely abuse. Future generations will look back on us as we do on slaveowners and racists, and ask themselves how we could possible be so backwards.
Which lends credence to the "Mossad funds ISIS" theory.  If ISIS was truly a muslim extremist group they'd be killing jews, not Muslims/Christians. 
Oh my god I've seen the Maggi brand around LOL CRAP
Why exactly, and more importantly who placed this post in Controversial?
You folks love to use that insult. You can't dialog, so you resort to name calling and insults. In some countries, it's even a crime to question world history when it touches upon anything approaching sensitive issues.
sure
I'm not convinced of this by any means, but thought the article was worth sharing for discussion. 
The biggest deception possible: 'the US is ruled by idiots with a lack of competent leadership'
Damn, I've eaten maggi ramens :(
One thing that I don't understand if space stations weren't real is how on earth do they get the water like that? I could possibly believe what others say about the hair however you couldn't fake that water
You're being a moron throwing around ad hominem in the face of facts. My IQ is nowhere near low. Keep with your ad hominems, your side looks fucking horrible right now.
Good bye and good riddance
Yep that's exactly how I imagined you would look like.
&gt;Someone who disproved the notion of the evil smallpox blankets you brought up.  A blogger that links to other bloggers and wikipedia as evidence has disproven exactly jack squat.   &gt;Still never gave me an example. I'm proud of my race for all of their accomplishments, without whites, we wouldn't be living in this world today and you know that's true.  You're right. Whites made sure to destroy all non-white centers of knowledge in Africa, the (now) Middle East, and South America to make sure they stayed on top too, stealing all the stuff they found useful along the way.   Saaaay, it sounds like you're admitting that WHITES run the world, not Jews. Are you confused, maybe?  &gt;Oh? Our government? You mean the same one that was taken over by JEWS in 1913? Please, this is too easy.  Our government isn't made up of Jews, and they're going along with the plan, right? Wouldn't that mean that they're ZIONISTS, and not Jews to a man? Feel free to ignore that logical hiccup in your propaganda as well. 
Dennis Hastert is a bad person for a lot of reasons.
&gt; I think regulating the industry, and placing heavy fines on the people who aren't dong it the right way is absolutely justified.  Agreed - but I think this is a pipe dream.  It will never happen, at least not on a large scale.  The reality is that oil companies have billions of dollars and immense lobbying power to ensure that that never comes to pass.  &gt; The biggest thing that I took away from the EPA report was, if fracking is done the right way, there isn't a risk at contaminating water supplies.  This can be said of anything.  If nuclear power plants are developed the right way, there isn't any risk of radiation contamination.  If GMO's are developed the right way, there isn't any risk of negative health effects.  If vaccines are developed the right way, there isn't any risk of ineffectiveness or medical side effects.  The reality, though, is that these things are often *not* developed or implemented the right way and fracking is no exception.  We can't use the ideal of a thing to argue for it when the reality of that thing is something totally different.  I'm also having trouble with why you seem so trusting of the EPA and its data/conclusions.  There are [numerous](http://www.westernjournalism.com/exposed-environmental-corruption-agency/) reports of their [corruption](http://www.nationalreview.com/corner/377760/if-you-still-need-proof-epa-rogue-agency-last-week-provided-plenty-iain-murray), plenty more where [these come from.](http://dailycaller.com/2013/04/29/epa-study-cites-report-from-admitted-data-fakers/)  &gt; I'm not sure about Oklahoma, and when fracking started there, but I'm willing to bet it has probably been going on there for more then 5 years.  Oklahoma's oil production has more than doubled over the last five years thanks to fracking and this correlates almost exactly with the uptick in earthquakes.  You will see the exact same thing happening in recent years if you look at earthquake numbers for other states widely involved in fracking including Kansas, Texas, Arkansas, Ohio, etc. - Oklahoma seems to just be the most dramatic example.  &gt; I have also not seen any scientific, scholarly, or government study which has linked fracking to earthquakes.  No offense but [have](http://www.sciencemag.org/content/345/6195/448.abstract) you [looked?](http://www.sciencemag.org/content/345/6192/13.summary)  I found both of those in 30 seconds by simply googling "fracking earthquakes study".  [This link](http://energyindepth.org/texas/wastewater-injection-texas-rare-earthquakes/) is a pretty good source of info as well if you go through some of its citations and read between the lines.  The way fracking works is literally by initiating "mini-earthquakes", as everyone including the government admits, so I also don't know where you're getting the idea that no link exists from.  The usual claim, though, is that these mini-earthquakes can very rarely be felt by humans and that if done properly, nothing beyond those near invisible quakes will occur.  &gt; So my theory is that it may not actually be the fracking itself which is causing the earthquakes, but instead the Earth Tomography research being done to find the gas and oil to be fracked to begin with which is causing it.  Maybe, but really what's the difference?  If the process of fracking requires Earth Tomography to find the deposits, and this process is causing earthquakes and pollution, then why does it matter which *part* of the process causes it?  It's all linked in with fracking.  No fracking, no Earth Tomography, no earthquakes.  &gt; Until I see scientific facts which prove that fracking is dangerous and riskier then Saudi Arabia, I'll continue to support America's quest to become energy independent.  "America's quest to become energy independent" or "multinational oil companies saying 'fuck the environment' and chasing short term profit above all else, as they always have and always will"?  I think the second one is more likely.  A lot of these same oil companies you're talking about that are involved with fracking are in bed with the Saudis.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
It depends on the person and their ability to disconnect from the circle jerk. 
[deleted]
Sinse this is posted at conspiracy, dont forget imgur start baning fatpplhate post at imgur as well
Our backup, www.voat.co/v/conspiracy is up and running.  www.voat.co is really slow right now. maybe its had a sudden surge in users...
[deleted]
I don't think it is bad that this is happening.  The path for reddit has been decided and we aren't the ones who get to choose it.  It is better that reddit dies quickly rather than slowly.  I suppose voat is the next place to go, we will see how it does.  Let them advertise to bots.
I hate those ISIS guys. Is that okay?
Yet still everything he suggested came to pass. Everywhere there are vested interests, it's not a conspiracy.
Agreed. But by pushing more request, it gives them an idea of how popular they're becoming and allows them to adjust accordingly. 
Ok that makes sense 
As someone who knows someone who grew up with Stefani Germanotta (Lady Gaga), I can assure you she's no idiot and she most likely knows EXACTLY what she's doing with all the occult symbology. She may not be coming up with all these esoteric activities, but she def has to be tuned into them. She may be a mouthpiece, but she's no dummy.  Poor Britney Spears, however, I totally believe has been abused since childhood and is completely mentally broken. Bieber I'm guessing as well. Paris Hilton was the test run for Kim Kardashian, from amateur porn video to moronic reality series to sick circle of friends and lovers, except she doesn't have the same amount of ambition and immoral ruthlessness.     
Maybe I haven't gone dark... enough. ^^:O
Dead people can't downvote.
there's another r in there: /r/isrconspiracyracist
---€  That'll be 1 euro please. 
[K](http://i.imgur.com/QnbbzxJ.gifv)
&gt; oh, and before you pull out some "there are other websites" bullshit, no. Not when reddit has reached this level of influence and userbase. There are literally no other substitute websites that has the userbase reddit has.  Facebook and twitter! /s
I honestly don't think it's the same. Posting pics of people from facebook or instagram with the first name and town/city visible, saying hateful things about how you wish people would be dead or die. No. I subscribed to the sub myself and it's not exactly "oh he's fat, haha, loser", it's that times a million. 
Why would you support hate speech? 
No calls to brigade.
/r/fatpeoplehate and /r/conspiracy are my two favourite subreddits. If this one goes, I'm done with Reddit.
[deleted]
I find the vileness of that particularly group of humans interesting. It's like watching a show about serial killers. 
So you're okay if it's on 4chan, just not on reddit?  Unrelated question: Are you fat?
&gt;If you truly think Reddit is some special bastion of free speech, you need to get outside your bubble.  I wish Aaron Swartz was alive to smack you around.
This is nothing new.  * July 2014 - [ISIS seizes uranium from lab; experts downplay 'dirty bomb' threat](http://www.foxnews.com/world/2014/07/10/isis-seized-uranium-compounds-from-lab-experts-downplay-threat/) * Dec 2014 [ISIS claims to have developed dirty bomb – reports](http://rt.com/news/210631-isis-uranium-dirty-bomb/)  Did you ever think that Israel might be testing the effects of a dirty bomb *because* of the threat of ISIS?  By the way, experts say that the risk from a uranium dirty bomb is small. 
***"Keep Everyone Safe: You agree to not intentionally jeopardize the health and safety of others or yourself."***  *https://www.reddit.com/help/useragreement#section_your_participation_on_reddit*  ---------------------  LOL. Well, I think Reddit is going down the sewer... I am not for hate speech, but people should be able to talk freely. I guess soon some alternative site will take this place over. Actually I am myself a bit overweight (wanna lose about 10-15 more kg, and I am on a strict diet for some time), but I think banning subs is a fuckin' stupid idea. Even subs like /r/fatpeoplehate. Which one will be the next one? /r/conspiracy ?  /r/pcmasterrace ?  /r/trollxchromosomes ?  /r/mensrights ?   /r/worldnews ?  *edit: clarification
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Damn! I've never even heard of "shitniggerssay"... I bet it was awesome! Now I'm pissed!!!
Same. But I'm already done with it, sticking with this sub until voat.co is stable enough to take the reddit crowd then I'm fucking done. 
Wow. 
I agree with you. However, due to the circle jerk of fph I'm not complaining about that sub being banned at all. O think it's funny, actually. It was a shit sub, whether you were verified or not.
Banning fatpeoplehate first is by far the most aligned with her agenda. I mean... HAES... 
I thought she was appointed by Yishan?
&gt;what does book burning or taliban has to do with ANY of this?  Are you kidding? You are for eliminating any writing that offends your delicate sensibilities.  Just like the Taliban did, when they moved in and burned any text that didn't hold to their rigid religious views.   &gt;you're just proving my point further how this sub turned to shit.  So don't fucking come here.  Why is that so hard to figure out?
I really wish I had details, but unfortunately my previous post is strait hearsay. All information I've pieced together from other threads and posts.
What if I told you nasa already had such weapons in orbit right now capible of more destruction than our little minds can imagine. Made for such things, like you were saying.
Well, actually FPH did not just exercise free speech, but also fabricated social media drama and posted a roster of overweight Imgur staff in their sidebar for the purposes of doxxing and shaming.
[deleted]
Reddactit?
Transsexualism. 
[deleted]
I agree. The mainstream fucks everything up online. This is why we can't have anything nice.
The only issue I see is that FPH content can show up on /r/all. People like me will pass it and forget about it while others will make a huge issue out of it.  The real problem, I'm noticing, is that the media craze right now is people getting in trouble for expressing their opinions or not being politically correct. Maybe it's just me, but these type of articles are popping up a lot more lately.  I don't care if Snoop Dogg calls Caitlin Jenner a science experiment or if that other kid says he'll continue to call her Bruce. I don't care if Kaley Cuoco is fine with having the old traditional wife role where she's fine with making her husband dinner. But it's "in" to chastise people on their opinion.  Remember the "shit in beard" articles? Snopes proved it was wrong and that they took it way out of context. The reality was that bacteria found in feces were also found in beards ... but that same bacteria is found *everywhere*.  So, if these mere issues cause a media shitstorm, imagine what happens when the media outlet finds out there is a subreddit dedicated to mocking fat people. The media would go crazy. First: Jailbait. Second: The Fappening. Third: Reddit hates fat people and mocks them to no end!  No question, Reddit is trying to protect their image ... and it's unfortunate they have to do this. But to place the blame entirely on them isn't fair. We can blame the people and media outlets who love to jump on pointless stories to get people to read their articles and see their ads. Instead of actual news reporting, people seek out the next "that's outrageous" claim ... and FPH appears to be it.  We're hitting a point where "everything is offensive and it needs to be remedied". When in all reality people need to get off their fucking high horse and realize the internet allows different opinions to be expressed. Don't like it? There's a back button, close window button, or an address bar to take you to a site that doesn't offend your thin-skinned ass.  And for the record, I hate FPH content, but it deserves to exist as long as it's legal.
she must be confused, this isn't China
good info to know,  i expected Kissinger &amp;  USA Mundie, Craig J. S enior Advisor to the CEO, **Microsoft Corporation**. Member of the Bilderberg Steering Committee. Mundie *advocates that individuals be licensed before being allowed to use the Internet.*  
yeah, and nothing is being said about it, just pretend nothing is gonna happen.
I'm hopeful that not everybody who hates excessive censorship is all that interested in fph specifically.  I want fph to exist, I want coontown to exist, and I don't want fucking Costco on the front page unless there is actually something newsworthy about it happening.  All of these things are indicators for me about how open and non-corrupted the platform is. Reddit is dipping well into the negative side of that scale.
I don't think it's an intentional distraction. I think it's been a long time coming.
safer? maybe; but the word "chip" is starting to bother me.
That's what many americans did in Vietnam my friend.
[deleted]
Interesting.
[deleted]
right now, it *appears* this will be  Clinton vs Bush, i'm hoping for a "surprise" candidate; not that i think it will matter. 
yup. 99% of FPH were/are douchers
This is a business that can do as it pleases.  There are no thought police and you are a moron. 
Maybe they made a voat? Like the rest of reddit, we're moving there. Fuck Reddit.
[deleted]
Don't think I mentioned once Sandy Hook, ISIS or the Fed.  The Fed isn't really a conspiracy - in the sense that it's a known private entity that we pay for the privilege of printing our own money.  The Libor rate fixing, the selling of 'toxic' assets, tax avoidance and the laundering of drug and terror money is documented and proves a conspiracy in the fact that these banks conspired, together, against the consumers.   As for Sandy Hook and ISIS, there's some anomalous problems and inconsistencies with both 'official' narratives to warrant further investigation  - and I can't help but think of the governments own mantra: If you've got nothing to hide, you shouldn't be worried.  Also, providing instances of events that have not been around long enough to pass the moratorium placed on classified information - against lets say The Bay of Pigs and The Golf of Tonkin incidents that have been declassified - isn't really proof of anything, as they're a false equivalence.  edit: stuff   
[deleted]
It's fucking astounding how people like you think.  You think people should be ashamed of being fat, but you show no shame in being a hateful, judgmental douchebag.  One kind, thoughtful landwhale is more useful to this world than a thousand hateful fuckwads like you.  Idiots like you are these subs get banned. You don't know where the joke ends and where being a piece of shit begins. You're going out of your way to make the world a more hateful place, while throwing out shitty appeals to society, as though you give two shits.  Get your stupid fucking head out of your stupid fucking ass. Or, better yet, bury it in there so deep you can't breathe anymore.
Yes, but I'm not sure where to find posts like this. I'm lost without my updates on /r/fatpeoplehate 
Fat shaming isn't something I would partake in, but banning the sub won't really put a stop to it.
Except their group refused to stay within the limits of their subreddit.  Everyone has freedom of association, and should be allowed to congregate with people of like-minds, but they showed that they couldn't keep it contained.  I'll admit that I would actually be completely psyched if they did dissolve completely, but still, if you're given room to talk, and you drag your shit out into the hallways, then you don't get to use that room anymore.
I recommend not buying gold and installing/enabling adblock. I had previously disabled is to support reddit, but I don't really see the point now.
Please*
ALL HAIL, CHAIRMAN PAO.
You cannot see the individual up or down votes on comments, only the combination.  So you could have a comment with 2 points and never know it had +500/-498
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
They also try harder.
Well if you look at it most young rape victims tend to over eat as they think it will make their offender stop. I know multiple girls from childhood who were rail thin then one day started packing on pounds only to find out later they were molested. You can be narrow minded and judge everyone I don't personally care. You just look like a dick and your justification is "it's unhealthy." I don't see you talking down and shitting on anyone who smokes or talks on their phone while driving. You choose easy targets because you're pathetic and hate your life and this makes you feel better. Don't try to lie and pretend that's not it, you're a shitty person with weak excuses. 
I'll bite. There's a reason they were banned. They were brigading across other boards.  Personally, I liked when they shat on Tess Munster and all that HAES crap. But one post that came up set off some alarm bells. A reddit user posted her weight loss progress (like 100lbs) and one of the shitlords said something to the order of "well 400-100 is still 300, you're still obese, so this is not a victory yet"  When you link to other parts of reddit, there's a reason people use the np tag. Lynch mobs form at the drop of a hat. If a subreddit does not hand out those bans like candy on halloween, they start to actively draw people who harass.  And if you saw the shitfest on planetside, KIA is going to be banned just the same.  And censorship is when the government stops you from using your first amendment rights. A corporation (that reddit is) can restrict what you say on their property to infinity. They were never under any obligation to. I don't agree with Ellen Pao's whiny SJW shit, but it's her ship to sink.  [edit: oh look, it's the fucking phone, pick it up cause I called it](http://np.reddit.com/r/OutOfTheLoop/comments/39bzdf/why_was_rfatpeoplehate_along_with_several_other/)
What? I was talking about the Star Wars quote.
Good and people will leave and got to a competitor where free speech is allowed. 
https://www.reddit.com/r/obesedistaste/
I found some mentions on new. They might get taken down though...
This isn't really a discussion about conspiracy. Go read the announcements.
I wonder which side of SOPA reddit would have been on under Pao
Reddit is a for profit private company. No such thing as free speech. 
Seriously, reddit will improve dramatically if everyone who subscribed to fatpeoplehate left. 
The Bedford Level Experiment only disproved convexity; it did NOT show evidence for flatness. You constantly conflate the two, because like those who believe in convexity, you are married to your current theory even though there are unresolvable problems, like flight times in the southern hemisphere and the TWO axes of rotation of the stars, at the north and south poles.
Shouldn't they all be fat and white?
Oh I'm definitely an asshole. But your dismissive tone of people feeling violated for being censored unjustly makes you just as much of an asshole. So fuck off.   Also didn't hear a waist size. Fatass confirmed. 
[deleted]
At the moment it's been hugged to death by all the users leaving reddit. Just fyi.
[Oh sorry, you're right they've never harassed anyone, how did I get that idea](http://imgur.com/x82ITsj)
Feel free to leave.
How did the the fappening ruin 4chan. I only witnessed the fappening from a reddit point of view.
Those subs aren't posting the personal information of people on their banners and advocating users to attack them.  That's the difference.
Totally wasn't aware reddit had ads... always had adblock on.  Edit: Irony gold train below
So big they began to hate themselves.  
[deleted]
We both know you aren't going to leave. For every 100 people, 5 might actually stick to it.   Edit: I'm not worried about losing karma unlike OP. 
Bilderburgers?
First off, residents didn't call, the security did. Second, yes police are violent when they pull guns and throw helpless girls down to the ground and put their full weight on their back.  Are you telling me it's professional for an officer of the law to violently detain a 16 year old? Are you telling me you can't put handcuffs on a 16 year old girl? Maybe you're a coward who needs a badge and a gun as well.
With the /r/fatpeoplehate crowd throwing such a shitfit, did you *really* think the admins would leave their backup subreddits alone?  Say what you will about the sub in general (I enjoyed reading it), there's a community there that is absurdly toxic. Now they're just [throwing their toys out of the pram](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikipedia:Don%27t_throw_your_toys_out_of_the_pram).
[deleted]
Nope 5 is banned to now
Does anyone have any idea about why/how this is happening/allowed to happen?  There are subreddits out there far more subversive and inflammatory than /r/fatpeoplehate and /r/fatpeoplehate2, ones filled with links to gore, torture etc...   Did something specific happen on these subs to warrant this reaction or is it conversely just an inside job from tumblr to shut down any and all anti-fat opinions...?  I fear I should just go ahead and prepare a shrine for our new obese overlords smeared in sugar and bacon grease.
nope
Why? Are you a faggot? Are you a nigger? 
You know, I like how the remnants of FPH are unironically parroting the phrase "Heil Hydra". Apparently oblivious to the fact that, in the Marvel universe, Hydra are a Nazi organisation. Isn't that fitting?
[Sums it up](http://i.imgur.com/PnbRrWM.jpg)
[deleted]
Those subs were just a manifestation of the original. It just posted the same content and even adding the imgur staff photos back. 
Y'all fucking quit drawing attention to this sub omg
I've been on this site for years and have never used adblock. Definitely turning that bitch on from here on out.
Time to stop complaining and actually do something about it  https://www.change.org/p/reddit-remove-ellen-pao-from-her-job-as-reddit-ceo#petition-letter
&gt;How is voat different?  The censorship bullshit from reddit hasn't set hold there yet.  &gt; How can we guarantee this type of thing won't happen once/if it gains the mainstream popularity reddit did?  By not using the platform if that happens. 
big ups for speaking the truth so clearly there
Seconded. We're being overrun.
They also would go on other subs, where people would post pictures of themselves that had nothing to do with being fat, and ridicule them and call then fatties. There was this story in the Grand Theft Auto subreddit where these seemingly normal people said they met online, and became good friends in real life through GTA. The comment section turned into the subreddit calling them fat, and insisting they eat cake and other things. Look, have whatever subreddit you like. But keep it contained. Don't go around and abuse people. Even coontown members don't go around other Subreddits and harass people. This wasn't an issue of freedom of speech, it was an issue of a group of people desperately harassing people who were minding their own business. That isn't legal in the streets. I'm not allowed to follow some fat guy around and yell at him for being fat. That's harassment. As we all know, freedom of speech has limits. They abused it. They got banned. I'm glad I'm not the only one to see these jerks get banned.   Also, you wanna talk freedom of speech? How come it's so okay for their moderating team to ban people for being "fat sympathizes?" Jesus Christ reddit is so stupid sometimes. It's okay for them to ban people from voicing their opinions on their subreddit, but when reddit admin team does it for HARASSMENT everybody cries "free speech?" Jesus Christ. It's like this entire website went idiotic today. I'm glad you share a sane voice. 
I completely agree with you.
&gt;We humans can sniff out less-than-genuine content, no matter how cute that cat is.  I wish that were the case.  
Hey don't forget  r/sexyabortions r/cutefemalecorpses r/rapingwomen r/picsofdeadkids
I have seen idiots giving people gold that were criticizing her and the admins. 
I think these are far worse than any fat joke.  Reddit is just giving these people what they want, attention. 
The admins really need to get these stupid posts off here... this sub is being brigaded by all the FPH idiots trying to seek asylum in other subreddits while continuing to spam their bullshit  none of these posts are even remotely close to /r/conspiracy material   Face it, you guys couldn't keep your shit to your own sub, doxxed the wrong people, and spread your shitty memes and jokes to every other subreddit   You guys got what your deserved  The last thing we need is legit subreddits to get banned because the FPH idiots are raiding them and upvoting their own crap to the front page
TOO THE FRONT PAGE WEEEEOOOOOO  R/CONSPIRACY REMAINS STRONG
Not gonna lie. I don't really gaf and just want my front page not to be filled with spam at this point. At the same time I feel bad asking you guys to die quieter lol.
The subreddit would go around to other Subreddits, find pictures of people who happened to be fat, and start sending them messages to kill themselves. That is harassment. That is illegal in the United States legal system. I just don't understand why everyone is jumping on board. You can say it's bad apples this, bad apples that, but it's been a consistent problem. It's like reddit only hears what they want to hear. For example, I hate cops. I think that even though they say, "look it's just a few bad apples," they create a culture where cops consistently use excessive force and hurt people. I feel the same way for this subreddit. Hunting people down and sending them horrible messages is bad. It's actually illegal if you were running around doing it in person. Why can't reddit see it is being completely two faced about both this stupid subreddit and stupid fucking police?   Also the irony in this is palpable. Fatpeoplehate consistently banned people it deemed fat sympathizers. Is that not censorship? They didn't practice free speech, where was the outrage about that?
[deleted]
How the fuck is this a conspiracy? They're shit subs that don't need to exist. 
It only takes one, or maybe a few, to sniff it out. [TODO: Add some sort of creative quip about sheeps, dogs, and instincts. Toss in something about a shepherd for the religious folk.]
America has a severe obesity problem.  Reddit has a sponsor that would like to keep people fat.  Bamn /r/conspiracy
Never heard of it.
Posting a picture with no information is not doxxing, it's not bullying, and it's not briggading. All it is is hurt feelings of adults who act like children with no self control.
Good on you man. I don't take it as far as /r/fph but I will always respect the strive to better yourself and be healthy. Some don't take kindly to the mass embarrassment on that sub, but its optional! I am glad it worked for you and when you reach your goal you see it as a new way of living, not just numbers on a scale. 
Ok but isn't hating a fat person an idea and fucking your dog a behavior?  That logic is fucking dumb as fuck.
You know what shitbag, you are fucking full of it.  My grandmother spent 63 years between 95-105 pounds at 5' 6". Crippling arthritis and the medication she was placed on for it led to her gaining 45 lbs in one year. She could not exercise, she literally had trouble getting out of bed - the medication she was was on did crazy shit to her metabolism on top of the fact that her joints were literally failing her.  Assholes like you made her last few years on earth miserable. I hope to fuck you deal with something similar in your personal life.
In the meantime, fuck their advertisers.  #TURN ON ADBLOCK  Be sure it gets reddit's sidebar ads and sponsored links but going to: Adblock &gt; "Filter lists" &gt; uncheck "Allow some non-intrusive advertising"
This I cannot get my head around, showing up is the very LEAST a person can do. Mediocrity should not be rewarded. We are a society leaning towards the art of doing the very least and expecting full rewards or compensation. Not just in kids sports leagues. What on earth could this be stemming from?
I seeee! Thanks for the explanatiom
Quit gilding too
No man is an island,   Entire of itself.   Each is a piece of the continent,   A part of the main.   If a clod be washed away by the sea,   Europe is the less.   As well as if a promontory were.   As well as if a manor of thine own Or of thine friend's were.   Each man's death diminishes me,   For I am involved in mankind.   Therefore, send not to know   For whom the bell tolls,   It tolls for thee. 
[deleted]
For some ads show up even if they are using AdBlock because reddit is on their non-intrusive ads lists. To turn this off you have to go to:  # Adblock &gt; "Filter lists" &gt; uncheck "Allow some non-intrusive advertising"  This includes reddit's sidebar ads and sponsored links!  Ublock also comes highly recommended to me
Thanks for that archive. Pretty incredible social dynamics on display. Especially compared to /r/all now, a few hours later.
I got in after a minute or two, but there is nothing there.
Yes. All is one.
[deleted]
I DEMAND NO LIMITATION TO MY RIGHT TO HATE ANYBODY I CHOOSE   GOD GAVE ME THIS RIGHT   DID YOU READ THE TOWER OF BABEL?   HATING PEOPLE IS GODLY
https://youtu.be/l59cg62wqpY
Free speech, obeying the new rules. The issue is, so long as a sub hasn't violated these rules there's no reason to ban it. Well, guess what? They're banning subs that are not in violation of any clear rules. Harassment for example. You open up a new sub, let's say it's /r/fatpeoplehate2, and it has no content, no rules. Just a link and a moderator. That subreddit will be banned without any sort of violation what so ever. That's why people are upset.
[deleted]
FPH banned people for breaking their rules.  Reddit banned FPH for breaking their rules, and FPH is upset about this.  I don't know why you can't see the irony here. Reddit did to FPH what FPH did to users. It's crystal-clear to me. 
hi?
You make it sound like the sub was created as a holding pen, instead of being created by and for like minded people, *like the way every subreddit gets created*, and it was actually very actively moderated to remove rule violating posts and trolls.   
Mad. Also you're welcome. 
Thats what the claimed. I agree. I was just commenting that its not even possible that these subreddits did it too. Hilarious because the announcement preceding today's was about transparency 
So typing will get me gold?
Reddit is not the govt so there is no legal issue and yet what is the equivalent of a public space?  There really isn't one.  All such websites are privately owned and so when they censor it does really stifle free speech. That's why I say split the difference (disallowing threats etc), let them have their own sub but ban it from the r/all and the like.  If people want to go to the "red light district" let them
I used to be subscribed to FPH till I realised it was just a bunch of nasty, toxic people. I'm glad it is shut down, good work reddit. 
I agree. I railed on the sub and most of its userbase whenever I could but being banned? Too far
Couldn't they just remove FPH and other stuff from /r/all if that's the case? 
You made top 3 in my /r/all . Never seen a /r/conspiracy  post so high.
This is really the most pathetic excuse to be a bully I've ever read.(not you specifically just venting) There's other ways to influence change besides - blind hostility, hatred, and unreasonable stupidity - as this entire FPH, SRS (whatever you want to call them) 'shitlords' community seems to want to represent.   As a taste of your own medicine I suppose:  I hope you misanthropic cunts get permabanned from reddit and rot in your toxic corner of the World Wide Web.
Or stop buying gold.
Lol, funyy
I actually am subscribed to that subreddit and while messed up, it has shown me how uncarefulness can lead to a very quick death, which in turn has changed the way I look at life. I am waaaaaay more careful now when I cross the street, just to give you an example.
[deleted]
If an alternative came around with even a little close to the same features I would switch just to stick it to Reddit for thinking they're untouchable.
**YAR HAR FEEDLE DEE DEE! BEING A PIRATE IS ALRIGHT WITH ME! DO WHAT YOU WANT 'CAUSE A PIRATE IS FREE! YOU ARE A PIRATE!**
Will do!
This is completely different from [reddit.com/new](http://www.reddit.com/new) or r/all/new.
It is political correctness gone awry. Bad move. It may make a few high ranking SJW'S orgasm but it is a terrible mive for the future of Reddit. 
thanks broseph
Whos fighting censorship? This has nothing to do with censorship?! Despite the fact that when you read the sidebar rules , they are very clear that fat acceptance is not allowed. Nobody forces you to visit /r/gasthekikes    If it was about censorship then there would be multiple sites shut down. This is because a bunch of fat people got their feelings hurt and reddit dont feel like they can sell as many advertisements to their sponsors with a very large fat shaming community.
What else could potentially work is a blackout. No one goes on reddit for 24 hours on a specific day. That's a way to starve the beast. Your way works too. 
It's been banned for a long time. Beatingwomen2 has been sitting around for awhile though with no issues.
tomorrow maybe
I think I speak for a large number of reasonable people when I say we'll never be able to take any discussion of any topic on Reddit seriously again.  Every major event on this site ("major event" defined as everyone going crotch-waving apeshit for days or weeks) is either about paranoid mass organized dogpile hate or stealing naked pictures and playing keepaway with them. 
You can't knock them for doing one thing. Reddit feels they should censor the subs that really insult people. They're starting with the gat hating subs and will probably move to those other subs later.
Incorrect, its impossible to lose weight!
What could the cover up possibly be?
[deleted]
you'll be back lol
I get that you are being sarcastic (because nobody would seriously use 'sheep' like that), but some people might not so you should add a /s to your comment. 
The gift exchanges are also huge money makers for them.  Affiliate marketing machine
I really don't understand why people keep sayin, "Oh yeah, just turn on blockers and stuff, that'll show 'em!"   If you really think what a website is doing is unconscionable then stop fucking giving it your traffic entirely.
I guess it's that. The site is a reddit clone, the code could be a simple fork but admins said that it was difficult to deploy. If you have one guy handling everything, and no replicated server or CDN or whatever, we'll have the slowest web site on the planet. 
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Wow it's only been a couple of hours and we already have artwork o.o
Yah virtually all subs do it, but it's moderated as soon as possible.
Holy god, this is the best one yet. 
Hopefully from a more credible source. Yeesh.
So what was the sub about..hating fat people or fat people hating?
[deleted]
Ive been telling people not to buy gold for a while.  I have 14 months worth of gold.   
There's a better solution, use adblock instead of adblock plus. 
Hopefully reddit will be irrelevant by then. Censorship like this for me crosses the line, they don't deserve to be "the front page of the internet" anymore now.
(from april 1st, 2007)  Maybe you aren't aware, but that's April Fools Day. But then again, maybe you are.
So true that's why I just made this new account
The current crop of psychopaths have nothing to do with judaism (nor with christanism, islam, or any other religion). Regular jews are just as much victims as all others, and can be allies. By stupidly blaming all "joooos" you simply distract from the real problem. Also, your white victim crap is simply ludicrous.
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protest Reddit's unethical business practices.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
[deleted]
[deleted]
the profit will come from selling a gentrified reddit to the highest bidder, not gold subscriptions :3
Throwing in the towel. Voat really does work just like reddit just slow right now. Fuck thiis place. 
You could've made a post detailing the things you're referring to, but you instead chose to have a sook. 
There is carbon-14 in dinosaur bones, meaning they can't be any more than 80,000 years max as a very generous estimate. The amount found rules out contamination.  The worlds only six thousand years old.
Yup, why contribute to the problem. Create the solution. 
I suspect it's not the usual /r/conspiracy viewer that is upvoting the FPH stories.  There seems to be some brigading going on...
when I was in school it was approx. 11 miles at sea level  If this has changed to your '3' then what else has changed?
uBlock may be better than adBlock
Supposedly a lot of the submissions on reddit are actually ads made to look like user generated content. 
picking up the intent of someone is definitely subjective matter, but there are definitely strong signs to pickup... if the sliding goes peanuts to strawberry jam, i'll be less inclined to see a shill than if the sliding goes from peanuts to ww2, racism, antisemitism, feminism or what have you... It could be that the peanuts to strawberry jam is a shill, but then it's a useless shill we don't have to care about...
Banned. /s
You're absolutely right.  Problem is the people who are so gung-ho about the FPH bullshit aren't from here.  It is mostly disenfranchised reddit users coming here as "the last bastion of free speech", and saboteurs here to manipulate this place by upvoting fph posts and down voting non fph posts.     Just watch the vote count on this post for a while..  +2, 100% upvote at the time of writing. 
Citation needed. 
Correct! Just educate yourself and stop complaining. Move forward and open your mind by "freeing the mind" of media manipulation. You are a free soul to enjoy your life as you please!
It does look a lot like forum sliding, doesn't it? 
I think this is more like how an underground movement builds. Only the most motivated will begin to turn away from all the trappings/fetters of civilization and look to find others of similar concern. In 2 years I predict an entirely new underground of news sources based on the common person's contribution. Everyone is a video tape operator. Dash Cams can upload in real time, and be set to publicly publish on a timer.  Overlords miscalculated the ego feed that video gave the masses. Now it is a cheap tool for unfiltered recording of misuse of the government and it's law enforcement arm.  I have spent 22 years on the net. Seen a lot of change. Not sure if this is even pertinent to anyone over 55 anymore, this internet thing.
I can just picture it.  "...ewww second hand gold!" "Honey, don't touch that! You don't know where it's been!"  It will lead to a pit of abandoned reddit gold, huddling together to feel wanted.
Whats /r/todcon ?
Yep
Wow, her account..
&gt; But that has nothing to do with global geoengineering, or chemtrails.  What makes you so confident about that?
8ch.net/pol/
Any websites like reddit (new or old) that still stand strong against censorship?  Reddit has gone to complete shit lately.This site used to be so promising and felt so free, but has now became what I hate most. A censored up, circle jerk, reposting, social media machine that bows to the demands of fat, tublr, SJWs. Several of sub reddits have gone private due to the moderators not agreeing with the admins that censored other subs. While I agree with the mods of those subs that censorship is not what this site needs, they too have ruined the experience. Either you allow all content (within legal means) or don't have any content at all. I no longer want to be a part of this site now that the CEO and Admins feel the need to water down reddit to make it seem more PC. FUCK YOU ADMINS! You ruined this site and now i am looking for an alternative that shares the same values that reddit used to.
It just seems counterproductive to our cause to lord information over people and treat them like assholes for not knowing something they weren't exposed to, and you can turn a lot of people away by doing that. It's not that the message isn't good, but a little phrasing can work wonders for getting people to identify with a movement or belief and feel welcomed by it. 
There is a reason why adblock is free 
[deleted]
I could certainly see someone taking advantage of the turmoil in Reddit though...
I love how the shitlords are crying discrimination. I'm glad yo shit got banned. It's Reddit's fault they got out of control in the first place. It should have never been featured on All.  
Ok, you're right, Reddit is private property and they do have the right to "kick whoever the fuck the want off their property". I just don't see the point in banning a subreddit for its content, if you don't like it don't watch it..It's as simple as that.
That would be awesome. You know there had to be some employees there who knew this was a horrible mistake and now they're at work trying to clean up her mess while doing their best to not fall down laughing at how ridiculous this site has become. 
[deleted]
I thought it was around 305k just the other day.
I don't know what part of ask me anything gives you the right to ask questions that don't pertain to Rampart. 
Oops that's some typo!  I think you mean the Dews. 
i know what is right and what is wrong. we on r/conspiracy do not post personal information on people. thats why fatpeoplehate was shut down. maybe you should use your brain
[deleted]
[deleted]
Free speech is fine, you can legally paint any text on your car, signs, clothes or anything you want. You can create a hate site if you like. You are free to walk down any street and speak anything you like,  Reddit owed you nothing and does not have to give you a platform for free. You have to create your own website for that and you assume all the liabilities.
Pictures of plane debris:  http://www.911myths.com/index.php/Pentagon_crash_scene   Here is a *Truther* site specifically excluding the no-plane theory:  http://www.911review.com/errors/pentagon/smallhole.html  and specifically, this is their analysis of visible damage to the facade, that combines to more than accommodate the impact of a jumbo jet: http://www.911review.com/errors/pentagon/imgs/damage_comp.jpg  As I said (and as the Truther site confirms) the exterior walls of the Pentagon largely held up. Most of the debris penetrated without destroying the upright load bearing elements of the walls, with the main central mass actually destroying the structure, as seen on this simulation made by Purdue University:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oLfRbUNQDwk
Occupy was too vague a name. Media ate up the dumbs who couldn't articulate why they were there, save "99% vs 1%." A name that casts the movement as exclusively economic wouldn't be so prone to gender/racial/social hysterics. I don't know what that name would be, though. Wealth Equality Now? Not so spiffy...
Thanks, I try.  And no, that wasn't an incorrect usage of the term malleable. Good job.
You have to learn how to ride these waves or else they'll use them as a weapon against us.  Next they'll start banning other groups who are even louder and more obnoxious, hoping that group will run us out of town.
\#BringBackOurFPH
[deleted]
Anyone else see  "escaped New York killers" a drill for implementing martial law?  
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's disgusting.  Ewwww. 
They are going to discuss the end of humanity as we know it. 
[deleted]
Pretty fucking much.  Orbiters think they're gonna get rid of their oneitis, even if it's with a fat subhuman. 
Get over yourself and make an argument. Just because you act like you're superior doesn't mean you are. 
Lol report me.
True! Love your name. I hate Santorum. He used to be my rep. and I was so embarrassed. 
I'm glad we have famous philosophers from the past that think like this. There is an example of a man remembered through history and this was his opinion. Maybe the people who are so quick to shun conspirators or anyone willing to question our culture should open their minds a little more. 
Fucking brilliantly done. Its a very sad day in America when we need films like this to be safe from those that are supposed to protect us.
I kept wishing for one more *yes*
Donate to voat.co. It's a reddit clone dedicated to free speech and it needs some load balancing and bandwidth. Recent events have taken it offline due to a surge in traffic.
So it is a choice...  
your trolling is weak please move on
Considering whats "legal" is always changing, I think its safe to say someone is choosing what "free speech" is since changing is it's constant. When i say pretty open free speech, it means with exceptions just like your legal exceptions.
It's a conspiracy to keep today's youth from getting too physically fit.
&gt;Who knows what kind of bullshit surveillance malware is now downloaded to my computer  The same that the shadow government could easily put on literally any other website you download from?
I was going to say it's to keep the re-invasion of Iraq out of the headlines. 
This probably has some truth to it. Trade shit is being passed in the USA in order for us to be able to read what is being passed. Excuse me, but what in the fuck?
America isn't a democracy. 
Opponents of net neutrality argue that broadband service providers have to be free to manage their networks so all customers receive adequate levels of service. They also argue that regulation of the internet will negatively influence innovation, which the internet thrives on, and impede free speech.   http://broadband.about.com/od/netneutrality/a/What-Is-Net-Neutrality_2.htm
Doesn't matter if it's slight, or a lot. Wrong is wrong  That's good you're not taking it to mean you're dumb though. I care so deeply about your self esteem, you know!   ^^Not ^^really ^^I ^^don't ^^respect ^^anyone ^^who ^^is ^^pro-censorship
I hate to have to be the one to ask this but, why are you mad bro?
Entitled, manipulative, use-and-abuse c-unit
I've never heard of /r/TopMinds. I subscribe directly to this sub.  EDIT: Still waiting for the apology, but I expect a [deleted].  *For posterity, the post by /u/AcousticProlapse said:*  &gt; Hey, dumbass: You were told specifically not to reply or participate in this thread when you clicked on it from /r/TopMinds. Quit being a fucking stupid cunt. &gt; That goes for /u/redpanda999, too.
The issue is other subs that are more active in harassing people got left alone. Most notably r/shitredditsays that has a history of harassment and even doxxing. The message here is you can be as hateful as you want as long as you agree with Pao's agenda.
Wow, you just wasted a whole lot of energy... and you're telling ME to calm down? I say wasted because I'm not interested in having this debate with you. If you don't get it yet, you probably will soon enough.
W H O C A R E S
The real doxxing likely was quickly removed and users banned. It would be hard to have good evidence unless you cared enough about the dumb drama to be smack in the middle of it.
Yes.  [Check out this job posting.](http://www.liveworld.com/careers/liveworld-moderator/)  [Now check out their clients list.](http://www.liveworld.com/clients/pharmaceutical/)  Sanofi is the domestic distributor of the MMR vaccine.
What makes you think they are fucking idiots?  A bunch of angry social media posts?  *Have you ever actually looked at any real science on the matter?*
Louis CK asks why the U.S. is killing people in Yemen: https://vine.co/v/OUPep3nExvr
[deleted]
Fair enough...maybe he's right, maybe he's not. But he should be factual and leave personal views out of it if he expects people to be objective and hear him out. For me, he failed to do that.
Promise?
[deleted]
[deleted]
Just know that congress legislates with a forum consisting of pimply teenagers and social rejects firmly in mind.   I'm just here for the JFK footage and the crazy funnies...shit started getting really racist a couple years back and now I just get paid to come here and spread disinformation. 
&gt; By the way, why did she lie?  Her expertise is in nanotechnology (literally the manipulation of matter on an atomic, molecular, and supramolecular scale). Her expertise is not *secret military grade powdered incendiaries*.  Even if she had enough knowledge to review the paper, **that wasn't her job.**  Her job was to select and approve reviewers, monitor the review process and ultimately choose whether to approve or reject the paper. She was involved in none of that.   &gt; Sorry, but she literally lied about the topic at hand  The *topic at hand* is whether Bentham followed their own editorial standards when they published the paper. She says they did not, and that statement has *never been challenged by a single author of the paper* or by the publication itself.  Produce one statement from any of the authors claiming they dealt with her on selecting and approving reviewers and publishing the paper.   I'm still waiting...
whats all the hostility about? i wasnt being a dick about it. im just saying its not like congress gives a shit about what the people want. BTW where did i refer to him as an idiot? and where was i "bitching about it"? all i said it will no likely not have any effect how much we call them. you need to chill out man and stop being so hostile.   i would think congress would have a higher approval rating then 19%, if they actually listened to the people, just sayin.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's a manufactured controversy with manufactured votes and comments, to drown out any real discussion. One thread about it is fine, 12 threads all with thousands of upvotes is obviously not organic. It's successfully derailing this subreddit, at least for now. 
Considering that private prisons make up around 9 percent of the the capacity in America it's a long time before anything would every happen. This is an often cited but highly uninformed criticism. 
[deleted]
That is the opprotiate response to pretty much anything offensive on the internet. Instead of policing the internet, people should learn not to be offended. 
Blah, blah, I want government goons to extort for my special interest project, blah, blah
Tupacs baby mama
Is their an adblock for mobile users? I have an android and use "reddit is fun" to browse 90% of the time. 
I would like some gold. 
Wow, hows that for an informed opinion [this is sarcasm].  Through the people I have known in life, I have seen the Canadian medical system treat a range of injuries, accidents, diseases, organ transplants, cancer, end of life care, etc., and I have never seen anything but committed professionals who care about the patients health.   We have our challenges, exasperated by trying to provide high quality service to everyone, when so many communities outside of the major centres are extremely isolated.  In my opinion, government intervention in the American health system could benefit the consumer, by controlling costs.  Right now it plainly seems like people are getting gouged by medical costs.
How in the world do you make a comment just disappear? The first comment on here is that we didn't win. Where the heck did it go?
In the world of civil law yes. In natural law nobody can come between the rights you were born with and our creator. And you can bring natural law into civil law if you know who you are.
Why not? 
The idea that Coca-Cola or Monsanto are paying for propaganda for the acceptance of fat people is laughably absurd. Does that really make any sense to you? A company has better ways to spend its money. I call you a conspiracy theorist because ypu are posting this insanity on /r/conspiracy. Nice touch mentioning Blomberg Research, as if that gives you some kind of credibility. If you actually wanted to know about this invented issue you could use a research tool, or even a sub dedicated to finance or investing, but since you'd rather believe this insanity, you came here to ask others to do the work for you instead of doing your own "BASIC MARKET RESEARCH."
TL;DR. But, seeing as there are no comments currently I will peruse. Nope, it's about "the fattening" so still TL;DR because I have better things to do with my time.
Wow, thank you for this. I'm not even finished with the tutorial, and I can tell I'm going to enjoy this a lot if the content is there. Posting a link to the source on the download page if you want to compile yourself? These people understand. 
Any proof that bankers did, in those wars I cited ?
No you're donating to the forum you spend more hours on then talking to your loved ones. It is a quirky way to do it. No one thinks gifting gold is going to somehow cure their baldness.
[deleted]
You see that thing that snoop said?   Talked about akon supplying solar power to African villages but the science project of Bruce is all over the media. 
Who wants to bet the reason she and her husband aren't seeing jail time is they're being used for something like censoring a popular content site for expressing opinions?
Another steaming pile pulled straight from a redditor's ass and dumped into the forum like it made any kind of sense. The delusions are simply amazing. People who have absolutely no objective standards of evidence for anything they believe. There is literally zero reasoning in your post.   
Voat is taking small donations via bitcoin and Paypal right now if people want to throw in to try and get enough server power to handle the exodus. 
I had not thought abut that until you mentioned it but it makes total sense 
But while yelling on Skype.
The "90% occupancy" thing comes from an offer letter that was leaked a few years ago. It was part of an offer to purchase existing facilities at a cost of many millions of dollars. The government is under no obligation to accept such a proposal, but if it does the government gets a big check. The company cannot possibly afford to make a $50 million investment if the government could decide the following week to build their own new prison, or hire some other company. In return for the very large investment, the company needs a revenue guarantee.   Such revenue guarantees are part of virtually every supply contract between businesses, and they benefit both parties. A company might contract to buy potatoes at a very good price, agreeing to purchase some minimum quantity. This allows the supplier to make investments that reduce their costs. But if the buyer doesn't need all those potatoes, the supplier doesn't force them to buy them anyway. Instead the parties negotiate new terms, perhaps including a cash payment.  If the government did not have enough prisoners to fill the beds, they would at worst pay the company for the empty beds. Much like if you don't show up for a confirmed hotel room, you still have to pay for it. And if your employer reserves 20 rooms and only needs 10, they don't recruit random people to fill the rooms, they just pay for the empty rooms they reserved.   
What protections did they put in place? You mean like half the rules on that sub that got you banned for violating? The mods were crazy fast at removing any post with identifying information. I don't think you ever saw the sub before it was banned. 
Aww man ... Loved Tiki. 
9/11 In Plane Sight  9/11 Loose Change  JFK: Dark Legacy  Even Zeitgeist has its thought provoking moments.   An earlier commenter mentioned 9/11: The New Pearl Harbor and I concur that even at 5 hours, it is pretty damn good, as is Enter The Void. Good luck on your search for new and intriguing information. Always a boost to see someone else wanting to awaken.   Kudos, random redditor.  
Yes, but a lot of *new people* will come to this sub, see a single news story and say 'what's the conspiracy?', the problem is they don't realize that one article is a breadcrumb in a larger conspiracy.  Police abuse is one of those.  It's not the abuse that's the story it's the corruption, frequency and impunity in the courts that is the conspiracy.
[deleted]
BOT LIVES MATTER
All this shit is so fucking childish.
[deleted]
What's the point of having these wanna be special forces operators on the city payroll?  It makes me sick knowing that our society has created a class of citizens capable of having worse values than the people they're appointed to serve.   Until we fix the hiring process and the policy that these officers pull their authority, sadly the problem will continue to grow. 
Those poor fucking people paid for their fucking edibles!
[deleted]
Dem edibles...  I can't imagine having to do anything important after eating a brownie, those are for days where you have 8 hours and a couch all to yourself. 
Great post, thanks for the submit. This is like 1 out of a hundred so far that I have seen that is worth looking at. A ton of posts lately are garbage.
And they don't like the fact that you pointed it out.
I'm pretty sure the gold buyers are not part of that mob of angry trolls trying to tell everybody what not to do.
This is fucking scary.   If you so much is look in the direction of CPS in a way that comes off as cross, they will fucking haul your kids off and have you slapped with a felony, who the fuck gave these people such unheard of power? 
I'd rather media be owned and operated by the people, independent of private owners and profit motives, and directly accountable to the democratic process. 
That's called collateral damage, not a conspiracy.
Pudgy nerd boy has different plans.
no
Holy shit, comparing reddit to the holocaust? Are you sure it even happened?!
[deleted]
on the record.  shame is something these zionists would die from if they ever return to being human and stop ignoring truth.
because we will take it back.  running from site to site is bullshit, let us end this by throwing that dumb bitch and all the others out
Or is it you envying them because they just don't give a fuck about wanting to be eye-candy to receive validation, hence not giving a fuck about pride?   Poor Americans have to eat total garbage. Being overweight has shifted from being a luxury disease to the exact opposite.   And frankly all of this isn't any of your business. Who's next? Freckled redheads and blondes ... or crooked nosed jews? 
except weed, the better to stupify the masses
There are some things about it that I don't like, but the new method of long division is actually better.
[deleted]
[Shaq is a Freemason](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HRT_PVtkAho)
I want to know how when I logged in my account seemingly downvoted this by itself before I ever got a chance to scroll down to it.
Do you have any citation for this?
[deleted]
The fact you people think anyone that speaks against it is fat, tells everything we need to know about you retards. And hate filled retards on top of it. Go pay for your own website loser. Also you might want to look up what an analogy is genius. stay in school for fuck sake.  
I would agree that a lot of facts are undeniable.  However,  I think energy beam weapon is a bit of a stretch and actually does more harm than good to the Truther cause.    I'm sure that the government has been reverse engineering alien technology since the 60s but bringing in click bait articles and talking reptilians turns off most people and forever puts them out of reach of the truth.    Know your audience and start with something they may already be questioning.  
Yah but my mother wasnt at home crying when it happened, she was when 9/11 hit, its wasnt quite on the same scale.
Video from OP was censored from /r/videos twice;  First for "no politics".  Then for "harassment". 
What does this mean? Jebs gonna say he's pulling out from the race?
[deleted]
Well Iraq started it by invading Iran, Israel selling Iran weapons only strengthened them
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IxTafqejV6k
It is too good to be true. He may genuinely want all these things he talks about, who knows?. If elected, he'll get bitch slapped just like Obama before he even gets a chance to sit in the oval office.    The corporate world makes the laws now and AIPAC sets foreign policy. The president of the United States is only a shadow of what it once was. 
You'll come to realize its a one way system.   Real life example. The so called "protectors in government" can deem anyone with what they "label" as a cult or "militia" (hence: [Waco](http://www.thetruthseeker.co.uk/?p=137), [William Cooper](http://www.bibliotecapleyades.net/sociopolitica/esp_sociopol_cooper10.htm) and more) and sending the troops to take them out. But these same governing people run and operate their cults or what they label as "secret society".  God forbid you can have your own secret society!
Great article.  I love Jon Rappoport, he's such a lucid writer.  What's blows my mind about this topic (like the proliferation of drones and rampant NSA spying) is that it's yet another example of a "crazy conspiracy theory" quickly becoming a widely accepted concept by the masses.  A few years ago the notion of "mandatory universal vaccination" would have been considered ludicrous.
Basically exactly that, but i highly doubt its going to get to that stage, the farthest i see it going is sales limitations.
I'm glad you came forward. As someone who has looked into the issue, it seems to be pretty clear that the incident was a false flag attack, and I was beginning to wonder if anyone connected to Sandy Hook noticed any inconsistencies.    I would highly recommend that you watch the first 40 or so minutes of each of these two documentaries:   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uMsiNMnW0t0 It'll probably only take you about 40 minutes because after that, you will likely be fairly convinced that it didn't happen.    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IxTafqejV6k This second documentary goes into further depth and assumes you already know some of the inconsistencies of what happened. This documentary focuses more on WHY they would fake such an incident. 
You need to see how many times gun control has been pushed by the Sandy Hook fraudsters since the event.  Mass shootings were also used in Scotland and Australia to take the guns. 
[Here](http://davesweb.cnchost.com/nwsltr114.html) is a great in-depth research series that goes beyond what a lot of the other bombing "conspiracy" research does.
Relevant [TED talk](http://www.ted.com/talks/eli_pariser_beware_online_filter_bubbles?language=en)
You can never talk about killing someone when you move up. But of course until you do you cannot be permitted to lead. 
/Lie.  It wasn't a lie, there is video of the parents saying they weren't allowed to see their children.  /But probably even dumber than that is the combination of "the parents should have been hysterical" with "they didn't get to see their children."  When you say this, you are compounding false logic. Both are true, yet you take them as false and assume it is somehow natural to do so.   /So, the parents are in on it, but they aren't?  This is your premise, or strawman. In general, to people who believe it didn't happen, but was merely a staged event to direct policy, then of course the "parents" were in on it. Saying they couldn't see their children doesn't suggest they weren't, it suggests that as much was kept from public view as possible. If you had staged a hoax, you would want as little hard evidence available as possible. For example, releasing the autopsy of the "Boston bomber" showed the holes in their narrative. Literally.   You created a strawman in your head and rolled with it into ever murkier scapes. 
Granting for the sake of argument that the school was not ADA compliant, why would this indicate it was not a real school? Are you of the belief that ADA violations never happen?
It doesn't matter. You are being royally  fucked and you have no say about it.
[deleted]
That's what I don't get here, public figures come out to defend the same views we have, and right away a people say , "oh he is a mason," or " its disinformation." How does that make sense? Why would he shed light on something most people refuse to talk about?
[deleted]
I didn't really think I needed to explain? It's fairly obvious, no?  At least I don't need an entire sub reddit to do it. For someone who prides themself on being attractive I'm surprised you're such a whiny suckhole. Whining is one of *the most* unattractive qualities a male can have....just a heads up.
Copy and pasting a comment I left above with a little edit:  The lineup of commercials that I saw last night were not typical before-movie-commercials. There was a common theme. Usually, the ads would be for things like an upcoming album, a soda company, or a local business. If the commercial for the navy was in a typical lineup like I just listed, I would not have thought it to be propaganda. 
[deleted]
No, I don't think so.  Got a link handy?
And Robin Cook remember. http://shaphan.typepad.com/blog/2006/05/questions_about.html
Tony Blair predicted Smith's death!  "Mr Blair woke his wife, Cherie, one morning and told her: “If John dies, I will be leader, not Gordon. And somehow, I think this will happen. I just think it will.”  "He [Blair] made the “strange” statement during a stay in a French hotel with his family in April 2004, the month before Mr Smith suffered a fatal heart attack,"  link: http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/politics/tony-blair/7976017/Tony-Blair-predicted-John-Smiths-early-death.html    http://didnwofabiansmurderjohnsmithmp.blogspot.co.uk/  http://www.onlinepublishingcompany.info/content/sitenewsreadmore/infobox/news/template/default/active_id/118  http://www.thetruthseeker.co.uk/?p=48459  http://www.informationclearinghouse.info/article31920.htm
Let us do the thinking for you, were clearly smarter. Some are more equal than others 
Thanks. It means a lot to me.
[deleted]
I agree.  Most people regardless of origin couldnt understand trade and investment framework.  I hope though that CNN stating this makes a lot of people at least go out there and attempt to at the very least feather through the TPP.
Cat and mouse, people are posting around the filters. (Reporting 24 hours later) the filter seems to be expanding and catching more. Are you still seeing most of the front page as FPH/censor/pao? If you go to "rising" it's basically 90% that, it's however never making it to "Hot"
did not say it was a good idea or that it made sense.... after all it is the plan of ignorant, stupid, selfish children that are the elite.  they believe that satan is their power not realizing satan is 'nothing' ... literally.  if they get what they want they will destroy what they have.    evil is stupid, literally
then* others  /s
Except that those who set policy are elected officials, no?  That implies consent of the governed.
We should be going for any I over any R or D.
I don't see that quote anywhere in the article.  Possibly misleading title?  
This was a huge win for We The People, and happened because liberals and the Tea Party joined forces and did the right thing for the country and their constituents, and said no to the establishment Republicans and Obama.   Pelosi should be commended here for slapping Obama and the globalists with a resounding no.   My favorite part of the article is the conclusion;   &gt; Did the US public finally give big corporations, who have successfully purchased the US president long ago, the middle finger?  
Nope. Wrong again. 
The characters room they are in is in to all that kind of mystic stuff and horoscopes. The all seeing eye is not just Illuminati related...
Good argument. Exactly what I'd expect from a frequenter of FPH.
Yup. Including that second one that you're scared of.
[Source](http://poleshift.ning.com/profiles/blog/show?id=3863141%3ABlogPost%3A488107&amp;commentId=3863141%3AComment%3A1000776&amp;xg_source=activity)
Thanks for bringing this all up Lizzy. I really think this stuff needs to be looked at and talked about.   Here's a kinda interesting video about a school shooting "drill" in Pattama County, Iowa that was called off. Talked about at 23m50s in video.   https://youtu.be/zohJpxkWJcg?t=23m49s    
Does that mean people should berate the crap out of fat people who are strangers to them on their own subs,cand the other subs they brigade? Do you think that berating them helps solve the problem in any which way or form?
Then what would all of the debt-burdened law students do...   /s
&gt; Reinhardt  Yep, that's the guy.  Man, that brought me back.
[Inverted Totalitarianism](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Inverted_totalitarianism)
Which will only lead to a darker path. More protests, once peaceful protests are impossible, violent protests, small cells of anti government rebels will form soon after that, maybe even a full scale civil war again.   Civil war being the absolute worst possible outcome. I doubt that it will happen unless something horrific happens. 
[deleted]
What does it matter? If the crater is 55 miles the bright spot is several miles across, aka city sized.
Robert Sapolsky gives amazing lectures. I'd highly recommend watching some more of them.
And gangs kill more than some active wars .chicago has the nickname chiraq because there were more gang murders there ,than there were soldiers killed in iraq for that year. In Baltimore there were 42 murders in may alone. The streets in several major cities are gang war zones .so if the police are doing thier jobs, of course there is going to be casualties. Do you really expect them to police a war zone and not have to shoot people ocasionaly?
&gt; But not revoltingly scum of the earth  That's because revolting scum of the Earth run this planet.
But don't worry!  Federal credit monitoring for everyone!
shaq is a freemason look at his ring https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=x7qoxchAgw4
[Rage Against the Machine](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bWXazVhlyxQ)
It is a skeptical idea but then so are some of the events.   However always remember the information called news/media/entertainment is very tightly controlled and not by us ordinary folks.  This is an important time to be a doubter and to find information using sneaky methods and most importantly learn how to vet the information you find especially by comparing it to what is actually happening in our lives, every day, the ordinary stuff.    Example the periodic propaganda drives about all the violent citizens and how criminal we all are.  We live in cities with millions of people, drive on the freeways together daily, go to work, send our children to school attend or not attend church, marry or stay single etc.  But now and then the narrative presents us as so violent we should all be locked down and constantly harassed by law enforcement.   Here are some sites that collect that kind of information and send it all over the nation, over and over.    Anti-Police:  http://www.policemisconduct.net/  This site used to be devoted to African American crime but now includes anyone.   http://thugreport.com/  Women especially mothers:  http://www.truecrimereport.com/bad_moms/   Teachers:  http://teachercomplaints.com/       
Law only matters when *enforced*. If one doesn't get punished why does one need to concern themselves with law? Law only applies to those who can't afford effective counsel. 
This question is often asked by those who are not yet members and by those who have been in lodge for some time. This question is often a difficult one to answer. We know that we enjoy being Masons but do not know how to explain this. I will try to give an overview of why we are masons and what masonry is.  First we need to understand that the number one thing that people want to know about any organization. This is: “What’s in it for me?” This is one of the things that is always the same in life. No one wants to become involved in something unless they benefit from it. This question must be answered for if we do not know what we want from it, it matters not what it is.
Will do thank you very much!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Uncle Sam, "Don't let the door hit you on the way out."
I don't think so, but I could be wrong. Take a look at the last 30 pages of the document. That's where the report is.  Also: http://np.reddit.com/r/news/comments/39n2ev/the_cia_has_finally_released_its_report_on_saudi/  The report on Saudi Arabia starts on page 437 for anyone else interested. I'm fairly confident that this is the report everyone was waiting for. Look at the link on /r/news. It's also on the front page of reddit.
so do you think its a city with something living in it? 
You sir need some CBD and THC.    Search this   cannabinoids-101-what-makes-cannabis-medicine
I hope you're right -- about the honorable men pushing back. That is exactly what we need. And it would indicate that the military is not utterly corrupt.
&gt; There are tells when someone is lying  Such as? 
&gt; I don't know how far it will develop as an ideology, but it started in universities, and then spread into company HR departments, and also millennials starting work...  Just wait until people from this generation (with a pro-censorship ideology) start getting elected and making policy. It's probably going to take a couple more decades, but eventually you're going to end up with the USSA (United Safe Spaces of Amerika)
Reddit's CEO words: "Reddit doesn't strive to be a true free speech platform". Expect admins to target /r/conspiracy as soon as posts about banks and big companies start to pop up more.
Now, to take Bush Jr's defense here... That weird vague air that gives him a constant look of cluelessness and panic always was usual in his speeches.
Yeah, we're under attack by flat earth disinfo agents, that's certain.
&gt; Remember how everyone keeps bringing up evil Putin's shill army?  Not really, since anyone who does seems to be heavily downvoted!
[deleted]
Who besides Michael Hastings?
Nixon is dead, right? We don't need any Futurama IRL.
&gt; Nixon   at least that one resigned not as the current criminals
What's so retarded at pointing out that a sub devoted to spotting PR done via reddit has begun restricting submitted content?
He has made a prediction, but I was referring to his statements about the past events. It will indeed be interesting to see what happens in September...
BECAUSE THE MODS OF THE SUBREDDIT DID IT THEMSELVES TO PROTEST CENSORSHIP.  Holy fuck.  This is why you conspiracy idiots are so retarded.  You fervently believe anything that fits your "everything is corrupt" narrative without actually looking into it.
SRS superior? only in there little hug box
Flair added.  &gt;shit down the sub  Yes they did, didn't they?
Clones if you arent in a hurry and planned ahead. If you are in a hurry dna databases and blackbag teams.
It doesn't take common sense (well apparently it does) to realize obesity causes heart disease, high blood pressure, diabetes, high cholesterol, infertility, etc. Couple that with decreased physical activity and health care costs sky rocket. Obesity had been known to cause a 50% increase in cancer rates.  But yeah you're right, obesity probably doesn't cause health care costs to increase.   It's just common sense.
NOTE: He/She did reply. Here's my response, which I was unable to post before he deleted his comment.  &gt;Where else on Reddit can you report surreptitious marketing then?   Pretty much anywhere. Or start your own sub. There is not a top-down ban on that type of content, which is what your post implied.   &gt;How come since about an hour ago I got -60 downvotes on every post and tons of replies almost exactly like yours? How many people does your brigade have? You have destroyed Reddit and made it a ridiculous marketing outlet for fools.  That may all be true (except I have no idea what "brigade" you're talking about), but that has nothing to do with the accuracy of your post. Your perception of people being assholes to you does not prove or disprove the accuracy of your title.
And how effective could that be?   
We are experiencing the end of time as we know it. The end of humanity as we know it. It is not a good or bad thing either. It just is. The Last Blood should open up everyone's eyes to some hidden truths. From there all bets are off and a line in the sand will be drawn. God or no God. I roll with God. 
I haven't seen a single drastic change, tbh. Some subs got banned for violating preexisting rules and now they're trying to contain the shit-storm so the site doesn't become unusable for the 95% of users who don't give a fuck that FPH got banned.
looking at dick pics
[The mods of /r/hailcorporate refute your post within your linked thread.](http://np.reddit.com/r/HailCorporate/comments/39ivqx/what_the_fuck_is_happening_here_censorship_is_the/cs3qw9c?context=3)  Now remove your ***extremely*** misinformed post.
Speculation doesn't trump the questionable events that happened on that day.
Greed.
This dude is absolutely refusing to accept reality.  It's embarrassing to watch.
[deleted]
How about instead of that fancy link I've seen a million times, *explain it in your own words* as your teachers should have required in school. 
you mean when rage comics were peaking?
Shut the fuck up. This is far, far more serious than digg ever was.  Digg died over a layout change, they never even touched mass censorship / information control.  Think about that. 
That's now how shared freedoms work btw. If you have an opinion like you do, you're halfway in the grave with any argument. Age, content, reactions..   "15 year old black highschcool kids started looting and rioting with cops in Baltimore. If those blacks want to be treated like humans and not be treated like the way they are, they can go to another country."   Voice of dissent should be a marker that larger things have gone pear shaped, rather than ignore the immaturity and disregard the whole situation.  E- another thought, reddit will become like wicker park Chicago... It started with the youth and the artists when they all moved to that shitty neighborhood, ten years later, no artists no culture: baby carriages, black north faces zippers, ughs, Starbucks... Gentrification... Command this moment folks. Built on the foundation of the past, but then turned into this homogenized American worthlessness.
At some point enough will be enough though. 
How is acknowledging that literally everyone else understands that you're incorrect shooting myself in the foot?
Indeed.
G. Edward Griffin [explains it](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ynVqPnMQ2sI) better than I could.
[deleted]
Yes, that makes it more clear.   I'd suggest that those who dissent should start to become more active in searching out and downvoting the threads. However, I believe the vast majority of redditors do not worry either way what happens so long as they can laugh at cat pictures.
yes, but when people say shit like "this is censorship and you should care about it even if you dont care about what was banned" i just think about all the other times all these same people didn't care when it didnt effect them.
Except he's wrong, too.
Appreciate that James, you too.  I'd push for you as a mod here, but I feel that your best work will be done with /r/C_S_T
FUCKING THAAAANKYOU, I thought i was the only one witnessing the active suppression of this story, glad to know I'm not the only one
no because im not actively shit talking these people and spamming horrible hate for days on end. i dont like them i dont want to be associated at all with them. I am not gonna run around spamming like a child having a tantrum. they are terrible people, simple as that.
[deleted]
[deleted]
The sheer number and size of pro-zionist (pro-Israeli Gov't) lobbying groups in the US is a bit worrying, when you really look in to it. 
That is not correct. Just because you claim to be part of a group doesn't mean you actually are part of a group. I can claim that I played football with the Brazilians in the world cup, but that doesn't make it so.
This is from last year.  why does it say 6/12/15?
More wars. Less freedoms.
[deleted]
[deleted]
But that IS her market value. It's whatever Harvard's Willingness to pay her is 
I haven't had a PM saying it's been deleted from worldnews, is there a conspiracy here?
I remember that post too.  I'll have to look through again.
Because the internal skeleton of the towers are made of steel which can withstand kerosine (jet fuel) fire which burns at 990 °C and steel melts at 1370 °C so kerosine can burn over steel indefinitely without melting the steel forever!. The energy required is not large enough to break the Fe-Fe, Fe-C, Fe-Ni and Fe-Cr bonds.  At worst it would soften the iron in the steel as it oxidises and tarnish it but nothing more but it can never melt at those temperatures for millions of years.  Also if the the fire was hot enough it doesn't just have to melt the steel at the floors were the planes hit but every floor, every trellis every joint every beam to make the building collapse at near free fall speed which of course didn't happen that way.   Unless the burning material in the twin towers were made of magnesium which somehow combusted (m.p. 2000 °C) or acetylene (max m.p. 2300 °C) or even oxyacetylene which burns at 3000 °C this type of fire exceeds the melting point of steel (1370 °C) and would melt it.
oooh snap, thats scary shit
Black kids come into a private venue, start fighting with each other and locals who pay the HOA dues to maintain a private pool.  Police tell them to break up the fights, sit down, and restore order.  Black kids either jump the fence and later damage locals' property or talk back to the cop, refusing to sit down and keep the peace.  Then the black boys rushed the cop.   Why are the standards of civilized behavior like respect for private property and obedience to authority not required of blacks?   How is holding them to a lower standard somehow not a form of racism?  
Damn.  I was going to say that that's some serious irony, but that's not really ironic.  It's just straight up underhanded.
rgr that. that's actually a pretty great description. If john q public loses the fear, they lose control.
Call them. 
fear theater...runs our military industry
Listen, I've done my own research on the topic and I don't judge people based on titles, i judge them based on what they do.   If my dad goes to heaven and God is like, "hey man I'm sorry, you lived a very good life, but because you mistakenly identified with freemasonry you get to burn in hell..." Well, lets just say I would not want to worship an unjust god.   Many people call themselves Christian who aren't very Christ-like... I don't think a title condemns or absolves a man, I think actions do. Just my 2 cents.   I might still browse those vids tho.
[deleted]
Dont you?
She is uniquely aggressive, knowledgable, and direct about a lot of financial issues in a way that very few 'elites' are. She's not perfect.   What is your point here? That because she isn't literally trying to take down the entire corrupt system she should be mocked and dismissed?   It seems to me that while not perfect, she speaks to a lot of issues and suggests policies that would not be popular with many special interests. So she's marginalized in any way they can.   I mean her salary as a meme on this sub? I just don't see this as a battle worth fighting. 
Just so you know, all the content creators (as opposed to reposters and blog spammers and advertisers) left reddit about a year ago to make their own link aggregates.  The people in that thread are the kids on summer break, and the bloggers, spammers, and advertisers.   I just thought you should know since this wasn't getting a lot of traction, that it was because there's no one here anymore lol.
Watching this now. She lost a little credibility when she analyzed the photograph of Bush holding the children's book upside down on 9/11. It's pretty well known that picture was altered to make it appear that Bush was holding it upside down. 
Right, I don't want my sub vaccine age kid to die because your older unvaccinated child gets around me or him and transfers into my child. 
You are now a mod at /r/pyongyang.
[deleted]
Michael Jackson? 
Indeed.  Not to mention the person (Aaron) who pretty much authored creative commons coded reddit in python and no doubt intentionally left the code open source to spite corporate.
[deleted]
Yeah well, you also believe that "the comparison of Pao with Mao (is) *pretty racist*".  That's right; you actually believe that *comparing one person of Chinese descent* to *another person of Chinese descent* is somehow "racist"... so... who's really going to give a fuck what you think or what you like?
Unless a jetliner traveling 400mph hits it, this thread is stupid
Why is this question being asked every single night by accounts who don't normally post here,  only to be deleted in the morning?   Jade Helm is the name of the commander who's ruining it,  dog.  His Labrador retriever is actually named Jade Helm,  I swear.   Stop freaking out people it's just a dog's name.    
My mistake. Juggling a lot. And have a Civ5 game in the background I'm about to lose. (Hiawatha just made the SS Cockpit and he has nukes.)
It appears this is restaurant is in Germany and not Austria where Bilderberg is being held. It was taken in 2008 aso well.  Nice idea though.   http://www.funfoll.com/show/2232/High-Altitude-Food.html
&gt; I would like proof of over 10000 launches  I would like proof of over 10000 launches
I'm sorry but this mods post alone, has made me want to leave reddit... And I really wasn't thinking about doing so, despite the latest revelations. 
&gt;  I'm sure now that you can't be in power unless you have got some serious skeletons in your closet.j  A lot of people are beginning to see this pattern. And if you dont have a skeleton they get you drunk or drugged and film you at some party were some child molestation is going on or something then say " well, you can try to explain your innocence (to the public and your wife and kids) or do what we say and we will make sure you are rich beyond your dreams when you leave office"  
No. I just pay attention. 
I guess you need to pay better attention. 
get in touch with who you really are.   a divine being of light that forgot who they are for purposes of discovering again what you want to be.  i no longer get sick, i don't need to eat much, i meditate, walk for an hour a day, yoga.... basically be the best person you can be while not contributing to our downfall and we might just make it.   we don't talk here enough about the big conspiracy, that our mind is a powerful attractor and can help us live happy lives regardless of the fuckery.   more people do this, turn off the tv, focus on what you want....  we can change the world.
Uh-oh, someone exposed a flaw. OP most likely won't respond to this and ignore the blatant hole you just shot through his "conspiracy".
I'm sure that's what the 98% of the American interviews that Mr. Dice did not include said as well.
[deleted]
great link! i was snapping my fingers to the music too
Yeah it's a brilliant system in that it works well in ways that naturally incentivize people (attaching value to objects for trade) and that is why it is still in use today but it's so easily corruptable.
This thread is interesting how hard it is for people to view Warren in a negative light. In the very least, it's revealing that even the more "enlightened" demographics are still subject to propaganda and confirmation bias.
Lord Christopher Monckton in full flight against the greens and the globalists who want to control YOU.  From the 10th ICCC on the 11th June, 2015.
You used a military burial at sea photo cropping out the sailors saluting their dead comrade and passing it off as Bin Laden, and you used an unsourced photo of a bin Laden lookalike with an unsupported allegation he was the one found at the compound and then you talk about media manipulation?  Don't get me wrong, theres a metric shit tonne of unanswered questions about the raid but this kind of half arsed photoshop bullshit is not helping.  You want to help? You could do everyone a favour by shutting the fuck up until you have an educated and lucid point to make.  *Geopolitical ripple effect* my fucking hairy arse. Putin is trying to reboot the USSR and China is trying to claim the South China Sea via a fleet of dredging ships making artificial islands and you think they would be at risk of *what* exactly by calling the US out on this? 
Its a nonissue which is why you're making it into a thing. Instead of arguing it is or is not a heatsink (obviously a better heatsink than anything else in the building) why not go and calculate how much energy and time it would take to heat *just one* of those girders to 1800 degrees?
[deleted]
[deleted]
I have on open mind. If there is a legitimate issue with the official story, please let me know.
There are way better places to advertise a movie than a sub reddit full of paranoid vpn torrenters. 
Its not a dangerous way of thinking. That women helped save peoples lives (Regardless of who she is), so my context is fine, your just being pedantic.
Pork bellies and T-Stocks are going up up up!
In your kinky dreams, maybe.  But I'm for real, and you are not.
When i downloaded it from wh.gov (dont know if its still there for dl) and opened it in illustrator all layers were visible, once heard a defender saying it was an artifact from scanning but a scanner wouldn't separate all elements and fill in textures behind content like the signatures.
People, lobbyists, and corporations back (pay) the people that they can either be bought or already agree with them.  In either scenario, you end up backing people that vote the way you want, so this isn't surprising, it's too be expected. Even if corruption wasn't an issue, and I'm not saying it isn't an issue, similar numbers would come out for any policy.
Thanks kitz, I agree. I'm my experience people who aren't will to try and explain complex idea just don't understand them and would rather repeat talking points that dont move the conversation forward. All I asked is why she should support auditing the fed- instead of discussion, I get insults. I genuinely am curious, and though I can read both sides and make an opinion of my own, I was curious about OP's reasoning. Too bad. So maybe I ask again more clearly. In a sentence or two why should anyone support auditing the fed?
Yeah, everybody! So vote for Scott Walker instead! He's no hypocrite and he's going to DESTROY the education system! Go go go America!
[deleted]
[deleted]
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Source? 
I try to explain to people all the time that terrorism is an American funded thing. The CIA, NSA, all of them, want terrorism because Americans vote their rights away for temporary safety from a threat that is basically impossible to prevent. Look at the Patriot Act for example, it didn't help them uncover any single act of terrorism. I won't go on a full rant about the happenings of the past decade, but people just need to understand that. 
Conspiracies can be and sometimes are, *very* real.  Bravo.
[deleted]
They're really not.
[deleted]
Like I said, where is your proof? This isn't proof. This is merely conjecture and mindless regurgitated conspiracy without evidence. 
The amount of paper contacts to physical gold is hovering around 175-200 to 1. Every ounce that exists has 175-200 people that think they own it.  It's extraordinarily undervalued. 
Please clarify.
Dispatch a swat team immediately.
&gt;And nobody implied that [/u/FortHouston](https://np.reddit.com/user/FortHouston/).   Aww...Maximilian_of_Baden.  It is cute that you put a little effort into embedding a link to my account in your comments.  Thanks.  Regardless, the blog linked to the title of this post implicitly implies that people have claimed Germans used diesel fuel for mass murder.  From that blog:  &gt;The idea that the Germans used a pesticide and diesel fuel to kill people is utterly refuted by science.  https://forum.codoh.com/viewtopic.php?f=2&amp;t=3787  &gt;It is mentioned in many survivor testimonies and even in the Eichmann trial seen here  Yet, Eichmann was not convicted of mass murder with carbon monoxide from a diesel engine.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Adolf_Eichmann#Trial  &gt;EDIT: [Here is the thread where you were called out on, and you just bailed](https://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/38r05u/if_those_who_couldnt_work_were_gassed_on_arrival/crx7sna?context=3).  I have a life with responsibilities.  So I do not sit around waiting for responses from denialists with straw men.
That's the point of having secrets handshakes and signals.  People can easily look at it and say "not too crazy" then people that know what they're looking at do what I've just done and the others allow society to get steamrolled.  It looks ordinary but everyone knows how to shake a hand.
Again.
Yeah. Such a simple question, yet the devout believers seem to have trouble answering it.   
I would check out this book, haven't seen the movie yet, but it sounds like they're going to have a lot of the same source materials. http://www.goodreads.com/book/show/58551.Who_Killed_Kurt_Cobain_ 
What drives me absolutely insane is we are paying for these workers food stamps for companies like Walmart where they throw away food and make millions a year. What the problem is, is that these people are addicted to money like a drug.
I never watch tv only movies and shows on Netflix or torrented and when I turn on the tv, It seems like educational tv has been pushed aside for the dumbing down of the young ones. I was married once and all my wife did was watch tv....I couldn't believe she as an intelligent person would subject herself to that programming. I felt like the more time I spent with her and around the tv, the more I could feel my intelligence slipping away. As soon as we divorced I starting consuming all the information I could via reddit and other truth sites. And I feel like after 4 years I'm back to where I was intellectually. 
Easy to say from a touch screen! They are there!  Edit: I'm hurt you down voted me! Our brief friendship is over! 
&gt; first job is to look after America's People  That's every politician real job, but their are so few who don't sell out. His vote shows he is a sell out.
Agreed once I woke up PTSD has been a very real condition for me. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I understand.
I'd love to believe that these departments are fighting against corruption, but I fear it gives more power *to corrupt* than preventing. 
The plaintiffs argue that, “by deliberately concealing information… about the efficacy of the vaccine, other potential entrants into the mumps vaccine market were precluded because of their presumption that the U.S. government would not create additional contracts for new vaccine products while the [Merck] vaccine had a 95% efficacy rate,” U.S. District Court Judge C. Darnell Jones wrote in his decision.
I thought ISIS were the Rebels John McCain and Hillary were routing to float cash to back in the early days?
And you need to understand the legitimate issues involved here.
It's np.reddit which makes it seem less credible  Edit for you downvoting noobs  http://www.reddit.com/r/bugs/comments/35qmpv/certificate_error_in_chrome_when_viewing_a/  https://i.imgur.com/YUsyE8q.png
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I did.  And?  Milewski's said to be a 911 victim.  And the picture of Milewski and Rudowski makes it look like they could be cousins or even brothers.  ...*And?*  I mean...It's said that this is "damning evidence"...  Um...damning evidence of what?  What is the similarity supposed to show?  ELI5 because right now, your just saying "google luke milewski" is...kind of saying absolutely nothing whatsoever.
[deleted]
What world are you living in man, and the fact you just tried to compare the US to Greece leads me to believe you have literally no idea how the economy of a country works.  Greece wouldn't even be in trouble right now if they were in charge of their own currency.  Second, the "free stuff" you mention is things every other western countries has and has been shown time and time again to be cheaper than our current system on every level.  The US spends 3 times as much per capita on healthcare as every other country in the world because we don't have a single payer system.  In fact it'll bankrupt us in the near future if we don't fix it.  We spend 18% of our GDP on healthcare compared to an average of like 5-6% for other western countries, and that's 100% because our system is inferior in every way possible to a single payer system.  What free stuff is it you're talking about? because I can cite some numbers if you like that show we're subsidizing US companies many times more than we're spending on social welfare.  But I guess anyone that thinks the US is in anyway comparable to Greece probably isn't very educated on the subject.  So do tell, what is this free stuff people want?
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm stupid regarding these things, but could it be that the Snoop Dogg investment into Reddit could've made Reddit this way? Snoop did invest into it and a lot, it would be naive to think it was because of personal sympathy to reddit, it was to make money. And since he like bought half of reddit...
I saw a few related websites. None looked to be credible, and the side by side photos are clearly different people. They share physical traits like anyone of the same heritage. 
[deleted]
Its so crazy that explosives were planted in the building.  Those are the real terrorists.  Most of the hijackers are still alive. The whole hijacked planes scenerio was merely cover for the controlled demolition of WTC1, WTC2, &amp; WTC7.  Where is the plane that was supposed to hit WTC7???
[deleted]
wow... my sarcasm isn't strong enough hehe :)
Guys an assholes.  Everybody knows AL qaeda is in Iraq and Syria. Everybody knows saddam  had weapons of mass destruction cause hehe used them against his own people.  Everybody knows Chris kyle is a hero because he killed over a hundred plus people in Iraq protecting our homeland. Guy is literally lying to every American when he doubts these things. Iraq and Afghanistan became the battleground for terrorism.  Anybody with half a brain would know this.  The majority of isis is former Baathists  turned terrorists. Anybody who doubts Chris kyles  heroic  actions should seriously leave the fucking country.  He was one of the greatest snipers and war hero's and even created his own unit after.  What he did for America and veterans is massively heroic.  Clint Eastwood didn't make a movie to glorify his actions but to show what war really is.  Hell  on earth.  Edit:suck my duck. This sub supports terrorism and denys  basic facts about AL qaeda,  isis,  and why we went to war with corrupt regimes. If you don't think an American who kills radical jihadis  isn't a hero please get the fuck  out of my country.  
The book of Revelations was written by a guy tripping on shrooms.  You can make it mean literally ANYTHING. 
http://np.reddit.com/r/911truth/comments/37u9au/explosive_testimony_macqueen_nyfd_911_witnesses/
Yeah you can see I actually brought that up in this thread multiple times and was downvoted. Still, use some common sense, its a direct link to reddit
in case you haven't noticed, this place has been overrun with false personas.  OP's video was fake as fuck and hilariously even after you posted the one with an undoctored audio track people still are calling out for people to source the original.  lazy bums.  then theres abdullah boogers guy that is trying to say this one had sounds removed from it,  yeah ok...  and now OP thinks that someone is going to waste time to track down the unedited version with proper watermark to prove he's a complete fucking moron.
comment
"Our servers are shitty and we're going to try to excuse that by saying we were attacked."
Can I get more of an explanation? I thought the UK was an island.
It is amazing to me that people like you say we should value everyone's opinion, complain about how you get downvoted in other subreddits because your opinion isn't liked, then call people who have a differing opinion "shills".  You just don't get it, do you?
[deleted]
Now is it really free speech on the internet? I feel like the Internet has its own rules pertaining to what people can really say on it. Or that it would be up to who owns the domain.
To limit the infinite amount of choices to either or...  Only "approved" politicians *can* be elected.   America needs to ask people who wants to be president, then stick the first person that says "Fuck No!" with the job. People seeking power rarely (actually, i cannot think of an example otherwise) wish for power to do good for others. People seek power to serve themselves more effectively. 
K-Rino -- https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=b4KtWgTiz7o
Nah he's ducking from Soros.
[deleted]
Check out Eastcoast Avengers if youre into that stuff, theyre great
I know this is one of the top anti-Israel subs, but let's be honest here - whatever Israel does with the Golan Heights is a far better offer than whatever Syria will become.
They stowaway on vehicles *(mainly in France)* to get across the channel, and illegally enter the U.K.
What? They look exactly the same?
I shop at thrift stores for my clothes.   I grow food.   I have never once paid a dime for cable or sat. TV, as it does not interest me, unlike you, TV addict. I ignore hollywood films, and popular culture, completely.   I have not owned a TV in about ten years, and even then it was just for VHS and DVDS.   I almost never hear the voices of advertising, unlike you.   I am the real thing, doing high end hand crafts that fetch top dollar, as I travel in fun adventures. I farm on the land.   I have seen more sunrises than you'll ever see.
[deleted]
In the current climate, it would not surprise  me if Mods adopted risk-adverse policies to avoid unwanted  Admin attention.  The 70+ subs banned (original 5) has to have a chilling effect on tolerance.
[deleted]
That's what I thought. Good argument.
Two  things, I didn't know that Jupiter had a facebok account and second,  I'm impressed that Jupiter knows  english. 
In my experience there are generally two types of people - those who are good skeptics and those who are bad skeptics.  The bad skeptics are those who find things easy to believe, without having researched for themselves (and recursively, researched the sources of what they are researching, i.e. is a specific news source honest or not). The bad skeptic takes what he is told at face value, whether it's from TV, the New York Times, or from the local water cooler gossip. The bad skeptic has a very cartoonish view of the world - that is to say their understanding of what goes on around the world is caricatured to exaggerate certain features, and is heavy on the contrast. There is right and wrong, black and white, with little in between.  The good skeptic is one that assumes nothing, accepts no viewpoint of reality except that which they themselves can prove and verify, and keeps a log of "hypothetical maps of reality" in the back of their mind, as possible explanations for the phenomenon they experience. They gather information, judging how accurate that information can be, and store it in their ever increasing pool of data, and slowly start to develop a rich map which is a representation of reality - and not reality itself, but they understand this.   Rarely is it ever true that anything of great consequence on the global stage is the result of one man or of one group - it's a cumulative result of many different actors with different agendas unfaithfully steering a current event into an unknown (but purposeful) direction - to create events that are then perceived as "problems" by the general public, who then more readily accept something that is akin to a solution, from which mutual parties benefit as providers.  In all walks of life, in every group, you find the good and bad skeptics. I don't think the ratio ever changes much, whether you are on /r/conspiracy or elsewhere. The idea that somehow those here are more aware of their reality than those who hang out in /r/funny or something is just another myth that the bad skeptic would believe without testing it for themselves.
What are they then? Because that is the craziest thing I've ever heard.
This is the shittiest of shitposts.  Take your sanders masturbatory fantasy back to /r/politics. 
That's not a conspiracy, she actually did say that.  Like 2 weeks ago, I think?
That is very mature of you. Thank you for the sincerity. I'm glad I put enjoyment into your life. 
That piece of shit is the future of the whole country, if you people don't do something about it.
I just clicked on a conspiracy link and got magically transported to Tumblr. 
[deleted]
Well, you should be able to uncheck subreddit styling. The ban might've been a mixup, or something, I'm not sure. 
Getting stuck in the spam filter != shadowbanned.......
Online idealistic communism? Sounds nice in theory. 
My thoughts exactly.  Politically correct people doing politically correct things isn't a conspiracy.  Idiocy, yes.  But not a conspiracy.  The obsession with the topic is absolutely repulsive.
The infamous Permanent Record actually *exists*.
[Message them](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Freddit.com), email contact@reddit.com, or reply when one of them posts in a thread. They hardly ever reply, but I like to think they're at least reading stuff.
I'm fairly surprised that, no matter where posted, this sentiment will **always** be downvoted.  Kinda makes me sad for the rest of society.
Because of the CIA- cultural mind control angle- misplaced user name 
[deleted]
Voat.co  'nuff said.  Now stop the DDOS y'all fucking Redditors.
Seems like it's been getting increasingly obvious for 3-4 years.  I'm guessing the guy previously running the show died.
I've read it's dangerous for many reasons to jump higher than 30 feet into water.  I've seen people get hurt jumping into water from higher than 30 feet.  Obviously the danger comes from how you hit the water.  It's not recommended for most people to jump from higher than 50 because the fall can kill you if you don't have the proper mechanics/technique.  Nope, not a high platform diver myself.  I'm glad you feel confident enough to make internet assumptions on people.
right on
[deleted]
Yeah because you're trying to skate on water.  What about the fact that it isn't frozen?
&gt;For more than 40 years, TAA has helped support U.S. workers who are **adversely affected by globalization and trade** by providing job training support, career counseling, wage supplements for older workers, job search and reallocation allowances, and income support for workers in training programs.  lol
The Poteshman / market thing:  - Just speculation, no evidence that anyone operating in the market knew anything about 9/11.  - Was investigated:  http://www.snopes.com/rumors/putcall.asp  SSRN link is just an abstract of same thing.  Pattern in market, okay ?  Evidence of knowledge ?  No.  Corbett thing: I'm not spending 30 minutes of my life to watch a video about the same topic.  Already addressed.  Deutsche bank: seems to be a more general claim, about some unspecified trading that might have been covered up by destroying financial offices in the WTC towers.  But trades actually take place in computers in New Jersey, I think, and certainly are backed up in many other places.  And the article seems to be speculation; no evidence that any bad trades or stolen money or something was ever detected.  Saying that maybe investigations were not thorough enough is not evidence.  You have lots of claims, but no hard evidence.  Govt explanation has a fair amount of hard evidence, and plenty of room for more investigation.  Govt explanation seems right to me, but if you present some hard evidence, I'll change my mind.  Almost 14 years now, and you guys haven't been able to present any good evidence.  Re: your additional edits:  Nothing new there about the trading.  Some info about ties among Pakistani ISI and Al Qaeda, ISI and US agents, etc.  Sure, USA has many contacts with ISI and other parts of Pakistani govt.  Many parts of that country are unsavory.  Any evidence of US govt conspiracy to do 9/11 ?  If so, please name it, give specifics.
"Napoleon is always right"
US protection? Their only protection is that if any country intervenes then they will flood that country with their people. The US has a 1% Jewish population, but they print the money, own the news, head large companies that control politicians, redirect Christian holidays like a Bunny rabbit for Easter or Santa and elves for Christmas? Fuck that, they can do whatever they want down there.
This is so stupid. Why do people think that since its summer all the kids in school are suddenly on reddit? You think these kids don't reddit during the school year? It's 2015. If they're not redditing in school on their phones, they're at least redditing when they get home.
Disagree. We've abandoned each other to service ourself. People will throw their own mothers under the bus if it fits their purpose nowadays. Principle has nothing to do with it. Morality and consideration are a thing of the past. 
It's OP's fault. OP should have linked to np.reddit.com, not www.np.reddit.com.
It is coming and has been coming for a while. Every market has been manipulated and micromanaged to delay the correction/crash. There are huge bubbles all over.   You could ask the question when, but that would be short sighted. The real question is how. Something major will happen to take the blame for the correction/collapse. They will start a war or their will be a large false flag terrorist attack. Anything to blame the correction/collapse on so the real cause is hidden. The real cause being corruption, legal ponzie schemes, and the attempt to micro manage the entire economy instead of letting the organic free market balance things out. For instance bailing out banks with tax payer money instead of letting them fail when they are failures.
Yep, your wideawakenwo account is definitely shadowbanned.  &gt; He said all infowars links are automatically sent to the spam queue.  This is correct and it's sitewide, infowars is one of the domains that automatically gets censored and needs to be manually approved.  I think naturalnews is one too and there are a few others.  &gt; I imagine that these 12 reports were what caused the admins to ban my account site wide.  Most likely, a lot of the reports claimed you were asking for upvotes.  I don't see that in your OP but perhaps you edited it out, that's probably why you were shadowbanned though.  But it makes very little sense since self posts don't give the OP any karma.
Don't be a fucking smart ass, yes I said descendants of Abraham because both Arabs and modern day Jews are Semites. Both of which are descendants of the very same Judaic, Biblical, Islamic prophet Abraham.  Yes I said both control the world because both Saudi Arabia and Israel practically control the world via banks and petrodollar Ponzi scheme.  Then you go on to say that I think Saudi Arabia's politics are Islamic? Dude what drugs are you on?
Earth is flat it is your cognitive dissonance and authority worship and your own aggrandized ego keeping you from seeing the truth, have fun with that.
I've been wondering why I've been seeing SO MUCH military activity in my area (I live in a town Near Ft. Carson in Colorado). Being that close to a military base, I've seen some motion before in the previous years. But in the past month or two, I've been seeing convoy after convoy come through the entire Southern Colorado region. I travel through the southern area of the state a lot and about a week ago, I saw this really long convoy pulled over on the side of the highway and they were all patrolling (?) the grounds near the highway.   I see them almost every day now, and it makes me wonder what's really happening, because something is changing. We wouldn't be seeing all of this military activity for no reason. Through this thread, some rather interesting light has been shed... 
Only dumb teenagers will post their uprising plans on Facebook. The type of folks that would put up a fight don't spend all their time on social media. 
And yet look at what you are doing, no difference.
Jim Morrison. John Lennon. 
Neither of those, do YOU live in Saudi Arabia?
It'd be great if this heffer died of a cardiovascular disease already.
&gt; It's boy cried wolf.  Yeah, and the boy was eaten at the end. 
Also from Philly, but power was fine. Well at least at 11, I was asleep by 3. I'm near Fishtown in like Northeast Philly. How many helicopters and where at?
Idk how relevant this is but when the power was restored my roommates Wireless network card no longer worked.
Good.
Very cool!  
Alex jones haha
Because it is used by intelligent adults all of the time.  Do you disagree with that statement?
[deleted]
And you also have a problem recognizing propaganda.  Good to know.
Why do you feel the need to defend the SA government? I don't mean to demonize all the people of SA, but the government has proven itself to have no respect for human rights and life, time and time again, and openly funds jihadist terrorism. Why would you defend that?
Gr8 b8 m8  Are you having fun trolling r/conspiracy? Is there anything I can do to make your stay here more pleasant?
Ruin your voice to be more raspy and lower. Cuomo can hit falsetto.   Also, Weezer was a thing before Kurt killed himself... so...
Exactly, a leader points his arms towards the goal and rallies their people while standing on equal ground with them.  It takes true character to stand out on equal ground.
It is not taken lightly, when a person in such a position, surrounded by such people says such a thing. You can relate what he says to a futurologist, but the truth is, intelligence on these subjects, would never be revealed, but the topic would be. You're basically saying I want the names, places, and people who we believe are directly involved in such activities. Such things would never, ever be said publicly, and you know this. And his budget? There wasn't much of a change in their budget from then to today, we're still spending the same percentage of our GDP, nothing was being threatened to be cut. Clinton actually had quite a few military excursions during his Presidency, from Africa to the Balkans, there weren't any cuts during this time even under a Democratic President. In fact we were making money because he signed off the bill selling all our "old" military technology to China for a few billion dollars.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Must be gettin close to the edge huh?
Hit the context button and you will see that since Snoop Dogg/Lion invested in Reddit marijuana and music subs are up over 1000%. Now, someone who smokes weed is usually chill, so hate is out. Black guys love *curvy* white women so fat people are in. And he wants his investment to grow and since FPH cannot be sold to [advertisers](http://www.np.reddit.com/wiki/selfserve#wiki_how_much_does_it_cost.3F) and they made fun of a few admins, they gone
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
How do you know they are still alive? I mean I wouldn't put it pass the CIA to, you know, tie up loose ends.
&gt; you said studies weren't scientific didn't represent the truth, so you can't use them in your argument now.  The issue is whether those studies are genuinely independent or not.   Aspartame has no nutritional value, and no know health benefits. It also doesn't taste of much - it's just incredibly sweet. Not consuming aspartame is not a hardship. 
Prefaces post with "Here is a *brief* list."  Majority of replies "Hey, you *forgot* to list ______."
[deleted]
I understand, but how would you buy your BC or invest in BC in the future if the man decided he didn't like Bitcoin? How would you pay for more BC. You have to exchange one asset for another in BC right?  They confiscated this 30,000 BC from Silk Road. http://www.coindesk.com/us-governments-sale-30000-btc-impact-bitcoin-prices/
lol LINK PLEASE
Along with China's trade exploitation since Tiananmen Sq. We've been looking the other way as long as we can line our pockets somehow. 
There was front page hitting studies like 4 days ago about how drinking diet soda was killing women. Diet juices were also included (it had nothing to do with caffeine or sodium.)  I know we can't all be up to date on everything but shrieking "source" when it literally takes two minutes to type "aspartame health .edu" into google is tiring.
&gt; Why bother doing anything if you're able to ~~live a happy life~~ survive decently so long as you follow the rules.
I don't remember the post, but it was in my browser history, it was posted on 10/6/2015 or 9/6/2015; http://now.uiowa.edu/2014/03/ui-study-finds-diet-drinks-associated-heart-trouble-older-women http://www.researchgate.net/publication/269637605_Diet_Drink_Consumption_and_the_Risk_of_Cardiovascular_Events_A_Report_from_the_Womens_Health_Initiative I have no idea how reliable the latter is...
It makes you think twice about the "celebrity star whackers" that Randy Quaid says exist.
Why does "&amp;" get converted to "&amp;amp ;" in some HTML text?    What kind of coding error causes it?  I've seen it on various forums (mostly in older forum posts that were linked through Google searches) over the years.  
[deleted]
&gt; Elites invented Illuminati theory to explain challenges to their power, and today poor and working class people in the hood use it to explain our own oppression. We live in a society that blames individuals for failing to succeed. But people in the hood aren’t stupid: we know we aren’t to blame, and that there are outside forces preventing us from living with dignity. For this reason, conspiracy theories and urban legends have been a common feature of oppressed communities in the U.S, especially black communities, for decades.  &gt; The best way to explain oppression and exploitation is through a theory of the capitalist system as a whole, not through Illuminati theory.  That should sum it up well. Great material.
They cast no shadows and weaving spiders, come not here.
The fed got their gold, and control of their money, and that's what counts.
[deleted]
Jeb stands for John Ellis Bush.
There is only one reason why they wouldn't release all their info.  And it sure as fuck isn't the same old bullshit "national security" excuse.
&gt; Please calm down. Stick to the topic at hand without the personal attacks and you'll be fine... and attacking me won't help your cause. I'm not Jewish... or any other religion for that matter.  Yeah, sorry dude. As soon as I'd calmed down a bit I realised I was out of order. My bad.
Oh, she wants it bad.  But she knows she won't get six votes total if she tries to publicly back it.
So because a vocal minority of people keep yelling multiple times a year about how the sky is falling and the government is going to take their guns and encact martial law based on absolutely no real or valid evidence, that means that the entire state of Texas "has been a bat-shit crazy paranoid state since forever..." and "Texas is by far the most crazy state in the US..."? 
I said Texas has been a problem, and all of these theories come from Texas.  If all of these dumb theories come from Texas, and they're constantly talking about martial law and the federal government taking theirs gun ON TOP of always talking about leaving the union what's that leave us?  A paranoid bat-shit crazy state.  And to top this all off Greg Abbott the FUCKING GOVERNOR had the national guard follow the military around, giving the crazies even more reason to push their bullshit.
Impossible.  The elevator shafts were not continuous to the basement.  
http://i.ytimg.com/vi/qhn8V9ZUKbQ/hqdefault.jpg
[deleted]
&gt;they have much documented proof of...  Link?
That's not an argument that their data is faulty or incorrect: that's just an ad-hominem attack
Nice self gold.   I'm still waiting on your reply to this comment:  http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/39y71v/open_challenge_to_anybody_in_rconspiracy_in/cs7n8te
Could it be a shipment? Could they have been converted in ambulances in the U.S. By an American company then sold to the U.N. ?
I don't know he kinda hurt his self with the "If you know what you knew now, would you go to war?" Not saying he's a Perry idiot, but that was an easy question to distance himself from brother Bush. I think his handlers corrected that glitch.
increased rates of cancer and obesity does not mean "it will kill you" unless the increased rates are dramatically large.
Sure, let's blow trillions on making war overseas. Money is no object for Republicans when it comes to war.  All the while our own infrastructure is deteriorating.  If Jeb makes it to office I'm sure he'll have "our soldiers" busy pushing the agenda of the rich somewhere new. 
Op is a plumber 
Hyperbole headline . . . it's only 2015, we still have 85 years left in this century.
[deleted]
I just disagree. God could exist but at the same time there could alternative dimensions, etc.. Isn't it also possible they pose as Satan worshippers to lead others to a false assumption? Energy/magic can exist without God as well.
man, I felt the fustration and anger. You are NOT ALONE!
I don't think she is a cointelpro operative, but you can bet the widespread exposure given to this story will give Elizabeth Warren, the senator who built her career in academia on a lie that she is a native American Cherokee, a second thought about whether she too wants to risk career suicide by running for the Presidency. 
Derail much?
More bullshit. Less than five percent of US jobs pay minimum wage, most of the people I mentioned make far more.
It's a good thing science/mathematics must be verifiable before it becomes accepted. 
I think Tom would write ALL CAPS **AND BOLD** #REALLY BIG
Some good passive-aggression from BabyBunt there.
Have*
Ethan Hunt is a good guy
You do realize that if either of the Republican alternatives had been elected instead we would have had boots on the ground in those countries **and** Iran? Even if it's just slow-pedaling the same pro-Israel agenda to keep up the appearance of choice, there is a difference.
They were trying to make Super Heroes to save the Earth !! Or maybe they were just being shitbags.  /notsure 
&gt;the experiments involved laying a pattern of explosives underwater to create a tsunami.  Omfg. I was planning to tear apart your original comment, but this is so fucking ridiculous I don't even need to.  Are you a paid shill or completely out of touch with reality? Since you want to bring Israel into this, I'm going with shill, but who knows?
Let the butthurt flow thru you!
Ha!! I see what you did there!  Seriously, not dissing Nirvana or anything, but they were the two most overhyped yet disappointing live shows that I've *ever* seen. They were truly terrible, and I was expecting greatness--especially after listening to "The 'Priest' They Called Him" something like 16 trillion times. I shouldn't have said that they were "absolute shit" because they were not. Their music set trends for songwriting for years to come. The *live* shows (that I saw) were terrible--but it could have just been two "off" nights. I've been playing in a band almost my entire life and god knows we've had some nights where "off" would be putting it extremely nicely!  The "Priest" They Called Him...maaaan, that was some great stuff there. While I'm on that subject I should tell anyone that reads this to RUN out and buy the Burroughs album that was done with the Disposable Heroes of Hiphoprisy. I believe that it was called "Spare Ass Annie?" AMAZING.
I guess if I was doing something illegal like selling drugs and mr. policeman asked what I was doing, and I responded, "I'll show you when I'm done smoking." Oh wait, I'd probably get shot for "having a weapon" or something.  
There are people here who buy into various rhetorical foundations.    As time goes on they either open up or shut down further.  But one thing that has held true is that arguing with a barking dog never gets anywhere.
People that have evidence are usually pretty eager to display it. It would be ignorant for anyone to believe what you're saying, specially if you're acting so defensive about not having any science to back your claims 
You realize drugs fail trials all the time right? This isn't something that never happens.
I wouldn't say plumbing is *entirely* the reason, but, IMO, when it's factored in, the risks of vaccines in-general outweigh the benefits, which have been deliberately exaggerated by excluding things like sanitation and other lifestyle improvements.
&gt; A Discussion of "Analysis of Structural Response of WTC 7 to Fire and Sequential Failures Leading to Collapse Ronald H. Brookman, October 2012  I read through that. It doesn't refute the study by *McAllister, T., MacNeill, R., Erbay, O., Sarawit, A., Zarghamee, M., Kirkpatrick, S., and Gross, J. (doi: 10.1061/(ASCE)ST.1943-541X.0000398) *. That is not a refutation. What the author did was make criticism of some of the assumptions used. Which is fine, you have to make assumptions. CTUBUH came to *different* conclusions based on different assumptions also. They claimed the failure emanated from the collapse of the floor structure that led to loss of lateral restraint and then buckling of internal columns. Meanwhile ASCE and another study I believe said it was due to the failure of column 79. They had different conclusions, based on different assumptions and computations made. The author never made a positive claim in *favor* for controlled demolition, he *just* criticized the assumptions made, which anybody can do, and is somewhat of a moot point because you can criticize the assumptions of any study in regards to WTC 7 due to the complexity and limited amount of concrete data. How ever, even in the storm of all of this, not once does Controlled Demolition come up, and that is my point. They will have verbatim back and forth in regards to which floor, which column was the culprit of failure. Nowhere is Controlled Demolition even an option of being considered.  &gt; Seems a conflict of interest to have the author Therese P. McAllister also be a NIST employee and co-project leader for the WTC NIST report.   And this doesn't matter. He can be working for the CIA is all I care. The Scientific Process protects from bias.  &gt;Within the first ten years, there are 15 distinct CD papers (i.e., arguing for the Controlled Demolition hypothesis, that address WTC 7)  Where are these papers? And which journals are they in and who are the authors? 
the shiftiest of eyes... 
I already [responded to something similar](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/39y71v/open_challenge_to_anybody_in_rconspiracy_in/cs8qvh7)
It explains the possible mechanism that lead to initiate the failure of various columns with subsequently caused a global collapse. Yes.  However, i'm not sure what you are trying to say. The only important thing here is that controlled demolition is not even close to be an option on the table.
It means the acid you took is good as fuck.
IIRC they tested the fire rate and it's definitely possible. 
[deleted]
They do the same shit to people in hollywood. A local rapper went there called my sister(she's friends with him) from a famous black music mogul and this star wanted to put it in his ass, he didn't comply and it took 15 years longer for his career to take off. 
[deleted]
That's not entirely true. The glue itself may be harmless, but any screw up in its use can cause nasty bacterial growth. Basically, the outer areas of the meat that are exposed to the environment have some bacterial growth, but this is ok, because the outer areas are the parts that are cooked first.  However, if you take those parts, and put them on the inside of the meat, you're leaving that bacteria untouched by direct heat, so it could still be present even after cooked.  This is why the guy cooks the faux-ribeye in the oven before throwing it on the grill, to ensure that the interior of the meat is fully cooked. If the customer does not know they are getting frankenmeat, they may cook it below well done, which would be fine for a piece of normal meat, but very unhealthy in this case. 
no problems with this other than it being taxpayer funded... i mean really where's my orgy? and wouldn't this make money if there was enough interest? 
Attempted.  Does not block content based on your suggested misspelling.  Must be different auto filter logic, or there's some very fast moderators.
&gt; Dude, please do not tell me that OP, in compiling this list of proven conspiracies, followed both by including the sarcastic title ("What, are you telling me that you're one of those crazy conspiracy theorists?) as well as the ending of the first sentence (" that even the sanitized and propagandized Wikipedia can't dispute.") is in NO way providing any implicit pro-conspiracy theorist connotations.  Never will I. He _is_ providing "implicit pro-conspiracy theorist connotations". But so am I.   &gt;  Yes, there is what is stated on the page, but then there is another level of reading in between the lines of what he is saying (this is the implicit part).  There always are multiple layers and levels of reading between, across, above and beyond the lines of what someone is or is not saying. Communication theory, linguistics, neurology, heavy stuff.   &gt; you first state that "OPs "argument", if there is one, is that some "crazy conspiracy theories" were eventually proven true, nothing more, nothing less" and then proceed, in the next line no less, to offer your own interpretation of his argument.   In comparison with yours, of course - that he is saying "we should be more believing of conspiracy theories".  &gt; If his argument is so clear and cannot be "any more, or any less", why have you felt the need to clear up what he was trying to say with your own interpretation?   Because I disagree with yours, and that is why we are having a civil, public, fair and enlightening discussion about it. Because you said:   &gt; If it's like a thousand that have been proven false for every 1 on your list that that has been proven true, then what you posted is a list of statistical inevitabilities (i.e. by chance alone, if you propose enough conspiracy theories, one or two of them will be true).   We make up X conspiracy theories. Y turn out to be true. V conspiracies REALLY happen, U turn out to be true. Of U + Y, OP makes a list of Z theories that turned out true. W conspiracy theories are proven false (meaning nobody adheres to them anymore). Can we infer any statistical meaning about the veracity of conspiracy theories by comparing U, V, W, X, Y and Z statistically?   Hardly so.   &gt; I just told you in my last comment that I think both of our interpretations are reasonable ("I would like to think that both of our conclusions are within reason"), and did not compare the two with respect to how much they account for OPs intentions and implications (because one cannot do so accurately without actually talking to the OP). Did you even read that part? You're the one that believes you hold the superior position.   Yes, I think the list is a good thing. It's a nice bowl of juicy, sweet and hand-picked cherries and they go well with the cream our debate is.   &gt;  Again, it seems like you aren't reading my comment in its entirety. Your last sentence, however, summarizes nicely what my interpretation is getting at.   Yes, because I am reading all comments I reply to in their entirety, digital native here, old habit.  &gt; Unfortunately, it is more likely (and I may be wrong) that the first category ("the less critical") is much more abundant within the pages of reddit as well as our population.  Now I understand. You want to account for the dumb and the stupid who need to be told not to dry their cats in the microwave and not to cut their toe nails with a lawnmower. You miss OPs big, red, flashing warning label:   ---  ATTENTION! Believing conspiracy theories SOMETIMES turn out to be true (as in Wikipedia-true) might lead you to believe that conspiracy theories _not yet_ true (as in Wikipedia-true) in circulation today might SOME day ALSO turn out to be true (as in Wikipedia-true)! **That is false!** Of course Operation Northwoods really (Wikipedia-)existed, but that doesn't mean that jet fuel can't melt steel beams!  (And it doesn't count ^because ^we ^knew ^it ^all ^the ^time ^^because ^^it ^^was ^^in ^^some ^^obscure ^^newspaper ^^once ^^^for ^^^which ^^^you ^^^were ^^^ridiculed ^^^so ^^^back ^^^then...)  ---  Nah. People need to investigate for themselves, they don't need someone telling them to be careful when thinking too much. It's okay if you don't jump head-first into flat earth stuff, but that doesn't make all vaccine skeptics raving lunatics. There are too many that are "the less critical", I agree, but that problem will not be solved by _not_ making posts like the one OP made or by adding, each time, also a list ten times as long of conspiracy theories that have been utterly debunked just so nobody gets any ideas.   Speaking of OP, he should absolutely chime in, since it is his intentions we are riddling about. /u/high-priest-of-slack, u lurkin'? What's your agenda?  &gt; THAT is why I was trying to point out the fallacy in the OPs implicit argument--it is very subtle, and if not noticed, will lead to a rather dangerous confirmation of one's pro-consipracy views, much as you see in the comments section.   And here is the core of our misunderstanding, it seems. What is inherently dangerous about confirming one's "pro-conspiracy views", and what does that even mean? That people who believe in some conspiracies suddenly start to believe in _more_ conspiracies, even those that aren't true? Don't you worry, them conspiracy theorists don't call it the rabbit hole for nothing. You start with Elvis lives and turn out suspecting that there is massive weather manipulation going on in many parts of the world. A friend of a cousin of my neighbor's aunt got 9/11. He really _got_ it. It totally changed his mind on the moon landing too, you can imagine.   As /u/CelineHagbard (relevant username!) [said](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/39xa2l/what_are_you_telling_me_that_youre_one_of_those/cs7tks2): an educated conspiracy theorist will see that there is a pattern in how officials, criminals etc will lie, deflect, evade, cover up and deny and from that _extrapolate_ how certain other, not yet 100% Wikipedia-true true conspiracies might have played out.  To wrap it up: I still stand by my opinion that your argument was weak. The ratio between conspiracy theories proven wrong and conspiracy theories proven right has no significance for the evaluation of conspiracy theories about alleged conspiracies going on now, or whether OPs alleged implications or lack thereof are meaningful or the list is merely a statistical inevitability. It was a bowl of very tasty picked cherries that show how media, politicians, industrials, scientists, officials, bankers and religious leaders have conspired in the past against the interests of minorities, the public, against nations and humanity itself, OF COURSE implying, insinuating, that they _still_ are up to some pretty shady shit and have not suddenly given up their scheming because they collectively found peace and love and understanding in their hearts or so - and that is why we must keep educating ourselves, even if it leads to some pretty far-out, unbelievable, spooky paranoia X-Files bullshit like that crazy scientists are trying to reprogram personalities with drugs and torture.
[deleted]
How about I say it this way.  Hundreds of billions of TAXPAYER MONEY wasted on law enforcement and incarceration of millions of drug users, while the CIA earns hundreds of billions on illegal drug distribution.  Our money funds the fake war on drugs, in which they profit from.   
I work for a hospital. I am directly involved with the logistics of 50 hospital laboratories located throughout the state. In my 5 years with the company we have opened 20 of those 50 labs. I know how many patients are presenting monthly, the number of draws and total tests ordered.  The outreach program (laboratories) is not a losing venture for the hospital. In my 5 years I've seen us almost double the labs we had and we have seen 1 of our biggest competitors fold. Our president makes $2,000,000 a year and has some kind of retirement monies(employer paid) that total $250,000 a year, not sure how it's paid into his accounts, but it is disclosed every fiscal year. My problem is not that our president makes this much but how we (employees) are under raise freezes and we have only received a 2% cost of living increase in the past 4 years.  We are constantly sent emails about multimillion dollar grants given to the hospital and it's through everyone's hard work that makes it possible for the outcomes. Also that the hospital is giving our partner(medical school) X amount of money for research yearly but they can only manage to give "colas" to the employees. It is no longer a work hard and contribute, go above and beyond type of situation any longer. I love my job but it's getting harder to provide the level of service to the patients, doctors and fellow employees when you realize you're being taken for granted. End rant.     Edit: I have healthcare for myself and family and the plan is called xxxxxxxxBlue(hospital's name) through BCBS, I have to present to one of our facilities or I have an automatic deductible that kicks in. So you have to use the hospital's services (labs/diagnostic imaging/urgent cares,etc...) and they get to basically charge back the insurance company that they selected for us employees. Mind you they are not the only hospital in town. They also prefer your PCP is an affiliate of the hospital system. All this is still fine with me but don't tell me you can't evaluate us separately and if you feel I've gone above and beyond with my responsibilities please prove to me you appreciate what I do and not some generic 2% for the past 4 years. 
This is my final contribution of the day on this hag:  http://www.therightperspective.org/2013/01/03/hillary-was-injured-in-secret-iran-mission-report/
I doubt it, probably just fracking.   Im sure Ill see a sign like F.racking E.nvironmental M.etal A.lloys Camp 1 or something 
Then who would you support?
Idk but I only brush in the morning and My dentist gives great reviews...im willing to bet it's like the rinse and repeat on shampoo....atleast one of the 3 recommended brushes is to increase sales.
[deleted]
Haters gon hate.
You are definitely in the wrong sub. Removed.
LOL yeah. 
Why do you keep making this about good vs bad? You are still making this argument binary! I have said nothing contradicting the good of vaccination!  I'm not calling for people to not vaccinate!   One huge problem is that they lie about the side effects and just deny any issues. People see through this and distrust the whole science, rather than approaching it with reason, and seeing that the rare complications are worth the risk!   I'm calling for a complete and honest discussion about this rather than giving carte blanche to the pharmaceutical industry and government to just do as they "see fit". By ignoring this and making the argument binary, you are being dishonest.    
A major government coup d'etat committed by CIA, FBI and a host of others.
Chosen by who? You sound like you're indoctrinated by religion, friend. Good stories but don't take it too seriously, now.
/r/im14andthisisdeep
&gt;White had a portable toilet set up behind a two-way mirror, where he could watch the proceedings, usually with drink in hand.  Torture is for the torturer.  Not the torturee.
I'm sorry, but it's something else triggering your migraines, not MSG.  MSG is a naturally occurring salt compound of glutamic acid. When I say naturally occurring, it's present in a vast majority of foods you would eat every day, especially meats and cheeses ... oh and your own body produces it, further more it's present in your own blood, **and your own brain**. Do you like parmesan cheese? Yeah? Well guess what, it's roughly 1.2% natural MSG.  Next, due to naturally occurring MSG (bound glutamate) in your own brain, the blood brain barrier regulates the flow of many nutrients including MSG, and unless you are specifically impaired, MSG does not cross the blood brain barrier, if it is, then this suggests a metabolic impairment, which will further suggest MSG is not the cause, but a symptom of a potentially more serious condition.  MSG is perfectly safe and natural, anyone who suggests otherwise is a nutjob, pure and simple. Anecdotal evidence from a sample of 1 (yourself) and a bunch of others who kinda blame it because of "chinese food syndrome" crap, cannot compete with the mountain of empirical double blind scientific studies which has conclusively determined MSG is perfectly safe and does not adversely affect healthy people in any way.  MSG is one of the most studied food additives in the world, if there was actually a problem with it, countries around the world would have banned it years ago ... the MSG industry isn't "big pharma" they don't have the political clout to bust past scientific study to stay on the market.
Obama has always hated white people. Not disliked, hated. He hated the white people who voted for him. His entire effort during his presidency has been to damage white culture and white traditions and the stability of the white family as much as possible.
Huh?
And these people keep on saying "Never Again" - the irony.
Last I heard, google's motto is "do no evil."  I am not sure if they follow this nowadays.
That's because they *are* real in point of practice.
Of course they arent the only place doing it. Cancer is very sexy at the moment (look at all the charities for it)
I haven't seen it all yet but how open was the ending?  Also what channel was it on? 4? 
You could move to voat
It's a test.  They are recruiting.
[deleted]
Yeah and Paul Walker. I wouldn't be surprised if when Jon Jones hit a pregnant lady with her car and was arrested, it was because of this. Probably Ryan Dunn too. I'm sure there's more, silencing people with car crashes is common.
Saudis, zionists, our own leaders.
/pol/ came in and decided that they wanted to confirm the admins'/normie suspicions that this board was filled with anti-semitic (re: anti-jewish not anti-Israel) stormfag garbage.  Basically, for all the talk of jewish/mossad false flags (which certainly have happened, that's not what I'm arguing) now the new stormfags are doing an amazing job at wrecking everything. Problem is, if you moderate them then you're going against the stated MO of the subreddit (ie to allow free and open discussion about conspiracy theories).   Our overlords know that the best way to destroy a board is to let it destroy itself with meaningless gossip and circlejerking. Instead of talking about the TAA/TTIP/TPP or the "crowd on demand" stuff stormfags would rather have another discussion about the jewish marxist plot to destroy the world and how much they hate Israel for killing muslims. I'm all for shittalking Israel and banks but every fucking day it's the same shit and nothing new is ever discussed beyond "fuck the jews"and so forth. This is a problem, because when a normal user comes on and sees this shit they obviously back off. And it becomes impossible for regulars to have a serious discussion about proven Israeli/IDF/Mossad activities as every conversation is now tainted with bigotry (that, I should add, is more concerned with shitting on jews rather than discussing Israel's often disgusting and unethical activities).  How to solve it? I haven't a clue.  
Can you give me a link that gives the best possible evidence for the inside job theory?
The military is already privatized, it does the bidding of the bankers, not the civilians.
A lot of money switched hands that day.
Democrats are neoliberal.  BIG DIFFERENCE!
That's good to know. I'm glad it didn't happen to just me.  Hilarious username by the way!
Sun rise, sun set. New day begins.
/r/iamverysmart
Oh.
kinda looks like this   http://www.fallprotect.com/fall-protection-solutions/confined-space-rescue/tripod-systems/
Well those spots match spots on the other map, could just be activity. I could be wrong, i just hate jumping to radical conclusions, see if you can find out some more information. Maybe this phenominon occures elsewhere in the world?
https://np.reddit.com/r/ImGoingToHellForThis/comments/39kukd/its_a_little_too_late_for_that/cs52h69  It wasn't an April fools day prank, this is apparently the modus operandi there.
[deleted]
I was going to say the same thing.
I used to think this was a silly conspiracy.  Until I dug into it.  Things look different from inside the rabbit hole.
why wasn't your thread exposing it downvoted into oblivion.
Another is 6 hours old with 130 upvotes and doesn't show up anywhere. I've gone through pages and pages finding stuff that's 9 hours old with 20 upvotes but mine just disappeared. 
You can't know comment ID prior to posting it, since it's being created at the moment you post. My guess is that the CSS was written some time ago to make few random comments "moah funneh" and this is just an unfortunate coincidence.
Well, at least now we know who is dumb
Its a redirection from all the peadophilia
The title of this post and article is sensationalist as fuck.
I believe he had to die, his music content was to strong in the black community. He was teachibg the ways of the black panthers and was heading down a political career, which he would have done well in. He didnt fit into the agenda at the time.
What exactly do you forgive me for?  Is it because you actually can't find anything to back up what you said and want to end this exchange so as not to look foolish? Or because you wholeheartedly retract your statements, and have learned not to make bold claims without providing relevant evidence?
Hospitals are "overstaffed".  Everyone wants the good feels of helping people out so they go into medicine and now there's more healthcare workers than we need so they get treated like shit because if one gets burned out or can't make it on shit pay then they just get replaced by another.  We are seeing the effects of an oversupply of labor.
[deleted]
as i've been saying since the FPH ban, this site is dying to its free speech vocation and as such is only good anymore to shitpost in if you're a freedom lover 
I actually got into an accident over the winter.   I rear ended an f-350 destroyed my grill, bent my hood, broke my headlights, and threw my alignment way off.   Replaced the headlights and slapped some duct tape on the grill, fucker STILL runs like nothing happened.   If you can kill it go ahead, i think you might end up dying in the process though.  Evidently Rangers are the honda civic of the truck world.
&gt;  your shitty little sub  it's got half a million users, so i wouldn't call it little. shitty is subjective though.   have fun on your moral crusade to get us banned though.
You cant make people not be intentions  stupid. You just have to teach the intelligent to challenge false information when they see it. The internet actually has improved the state of misinformation imo.  Before, you took the media at their word now you can check sources more easily. The problem is people who simply look to have their own opinions confirmed then don't do the due dilligence of checking opposing viewpoints.
I have no affiliation with Jews and no vested interest in Jews whatsoever. I argue in favor of /r/conspiracy. I argue in favor of sensible discussion and against idiocy. Fuck the Jews. I don't even care about Jews.  The Jews are not a unified group. They most likely agree on absolutely nothing, including what constitutes a Jew. They identify themselves as Jews for a diverse variety of reasons, including religious, cultural, familial, ethnic, and nationalistic reasons, and none of these reasons predispose any of them to have anything of significance in common. There is no other explanation: only a complete fucking idiot could possibly have a problem with "the Jews" as a whole. Only an idiot could possibly entertain the beliefs and assumptions that would lead them to have that problem, and I don't want that idiot anywhere near any reasonable person. That's all there is to it. **I am against worthless idiots worsening /r/conspiracy's discussions.**
Nope, every conspiracy-theory video I've watched has turned out to be a complete waste of my time.  Not going to do it.  Hit me with a key point from the film, a key piece of evidence, right here, right now.  Go !
Only when there seems to be added MSG. For example I ate a bowl of barbecue pork ramen from a Japanese take away which had added MSG and an hour later I was having visual disturbance etc.  Once I ate several sticks of beef jerky and about 40 minutes later I had the same symptoms, aura with visual disturbance.  After I checked the bag out of curiosity it had high amount of MSG added.  Basically I've noticed a pattern, but perhaps it is something else
Ugh. Just let people grow their own. I've never met ANYONE who puts pesticide on their own crop. There are about a dozen non-pesticide ways to control a grow, and most growers in Washington will gladly recite them for you.  This is just an angle to regulate. I'd hardly call pesticide use on our FOOD "regulated". I'd call it "fu**ed".
I'm too busy being hellacool.  You should try it!
&gt;do not support obesity or transexualism  i think thats because fat-shaming and transphobia are generally very violent mentalities and attract people that harass others
Sweet it should be pretty easy to shutdown sites you dont like just by commenting. 
You must go out of your way to eat "healthy"  and even then they are slipping shit into your food.  Grow your own.  or be apart of the experiment. 
I love this idea. I'm working on it now.
Reddit is a joke. Neckbeard mods can get bent. 
Why are you?
well played.
Some people simply refuse to let truth enter their mind. Thy simply refuse to look at it, and resort to cute quips to justify it to themselves. Very standard human behavior, unfortunately. 
[9/11-The Deception That Changed the World](http://www.amazon.com/Solving-9-11-Deception-Changed-World/dp/0985322586/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1434566044&amp;sr=8-1&amp;keywords=9%2F11-The+Deception+That+Changed+the+World)  
Good for them!   I hope they stick to their guns this time an follow Iceland's example. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I will be the first to admit he's being an idiot. But that's his right. This is something police and people in general don't seem to understand. You have every right to be an asshole to police officers.  It's absolutely not a good idea and I am always polite to people, police as well ( I don't have a problem with them).  But the idea that you have to show your ID is what bothers me. It really disturbs me that we would spend 50 years using that as a propaganda talking point against communism and then we would adopt that policy ourselves.   I don't have to show you who I am and just because you say I do and brandish a gun and even hurt or kill me didn't make that any more true.
every fucking fracking thread there's a bunch of guys claiming to work for those companies on fracking rigs but they're posting on reddit threads in the middle of the work day.   ....checks out.
OP you should take this laptop outside and smash it to pieces and then burn what remains. At the very least dispose of it in some fashion as soon as possible. It has been compromised.
Can I hear the cockpit voice recordings? Can I see the video of the plane hitting the Pentagon? And not the one with about three images--the ones the FBI stole? 
That was very clear, people just lack reading comprehension skills because of our education system.
&gt;- Metal corrosion: a "question", not evidence of anything particular.   Except legitimate scientific intrigue and of course the owners of existing high rise structures and insurers understanding the risk of sudden fire induced collapses. After all the "event" (severe corrosion) could have happened [before the buildings collapsed.](http://imgur.com/ijKf1J6)    &gt;not evidence of anything particular.      The lack of following up on this important *call for action* and the fact that insurance premiums, design parameters and building constriction codes have not been modified indicates the insurance companies do not accept the PC hypothesis and the powers that be don't want to know what happened to the WTC steel.     
Joke or not that shit is wrong.
Is that $ selectort at the end of "data-fullname" simply says that check the assignment from the end of the value (just like reg ex) ?  It's a funny little hack.
Forget it Jake; it's Chinatown.
read that post of his again  &gt;Right. You're allowed to tell lies, but not react to people telling lies. Spoken like a true Jew. In Jewland, the "rules" only apply to the things they want deleted/removed. Everything else is fine.   He IS ANTI-SEMETIC I don't need to paint him as anything. 
&gt; But repeatedly doing the same actions and putting people in the same situations that lead them to death: that's not an intention to kill them? &gt; &gt; There wasn't a repeated situation that lead to death anymore than repeatedly drinking water will one day kill someone.  How many people died in the camps?  These people were malnourished and kept outside in the cold and made to work even when clearly physically unable to. And often times shot   You don't call that repeated situations that lead to death?  &gt; Plenty of people died in slave labor camps of disease and especially starvation later towards the war. If the germans wanted jews dead, they would not have used zyklon b to delouse in an attempt to control the spread of typhus. The germans intentionally deloused in order to save jewish lives in many cases, if the intent was death this would not have happened.   So did the Germans put the Jews in situations that led them to their deaths?  &gt; Your analogy is ridiculous, as if the goal was intentional death of jews, they simply wouldn't feed them, yet they fed them intentionally for years in order to keep them alive and working for the german war machine.   It's a simple question: can you answer it. Here I'll ask it again. It's just a simple question on a hypothetical   Let's say: I have 5 people in a room and I shoot 4 of them in the chest and they die. I now know that shooting people in the chest will kill them.   If I shoot the 5th person in the chest also. Would you say that I had the Intention of killing them since i know shooting them in the chest will most likely kill them?  
Darn. He looked fit as a fiddle in the video. Maybe a little too much blow and hookers? Maybe he was a fixin' to start singing? We may never know. 
In a way, doesn't this call more attention to their lies? Streisand.. 
Anybody still holding Greek paper deserves what they get. That being said the debt is indeed odious and the sooner it is discharged, the sooner Greece can experience a real economic recovery. 
Some of them are. I think there's a handful, though, who are just really misinformed about the science. "Thinking for yourself" is a great thing that everyone should do, but sometimes people take that to the extreme, in the form of an intense distrust of any established authority. I can understand always questioning the veracity of scientific claims, but really, if you understand the science itself, it begins to make sense. If you don't have, and will never acquire, a detailed knowledge of physics, geology, and mathematics, than it makes sense to trust scientists *who devote their entire lives to these subjects* that the earth is round. 
[Kubrick's Odyssey: I](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qXrY8tlYQNQ)  [Kubrick's Odyssey: II](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Es4mgXwLQzk)  I personally found these quite thought provoking.
This looks like current employee PR work. Distract from the point while simultaneously making it look like you're leaking information that isn't already widely understood. I swear I have seen a comment similar to this before.
Are you a reservist?  What is the return mailing address? )
Search for a A New Pearl Harbor on YouTube.  5 hours of in depth evidence discussion.
There is no explosion! Are you really that thick or something? There is no explosion! You see a firecracker and some sparks and the craft lifts. There is nothing under it which would explain a rocket booster or anything of the sorts. Like I said in the other thread, have a good evening (and piss off).
[deleted]
[deleted]
This report only counted homicides when guns were used for self-defense.  It doesn't mention self-defense when no one was killed.  What is the ["Violence Policy Center"](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Violence_Policy_Center)?  [Who is this Josh Sugarmann?  Where is he from?](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Josh_Sugarmann)
&gt; complete exemption from penalties for agriculture  I mean, I can see the point of that.  And maybe even for petroleum refining. But fuck fracking, and fuck the institutional bullshit.
Why are you pro Jewish?
My point is, you are saying that somehow a neo-Nazi group in Russia is fueling the Flames of Ukrainian Nationalism and Ukrainian neo-Nazi's. This is the dumbest thing I've heard since OBL was the mastermind of the WTC attacks.  Ukrainian fascists/neo-Nazi's want to kill Russians! Dafuq?
Oh, boo hoo. Who are getting killed en masse right now? I'm pro truth and I laugh at you.   &gt;Jews are bullied by pro Muslim liberals.  Oh, sowwy. I'm not a pro Muslim liberal, I'm a realist. Jews, Christians and Muslims are slaughtering each other, while their controllers are dividing and conquering.  You shouldn't be pro anything, but pro humanity. If you say you are you wouldn't favor big nosed Jews over smelly brown skinned Muslims. You have a bias and are not a pro-humanitarian. You are pro Jew and fuck all..  People like you make me sick, seriously.   BTW, you sound foreign. JIDF much?
Interesting. I wonder what it means to have a "circumcised heart". 
Yes, the sun will reflect light from the building.  Not at the last second from all the different angles in to the camera lens.     Poor quality or not, there are better quality stills, and even with the quality, you can tell there something on the bottom part of the aircraft that isn't suppose to be there that casts its own shadow.  [Here is a good pic of the belly of a 767.](http://i.imgur.com/KVQalXc.jpg)  How does that at all [resemble this?](http://i.imgur.com/uoen6as.jpg)  Again, I do not to claim to know what it is, or what comes out of it.   I claim that is not a normal commercial aircraft.  I claim that a flash occurs prior to impact.  What it is, I don't know.   I never said it was a missle.  You are making that assumption. Thats the whole point.  I don't know what it was, you don't know what it was, but something appears to come from that extra part on the bottom of the plane. That is why we need a new investigation which is the only thing I ever assert.   And the first investigation was faught every step of the way by the Bush administration, and was a total joke.  Let minds smarter than us figure out what happened and who was really responsible.  The fact we don't know is all the more reason for a new invesitgation.  The fact we dont know how the pyrmids were built, doesn't mean they aren't there.  It means we should investigate and try to figure it out.  Finally, you say it would take a large missle to cause major damage to a building like that.    Would an aluminum bodied aircraft slice through steel like that?  The engines would at that speed, but what about the nose of the plane?  Slam a pop can into a steel beam at speed, does it make a cartoon like hole through the steel?  Or would it crumple up like the aluminum tube it is and bounce off?  Drive a semi truck at full speed into a freight train standing still, what happens?  Does the truck punch a hole through the train? 
I'm not religious either but I don't think Christians and Lutherans are fighting each other in the streets.  Do you remember Bosnia you Slavdik fuck? Where you sick snaggle toothed fuck-a-roaches gnawed on each other, well.YOU STILL FUCKING DO!   The National Socialists killed Slavs and Jews in concentration camps.   Stop hating on the innocent Jewish people, they did nothing to you!   That video was __EXTREMELY__ Anti Semitic.  Your fucking worse then the Nazis which you lovvee. If the Nazis made a return and killed everyone I knew at least I wouldn't have to deal with your dumb ass stink dick...
I don't have roommates, nor share my account with anyone. Keep trying.  If it's been discussed so much, then explain how you could get my IP without being an admin of this site.   You are literally talking out your ass because no mechanism exists for you to do it. Prove it. You are a liar.
NSA
Gnight sweet pie.  Abraham fucked his kin ;). Stop sucking baby dick, shit is distasteful and spreads herpes.
I'm sure you would have said the same thing about 9/11 the day it happened.  Not saying this is any sort of conspiracy just seeing if anyone else had any input on it.  After all, this subreddit is for "free thinkers".  One would think a user with such a username wouldn't be such a "closed thinker".  Just saying :)
It can if the original wasn't stored properly. There is actually many different ways that the original film could be inferior to a copy.
Who gets embarrassed on Reddit?
gnite: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1hKSYgOGtos
i unknowingly interviewed for a company that will recognize your presence in walmart and track your in store behavior.  they can play specific ads on tvs as you walk by.  send you special messages txt / email.   walmart has a dod contract.... if you're dumb enough to b on facebook and go to walmart... you are entering the new grid of the future.  inescapable. 
For the record, it has only been going on since April Fools. We just thought it was funny so we kept it. Hell, one person actually messaged us seriously concerned with the whole "I dont know how to use computer" thing and we got her to run like 5 antivirus programs at the same time and I told her to bring the whole thing in to get looked at by geeksquad.
I dunno man, have you seen the photo of Neil Armstrong after he walked on the moon? You can't fake that amount of awe and joy.
[deleted]
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&amp;apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
If anyone wants to stop speculating and see for yourself, all the source code is here: https://github.com/Minds  I have no affiliation or intention of using it. Just thought I'd share the link.
&gt;People mock us anti-vaxers  &gt;sphilious
A giant UFO pretending to be a cloud. CGI?
and they rip off the alchemy
Hey, I enjoy my popcorn alone in confined spaces... So I resent the connection to sociopathic politicians. 🎃
Well, apart form the people that did exactly as my source says and actually went to the moon, but whatever.
That doesn't rise to the level of a hate crime. You have to prove race was the motive. Plus, saying they are going to investigate it as a hate crime is just political pandering. Hate Crime laws are only used to enhance penalties. 9 deaths is a death penalty on its face. So how are you going to enhance a death sentence? Kill him twice? 
OPP
&gt; Apparently jet fuel can't melt steel beams. But can it weaken them?  No aircraft hit WTC7, yet there was molten metal at this demolition site.
&gt; Every indication is, if they had written a check, it would have been published.  "Would have", "could have". If the authors had not chickened out, they would have had something in hand - against a different journal than the Open Chemical Physics Journal; for a hoax that far more "reputable" journals have fallen for before. 
Totally agree. The guy had a gun and police were called. Of course they are going to assess the situation and take extra precautions with you. The article makes it sound as if we should be worshiping people who open carry and never question that they might be dangerous. 
The movie The Hemp Revolution can explain a lot. The values of this crop are almost endless. It actually aides to replenish the soils from which it grows; rather the opposite is true from say corn, which heavily depletes soil nutrients during growth. This crop was intentionally railroaded for the sake of industry - agriculture, pharmaceutical, material science, fuel, ... 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Who defines what is a decent standard of living? 
Republicans? Seriously? There's Democrats that want to push this filth too. Quit with the partisan shit, that's exactly what they want you to do.
Thank you for providing some much needed common sense to this sub. 
Ermmgerd conspiracy 
At least then it won't hurt right?  RIGHT?!
[deleted]
So what you're saying is that these numbers, which can't be independently reproduced as observations, are the same, so this means everything is a hologram?  That seems like a huge jump. Can you address the fact that we can't reproduce those numbers as observations? Or can you address that even if the numbers were true, and the same, that it does not imply a holographic universe?
What do you mean they can't be independtly reproduced?  Do you have a proton you can blow up to the size of the Universe?  That isn't how physics works. Nobody asked Karl Schwarzchild to make a black hole because he solved Einstein's field equations with an infinity.   &gt;that it does not imply a holographic universe?  Have you researched the holographic principle?  Are you meaning to tell me that if we go from the mass of the observable universe, a number with 55 zeroes, to the mass of a proton, with 24 decimal points, it's a coincidence?   Do you know the probability of the holographic principle doing that by accident?
"This is just an appeal to authority. "These science guys say it is, so it must be so."  No these are people who used years to study physics, astro physics, geodesy. But somehow a crackpot who probably have no degree in anything knows that the earth is flat because of some shitty made YouTube videos, you clearly lost touch with reality. Millions and millions of people is wrong but somehow you and a small handfull of people is the enlighted who knows the truth with no real solid evidence other than what you can make up to fit youre flat earth agenda. Keep believing dude despite the 100's of space pictures and real evidence we have, you could even send up a GoPro and see it for yourself. Im sure the lizard people wil pay you a visit and silence you since you discovered the great conspiracy of all time. 
Won't this support people like Burzinski?   Making this a conspiracy to help those claiming to be conspired against... A conspiracy helping conspiracy theorists?.... Much whut.   ------------  Burzynski claims that the current regulation is too strict and prevents him from getting approval for his pee-pee cures for cancer, but this new stuff looks like it'd lax the laws on Burzynski's pee.   So what gives? This is one of those conspiracies that butts in the face other conspiracies. 
[deleted]
Would you recommend any videos to watch? 
Iraq and Afghanistan ***never*** would have happened after 9-11, my *ass*. The whole fucking country was apeshit for war. People sat around the tv with their families over beer and popcorn leaping into the air with their arms up--cheering like apes--for each new tank blown up; screaming "Get those fucking towelheads. Turn Iraq in to a land of glass!!!"   A lot of them still would, too.
Hahaha ,poor you.
I find it funny its always some weird looking 20-something white kid who is probably on all sorts of anti-depressants.
&gt; rape seed  What is a rape seed?
[deleted]
ELI5
sheep mob
What kind of insecure tool needs to lie about himself on the Internet Torrey and make people think he's not an idiot?
Thanks. Wasn't sure what I looking at.
&gt;/u/TurdHennesyJrIII is at it again. Can this sub not attract bigger retards?   *FTFY*
Look for the words Census. That is all that is legit right now. I'd throw the thing away. If you're wrong they'll come to your door and as you questions. Or will come back to pick up their package/booklet.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Slurs aren't allowed here.  Future post like this could result in a ban.
If he is, I wonder when he started.  Beginning antidepressants is a dangerous time due to risk for mania.
Ffmppffmf'pmfpmf mmpmpp fmmppf mppfpfmfffmpmppmpm fppmfpmppppp ffmppffmf mpfmffpppmpm ppffmffmp mfpppffpp fmpppf mpmmppmmfffmpfmmfpmpppff fmpmfpmfffmm, Mff ppmmffmfmmfpfmp mmmfmm fppmpppmfpmf mpmpffppfpfm mmm pmppppppffpppmfmppmpmmfmmpp mmpppfppmmmp mfpmpppffmpp.   Pmmmppfmp mpffmfmpppmf mmfmmmppp'fmp ppmmpppmffmp fmmfmpmppmpppmf mmpmppmmmppmfmm!  Mmmpppmpm mppfpmmppppp mffmpf _mmfppffmfpmfmpm_ fppmppmmmpmpmppppp fmpmfpmppppm fmpppf mffpppmfffmpmffmmmfmpmpp mmm mmfppfpmfpmfmmmpfmfmmmpp: fmpmfpmpp fmpppfpfm mpfppffmfpfffmpmfp ppfmpf mmm mpfpffmppmpp-fmmfmpmmmpppmpmmffpppmfm, fmmfmpmmmmmppmfmpp, fmmpmfmpppppmpmmpppff, fmpmmmpmfpmf fmmfmppfffmfmmffmpfmfpffmpp mmfmmmppppppppffmp mmfppfppmpfmpmfmppfmpmpppmfffm mmfpfffmffmmmfp mpmppffppppp fmpmfppffppffmfmfmmfp fmpmfpmpp pmfppffppmpppff fmpmfppffmppmpp mpfppffmfpfffmpmfp. Mffmpf ffmppffmf fmpmfpmffppppmp ppffmpmfpmpppfffppmfffmmmpp, ffmppffmf ppmfmffmmfmp pfmpffppffpmmffmpmmpp mmmppp mppfpfpfmmpppffmffppmmpppppfmp, mmpmppmmfmmmfmffmmmpp fmpmfpmpppffmpp mfffmm pppppfpppmpp ffmmppfmp fmpppf pfmpffppffpmmpp Mmpmmmffpmmmpppfmp mmmpppmpm pppmfffmmfmp pffmffmfmmfpfmp. Fmmmmfmffmpppppfmpmffmpfmffmmf ppmmppfmpmfpppfmpm mmmpppmpm mmmpmfpmf, ffmppffmf pmppppppffpp ;)
Man, that took some effort. *congrats*
It was likely an FSE because FSEs are the only thing that the media will shill now..... Ever since the 2012 NDAA passed its been blatantly obvious that we are being fed non stop hasbarah.
All I am saying is we landed on the moon. I am not going to read ZetaTalk trash.
You don't seem to acknowledge that every floor that collapses adds to the falling mass, which makes every subsequent floor collapse happen faster as there's more load.
Are you enjoying the puppet show? 
I'd be interested in this.
You're a troll for going to /r/subredditdrama and telling people flat out that you just come here to fuck with people, not as a member of the sub.  In English, that's a troll. 
too lazy to even watch an 8 minute video.... yeeeaaah....
What. The. Fuck. Why is this the first time I'm hearing about this? Is it because it involves gangs and ghetto people? Are they not newsworthy? I guess they don't want to address the problem there. Very sad. 
My Reps' FB today.  "Today, Speaker Boehner is bringing Trade Adjustment Assistance and Fast Track to the House floor for a vote. This bait-and-switch arrangement promises to help workers who have lost their jobs in previous bad trade agreements - but only if the Congress agrees to fast track yet another job-killing trade deal. I will vote against TAA and the other trade deals that do nothing but hurt working families in the Hudson Valley. I urge my friends and neighbors throughout the country to call their members of Congress and ask them to join me in sticking up for American workers by voting against TPA and TAA. You can find your member here: http://www.house.gov/representatives/find/."  https://www.facebook.com/repseanmaloney
Smart.  You think like me. 
[deleted]
So you honestly believe the pictures of the laser ranging experiment are indeed faked? 
Their series of 25 provable points exposing the NIST report as fraudulent: [READ HERE](http://www.ae911truth.org/images/articles/2014/11/twenty-five-points-10-19-14-3.pdf)   ___________________  Individual Interviews with these qualified professionals:  **Steven Dusterwald, S.E. - Structural Engineer**: https://youtu.be/I7oti6KGEf4  &gt; - Mr. Dusterwald presents contradictory evidence between the NIST model and the actual sequence of failures within all the WTC Buildings.  **David Topete, MSCE, S.E., Structural Engineer**: https://youtu.be/v9WB1A9j8f8  &gt; - Mr. Topete discusses how WTC Building 7's column 79's failure could not have caused the symmetrical and simultaneous collapse into it's own footprint.  **Richard Humenn P.E. - *WTC Chief* Electrical Design Engineer**: https://youtu.be/gJy7lhVK2xE  &gt; - Mr. Humenn gives us quite a unique perspective inside the elevator shafts in the twin towers and how access to the core columns could have been gained.  **Tom Sullivan - Explosives Technician/Loader**: https://youtu.be/u5IgqJXyLbg  &gt; - Former Explosives Loader for Controlled Demolition, Inc. (CDI) Tom discusses the complex process of preparing a building for controlled demolition and sites the reasons why WTC building 7 had to have been a controlled demolition.  **Bob Bowman PhD, Lt. Colonel (ret.)**: https://youtu.be/CROB5p-1GjE  &gt; - The former head of the Star Wars program under President Ford &amp; Carter, has multiple engineering degrees and agrees that NIST is conducting a massive coverup. (RIP)  **1999 *Presidential Medal of Science* award winner, Lynn Margulis PhD:** https://youtu.be/O0fkDmi78Og  &gt; - Famed scientist, Lynn Margulis, provides crucial rules and elements within an investigative scientific analysis to procure an accepted hypotheses vs. what's depicted in the NIST report. (RIP)  **Rudy Dent, *9/11 survivor* and former Fire Marshall**: https://youtu.be/nQrpLp-X0ws  &gt; - 32 year veteran of NYC fire department and the NYPD, speaks about his incredible first hand experience of the lies surrounding WTC 7 and gives his professional opinion on the destruction of the buildings with his experience as a Fire Marshall.  **Casey Pfeiffer, S.E. – Structural Engineer**: https://youtu.be/V4y6cweaegI  &gt; - Mr. Pfeiffer provides a in-depth look at what actually happened to the top portions of the WTC towers prior to collapse and how WTC 7 could not have experienced simultaneous connector failure without the use of controlled demolition devices.  **Kamal Obeid, C.E., S.E. – Civil/Structural Engineer**: https://youtu.be/3WCcSHpvAJ8  &gt; - Mr. Obeid, a 30-year structural engineer explains how NIST's analysis actually disproves it's own theories on how WTC Building 7 collapsed, thereby confirming the use of controlled demolition.   **Scott Grainger, FPE - Fire Protection Engineer**: https://youtu.be/5nvWh2aTdCs  **Ed Munyak, FPE - Fire Protection Engineer**: https://youtu.be/c0QEutd1Unc  &gt; - Mr. Munyak uses his considerable experience as a 25 year Fire Protection Engineer to expose the NIST reports of WTC 1, 2 &amp; 7 as fraudulent.   **Robert McCoy - High-Rise Architect**: https://youtu.be/4-3FQtZnk2A  &gt; - Mr. McCoy expresses his doubt abut the official story and from NIST as to how these 3 skyscrapers were destroyed and calls for a new investigation examining he hypothesis of controlled demolition.  **Ron Brookman, Structural Engineer**: https://youtu.be/TM_l_4sJ-sY  &gt; - Mr. Brookman discusses his direct inquiries with President Obama and NIST on NIST's responsibility to find the cause of the collapse of WTC Building 7 and their responses.   **Tony Szamboti, M.E. - Mechanical Engineer**: https://youtu.be/4V3WdpzaA4o  &gt; - Mr. Szamboti provides a comprehensive analysis of the undeniable discrepancies between the NIST report, their modeling and their findings compared to what factual-based evidence exists.   **Stephen Barasch - High-Rise Architect**: https://youtu.be/eeWNITKBFto  &gt; - Mr. Barasch discusses his skepticism of this theory of collapse by fire and talks about how one might expect a collapsing high-rise to behave.  **Les Young High-Rise Architect**: https://youtu.be/zceJhfYV69M  &gt; - This high-rise architect expresses his suspicions that the explanations provided by NIST speculates how the Towers might have fallen if they were to have fallen at all. Further, he analyzes the fire in the buildings.  **Jerry Lobdill, C.E. - Chemical Engineer, Physicist**: https://youtu.be/7P3_TboFltI  &gt; - Mr. Lobdill presents an in-depth explanation of why the resulting chemical component elements found in the WTC dust, deflagration and steel deformations indicate that incendiaries were used to destroy all 3 WTC skyscrapers.   **Kathy McGrade, B.S -- Metallurgical Engineering**: https://youtu.be/Q6ziLE23Soo  &gt; - Kathy McGrade explains how normal office fires cannot melt steel and how the symmetrical collapse of all WTC skyscrapers, according to the official story violates the laws of physics and thermodynamics.   ___________  - [**2 Examples from their series of twenty-five provable points which clearly demonstrate that the reports produced by the NIST are unscientific and fraudulent**.](https://www.ae911truth.org/images/articles/2014/11/twenty-five-points-10-19-14-3.pdf)  Fraud? — [NIST maintains that WTC 7 collapsed due to fire acting upon the 13th floor &amp; A2001 girder. But — NIST omitted flange-to-web stiffeners on the south end of the girder A2001. These omitted stiffeners would prevent the girder flange from folding when the girder web moved beyond the seat.](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/301e6t/breaking_news_nist_maintains_that_wtc_7_collapsed/)  Fraud? — [They also said shear studs were not used on WTC 7 girders — and claim the 13th floor A2001 girder was pushed off its seat at column 79 by 'thermally expanded' beams. If shear studs had been used on the girders, it would have been impossible for the beams to push the girder off its seat.](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/30mmj3/911_coverup_nist_says_shear_studs_were_not_used/)  _________________________  **NIST did not follow standard investigation protocol:**  **Erik Lawyer – Firefighter**: https://youtu.be/KsbbpUA9FHM  - Mr. Lawyer presents investigative directives from the National Fire Protection Standards Manual that were never followed by NIST or FEMA for the fires they claim caused all 3 WTC Buildings to collapse.  ________________________________  **Danny Jowenko - Demolition Expert:** https://youtu.be/0f4w8iJmn08  - Mr. Jowenko concludes that WTC 7 had to have been a controlled demolition without a doubt. (RIP)  **9/11 Survivor Barry Jennings Uncut Interviews** (WABC-TV, 2001, LC 2007): https://youtu.be/OmeY2vJ6ZoA  - Barry talks about the explosions in Building 7 and his escape from it after tying to enter the office of emergency management area on the 23rd floor. (RIP)  ...........There's a lot of disinformation out there.  Stick to WTC 7. 
Word, interesting. I was going to take some time when I'm free and see about false positives / negatives but like I said I haven't done so yet.  Either way thanks for your input.
Damnit now that Im to old I wana serve
&gt; What? you want me to pull out my circumcised dick?  /r/gaybrosgonewild stands ready to verify your identity.
Thanks for the constructive criticism. Now, to find an off to fuck...
I have a facebook account with friends and i have never posted anything before,s so its not really that wierd 
o.0
Yeah. Winning the lottery is also possible. But it's incredibly unlikely. 
I debunked every single claim, the test that was linked in his comment was about aluminium in the air, in order to get this they tested fucking sludge and claimed it was water.  http://contrailscience.com/what-in-the-world-are-they-spraying/  It's been debunked a million times, you got destroyed.  Just stop.
A lot of people do not want crime scene photos of their loved ones floating around the internet.  Also, rights of privacy may exceed death in some jurisdictions.  http://www.publicdomainsherpa.com/rights-of-publicity-and-privacy.html
[deleted]
[deleted]
How many children are in America? How many commit mass shootings? Ok.
[deleted]
how can you say you know the government is corrupt, and then say you want to vote?  there is a process that has to be followed.  when voting doesn't get you what you want you protest, when protesting doesn't get what you want you turn to civil disobedience, when that doesn't work it is time for a revolution.    we don't have to overthrow the government yet, it is still very possible to bleed money from the companies that are trying to ruin society buy paying off our elected officials.  however, in order to do that you are going to have to be a little creative ( which you seem incapable of doing).  George Washington killed men, in their sleep, on Christmas. The patriots destroyed trade goods. our country was founded by terrorists. they also tried to be civil and vote, and as soon as they saw there vote didn't matter they protested.  when that didn't work they wen't on to civil disobedience and had the boston tea party, and when that didn't work the war started.    i understand you are scared of death and being labeled a terrorist, i'm sure some of our ancestors where too.  however, after our extensive conversation, I find that you aren't really here to get anything done.  Anyone that can tell me they know the government is corrupt, but still wants to try and use voting to bring about real lasting change, is either incredibly stupid, or is being paid to say that.   
So everyone on facebook is a damn actor now?  God lord, man, what a scary world you live in.  
88
Who is the crew in this case?  Who are the passengers?  I'm sure it will make perfect sense with some clarification.
The Bible is clear if you seek God with all of your heart you will find Him.   You have nothing to lose to seek God. What if He really is real and the Bible is true? God makes a promise He rewards those who diligently seek Him.
Wait a minute... I didn't intend that comment to be hateful towards you in any way shape or form. I know that when it comes to problems here or in your home country we use the same dirty tactics.. For instance.. The Cumbria massacre.. Have a look at that.. There is an independent investigation into this on richplanet.   I'm sorry if it came off like that but I don't agree with what my countries government is doing either.. He tried to push abolishing human rights yet again.. And that's one of the key legislations Cameron needs to be able to push our version of a federal law.   I wish and hope that everyone pulls together. 
Please, explain.
[deleted]
Wat
Looks like you've got some reading to do....  http://piketty.pse.ens.fr/files/Piketty2014Capital21c.pdf    http://resistir.info/livros/piketty_capital_in_the_21_century_2014.pdf
Didn't read it all, would be interested to see how they would do that. Like get them physically out and place them down etc.
Yet if you actually take the entire global picture into account, the wealth of the top 100 richest people could eradicate that poverty (that they mostly caused).    https://www.oxfam.org/en/pressroom/pressreleases/2013-01-19/annual-income-richest-100-people-enough-end-global-poverty-four    With modern tech and a proper governmental body there is no reason why all humans on the planet couldn't live a sustainable and "middling" life. 
First rule of discrediting, sensationalise, like lizard leaders
[deleted]
[deleted]
This new info is from an ex cia agent who is now 78 http://www.hautlife.com/719-jfk-assassination-details-coming-to-light
Here's some [obviously faked footage from the ISS](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vuN_ItXMC-E), they're actually just going around and around the top of the flat earth in a loop to fool you.  
Not what was said at all. Jesus christ. 
I think the armored van shooting in Dallas was the beginning. What happened in SC was the next event and I have no doubt there will be more in the coming weeks.   This shit is not going to stop. 
I was reading a documentary that stated that marijuana became illegal due to the realization that it could overtake Americas 2 major industries... cotton and logging. It could have replaced both easily.
I support your right to question it, but in all due respect I think that we need to keep our eyes on the ball.  9/11 revelations coming to light combined with conspiracy theorists coming up aces lately is the impetus to distract others with things that really dont fucking matter.
It's not the potheads only.   Henry Ford created his first cars out of hemp made into a steel...  It would have combatted the paper companies and forced them to compete   You can use it for fule, fiber, food, the list is endless.   The potheads want it because we know how great it would be. It's only the government and its big pocketed friends that want to keep it illegal 
Definitely NWO at hand. No doubt. I mean, just look at the evidence. Oh wait...
Got a former account name to go along with this story?
Hey, hey, ho, ho, this is what a police state looks like. Hey,hey,ho, ho, this is not what a Democracy looks like. No Range Rovers, no peace..
We also have a difference of opinion on what a conspiracy theory is.  Imo the 9/11 commission report is a conspiracy theory.  With a less likely hood of probability that the other theories on the events of that day.  What you call sniping, can be better applied to the responses to the evidence the independant investigators have brought forth.  The governments best theories on what happened have a much lower possibility to the point of impossibility on pretty much every thing they say happened with the exception of the date.  How many "hijackers" were filmed in the airports that day?  Even the footage of the couple they made public doesn't have date and time stamps on it, or appear to be legitimite.  If you are really that trustful in the government, and believe the unverifiable theories, computer models, and "evidence" they presented, thats your choice.  I have looked at all sides of the story since 2002 and can tell you that the governments story does not stand up to any scientific scrutiny at all.  If you choose to believe it, I truely envy you, and wish I could.  Intelligence wont allow me to.    I hope you are getting paid and really don't believe the shit they are slinging.  
Remember when a term was 4 years? Now it's like a given that you're getting 8.
You should re sign up as /u/ichoosejidf.
[deleted]
There's a fragile truce, yes. I wouldn't exactly say Cameron's a saint, but I agree on what you mean by that.   The worst part of the conflict was that innocent folks, useful idiots and idealists on either side were brutally taken advantage of and sucked into a vortex of abhorrent violence ... all in the name of some grander political scheme which got to lead a life of its own, until everything and everyone got bogged down in blind hatred. People just couldn't see they were fighting eachother instead of the puppet masters fomenting the nonsense and hatred for their own benefit, British imperialists and Irish Republicans alike. The former wouldn't give up tyranny, the latter their cause against it, because from either perspective it gave them purpose, control and authority in an empoverished region.   Innocent lives paid the price as always. That's the lesson to be taken from all of it. I'm glad that Paisley mongrel is dead, I'm glad the iron lady went mad and died in disgrace and I sincerely hope sell-out bastards like McGuinness and Adams will swiftly follow their lead.  Let's all just hope younger generations will not re-ignite what's done with, albeit under less than ideal circumstances.  
But that doesn't fit in with the narrative of everything is a conspiracy. If you start throwing rational thoughts like that out, this place won't survive.
&gt; I mean I can conspiracy with the best of them...but the earth is flat? Come on people..seriously.  It is necessary to allow government designed, created and sponsored 'way-out-there' folks to do their thing.  Just means we need bigger shovels I suppose.
[deleted]
here are the most important facts you will never hear about from the pro-forced vaxxxination crowd:  https://childhealthsafety.wordpress.com/graphs/  FURTHER...  just like herbicides are known to breed "super weeds"...  just like anti-bacteria is known to breed "super bacteria"...  ...vaccines have been proven to evolve **vaccine-resistant "super viruses"**.  "Life finds a Way" - Jeff Goldblum - Jurassic Park  **Researchers Discover Vaccine-Resistant Polio Strain**  http://www.iflscience.com/health-and-medicine/researchers-discover-vaccine-resistant-polio-strain  **Vaccination, evolution and changes in the efficacy of vaccines: a theoretical framework**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/8587880  **The predicted pattern of emergence of vaccine-resistant hepatitis B: a cause for concern?**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/10067705  **Predictions of the emergence of vaccine-resistant hepatitis B in The Gambia using a mathematical model**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC2810914/pdf/10813156.pdf  **Hepatitis B virus genetic diversity**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/16622876  **Vaccines and antibiotic resistance**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/22981392  **Virulence of pertactin-negative Bordetella pertussis isolates from infants, France**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/23621904  **Evidence of VP9 and VP4 intra-lineage diversification in G4P[8] Italian human rotaviruses**  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/24353026  **First Cases of Vaccine-Resistant Whooping Cough Found in United States**  http://www.healthmap.org/site/diseasedaily/article/first-cases-vaccine-resistant-whooping-cough-found-united-states-2813  etc...  http://naturalsociety.com/whooping-cough-morphing-super-bug-due-vaccine-use-australia/  http://www.motherjones.com/tom-philpott/2012/07/antibiotic-use-vaccines-factory-farms-creating-new-pathogens  http://www.dailytelegraph.com.au/news/whooping-cough-strain-now-immune-to-vaccine/story-e6freuy9-1225828959714  http://www.news-medical.net/news/20111108/Live-virus-used-in-polio-vaccine-can-evolve-and-infect-warns-TAU-researcher.aspx  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/1697396  http://journals.lww.com/jaids/Fulltext/2007/11010/Selection_of_Hepatitis_B_Virus__HBV__Vaccine.4.aspx  http://www.cidd.psu.edu/research/synopses/acellular-vaccine-enhancement-b.-parapertussis  http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/20825107/ns/health-childrens_health/t/shot-may-be-inadvertently-boosting-superbugs/#.UAUYIvUsFrO  http://www.smh.com.au/national/health/whooping-cough-beats-vaccine-20120320-1vibp.html  http://preventdisease.com/news/12/071712_Vaccines-Are-Causing-Mutations-That-May-Jeopardize-The-Health-of-Future-Generations.shtml  Setting aside the act that the American Medical Association insists that individuals should only be given medicine after "informed consent"  -- a globally recognized standard among civilized nations:  http://www.ama-assn.org/ama/pub/physician-resources/medical-ethics/code-medical-ethics/opinion808.page  Please do yourself (and your fellow comrades) a favor:  Stop shit-talking "anti-vaxxors" and **INVESTIGATE STEM-CELL-BASED VIRAL CURES!!!**  We are humans not stray dogs.  And we have options.  (We all want the same thing... cures for disease!! Don't get stuck on the method -- simply demand the best/safest/most effective method!!)  ...if we MUST make this a government-forced issue ("For the good of all comrades"), **we should be investing in viral CURES** -- something we will OBVIOUSLY need sooner or later. 
I love this. A website came on my Facebook feed today saying "time to ban the confederate flag" and it infuriated me. Yes, it's the flags fault that a psycho went into a church killing people. Really? What if he wore a peace sign shirt? Burn all the peace signs? People are the problem not the flags, or guns, or whatever else you want to blame. I was born in Baltimore and lived there 28 years. I have lived in the south for 2 now. The confederate flag doesn't mean racism to me and hasn't to anyone I have met. It's about giving power to the states and not the federal government which became (like it never should have) what it is today. The same reason why we fought for independence from Britain. Our federal government is out of control, and of course we in this sub know why. Sorry for the rant, I'm drunk...
Because that person was ignorant about the real events behind the curtain during the pre WW2 era and i was not in the mood arguing with him - you know... it takes so much time to comment argue and it is so frustrating and no1 ever agrees to go skype talk to teamspeak... because ''clearly'' the secret agencies really have the time to have an eye on the ''conspiracy''(???) subreddit&gt;  Plus it is a conspiracy sub. Him denying what i stated, makes wonder... are we still on the ''conspiracy'' sub?! Or is this some fake vitrine? - for me this, is obvious.
Yeah, somewhat, although it is pretty boring.
See that makes me think they just calibrated the speed of the lander and set up the cameras to follow accordingly. A 2 second delay would be way too much to track it from the ground IMO.
Lol /r/askreasonablyshittyscience
holocaust? anybody? it worked for a long long time. this one "9/11" won't survive that long in this age of cyber media.
Gateway Timeout.  Do you by chance have a jpg?
I called it that some"big event" would go down and tpp and its ilk would get fast tracked.  Honestly wouldn't be surprised if that church shooter was some mk ultra zombified benzo and ssri hopped up stand by they havd waiting to be let loose in times of needing a cover to pass bills unhindered, but that's just me
Makes no sense
That's not a race issue, but a religious one.  The Talmud teaches jews that it's ok to deceive gentiles and take advantage of them, for they are merely animals.  Combine that with high intelligence on average and you quickly got world domination.  Jews were expelled almost anywhere historically and it's not a coincidence.  I have secular jewish friends that were never involved in the faith, however I wouldn't associate with religious jews or those that support them.
50% right
The better to track you with said the big bad wolf.
Compare [these images](https://c.o0bg.com/rf/image_960w/Boston/2011-2020/2015/06/18/BostonGlobe.com/National/Images/suspectcrop-1313.jpg) of Dylann Roof with [this photo](http://bullseye-prod.aggrego.org//wp-ag/wp-content/uploads/sites/71/2015/06/CHARLESTON_SHOOTING_54427713.jpg?o=eyJ3aWR0aCI6OTk5LCJoZWlnaHQiOjc0MSwieCI6MC41LCJ5IjowLjV9&amp;s=dv60nzrH6DfeE7VJSH%2BiGm2QeYE%3D) and [this](http://www.google.com/imgres?imgurl=http://cdn.abclocal.go.com/content/creativecontent/images/cms/792469_1280x720.jpg&amp;imgrefurl=http://6abc.com/news/2-dead-in-apparent-murder-suicide-after-standoff-in-port-richmond/782335/&amp;h=720&amp;w=1280&amp;tbnid=e1NqsDNOYFhD9M:&amp;zoom=1&amp;docid=t2DMhzFWjsvFeM&amp;hl=en&amp;ei=VdiDVcKwM_G1sQSWtbqoDA&amp;tbm=isch&amp;ved=0CGwQMyhFMEU&amp;biw=1366&amp;bih=588).  Then look at [these](https://www.google.com/search?q=Dylann+Roof&amp;num=30&amp;safe=off&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=CtmDVcCQGbGZsQSgyp-4BA&amp;ved=0CAcQ_AUoAQ).  It seems like the person in the first two side by side images has a nose that's either straight or slightly hooked.  Someone mentioned the nose looking like it might be fake, but it could be the white appearing at the tip of it in the right photo is actually part of the vertical L shaped pipe you can see behind him.  If you look at his nose in all the other photos it's obvious it turns upward rather than being straight or hooked.  In the first two side by side photos his hair is either cut short enough to reveal his ears, and/or tucked behind them.  The photo showing him with his hands cuffed behind his back indicates it may be the way his hair is cut that reveals his ears because it would be impossible for him to use his hand to push his hair behind his ear.  Could it be two different people?
This is not true. I highly doubt the average person would risk their career to make a statement.
Oh no, a bunch of neo-Nazis don't respect me, I'm so sad :(  OH WAIT *YOU'RE* SUBHUMANS, WHO GIVES A SHIT WHAT YOU THINK?
[The technological applications of graphene is available in hemp which has been banned for over 80 years](http://phys.org/news/2014-08-hemp-nanosheets-topple-graphene-ideal.html#ajTabs)  Prohibition has set mankind back a century, every prohibitionist should be rounded up and put to work on the hemp farms.
freightshaker
A l I ttle last to the party, oh long winded one.
I wish I could upvote this more than once.
I don't believe it is morally acceptable. Especially when that chosen ignorance is directly playing into the suffering of millions of people in other parts of the world. Sure it is their choice, I just believe it to be a morally unacceptable one.
OP didn't you post this last week?
&gt;...it is rare for claims against high-level government officials to proceed.  No better time than the present.              &gt;If there is one guiding principle to our nation it is the rule of law. It protects the unpopular view, it restrains fear‐based responses in times of trouble, and it sanctifies individual liberty regardless of wealth, faith, or color. The Constitution defines the limits of the Defendants’ authority; detaining individuals as if they were terrorists, in the most restrictive conditions of confinement available, simply because these individuals were, or appeared to be, Arab or Muslim exceeds those limits. It might well be that national security concerns motivated the Defendants to take action, but that is of little solace to those who felt the brunt of that decision. The suffering endured by those who were imprisoned merely because they were caught up in the hysteria of the days immediately following 9/11 is not without a remedy.     Reads like a cool drink of water.     Maybe this opens the door for whole torturer crew to be  sued and shamed in front of the world?  Shunned from society would be apropos.          Bush   Cheney   Rice   Ashcroft   Powell   Rumsfeld   David S. Addington   George (give that medal back) Tenet   John McLaughlin    Richard C. Shelby     Bob Graham     Porter J. Goss      Nancy Pelosi    John Yoo   ...   &gt;   ***     &gt;*In a series of high-level meetings in 2002, without a single dissent from cabinet members or lawmakers, the United States for the first time officially embraced the brutal methods of interrogation it had always condemned.*      [(nytimes.com)](http://www.nytimes.com/2009/04/22/us/politics/22detain.html?hp&amp;_r=0)        r/AbuGhraib/
&gt; I dont need to look at one article or video, and haven't. Or will. Nor will I waste my time to convince someone it's round.  Willful ignorance at its best.  Edit: Reverse psychology?  /r/theworldisflat
You're pretty disgusting if that's the first thing your mind went too.  A normal person would have said yeah decentralized would make it so the servers can't be shut down so we would be able to leave reddit no matter what.  But not you, you're over in your basement jacking off to dog porn and you see a word and then you jump to your fantasy.  You fucking disgust me.
Jesus Christ. All of these are so fucking dumb but I'll respond to a few.  The UN flag point is just retarded.  &gt;Why do simple experiments show no curvature of the earth's surface?  But they do? Go out to an ocean. Bring a telescope or binoculars with you. Wait until you see a ship come into port by appearing out of no where or follow a ship out until it disappears over the horizon.  &gt;Why has nobody ever circumnavigated the earth from north to south? The weather is really crummy at the poles.  &gt;Why has NASA officially changed their story about the shape of the Earth?  The picture to the left is even entitled "exaggerated bulges of Earth." Of course real pictures of Earth look like circles. Because the bulge is so tiny you can barely make it out. Open up Paint and make a couple 800x799 rectangles and a few 800x800 squares. Randomize them and see if you can see a difference (spoiler: you can't).  
Don't worry. He probably is deliberately throwing of the conversation so a real solution (decentralized awesomeness) cannot or will not take place.   Kid porn is used here as an excuse to not have nice things! Criminals use it? Must be bad...is a bad argument. Emotional tactic used to circumvent rational thought (which works mostly on people who are already emotionally manipulated by propaganda).  Still disgusting. :) 
A-fucking-men.  People trying to turn this into a race thing need to stop and take a look at their motivations.  When they came to arrest him, he complied.  Period.  That's the only difference.  If he put up a fight do people seriously think they wouldn't have possibly beat him to death like anyone else?  White people that don't comply are beaten and killed all the same.  Nothing to do with race, everything to do with cops having control of the arrest situation.
WOW! This comment must be my most controversial yet - up three points, down to one, up two more, down to negative one ...  make up your mind, reddit!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Wow.  I can tell you really have an in depth knowledge of international law.  Thanks for the contribution...  &gt;Child pornography is child pornography.  Definitely not.....Like I just said.....CP is defined by laws and its defined differently in different parts of the world.  Switzerland its under 16 years old, USA its under 18.  Pictures of 17 year old is CP in the USA, but not in other countries.  So CP is not universal.  Actually its exactly how it works.  Companies residing in a country only have to abide by the laws of that country.  Switzerland is not going to extradite its citizens to another country to face changes for an action that is perfectly legal in Switzerland.  This is the same principal that torrent sites have been exploiting for a long time.  Now you can see how this issue could get legally complicated for the hosting company.  This type of content is going to be more trouble than its worth for most people.
What agenda? 
this kid is just a plain ol' loser,   i wish parents would stop giving their disturbed kids guns.   they know who they are
Signs point to 'yes'.
Hahahhhahahhahahhaha stop 
That's exactly how the conversation went down actually, and that's when he stopped responding
[deleted]
Look, I am the opposite of someone that likes sites that police content. My 15+ years on the web are counter to everything you assume about me. The points you make, I could agree with some of them and have discussions on them without issue or judgment.   What my point is here is that this is currently considered illegal content in the USA which will lead to a host of problems for VOAT with the possibility of killing it. If VOAT is intended to reach a wide audience they are going to have to make some tough choices on things like this. If they exist solely as a non profit free speech machine then they need to say as much and make arrangements to keep the site online from the onslaught that is sure to come.  I don't get the impression that Atko wants to deal with the latter and in fact it says "no illegal content" in the site rules.
The comments on that idiotic article do a pretty good job of tearing it up. Hilariously bad tech journalism.
This was a long time coming but go fuck yourself, idiot.  I am going to make this really easy for you. I was making statements based on **personal knowledge** of the topic but since you want to be a petulant child I will prove you wrong once again.  &gt;For the purposes of a violation of PC 288, the required element in order to prosecute you is your specific intent to satisfy sexual arousal or desire. Whether you touched a child’s naked body (or he or she touched yours) or clothing was being worn is irrelevant.  &gt;Additionally, it doesn’t matter whether the sexual conduct involved intimate body parts provided that the purpose of the lewd conduct was sexually motivated.  https://www.wklaw.com/what-is-lewd-and-lascivious-acts-with-a-minor/  You are fighting a losing battle here. These things were hashed out a decade ago when they were relevant on places like http://www.gofuckyourself.com (adult webmaster forum) and similar.  Now grow the fuck up, you are pathetic.
Not a crime to say you did something in the past with no proof, only happened AFTER they harassed him.  It obviously isn't illegal to SAY you smoked weed because he wasn't arrested for it.
Fucking ban it. These people believe there is a giant Game of Thrones style wall in Antarctica. It's a joke, and distracts from meaningful shit.   Edit: I changed mind. Downvotes sort those out. I just dont like when it leaks into other threads. 
[deleted]
Meanwhile, VOAT needs their servers to stay online.
Well it's not so I'm not going to answer some made up what if question.
Thank you for your prompt response. But further perpetuating that bullshit photoshop job w/ the Obama patch does this sub no favors. 
Yeah it's good, but dated. In 2004 there was no credible threat of "islamic fundamentalism" to America or England, so the War on Terror was exposed as a fraud.  In 2015 things are different now, ISIS is an actual threat to the western powers (real or manufactured) so the documentary is not relevant to the current situation.  Also interesting to note is the history and similarities between Islamic Fundamentalism and Neoconservatism. They are like polar opposites of each other.
&gt; The truth is bombing Iran and putting an end to their aspirations to devour one country and another in the Middle East would save far more lives than it would cost.  Again, I thing you are confusing Iran with Israel - as it is they that have aspired to "devour" the Middle East:  **[Report: Netanyahu says 9/11 terror attacks good for Israel](http://www.haaretz.com/news/report-netanyahu-says-9-11-terror-attacks-good-for-israel-1.244044)**  &gt; The Israeli newspaper Ma'ariv on Wednesday reported that Likud leader Benjamin Netanyahu told an audience at Bar Ilan university that the September 11, 2001 terror attacks had been beneficial for Israel.  &gt; "We are benefiting from one thing, and that is the attack on the Twin Towers and Pentagon, and the American struggle in Iraq," Ma'ariv quoted the former prime minister as saying. He reportedly added that these events "swung American public opinion in our favor."   Also, from 2003:  **[Sharon says U.S. should also disarm Iran, Libya and Syria](http://www.haaretz.com/print-edition/news/sharon-says-u-s-should-also-disarm-iran-libya-and-syria-1.18707)**  **Prime Minister Ariel Sharon said yesterday that Iran, Libya and Syria should be stripped of weapons of mass destruction after Iraq.**  &gt; Prime Minister Ariel Sharon said yesterday that Iran, **Libya and Syria should be stripped of weapons of mass destruction after Iraq**. "These are irresponsible states, which must be disarmed of weapons mass destruction, and a successful American move in Iraq as a model will make that easier to achieve," Sharon said to a visiting delegation of American congressmen.   &gt; Sharon told the congressmen that Israel was not involved in the war with Iraq "but **the American action is of vital importance**."  Now, take note of the countries that Ariel Sharon listed to be "disarmed": **Iraq, Libya, Syria, and Iran.**  What has happened to these countries since Sharon issued his orders?  Yeah, and you're trying to blame Iran?
That's faster than clearing a check.
I'm sure the word planet was decided many years ago.  Kind of like when they named the planets after Gods because guess what, they made shit up during those times.  Check out greek mythology.  And actually my telescope does tell me they are planets because I can see through said telescope.  Do you know how a telescope works either?  
no
[deleted]
Then leave.
&gt; Ain't nobody got time for readin that wall of text  Have you ever read a book in your life that didn't have pictures?   There is less lines of text and words, than found in a typical paperback book, in my post.
&gt; I hope so, all I see is more and more dumb people. Their plan is Woking perfectly - people seem to have lost their ability to engage their brain cells. But then this is the country that actually believe JFK was killed by one lone crazy gunman  Yeah, I understand completely. It's insane how dumb people can be.   There's another side to it though, which is apathy. There are a lot of people who do know what's happening, but they just don't know what to do about it. 
I believe it happened just I believe 9/11, Sandy hook, boston bombing and all those other events "happened". Now if they happened exactly like we're told, then no I don't believe that for a second
I've got years of Ps experience, you got duped son.
"Domestic Terrorists" we are yo. 
yes, someone has went to jail for the pop rocks and coke stunt. the parents were reported for child abuse.
It's an important revelation. Our leaders determined that the only real threat to their power was from their own citizens, and took actions. The entire domestic front of the "War on Terror" is designed to counter any potential revolution. Not to protect people, but to protect the Status Quo.
Well, they *do* try to think of the children.
Do you have any proof at all of what you do without revealing identity? Fascinating story, but anyone can claim to see the stuff too 
Do I?   So good night troll
TBH, I'd rather die of cancer because I couldn't afford chemo than to live in a world where you have to walk on eggshells over everything you think or say.  First Amendment \&gt; Obamacare
You literally just copy pasted that from your last comment.  No, they have **not** acknowledged it was demolished. The official explanation is that it collapsed due to office fires. It takes days if not weeks to rig a building to take it down like that.   You sir, are out of your element. 
Someone else take over, this guy's wearing my patience for nonsense down.
look deeper.  
What the fuck did I just explain to you? You can insert XMP data into EXIF data.   Jesus Crist how are you not fucking understanding this?  Just because you post an image from a[Mac Forums Rumor Site](https://www.google.com/search?tbs=sbi:AMhZZiuUBACEGh6cUnMG6eLkj0L1JiMbO8tDvetmKFJ_14C8cWCZkHbCenxppmfMIT2QzXruFFb_1ch6hSOcfH0VIJyQL_1DK3f54W5cFeZLyhQyTyfxLuepH1LFiuG8vI5fDLkVx33nc5Jl33OcrscWJTD_1GSxEY_1aY-CHS0_17zWkxwRJPA7PdOkcLlD-jKn6sfNoSqbe8wyQh3cSkNcSy9RBLQDkbVxqUQ7r_1PDq09LIIL07QA4sVefyn9SWr3vxcuRdd44Zf5g6VjPnJ8fNlbMuYVJGY5ymR3DyFNnZd1NQN2zJZDa8FzJJic-Qhrlw1VayPnLq1b9g6M33GrFY_1SAcnHl68PP9K8OMQBsqhRsUZZG3V7fNUkzD3NIVcQnVBATg3ALfYjJpibIMPSq3VV8BpD_1rEw-YYrAhsHo5SqHIExXCnbZ7cyQiOEGovwIvgD1lA8P69qe4nmZvIzOvoP4IW9uOze5v7-j8LN9GsXb0bDcVFRNRoObcj3FvTvI2NPu0_1QwQOYpgscgRuHuheFkqdlU6TUgwuRKJ7M8q2elag-JbfJpGywZZ99JhyIo6DDWk-9BxE-4SELiBuIJuKIjSJY7C0oZY16q8tS90V2lBlG-dQGQ-DBqWAcAi-uyyca-2Oapb3YvtOo1u3Bscf6A5xn9_1TjbdW6B-AmXLuRHQ5MtU2U8Q101MInJ8e2wOBtYREQuQMa1LHCb0-ZjernBQREvhrV7oclbgEq9PFtmceiI1P69Y0S4HTHgZ1xYMfl4YYG6XN9RN548oSQccupZiyTdyKYWdmgR_10ot5smbnIsede7S31gJ7G5NADGU2QVcQU2HpIBSD-hDx6bGTddoDuoyzR5lf8jOckgm6N0W4HGuxX01wFZBYoyeKSyhWU8217Ym-TwO1ehdE6hiUJ8HjPJ-edFWms6ZP_1234yXLhMXb8Vw-PclYhINaEgWP2Znh6wysl5NMScsPzC9TiSFV8UQgJb6KhLj4t1URnO2Yuu3qnUSJmkqisGmpeyOd4-i4aV7vv_1DglYWLWR6rMblpLJs_110TjoUUw_1GxbBmgDAeHtFzYkPLknnDYGCBVWsgGLagXELH73-Yz0IjwnpVec4ad85l1T8AdUPlj_1f1BPaNYk_1SOrw5yz6LsJtLHXm-F91VrXdE3g6lq2Zlv3OPdMiWbqbsFPrSHw&amp;btnG=Search%20by%20image) site does not make you an expert on anything kiddo.    
I don't have time to look at all you posted here, but I looked over these two papers.    Harrit et al, which analyzed some nanoplatelets, found Al and Fe, as well as S, Ca, Na, Ti, Cl, etc.  Basically they were full of common elements, and the spectra were inconsistent.  It does not make sense that the platelets are manufactured "nanothermite."  Oddly, the author doesn't give quantification of the elements to allow a better comparison which he had the equipment to do.  Any peer-reviewer should have demanded such an analysis.  The DSC data shows an interesting exotherm around 420 - 450 C for the samples, but since thermite ignites at over 2000 C, this is not evidence of a thermite reaction as is claimed.  The second paper is purely speculative.  The authors claim a mechanism for the production of diphenylpropane (DPP) based on the complete assumption that it was present in some proposed nanocomposite material.  It is completely circular reasoning.
Just read Singular. It has a similar story line
"I think its functionally better to treat the average person as more empowered so that eventually they come to live this way." Beautifully said. Be the change!!
Any reason to think we have more mentally ill in USA than in other countries ?  Other major countries don't have our homicide rate.  And they also generally don't have our gun ownership rate.
The link embedded in "08B1723" next to Richard Matt's name directs to another page that states "escapee" as his status.  On this page, another link is embedded in "08B1723" which directs to another page with more information about his type of release which is noted as "escapee."  Clicking the link embedded in "03B2297" next to David Sweat's name also nets more information.  http://postimg.org/image/dh14jhvch/  http://postimg.org/image/webs4has7/  http://postimg.org/image/s7u6ydoqd/  http://postimg.org/image/ltq094g7j/  http://nysdoccslookup.doccs.ny.gov/kinqw00  
Or a stabbing, or a homemade bomb....really. "If we just take away guns well only have silly slapping contests" you posted the same comment in the other thread for this.
it is very obvious what is going on here, if you dont see it you're likely part of the problem.
Ur a fucking shit head 
:) Ohhh Reddit
Right, you're going to stop the National Guard or the Marines with your guns.  You couldn't even stop the local SWAT team.  Your guns did NOTHING to stop GW Bush from weakening some of our key Constitutional rights after 9/11.  Did nothing to stop the NSA.  And other countries with FAR fewer guns don't fall to tyranny all the time.  Canada, England, Australia, etc.
Those places aren't targets for these types of things that you've been to, so there is no reason.  The WTC was regularly receiving threats of bombings for years before the bombings, and the years leading up to 9/11.  *Every single facility I've been to, government or otherwise, that receives these types of threats has this amount of security.  If they receive regular threats this security is constant, because if you don't you can't afford insurance to cover anything.*  Being law enforcement, you should know this, my brother knows this being in ESU, we both learned this being Marines.  My brother used his own money to get security training specifically in this field to give him an edge to become ESU.
I was livid as well when I first read the story. I still feel that a "regular" person would still be in jail right now, but they did make a good argument. An the results of their investigation will let us know how corrupt they are. The pic I saw in the article I read she looked hammered.   "Police say the driver, Holly Gonyeau, 36, of Ferrisburgh, was drunk."  This is from the article I read. I hate police but now I want to join. I want a get out of jail free card.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yup, just like all celebs, my account was hacked. Sorry guys now I'm going to scare myself at /r/topmindsofreddit 
I don't know the exact details of background checks, but i'm assuming you'd fail one if you have some significant criminal/mental history.   In that regard, that sounds like a great idea.   So far there havn't been restrictions that would prevent regular citizens from owning normal guns, so what's the problem? (Normal = Not 'assault'/cannons/rockets etc).
Ignore the bomb... its a damn stupid line of thinking, criminals will get guns if they are required.
When you say you lived through it, do you intend that you were at the bombing?  There are countless theories, hours of photographic forensic *evidence*, if you will, from the scene. Some of the photos, taken from an aerial vantage point that have *Craft* dead center. Not to mention some intricate details, if you care to investigate.  There are people in the medical field, emergency services, specialists that shake there heads at Bauman being hurtled down the road in a wheelchair.   I'm not here to change your mind. There are scores of people within /r/conspiracy that have spent untold hours *researching* the Boston Bombing Hoax.  One young man was brutally murdered in cold blood by the FBI down in Florida. There are hundreds of details that are at your disposal to investigate on your own.    
Can also be found in /r/comedy
The one wise thing he said was that the goal with the US was identical to that with the USSR.  Bankrupt them with unwinnable wars.  It's already happened.
Reportable.
When the next bubble pops, it will be the last, at least for a generation....
I have a hard time trusting Romanians, and I am semi educated American.
Big Pharma is a huge problem, I agree...
I can't be made responsible for the affects of years of propaganda against us. most deluded souls  simply don't have the ability to think through the facts  and see the propaganda.  They all parrot expert opinion (the very essence of propaganda, which consists of repetition by 'experts' ). Nothing I or you say here will affect that any at all.   As I said in a different response, Cheney lied no matter which one he meant.  
No surprise 
You shouldn't believe everything on the internet without checking the source first.
Guccifer is a very good hacker, he hacked e-mails of important american politicians like Hilary Clinton and Bush and published some of those e-mails.
Can we stop using "elite"? There is nothing elite about them. Moneyed, mabe. Elite, no.
Watch the movie "Soyent Green". We are on the fast track to making that a reality. 
Ain't that the truth
How did these guys reached to the cockpit before the pilot could activate the code mm?
I find linguistics fascinating. I find academic pedants....well, pedantic. I was subscribed to r/linguistics for a while and then left them in the same way I left the linguistics department at university years ago. Meh. Free thinkers they are not.  Not that they are alone in not-free thinking.  Living abroad I was taking language class. I asked the teacher (it was private lessons) about a word I often heard in common use that I didn't really grasp the meaning of. The teacher stiffened up and growling at me, said that the word I asked about wasn't actually a real word and that I should just dismiss it as bad grammar.  Which of course I could not/did not do, as it turned up in common use every day.  It is my experience that academics like to ignore the realities of actual living whenever it doesn't fit into their syllabus of scholarly training, no matter how erroneous the training may be.  And I'm still liking talking to you. I liked your post ^.  
Don't care
I hate when they are called the "elite", I'd rather use "leeches" or any other parasite name, as that is what they really are!
Sweden is wrecked now?
That's right. You'd have to have inside knowledge from hundreds of subsets of the military and Intelligence agencies  and possibly even  knowledge of secret weapons only known to the White House to know what they actually used.      Every bolt and weld let go at once and that leaves no chance of it being gravity caused.  I just don't believe it was thermite. 
They're in jersey haha
Perhaps if the US were on a fair playing field, with the populace feeling the consequences of their financial decisions, then they might take action against it. They might not enjoy giving the military industrial complex so much money; they might not reward those who cause atrocities with funds to do so.  
Rigt but taking guns away from the general public would certainly make things like mass roundups or executions easier. Im not giving up that right, i dont even own a gun but i am glad many people do.
That's very interesting data!  However I wasn't saying that in Iceland everything is perfect, but at least they took action against banksters. The outcome isn't even that surprising, though not great. If the financial construct collapses, those who make a living through natural resources will be better off.  Are Elites taking over the U.S. ? Yes. But Iceland has the chance to have issues that are easier to solve.
Do you actually believe that Nostradamus had the power of foresight? I mean, you're whole point is stretching but once you brought in the Pope and Nostradamus I had to laugh
haha I say this! The real Drones are starting the attack!
By being almost exactly the same thing. it's giving the "supreme authority" of the land to enact new laws without having to go through any of the already in place checks and balances.  The only noticeable difference is that Enabling Act of 1933 was about all laws and this one is just about trade laws.  Can you explain why after reading what each one is why would you require a further explanation? Are you some half blind fool or do you have some ulterior motive to dissuade peoples thoughts from the subject? 
Ah - well it's not your sub buddy, start your own if you want to be so righteous and if you can do a better job. It's not hard. 
Good to see evidence that this is a thinking ground.
He was being a smart ass. He was trying to highlight a misconception but he was being a smart ass about it. I was wrong to jump all over him like that but it can be an expected response on the internet of all places.
&gt;Lol, so your fallacious use of a personal anecdote to try and counter 200 years of actual data is hilarious.   You need to get out more.  &gt;Again showing just how weak your brand of deluded nonsense is.   Spoken like a true weenie who spends too much of his time on forum arguments, trying to fill a vacuous hole of absent self worth by *proving* others wrong. Hint: it doesn't work.  &gt;I don't expect you to read the whole thing (although you should at some point), I expect you to do what any rational person does: pull from it that data and arguments used, WHICH THE SECOND PDF ON THE LIST DOES FOR YOU.   Nowhere are CEO's referenced. CEO's are as diverse as the businesses they manage/own. I'll say it again, you are over generalising.  
Yeah, that *must* be it.
Yeah I misunderstood your view on lying, is all.
Well I'll be a monkey's uncle.
Most nations that participate in the global economy rely on loans to some extent, regardless of whether or not they have an abundance of natural resources. 
What conspiracy is this relating to
[deleted]
This is coming from HSBC, not the reserve.
4mg of Xanax could be enough for somebody to blackout, people have been known to do very stupid things on benzos, mainly stealing and fighting. They're pretty potent and it doesn't take much.
So you speak for all indigenous people now?
Maybe his words were deliberate.  Maybe he was trained what to say.  
The Charleston shooting is incredibly suspicious.  You can find lots of other threads in this subreddit discussing it.  Of course a lot of it is just speculation, but it just happened.  Some of the family member interviews look very much like paid actors following a script and not what you would expect from grieving family members.  It is incredibly convenient that this incident helps them advance their agenda of stoking racial tensions and disarming the population.  People's ability to think rationally about an incident is inversely proportional to the horrificness of the incident.  Sandy Hook for example.  Anyone questioning the official narrative about the incident, especially right after it happened is met with "how dare you, think of the poor families".  But this is intentional.  You don't even have to answer questions on specifics if you can gloss the whole thing over with horror. 
Just like the rash of gun violence, and racially charged stories the MSM reports on heavily after a tragedy such as Charleston. I have no doubt they have their agenda and are stoking the flames. Does anyone think for instance Baltimore or Ferguson would have escalated to rioting if every twit cable "journalist" from around the world wasnt covering the situation like some kind of all week MMA event on ESPN? Every country has problems ours is a societal mindset. Not guns. 
3 banks with 11 times the gdp of the country.
I enjoy playing, but would/have never watch a game. 
Frank was one wide awake dude. Ahead of his time. Passed too soon. 
According to the information netted from WhoIs, the website also has ties to the Ukraine.    Also, there is no law that prohibits an American citizen from using web hosting services located in another country.  &gt;Registrar WHOIS Server: whois.reg.ru...    &gt;Registrar URL: https: / /www .reg.ua /   http://bgp.he.net/dns/lastrhodesian.com#_whois
As I understand it the cockpit before 9/11 was not as secure as it was after.  Doors could have been left open, passengers could wander around the plane freely.  If the door was closed it would've been easier to breach then than after.  With 4 or 5 people it's not out of the question that they could subdue the 2 men in the cockpit before they could get the codes out.
My point was that the threat was engineered.
that combined with loads of new photographs of him make it pretty clear that it's his site.  
Yes you are correct. The Iraqi and Afghans used IEDs a lot.  I shall write to my American friends and tell them this. No need to worry about guns. /s   Hundreds?  Name just 5
But it doesn't matter for us. The effects would be the same, since devaluing our currency is the exact same as failing to pay, since the money we're paying is going to devalue other countries' currency to such an extreme degree.
Fast tracking trade deals? Like the TAA?  This can't end well. 
Oh My God... you're posting on reddit... are you the FBI?
When I say The People in Power im referring to the people pulling the strings. If I assigned names this would just turn into a debate I don't want to get into.   And I'm mostly talking about false flag conspiracy theories. 
I think they're coming here to create  an excuse for our detractors to point at the rest us and paint us crazy.   I haven't seen any supporters of the theory,  comment.    Their posts  are only supported by the OP's of the posts but /r/topmindsofreddit and /r/conspiratard  would have you believe that all of us here are flat earthers.   I think it's a plot.  Flat earthers seem well funded because of the number of videos they point to.  I just tell them, if anything, to get together a large stockpile of funds from their large number of supporters, take a camera with internet access, go to the edge of the earth and report back from there.  They claim the earth is flat but has no edge.  Infinite earth? no, scam.  
What are you referring to? (Other than this thing)
&gt; this film just a male version of the other.  Damn.  Well I'm glad I never had any inclination to see either.
Scopolamine was one of many drugs experimented with in MKUltra. The number was over a hundred. I just saw the list yesterday reading Jim Keith's "Mind Control, World Control." MKUltra Subproject 119 was "the remote electronic activation of the human organism." You combine V2K, psychotronic weapons, and narcohypnosis and you're cooking with gas.   There's some horrific tales of what the CIA did with scopolamine on http://www.deepblacklies.co.uk/feature_article_listing.htm   but some of what they have there isn't irrefutable evidence. The fact that scopolamine was used in MKUltra is well-documented.   For a terrifying and lurid tale of CIA scopolamine use creating assets go to this link. Do a ctrl+F search for scopolamine and you'll find the story. Chilling. http://www.deepblacklies.co.uk/the_pegasus_file-part1.htm
No.  Parents who turn their head, and intentionally allow bad behavior to flourish are actually bad parents.  You might want to educate yourself a bit more on this topic, if you actually have children.
neo-cons
So you're looking for a freak your viewers can make fun of.  Fuck off.
Well, he was a moderator before, too.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Same.
Here is a zip with all 60 photos.  https://filefire.com/5wY  I looked through them and noticed a couple of things. There's no way that these were all selfies. Someone took pictures of this guy. They also look posed. Like someone told him to look as menacing as possible.   In a lot of the pics he has highly reflective sunglasses either on or dangling from his shirt. You can't see a thing in the reflection except in one picture. Which looks like someone's hands, not his.   You lose quality on Imgur but this is the pic I'm talking about. http://i.imgur.com/KiJQ1n2.jpg  His website had no actual history until this month: http://web.archive.org/web/20150620140113/http://lastrhodesian.com/  One other thing I noticed while looking at the properties of the photos is that they were all taken over the last 3 months. 
Probably true, but keep in mind the USD won't be worth shit. So this is more of a protect-your-assets move than a get-rich move. IMO.  edit: Oh, and paper gold (FOREX) is largely fraudulent from what I hear. Get the physical metal.
I use to love his stuff, but his whole goat boy bit really turned me off: [Video [skip to 38.05]](http://www.disclose.tv/action/viewvideo/162953/Bill_Hicks__Revelations__Complete_Entire_Video/)
As a Christian I don't get it. Jesus Christ literally called them the sons of Satan and purged the moneylenders out of the temple 
Don't call it a grave, it's the future you chose.
Who says I dont?
Yandex is a well-known, easy to use throwaway email site.   As for the lastrhodesian site, if someone was planning to go on a shooting rampage, along with publishing a race-hate manifesto and host it online, it would make sense to use a site based outside the jurisdiction of US/Western intelligence.
[deleted]
Well put.
Ball's have curvature and **the earth has no curvature**. The only proof most people supply of the earth being the ball is evidence supplied by NASA, which is known for often lying, NASA often also tells us that earth is a spheroid, though there is no photographic evidence of that either. 
Your ball earth cult is a sad excuse for the world we live on.
Dunno, maybe alien blue has problems with multisubs?   What am I following.. Bigger picture things. I almost see these shootings as a distraction anymore.  I'm really interested in the deception working its way into the public consciousness. On Facebook, on youtube comments, twitter.. people are figuring the game out. TPTB are switching, slowly, to hard power.. but they gotta do it in a way that doesn't instantly awaken half the country.   And my friends, previously sleepers, are waking up. It's starting a social snowball effect. It's absolutely fascinating to watch.
I don't doubt people died and that the guy shot them with intent to kill. I just found it strange that a guy with less than a 9th grade education existed without a job for 5-6+ years, in what appears from his photos as a middle-upper class lifestyle, isn't a "loner" and his friends, one being black,  say he recently was talking about killing a large amount of people in a mall. He stops a couple block short of the mall at a church, sits down for an hour, then kills people.   Called a hate crime by everyone on the planet...his black friend goes on the record saying it wasn't a hate crime and all of a sudden this website pops into existence. The site...[Just a picture of an actor laying on the ground bloody](http://i.imgur.com/wZ9EALq.jpg). A single link to a zip file with 60 images and a link to a txt file "manifesto" with a large passage dedicated to black people. I'm glad that law enforcement didn't murder him...maybe the legal system will choose not to as well and one day we'll possibly find out why crazy people do crazy shit?
Love is also just a chemical makeup programmed into our biology for securing offspring
I'd want blood.
There would have been plenty of sulfur from the gypsum in the walls.  This feels like a planted red herring.
its exactly the same. we have the same "owners" and the same "orders". 
[deleted]
And posts like this is why this subreddit has the reputation it does.  Someone presents evidence that shows something isn't a conspiracy and they are insulted and dismissed.  This response should be at the very top of this post, not an unverified account of what someone says happened that people want to believe.    You attack this one point (and don't acknowledge the editor-in-chief resigned over the article being published), but what about the other 9, extremely valid points brought up?  Your Wikipedia point is fair, but I would think no one would claim something as fact without verifying it first with other sources. The poster's point against the article wasn't that it was just hosted in that particular journal, but also no one else has had similar findings.  Why has no one else had these findings?  Why did the EIC resign?  Lemme guess, fear of being killed by the government?  
US media isn't covering the Saudi Arabia-Russia nuclear power deal at all. Reuters covered it, but it's Reuters-UK.
[sure enough](http://i.imgur.com/YSwnk5P.png)
I'm glad YOU think you're funny
SoCal or NorCal?
I offer this video as an example to the dorks that downvoted the comment:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=m2eyq9qTOQY
No one is arguing that free speech shouldn't be limited in some sense. But saying that you don't have to use censorship to get there is to be dishonest.   It isn't semantics. It is a detail that needs to be clear and letting it pass is bullshit. That is a part of any rational discussion.  Edit: That is why I followed up my original comment with an edit, like I am doing here to attempt to insure clarity. Which is very difficult in real life and even harder online.   Nobody is making an argument that there will be some Orwellian nightmare but censorship is censorship is censorship. The other commenter seemed to be making the argument that it was not.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0QZyItsY2Lg
This has been a thing for years.
I have not repeated the paraphrased version here. 
let me ask you if you think Jews are in high power?
Same here bro. I'm not sure what to think about that.
Well said. I pretty much said this to myself 30 minutes ago (prepping incase I was called out). But I think OP wont win the argument. Challenge young peoples thoughts on it rather the set-in-stone-parents.
now it's at 8% audience rating.
Well like any good moronic survivalist, he doesnt seem to grasp that at worst wed be set back ten to twenty years because hey shocker the government and other groups keep hard copies of every piece of info ever.
[deleted]
Cool theory. I had never really considered that kind of objective and starts to make a little sense.
Well actually, these company offers the spraying of silveriodide to unload the clouds. This technique is known and used since the 50s for example to discharge storm clouds before they reach major cities. Chemtrails on the other hand are aerosols of aluminium and barium and their main purpose is not to cause rain, thats just a biproduct...
Well, you claimed the knock offs did shit, so I guess you're a fuckin liar, or just a fuckin potato head that believes every stupid thing he reads then. I'm going with fuckin liar.
Better divorce her now. 
http://fotoforensics.com/analysis.php?id=29642b707d52f525b2ef8748761418651465c582.87289&amp;show=ela
Use Chromium, it's the open source browser that Chrome is based on, and its not ran by Google.
The NYT...factual...LOL. Get fucked dude. You're so lost. 
&gt;  *Eventually someone will toss the anti semetic card at you. It's a tool they use.*  [the trick described by Shulamit Aloni](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uW3a1bw5XlE)  
New York Jailbreak  Texas Cop Shooting  Charleston Shooting  Blend In  Real-Time Integration With The Public  
Yes, he has. He addresses that in the video (from the start until around 4 mins 20). As for my reason for finding interest in the linked video:  &gt; what he's saying here **fits what I'm reading in news around the web**: imminent currency crash (checks out); local governments wanting their gold back (checks out); elites building bunkers and fleeing (checks out); possibility of martial law in America re: Jade Helm/ militarized police (checks out).  
Ugh....raise your hand if you understand how a combustion engine works.   Fuel, when burned, has ideal products of just carbon dioxide and water. What happens when very hot water vapor is put into a very dry and cold climate? It turns into small ice crystals. Now if the air where the water vapor is introduced is relatively still, what happens? It stays in place and slowly dissipates, as the ice crystals are acting like a gas, they eventually, over a very long period of time (due to the atmosphere being relatively calm) try to fill the volume of their container.   Why have I never seen an article of anyone who worked as an airplane mechanic for years and years when suddenly he had to start fitting these things to planes that had nozzles and had to refill them with unknown substances? Or why no pilots coming forward saying "I have sprayed them"....why is it always pilots coming forward saying "yeah, just contrails from the engines exhaust"  Also, I do believe in cloud seeding to try and make rain, that is very much a real thing. I do not, however, believe in continued spraying of people (I believe there was one isolated experiment the government did on St Louis?) as this phenomena of contrail lasting for various periods of time happens all over the world wherever plans fly. 
Looks like these drills are going on all year in Charleston. Therefore it's not that suspicious. 
&gt; 152mm shrapnel shell, fired at 10:00 AM 20/06/2015 at sector M (near Mariupol) as a response to Russian artillery attack on Ukrainian positions.   You are still being told that the russian army is fighting in Donbass, while no pictures of the alleged 12k soldiers who have been ''seen'' by NATO officials.   How idiot can one be to think that Russia would fight like this. You are a ukrainian from the mainland. Since you are against Russia, i guess u have many georgian friends who think alike. Why dont you then ask them what is like when the russian military in REALITY attacks.   No sane person with some military knowledge believes that Russia is fighting in Ukraine. 
Yes, and they're our enemies here in America *when our big government fucking bails them out*.   I'd rather suffer 10 years of consequences of a few huge companies going bankrupt than rigging the economy *and waging war* so rich people stay rich.  Corporatocracy.
&gt; Ugh....raise your hand if you understand how a combustion engine works.   Let's say that trail is nothing intentional and it is simply jet fuel exhaust which is being spewed out the back of that plane and hanging in the air above us for days. Isn't this CO2 emission the cause of global warming? Isn't this pollution a serious problem?
you need new eyes.
If you watch the video I linked when you get the time, you'll understand this more as it explains this in much more detail. I'm just paraphrasing that video (badly!).  Basically, the firmament is supposedly made of a special glass. This glass, which has been found as a meteorite, can withstand heat far greater than modern glass and has many other intriguing properties. Anyway, every 10,000 years or so, there is a cataclysm that comes from the 'great rift' in the sky, which wipes out that age of humanity. Cultures all over the world talk about this, and if you ever read 'the fingerprints of the Gods', you won't find this too surprising (cannot recommend that book highly enough by the way. It's a few decades old, but it's still an international bestseller and still a mystery).  the unexplained phenomena is a strange, loud creaking and the sound of trumpets in the sky. Very weird.
Especially you.
Japanese dying - what a shame. Russians(ukrainians are Russ) dying - not a big deal.   When they come for you, there will be no1 left to defend you. 
Picture proves nothing.  Here, on the other hand is Ukrainian GRADs being fired directly into a city:  Feb 12 2015: https://youtu.be/xAwTjtsL1Kc?t=3m28s (Watch the bottom left of the screen you will see dozens of rockets being fired into a city, Then at 4:48 in the video the rockets land ALL OVER the city as the lights go out)
These guys have a little problem:  http://cdn.thedailybeast.com/content/dailybeast/articles/2015/06/20/dylann-roof-visited-slave-plantations-confederate-landmarks-before-massacre/jcr:content/body/inlineimage_12.img.800.jpg/1434822924504.cached.jpg  Another picture with the same jacket.  edit: and another one:  http://i.dailymail.co.uk/i/pix/2015/06/20/16/29CF034300000578-0-image-a-35_1434814616803.jpg
&gt; WHY would I ever time my attack for that moment? Why wouldn't I instead put it all off until tomorrow, when the exercise is over  Because your crisis actors who help sell the drill as real wouldn't be there the next day.  That's what crisis actors are used for, to sell the event to the media,  and to first responders not in the know.   Read [this article ](http://memoryholeblog.com/2015/06/19/where-have-all-the-crisis-actors-gone/) for more information on how crisis actors coordinate with law enforcement agencies during these hyper-reality hoaxes. 
More than that, both Dums and Repugs have these so called free speech zones setup blocks away from wherever they are grandstanding for anyone who disagrees with them.
Google seems to have nerfed and made unreliable their timestamps sometime in 2011 or 2012, the intention to muddy the field and make date searches opaque.  pre 2011 google had reliable dates.  Bing accurately dated Sandy Hoax to before 12/14/12
Of course it's not "seeing the curve".  Looking straight out away from you, over so many miles, you'd never be able to discern the curve.  The ship disappearing from the bottom up is a demonstration that represents the curvature.  If you can see that, at nearly half the distance that you are able to see from side to side across the horizon, then it is perfectly reasonable that the curvature of the earth should be discernible.  (And if you can't comprehend this notion... Looking straight ahead, now turn and look behind you.  You just DOUBLED what you can see.  Now, instead of looking fore and aft, simply look side to side.  If can see the ship disappearing while looking straight ahead, try to reckon with what you are able to see when your field of vision is nearly doubled.)  Granted, it looked flat... It wasn't readily apparent until sighted up with a straight edge.  So you are confusing "seeing" with "measuring".  I really believe that your brain is broken in regard to this.  You truly have fallen for this nonsense.  I'm sorry.  I can not correct your utter blatant stupidity and I refuse to spend my time on this glorious day trying to debate with a broken mind.  I'm truly sorry for feeding the trolls.  /r/conspiracy will see nothing more from me about this topic.  I'll just do my part to downvote the stupidity and then I will move on.  
It is not though. It so far has been held up as allowed by the constitution. The Constitution says legislative branch can make laws and they did. The Constitution says the Executive branch needs to uphold and enforce them and it does.   I am not asking question because I do not know laws, I am asking them to create thought within you. When you say that smoking weed is unconstitutional, I try to think about why you would say or think that. Just trying to talk. Not going to use harsh language or yell. Just going to question or poke holes in weak arguments.
Well, in that case, I am wondering: who is denying that chemtrails exist? Your title implies that someone is still denying the existence of airplanes spraying some dust to try and form clouds and control the weather. Usually it's done to create rain in a desired area, but some times to create it around an area that needs to be "protected" and this is done during major sporting events.  So again, who is still denying that this is happening?
it was just your prototypical /r/conspiracy comment. You weren't missing much
The BIGGEST proof of this is when MySpace seemed to be the dominant human &amp; commercial interface and then out of nowhere, FACEBOOK took it down through a huge media push. 
When you put stuff out into the grid of consciousness, there will be a response.  You can't expect otherwise.  
Rushed?  It was posted on his site in FEB and never updated....
Because you've watched something on YouTube doesn't automatically make it a fact either.  And I'm sorry, if you're going to claim that history books pertaining ancient Greece are falsified, then there's absolutely no point discussing anything with you.
[deleted]
This is the product of looping the feature detection algorithms over the same input over and over, even if that input is noise, it will start to detect and amplify 'features' that aren't there. The basic function of this class of algorithms is directly based on neuroscience.  I think these are fascninating and beautiful but the key is that they are also apparently very easy to produce if you already have evolved neural nets for recognizing features in visual input. You just concentrate their effects by wiring the output back into the inputs and use inappropriate filters, like looking really hard for seals in a squirrel.  The analogy to visuals produced in a dream state or under the influence of drugs is direct because our brains provably contain such evolved neural networks trained for feature recognition. It provides strong evidence that the machinery of our brain, some parts more asleep that others in these situations, could easily and logically produce this kind of surreal imagery as a consequence of those conditions. Some people will find this disappointing because it suggests that a 'dream world' need not objectively exist to be experienced. Even shared dreams can be partly rationalized this way if one accepts that the input noise could be modulated by a very subtle latent psychic effect, or even common environmental factors as subtle as EM radio waves or cosmic background radiation.
http://www.thedailydigest.org/wp-content/uploads/2012/12/305479_181841755292426_108807653_n.jpg  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZFaPyn_EeDY
[deleted]
Many but not all. 
[deleted]
this isn't a conspiracy its a website being mismanaged, why dont you concentrate on something important.
Where is OP even getting this info?  Is says right on the side bar "We DO NOT use NSFW tabs".  Where's a source indicating that admins have deemed it otherwise?  EDIT:  okay I found the discussion in the meta thread.  [Mods have decided to ignore the NSFW tag requirements after all.](http://np.reddit.com/r/museumdiscuss/comments/3akgka/nsfw_tags/csdyt1f)
You are all literally retarded.
[deleted]
Such a predictable narrative, of course!
Think of the children, moron.
Boston.
Read up on the Rothschild family, they own all the banks (ar almost all) in the world, thus in fact controlling the money. As stated in the article, they're an old family that has been doing this since centuries. They're also involved in quite a lot of ufo stuff. The daughter of a Rothschild speaks out here about alien stuff..it's quite bizarre to say the least https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z4Vij4LsVO4
Are you, so eager to spit vitriol, responding to the wrong comment?
Not only this, but this theory is pretty much debunked by the [video of Ceres' rotation](https://media.giphy.com/media/ytwDCvfOBvgmeYMGXe/giphy.gif) released by NASA. It clearly shows that the bright spot is just something catching the sunlight that is slightly more reflective than the rest of Ceres, such as ice. It stays bright as it crosses into the night side of the 'planet' but then goes dark as the reflection fades away. If this really was lighting itself like a city, it would only become more and more apparent as it crossed to the night side and stood out more against the darker background, but that isn't the case.
Have you ever considered that the state keeps having this unproductive debate about taking guns away all the time, yet gun ownership has not declined?  This kind of talk just increases sales of guns and expands the budgets of enforcement agencies to have even more advanced weapons.  To me all this talk is about profits.  Not gun rights or safety.     
No, it isn't. I presume you aren't well versed in this topic
Except I did comprehend, and debunked every claim he made.  He literally linked a study on the wrong type of mercury then tried to claim methylmercury was in vaccines.  You're either crazy or a troll.
mentally ill rambling witch embarrasses self. 
Someone with a gun can kill a lot of people at range, quickly.   Someone with a knife, sword, fork, axe etc is going to have to chase people down the moment their ill intent is noticed.   It's much easier, both psychologically and physically, to shoot someone than it is to stab or bludgeon them. 
last time I watched TV: every show on there had been teaching how to be an asshole and that it is Ok and even fun to be an asshole.  so: no, thanks.
Who was shot dead during the movment? Pepper spray and some unnecessary beat downs, yes. That shit did happen but was not the defining factor for the movements failure.  Edit: as far as a solution. Demilitarize the police. Police don't need to look like domestic soldiers. A common police officer should be a civil servant that isn't intimidating to approach for help. Impliment better training and more accountibility. Police work hard and like teachers are very important but very underpaid. That in effect brings in complacency, frustration and less regard for procedure. 
An interesting diatribe against the party out of power in the United States for seven years. By his reasoning, the world must be just peachy with Obama in the White House. Totally misunderstands that it is the system, not the party.  Additionally, the article is more about Ayn Rand than about the endless political shenanigans that she so detested. The author shows a very narrow worldview, an oddly strong statist mindset, and a dismay that all the big government which he adores is just bad because they aren't doing statism the way he approves.  For the record, I am a peace loving, apolitical person dedicated to kindness and understanding between people. Not a neo-con or any of that nonsense.
My favorite was the masturbation machine - you know the guy that said the Nazis hooked him up to a jerking-off device and nearly killed him by orgasm overdose.  Hey, it's a better story than the lampshades.
Perhaps To ISIS that is part of society.. "just how things are"   And rape is a part of all war 
TBH, your thinking cap shouldn't come out of the aluminum foil section of Wal-Mart. Though I gotta hand it to this subreddit, this was quick.
What's hilarious it that it presumes that people actually give a shit. As someone that started a bit of a movement around the TPP, and even spent my own hard earned money on advertising and tried to stage several protests, despite having over 5000 people join our Facebook page &amp; a fair amount of support from the usual suspects, let me tell you that the average person feels two things: no confidence in their ability to change anything and thanks to that, apathy. You don't need to stage a fucking mass shooting to get the TPP across the line, you have just have to ~~bribe~~lobby enough politicians.
[deleted]
&gt; And did you see that guy's beard?   Not even a billionaire can pull off a monocle after Occupy.
It doesn't. 
Are you saying you don't believe kids are dead because you personally did not see them? 
I'm just trying to think of possible explainations. I don't claim to know for sure I just think with the things I've seen it seems entirely possible amd maybe even likely.
I see. They make money. With money that means wage slavery. Therefore corporation thus sellouts. Good post. Better argument. Much enlightened. Money is bad.
Again, something that is being studied, discussed, and proposed for the future.  That does not automatically mean that it's being done now.  I did not say "that would never happen ever," that's a straw man.  Just like a future manned mission to Mars is something that's being seriously discussed, proposed, and researched.  Lots of money spent, patents filed, etc.  Does that mean that we currently have people on Mars?
[deleted]
Damn, how many agendas are they covering with this staged event.
Please don't spread misinformation man, the study you're talking about does not confirm anything.  You very obviously didn't read it, they compared areas with low levels of fluoride to areas with high levels.  What you've left out here is the amount of fluoride in these high areas was 10 TIMES THE AMOUNT found in normal water.  http://www.quackwatch.com/03HealthPromotion/fluoride.html  http://www.livescience.com/37123-fluoridation.html 
Church is open for business again. Why didn't they tear down the church and the shooter's family home like Sandy Hook?
you must be some sort of retard or something. No intelligent white man would ever associate himself with you, so why do you think you can take credit for all white mans greatest achievements solely because you look similar. give me a break you basic piece of shit. its called divide and conquer. the ruling classes don't care about color they care about ruling and an easy way happens to be to get all the plebs/peasants/minorities (you) to hate each other. grow up you pathetic southern racist. All the world leaders are happy to hang with each other regardless of race/religion/ideologies.. they made it to top, definitely worth a drink or two when they get a chance and then its back to the grind of creating fuckbois like you who troll reddit with petty racism that perpetuates hate and nothing else.
Ok, as I said I had just heard it in passing somewhere, but I've found at least one source that seems to back me up that the BRICS was conceived and promoted by Goldman Sachs in this article ["Goldman Sachs Debacle Raises Overdue Questions About BRIC"](http://www.larouchepub.com/other/2010/3717goldmansachs_bric.html):  &gt;Not only did Goldman Sachs operatives create the term BRIC in 2001, but they fostered the establishment of the diplomatic grouping as such, and began to deploy it actively and heavily in direct opposition to Lyndon LaRouche's early 2007 proposal for a Four Power alliance to bring the world out of the economic breakdown crisis, which exploded, as LaRouche forecast it would, in mid-2007.
33 ITM
Of course, they have been for a while. Pressure is mounting now too.
Is anyone restricted from recieving education that supports a free thinking narrative?
I think Murdoch was attracted to vice because it was such an effective propaganda tool.  I don't think one can make the argument that vice was pure until murdoch corrupted it.
Correct but these guys all know better than you, so don't bother with your "facts."  Point is, this dudes right. There's no difference between a speaker and a mic. 
[deleted]
Found the Putinbot.  1. OP frequents russian subreddits and spouts a pro-Russian point of view regarding the whole Ukraine situation.  2. I went to /r/ukraina and it was in Russian. You can't say you want Russia to take over Eastern Ukraine and then claim that Russia isn't doing anything in Ukraine.  3. The context of every single video link provided is unverifiable on account of not having any suitable citations. I have only partially watched some of the videos you provided, and they all seem to be showing either artillery attacks without proper identification of the source of the artillery, surveying of damage whose origin is unverifiable, or unidentified Russianm or Ukrainian people talking to a camera. Show me a video that clearly shows Ukrainian soldiers operating Ukrainian artillery attacking civilian targets that are clearly not a rebel militia or Russian military. Then I'll reconsider.  4. Russia already annexed Crimea on trumped up claims and refused to admit Russian soldiers were involved until months after annexation. There is legitimate concern that Russia is also trumping up claims regarding Eastern Ukraine.  Tell me, in a few years time when either Ukraine's government regains control of the country or Russia has successfully annexed parts of Ukraine, will Putin admit that there were Russian soldiers involved as he did with Crimea?
How?  9/11?
That is the author of "Earth, not a Globe." He did plenty of other experiments to confirm his theories. Reading the book from cover to cover got me interested in asking questions. I think his math is pretty solid. [Here's the text.](http://www.sacred-texts.com/earth/za/index.htm)
[Also remember this other little jewel.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KAVCRVps-zY)
With respect, none of that explains in what way the Rothschilds 'own' or 'control' all of the world's central banks. It starts with the assumption that it is the case, rather than providing any proof of it.
Yet nobody disagrees that airplane exhaust increases cloud cover.  You're all fools if you think air traffic has no effect on weather patterns.
Have you never watched a cartoon?
[nah](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3aob89/swat_yanks_11yo_girl_from_shower_hold_children_at_gunpoint_in_search_of_nonexistent_plant__clearly_its_morally_justified_to_terrorize_an_entire_family_with_small_children_over_a_plant_that_hasnt_killed_anyone/csemvar) 
Link to Clinton blaming free speech?
~~Christians~~ People are the most fake two faced people you will ever meet.  FTFY  Often Christians are just people who are struggling with living within their worldview.  Being a Christian is not an easy thing, especially when there are so many temptations to do what you'd rather do than what Christ would do.  
You're engaging in unsupported speculation, not science.
Yeah; I think this is why the swine flu hit vaccinated people harder than unvaccinated people back in 2010.  One theory is that you get a new novel flu and attempt to fight it with the flu antibodies you have - because it takes time to try them all, the novel flu virus keeps replicating until your body eventually goes "Nope, no match, let me make the right one myself." When you have more resident flu antibodies, takes longer to draw the right sword, the novel flu replicates, and you can experience more severe symptoms.  I still don't understand why L-Lysine isn't prescribed for flu as a matter of course instead. If you kept the dose low enough, you could still finagle it such that the virus could take hold enough so that your body would still fight it, but the viral load would stay lower, allowing for fewer symptoms and an easier battle for the body.
How can you be so dismissive with so little to offer?
I think if you think you are going to get rid of the ability for people to own the modern personal defensive weapon you should put down the crackpipe and worry about the pychotropics.  'Gun-damentalism' goes way beyond the profit margins of some companies - this is life or death shit when they decide to drop the hammer on everyone.
No because you would probably bore me to death....you see we all know the US is just a big bag of shit....fraud like its going out of fashion....money going to the 1% and billions of dollars wasted on...well shit...oh and war they don't ever seem to win.  and they have you guys defending it  so fuck all you say will change anyones mind because everything that comes out of the US is in someone bollocks  so save your breath
"*Local media is already downplaying the injury, referring to a gunshot wound as a cut.*"  .....unreal
Add to that moderate amount of respect for those taxes pay for their employment.... unlike this fucking shitbag of a police officer.
Some 600,000 guns are stolen each year in USA.  Many of the recent mass shooters got guns that were legally owned by someone else in their family.  Gun organizations actively work to keep restrictions on buying and owning as minimal as possible.
[Tom of Finland stamps on sale Monday; Finland's biggest seller ever](http://yle.fi/uutiset/tom_of_finland_stamps_on_sale_monday_finlands_biggest_seller_ever/7459075)
Address poverty and hunger. Violence of all kinds will decrease significantly. Then you can worry about guns.
Randy Page was so dumb he couldn't tell a Muslim from Aa Sikh.
Cho was on Prozac at a point before the shootings and experts suspect he had firearm training as his mortality rate was at 60% with pistols. Also numerous other crazy shit happened at Virginia tech suggesting all kinds of whacky CIA MK ULTRA conspiracies.
https://c4.staticflickr.com/4/3634/3657922652_54553e6b0a_z.jpg
Do you know what we're talking about here?  They're worried about seeing naked statues and paintings that may include a boob/dick.  
California is full of oil fields. Think it's nonsense all you like. The Chinese certainly don't take Japanese threats lightly. Neither did Truman.  You keep telling yourself that. Maybe you should move to Britain.
Yes! I was wondering if I misremembered that. Also Obama's limo had problems in Israel a while back
You know there is a problem when the penalty for having the drug is actually worse than doing the drug.  
So this is basically saying that the US gave the Taliban a bunch of money as an ally in the "war on drugs" (god I hate that term) to help them keep heroin from being produced in Afghanistan, which is inconsistent with the premise that we went into Afghanistan in order to restart opium growing operations there. 
I have the same article as you that (according to you) we don't need to question since it hasn't been revised/retracted. Too bad you debunked your own argument, huh? You'll never get out of this loop 
[deleted]
LOL worst  tourniquet ever, what a fucking joke.
But isn't The Telegraph a UK paper? 
So, just like every other administration with whatever the hot button topic of the day was? I for one am shocked and appalled.
Not even buying this BS
If you had looked at the model in the OP, I'm sure you could answer this question for yourself, but you aren't here to have your questions answered.
so, here is what I never get an answer on out off all the youtube videos about flat earth.  if or when the earth is flat, explain to me, in technical terms:  - satellites and communication/GPS - north/south pole temperature drop (sunlight angle/energy) - coriolis effect in sniper rifles 
Buildings like this one are designed with environmental hazards like tornadoes in mind. Nothing serious would happen if a tornado hit it.
Well for one, people got killed and families are grieving.  
&gt; Nice, inclusive, unbiased debate there.  Translation: All the evidence you do have is fake, and all the evidence I don't have is real.
&gt;Sorry, but you can see the rotational axis.  Yes, all the constellations [rotate around Polaris, the pole star](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=afsb39_6QF0). This is indisputable proof that the ball Earth theory is false.  &gt;I'd be far more interested in flat-earth theory if someone could come up with a gravity theorem that would mathematically explain how a flat disk gives the same gravity at any distance from it's center point.  There is no 'center point' around which gravity needs to revolve. In fact, the capital-T Theory of Gravity is just the pseudo-science attempt to explain how anything would be "stuck" on a ball surface, when that is counter to every single observation of a sphere we can reproduce. We have never been able to reproduce the gravitational attraction of the Theory of Gravity in a laboratory, no matter how many times we put a massive dense object next to a miniscule object.  On the other hand, in every medium, objects that are denser than the medium sink, while objects that are less dense rise. This holds for every medium and explains our physical observations, without any clunky capital-T Theory necessary.
not even a little.  if we rise up they  may not win.. we sit on our hands they win.
This comment pretty much sums it all up.  http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3aggu7/charleston_shooting_hoax_crisis_actors_we_feel/cscpcn1 
So you have absolutely nothing.  Concession accepted.
For me the world we live in is a fusion of Brave New World, 1984, and Walden Two by Skinner. And I have an idea that Walden Two is even more determinant in shaping this present reality. The idea that people can be declared mentally ill because they fail to fit in. Ultimately everything ends up looking like Naked Lunch.
&gt; We should also remember Gravel as being the man who read the Pentagon Papers into the national record as a US Senator...  Respectable indeed, **thanks** for that reminder.   On another note, that Sarah Palin originated from the same state but actually made it thru to the final round of the 2008 presidential election (as the VP running mate of John McCain) is some scary shit (Alaska voted for McCain/Palin with a 21.5% margin of victory). WTF?   
I understand that throwing up a wall and going "I can't hear you" is easy, but you gotta stop that, kid. Evidence is evidence, regardless of whether it "debunks" anything. 
Using basic math that means 0.2% of girls had a serious reaction to the HPV Vaccine.   
[Aaaand they say that a hero could save us!](http://youtu.be/oPr8ZqRHTQo) 
Calling it "authoritarianism" is stupid.  Our entire system is built around "individualism" and "expression" and that's how products are marketed to people.  The WORST thing you can be in America is "racist" or "sexist" or "bigoted" or "homophobic" - you can lose your job for even suggesting such things.  So let's call it what it is - communism, Marxist, leftism.  After all, it was Wall Street that financed the Communist revolution in Russia.
[deleted]
LOL - right, the mainstream media is heavily slanted FOR conservative Christians and AGAINST leftist Jews.  Uh-huh.  In fact, the mainstream media in America is really anti-semitic. In fact, Hollywood is run by ... Arabs! 
A sad and pathetic fruit cake.
So no more 3 little pigs?  Ridiculous.  A Muslim isn't supposed to eat pork, that doesn't mean the sight of a pig is any more offensive than the sight of a lobster or a cat which they aren't supposed to eat either.
I'm old and it has been said about every president.
Anything  above 500gb is bs.... why so much content. 
Yeah, you.
They should be charged with child porn
So parading millions of Russians to their eventual death is better than starting a political discussion at home? And I thought the Russian revolution was considered a great thing within this sub, one of the most liberating moments of the 20th century.   And this has little to do to with Lenin as it does with your interpretation of socialism. Nice way to change the topic though.  
it's not a new video! you' think you're prety slick by posting this video?! in the mean time, some fucktard posts this shit every week thinking he is clever as fuck.  
Class warfare at its finest.
Upset your first post on the topic was thoroughly debunked? 
Do you have a problem with vaccinations? Granted the flu vac is a joke but vaccinations save lives big time
just another day at the office.
The best part is that he said "get with the times" Like people haven't been smoking weed for hundreds of years already and he discovered it or something. 
The church of science has spoken. 
122
&gt; predicted  I don't believe predictions unless it has to do with Game of Thrones. 
[deleted]
ok, but what about the people that were supposed tohave have been killed? 
So, sounds like they took the tornado possibility  into account during construction. 
Don't expect an answer, that dude's only purpose here is to spread disinfo.
Go play games. 
More trees...less assholes
That's a job well done actors, here ya go! 
More trees...less assholes  
[deleted]
&gt; In short, I need to see a new school of math before I can feel good about dismissing my current school of math.  Then the [book](https://archive.org/details/kingsdethronedhi00hickrich) you're looking for is *Kings Dethroned: a history of the evolution of astronomy from the time of the roman empire up to the present day; showing it to be an amazing series of blunders founded upon an error made in the second century B.C.* by Gerard Hickson.
The UN has, unfortunately, long been under Zionist control.
There's a joke about black people working somewhere in there. 
ELI5 for me please.  Psyop?  What Psyop?  I think STG advising against the divide and conquer strategy was a great point.
It's hard to say. I haven't been following this that closely, so I'm not sure what statement you're referring to; do you have a link?  I think parents usually do overestimate the abilities of their children, so she's not exactly an unbiased source. 
A) This place is a Russian Shill Front. They create disadence through lies to make you hate your government. Are there real conspiracy? Yep, alot, and Jeckle island is a big one. But you dumbasses are not seeing forests and trees, just evil joos everywhere.   B) Alex Jones tells you prozac is bad because he needs a paranoid audience, and once you're on prozac, the paranoia ceases. Not because you can't see the trees or the forest. All my accurates came after the pill. you're scared because you'd rather believe someone that wants to profit off you than a person that cares for you. LIgit.   C) Nazis use this place to recruit, and I've even had em confess it more than once.    There's nothing wrong with conspiracy theorizing guys, but this ain't the place. This is a place to be turned into a pos, and if you spend too much time here instead of actually doing things, bitching about evil joos instead of making your neighborhood a better place, you let em all win. The shills, this punk ass sub, and the stupid nazis too.   In under six months, when conspiracy, not just here, but net wide, is banned, as foreign propgranda, it wasn't me, but you assholes, that made it so. Not because you preached the truth. If ya did, ya wound't down vote darkwing duck.    this was a banned statement in /r/conspiarcy because it's true.
&gt; ha, you called me a jew. btw, gaza is just a nazi camp by those that claim to be jewish and arnt'  Cool. And are the Palestinians aware that they are fake Jewish Nazis?
The background is shopped. See lower comments for OG photo.
No idea either, but, either way, what take the time to upload a .ico? Who would be bookmarking his page? All, I'm saying is its meaning has to have a significance. 
O.o why would i kill a person? Am I you now?
What is Fast Track?
&gt;inhaling smoke  Good thing we're not talking about that.  &gt;brain development  Post proof.  &gt;slippery slope  No, not at all, actually.  &gt;carries harmful culture  You really are bigoted and anachronistic.  Old stoner culture wasn't harmful and there is no single codified stoner culture anymore.  &gt;causes schizophrenia  Nope.  Seems like you're being escapist about reality to support your inability or unwillingness to change your neuronal structure.
Yeah, I can see how someone will low tolerance could be buzzed but I wasn't more awake with one of those shots than normal coffee. It took just under a lethal dose of caffeine once, by weird accident, to get me super active.
I doubt he will even have to personally set foot in a courtroom.  He has plenty of lawyers to take care of this.
Could it be because their backs are broken paying for the seed and not being able to reseed with the seed produced by their plants (legally), and having to buy even more seed, which makes their already thin profit margins evaporate that drives them to suicide?
Nothing good will come from sanders or any other puppet. Socialism and socialists are not good for the majority.  I'll just leave this here; http://www.jewishencyclopedia.com/articles/13822-socialism
Impossible. The gun that was used has NO capacity for reloading. It is a single use gun with a single bullet. he was actually carrying upwards of 14 guns. Many of the guns jammed. Think about it people. Just think man. Think. Think more. 
Are *you* honestly arguing that there is NEVER a situation where a police officer has used deadly force unjustly? 
&gt;psilocybin (the active ingredient in shrooms and LSD)  no. psilocybin is a psychedelic chemical in mushrooms. lsd is the active chemical in lsd
Where'd you get that tidbit? That sounds like incredibly stupid advice, because worst case scenario, you're riddled with bullet holes (as well as everyone behind you), and best case scenario, you wind up a cop killer (and then deal with an even bigger shit storm of bullets).
Says Tyler durden. I know people incorrectly call everything ironic these days,  but I think this one actually counts as situational irony.  Thanks for the Kek 
The cop part was bullshit. I'm not a cop.
If he bought us all an ounce it wouldn't make up  for the TPP.
Understanding the structure of the building is *integral* to understanding what happened to WTC7. I'm curious as to why you'd consider that a red herring. 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russian_oligarch  
idk is this a joke? i'd understand the cash part but why the hat?
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YaG5SAw1n0c
The storms were really really bad today, I know that for sure, I was hit a few hours before Illinois.  Trees were down, hurricane force winds, etc.
[deleted]
Hi...I'm here. I'm worried about what the near future holds.
People watch and enjoy this garbage? Yet another overrated Tribe "talent". Once upon a time the tribe had some good comedy and actors, but now?  
How enjoyable are the car bombs over there? 
You must be white, preferably female or a child. 
You thought the terrorists were the muslims and you armed your country to serve and protect you. Too bad. The cops are the real terrorists and now they're unstoppable.
&gt;I'm not sure of violent behaviour, but I do know they increase the risk of suicide.  Some might argue suicide is a pretty violent behavior ..
What happens when/if they pass it? Will people riot and stuff?
[deleted]
Yes, they were eradicated, just like you said. What a joke.
Almost surely because 1) very few people have actually read the bill let alone had access to it and 2) the MSM has been awfully quiet about it.
Interesting! It'll be cool to see how the levels fluctuate (or don't) the longer pot is legal! Im not sure why this is posted in this sub, though, as it seems more up r/science or r/environment's alley. 
How many baby seals did you kill today while worshipping Osama Bin Laden?
Who owns the media is the question you need to find out the answer to and then it all makes sense...
I guess you didn't see that quite a few were innocent unarmed people  but heh that doesn't fit your argument now does it
 
No. I'm not. I know it's hard. One day, you might put it together. 
Is selling municipal water companies the same as giving up control of your water? Because that is a terrifying thing to read.
Yes
yeah that was a joke.
'Mother jones'....get the fuck outta here with that shit.   How about I start posting some links to NRA sites to bolster my pro-gun arguments?  How would you like that shit, huh?
care to say which mod?
So you accept my explanation, then. Glad I can spread some knowledge where it's needed! :)
Greece...GET THE FUCK OUT whilst you can  we will ALL think highly of your for doing it...and just hope to God we follow....  fuck the EU
Ever been held up at gun point?
Brilliant, I too make sure to check out every single spy related book from all of my local libraries. The late return fees may be steep, but my kids weren't gunna have the grades for college and the NWO will probably have made their move by then anyways.
We all know it's the Ron Paul strategy but this time it's not to late to stop it. As well, Ron Paul was a Republican and Bernie Sanders is an independent. A much purer underdog to back with everything you've got!
long story short, the loonies at SRS and SRD hate the fact that fat person hate users migrated to voat.  So first they contacted voat's host and got them to cancel their hosting.  Luckily Voat already migrated to a new service that day.  Now they're taking offense at a jailbait sub there, so they contacted paypal to get them to disallow voat transactions.  Meanwhile Reddit is chockful of racism/borderline jailboat porn/death/drug use etc and they don't seem to have the same level of hatred for it.  edit:  I forgot to mention the "coincidental" DDOS attack on Voat right at the same time the host dropped their contract.
&gt; some little nigger in Clifton shouldn't be able to get his hands on a gun as easily as he did to be able to rob us  Exercise your rights and carry a gun...stop being a victim.  
Jesus Christ
At least ron paul wasn't a rabid statist.
Yes, you can divide bitcoins to 8 decimal places.  Personally, I buy a bit-nickel (0.05 bitcoins or 50,000 bits) every day.  Wow.  A nickel a day.  I feel like my grandpa.
No i wouldnt advocate for that.
Looks like something Comcast would do
It's rare these days that they admit vaccines are the cause of **SIDS / Crib Death / Cot Death**, great to see some honesty this time  "The study has a number of disturbing implications. First, it is known that vaccination timing can profoundly affect both the risk of adverse effects and its claimed effectiveness. Generally, the earlier that vaccines are administered, and the shorter the interval between them, the more likely they will cause harm, including **sudden infant death**"
[deleted]
The interstate around the nuclear plant,  I-55 is shut down,  supposedly for down power lines  http://patch.com/illinois/crystallake/severe-weather-headed-chicago-area
&gt; to study how people react to this exercise taking place in their home towns   Definitely, it's to test the waters. They want to analyse how ordinary citizens respond to heavy military presence, get them used to it. 
Yikes! Somebody get this person some compassion quickly, before they fuck up their child's head with nonsense associations of emotional intelligence with physical weakness.  May your son be a better person than you are.  
What i found interesting is that few are really buying the independent propaganda piece. I just finished viewing the comment section and it seems people are waking up and aren't buying the USA sabre rattling. Sadly it will likely be to late and of little significance. The ball is rolling. What i find interesting is that despite viewer comments the independent keeps posting articles like this, its certainly not balanced journalism. I wonder why?
Of course you don't, because like with this you believe a bunch of made up bullshit.
It's a huge mess. US should just pull out and let them have their own countries back. Stop spending billions on this crap. 
the same people that downvote hurt feelings and morbid obesity.
American aggression? You mean American freedom fighters ::) 
Well I'm not a kid and I wasn't stupid enough to have any. I work two minimum wage jobs and came from a dirt poor family. I can barely make ends meet and now my taxes are being seized because I refuse to get Obama care. Any form of existence besides this is a party. Even if it's just for one night. 
Oh, you mean the "racist newsletters" from the 70s. Yeah I remember that. They really did a number on him.
No. Also, these videos are a joke. Half the people  here believe the most bullshit thing because it goes with their agenda, "hoax" "false flag." Hmm what does that sound like, sounds familiar, oh I know the same thing that they "battle" everyday: the sheeple who just go along with MSM. This sub has dropped to all new low and is so hypocritical.
Which is why the growing popularity of web-based news sources is one of the most important things emerging from the internet today (IMHO).  Look at Cenk Uygur from The Young Turks.  I'm paraphrasing from what he said on the Joe Rogan Podcast, but basically he tried to keep his journalistic integrity while working for MSNBC and his boss told him to conform to the network bias or get out, even though the ratings for his 6 o'clock news segment were through the roof.  I know that Joe Rogan might not appeal to everyone here, but check out Cenk's segment.  It's a free download from Joe Rogans website and it's pretty fascinating to hear about what Cenk went through while starting out as a journalist who didn't want to contribute to the degradation of the mainstream news.     For anyone who doesn't know, the Young Turks is a news podcast that is comprised of a panel of intelligent people who talk about news stories.  They swear, they joke, and they talk about news like regular people.  I'm not trying to be a shill, I've just found them to be a breath of fresh air when compared to the stodgy traditional news format on television.  
Of all the reasons to stop the TPP, you Americans keeping your AKs with a banana clip IS NOT one of them!
I am directly directly very close to one of the outbreaks. The community did not vaccinated their children.  Which one is 'that' outbreak? There have been a few.
So you're saying our civilian guns WOULDN'T have stopped them.
Some of your links are holocaust denial links, which is a bit wrong.  However, keep in mind that we have no idea where Putin got his money from, and we don't even know who his parents were (journalists who ask too many questions end up dead).    
&gt; they fought for us so we wouldn't have to.   Based on what?  &gt;Corporate greed and how our government manipulates has nothing to do with our troops who put their life on the line so we can at least have a country to call home.  1) The US doesn't need soldiers to go overseas to have their nation at home.  2) Corporatations and their pet governments are the reason why your soldiers go overseas. There are oilfields, drugs and refineries and governments that they want to secure and monopolize. Everytime the US goes to war the corporations and politicians make money.  They are sacrificing us for their political and financial gain.  Anyone who can't wrap their head around this fact should die. And I have no sympathy for them because they go to war and kill innocent people to help the banks and the greedy politicians.  3) Supporting your troops who murder is the same as being an accessory.  4) The troops are mostly uneducated, poor and easily controlled people who are desperate for a job and a future. They can not make one on their own without the help of tax dollars used for murder. I have no respect for anyone who joins a large military of this kind. If you want some respect, form a military to fight the government at home that would allow corporations to use people like this. Otherwise, keep your slogans and your bullshit to yourself.  American soldiers do not fight for American freedom. They fight for corporate freedom. The United States is not a free country and hasn't been for a long time. And each year it gets less free. There are more control factors put in place to limit Americans and to spy on Americans and to kill Americans. Where does the freedom come in?  Enjoy the mass immigration and the removal of rights and liberties while claiming to be fighting for freedom. American neighborhoods are turning to garbage. American jobs are going to imported labor and American lives are going to keep the status quo alive.
Why does congress/the president think TPP is a good idea and/or necessary?
Lots of people on here could do with learning about the masons, too many believe the myth that they are a direct Templar descendant
WTF
Absolutely wrong. The treaty will not be law unless the Senate votes for it. Which they undoubtedly will, but lets not pretend fast track is something it isn't. 
I see. Not completely isolated just yet. That's nice to know.
I meant amended, my bad. 
Stormfront?
The 1st study you posted you labeled 'Vaccinated children are less sick than other children', yet this was clearly an attempt to deceive us as the study concludes the following **"The prevalence of allergic diseases and non-specific infections in children and adolescents was not found to depend on vaccination status."**  The 2nd study you labeled as "unvaccinated children is more likely go get seriously ill" is actually a study comparing health care utilization rates between **undervaccinated** and age-appropriately vaccinated children, they found that **undervaccinated** were less likely to visit the emergency department.  The problem with your seat-belt analogy is that the seat-belt actually has a lot more benefit than risks and is based on solid science, whereas vaccines are not, the safety tests are of poor quality and short, it is junk science.  Vaccines bring the risk of lifelong autoimmune disease, leaving the recipient dependent on drugs for life, this makes the pharmaceuticals a lot of money, that is the reason for the push for vaccination.  Unfortunately the risks of vaccination far outweigh any theoretical benefit.  http://journals.plos.org/plosone/article?id=10.1371/journal.pone.0008382  "Systemic autoimmunity appears to be the inevitable consequence of over-stimulating the host's immune ‘system’ by repeated immunization with antigen, to the levels that surpass system's self-organized criticality."
&gt; No matter whitch side of the story you are looking at,  you know that mankind has pumped up tons of oil and burned it, releasing CO2 into the atmosphere.  You can't deny that basic fact.  Then you can use science to deduce that, yeah, we're making the earth warmer, because, duh. 
&gt; no restrictions other than the recipient must be in the USA.  Great. Just made a few billion people not able to use it. So I'd say it's a huge restriction.
"Force Protection Bravo" has apparently replaced one of the previous colorful warnings used by DHS. http://www.nydailynews.com/news/national/homeland-security-ditch-color-code-terrorism-alert-system-ending-years-mockery-article-1.451497
It literally says updated May 22, 2015
Again, you are totally wrong an you can see the primary sources on this, the only people who don't believe the civil war was fought for slavery are racist revisionists. [Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3auug5/for_idiots_who_are_falling_into_the_remove_the/csggzbt) is my comment I just made addressing this very issue.  
Thank you, the swastika is the example I always use when trying to explain my thoughts on the issue.
That's when the conditioning kicks in,denial and ridicule at the drop of a familiar phrase, word or name. 
There's a whole porn industry crafted around "jailbait" that's 18+ years old.  it's one of the most popular search terms in the world.  So no, most normal people aren't offended by something that's legal.  
Anything that separates the people from the masters
there are only 1% of people who like TPP
/v/TrueJailbait, /v/Jailbait, /v/TheFappening and /v/doxbin have been banned    https://www.voat.co/v/AskVoat/comments/163353 
http://metabunk.org/threads/debunked-chemtrail-plane-interior-ballast-barrels.661/
&gt;Look at the similarities between the rise of the Third Reich and the current neoconservative path the country has taken  Can you elaborate on this point?  We have similar cultures and Germans make up the largest ethnic group in the country.  I don't reject the notion that some of our customs are the same, but I also don't think it's fair to compare even Cheney and Rumsfeld with anyone that was in the Nazi Party.  I absolutely 100% do not mean this in a condescending way, but look into the policies towards political opposition for the Third Reich.  You'll find that there is nothing similar to them in the United States.  Dissent was absolutely not tolerated; you were killed for "protesting" or inciting against the regime.  Opposing political parties were completely banned.  There was no independent media.  America is an incredibly free nation, and you can ask any immigrant what they think of America, and it will almost always be outstandingly positive.  I'm not convinced that the NSA is using, or is planning to use, bulk-collection to target political opposition.  I have seen no evidence, at least none of what Ed Snowden released, suggesting that they are doing anything except for targeting those who might be prone to commit political violence.  I see the "slippy slope" argument, but I don't give it much credibility.  I have yet to hear of a case of someone being knock and talked for doing absolutely nothing questionable.    We have an assertive foreign policy, which is a result of our post-war status as the beacon of the western world.  We were charged with defending our way of life from the communists, and that required us becoming more militant.  Here's my thing.  I am well aware of the extent of our use of coercion and subversion to advance our goals, but that is only one small part of our geopolitical strategy.  The most important part of America's soft power is not the CIA and its occasional coups, but our diplomatic and economic clout.  We have created a rules-based international system of trade and diplomacy that has made the world incredibly peaceful and prosperous.  Mistakes happen, like Iraq, but the trend is clear.  The American-way works and we should remain assertive.  
How old are you?
The level of stupidity on this forum is almost unbelievable 
MSM will have brief segments flaunting the millions of jobs and competitive advantages the TPP will bring. Aaaand back to this Walmart where there are still some rebel flags for sale...
I don't know if any one organization or government agency is in control - and that seems like a big issue. Most states that conduct cloud seeding/geoengineering programs appear to self-manage according to the docs available on their web sites. Seems dangerous to me, because these operations can't be contained such that they only affect a single state and it doesn't appear that there's any overarching control/testing/vetting.
&gt; He's a hard assed business man pretending to do a humanitarians job.  ....while simultaneously pointing out every possible government involved in his "Globalist conspiracy" EXCEPT one.... Israel.  That slimey fuck goes out of his way to omit Israel, and Zionism from every show he produces.
Nope, working here.  I've had trouble loading zerohedge before, a lot of websites experience glitches and problems from time to time.
The MSM stays nearly silent... link to CNN.com.
It's not just that, they shit on voat no matter what. With the kind of logic they have we'd have to shut down the internet, ban cameras and ban children.  Voat can be clean of illegal stuff and still have no censoring. If it breaks the law it has to go, no one in their right mind defends actual illegal stuff. Not on reddit, not voat.
You know nothing about me. Don't throw insults around just because someone believes different than you. That's something children do. It doesn't promote discussion, and is frowned upon here.  Sure, they lived under the American flag when it was one country. Obviously. But what flag did slaves live under during the Civil War? What flag represented the white men who wanted to continue their tradition and culture of slavery? What flag represented the side that wanted to countinue slavery and spread it out west?   What flag represented the side that wanted to end slavery? What flag represented the side that thousands of former slaves volunteered to fight for in order to end the lifetimes of suffering that they had endured?  What do you believe the Confederate flag represents? I'm not talking about Kurds. I'm not talking about people from Tibet.
You are a paid shill for evil thinking. If you walked down the street spouting your hatred and ignorance, you'd be punched in the nose too many times to count. 
Another answer would be divesting funds from weapons and aggressive policy around the globe and investment into desalination plants.   At this point in our technology advancement there's no reason not to have giant floating evaporation collection units in the ocean.   Shit they could pump sea water into shallow large diameter collection tanks in the dessert and use the sun to reduce the energy needed for steam creation to desalinate on a large scale.   But nukes and Nestlé take precedence over humanity...
Me- Lebron, focusing on one thing and dominating  You- [The stupid ball who can't understand that someone would disagree with them, and then completely shit on their argument with facts](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8q163_sUnWQ)
[deleted]
How sad.
No borders! No races! No countries! No religions!  Just #GlobalCitizens United Under One Flag, One Party, One Corporation, One Market!  Individual consumers with no identity other than the consumer lifestyles we sell them!
Jesus.  I think you might be on to something.
What was the point of this shitpost?
If you want insider info into freemasonry check out the writings of Albert Pike.   He was the most highly decorated free mason involved in the craft.   He didn't leave freemasonry and then started writing  about their secrets, no, he wrote about freemasonry while he was still a mason.   He was a confederate general and he has his own statue in D.C.   His writings left nothing out. You wanna read about what goes on,  read from him. 
The judge left because there was a whack-job spouting nonsense drivel he found online. In an effort to keep the court civil she excused herself, otherwise the plaintiff would have found himself in handcuffs very quickly because he wasn't following the magistrate's directives and was in contempt of court. What she did was a sane person's reaction to a misguided person's ranting. What do you do if someone runs into your place of work and just starts shouting nonsense and claiming to know more about your trade than you do,  while reciting some dreck he dredged up from the internet. You don't engage them, you end it quietly. Do you have the case number or anything substantial to follow up on the outcome of the case in that video? Because my guess is that the case wasn't dismissed, but simply reconvened. His defense wouldn't pan out because it doesn't hold any legal water. I'd like some proof that this guy won based on this defense, because otherwise its just simply a Judge upholding the civility of the court room and not throwing a guy in jail for contempt of court.
Hate to jump on the "you're wrong" train, but I've gotten to play victim to our "police" and they'll display more aggression than that over minor traffic stops. They definitely come across as extremely calm given the situation at hand.
Yeah. The Internet is an awfully suspicious place these days. On a side note, I owe "you guys" a big thank you. I was semi-aware of how horrendous TBTB are before all the Snowden business, but I'd learned at an early age that my opinions were "unamerican." For years I kept it all to myself, especially once I realized they were absolutely storing the things I say for later use. Reading the things I've read lately have made me decide that I don't want to sit down and shut up. They've already got enough of a profile on me to take me out when they do their round up. So fuck them. I'll speak out against them until I'm blue in the face. I'll be seeing you in the gas chambers, bro-heim. Long live freedom.
You obviously know or found out what it is to advocate for someone, I'm assuming and you don't want to say what you found. American legal system in admiralty law uses this term all the time and it means exactly what it says in those two different languages meant to obfuscate the meaning for lesser or unwise citizens. Before you go flapping your yapper about we are all equal. Please don't insult our intelligence, or shit out more fallacies I have never been to above top secret other than once it was about a thread proving the entire site to be disinformation. Before I bust your chops about the original 13th amendment and why and who it targeted specifically, we were given status of enemy by the leiber code article 1 you don't have rights you have privileges and they can yoink them anytime. So if they have a duty to the court we are obviously after that as a client because we are the enemy denoted by the gold fringe around the flag in the oval office declaring the CEO is at war even in piece time. They are also that way in every court room. Have you ever read this? Does it sound like they believe that they work for us, that is a joke.  http://avalon.law.yale.edu/19th_century/lieber.asp#sec1
In the off chance you're being serious.  [Trans Pacific Partnership](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Trans-Pacific_Partnership)
I've never seen a pro-TTP article. It's like there's nothing pro to say unless you're a rich capitalist who wants to finish destroying the US and destroy any public health organisations in other countries as an afterthought.
I don't have any anecdotal proof of my own, but [this talk](https://youtu.be/DAw_Zzge49c) definitely falls within your line of reasoning. Certain fungi seem to help organisms that are affected by aluminum and other metal poisoning; in this case, the bees experienced returned cognitive functioning. I would not be surprised to see this being an important link for disease research in the future.
I don't think I've ever seen the FP of /r/news without at least one story which could be considered political.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Advance Publications, owner of Reddit.com -  &gt;Advance Publications, Inc., is an American media company owned by the descendants of S.I. Newhouse Sr., Donald Newhouse and S.I. Newhouse, Jr.  As of October 2014, **it was ranked as the 44th largest private company in the United States according to Forbes.**   &gt;Samuel Irving "Si" Newhouse, Jr. (born November 8, 1927), is an American heir, business magnate and philanthropist. Together with his brother Donald, he owns Advance Publications, founded by their late father in 1922. **He has an estimated net worth of $9.5 billion, and he was ranked the 46th richest American by Forbes magazine in 2014.**  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Advance_Publications#Reddit  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Samuel_Irving_Newhouse_Jr.  Maybe we need to get "Si" Newhouse Jr. to do an AMA?      
And gives away our right to regulate corporations in pretty much any way if the legislation impacts their profits. It effectively gives corporations sovereignty over governments.    Is this good for democracy?  
My own hypothesis is that before there was farming there was hunting and gathering. You could either eat animals that you had to catch,  fight and kill or you could eat less tasty but less violent things  that you might find growing out of the ground. The thing that might have been the tastiest choice might be mushrooms and there is some evidence that they were regularly eaten and that was done for many millennia.   Today the progeny of that time may actually be missing them somewhat  in our diets.  According to the Wikipedia page on the Lions Mane mushroom such studies as you mention are already under way but the big pharma companies will oppose any  positive result because most anyone can grow these mushrooms for themselves which will disallow any huge profit margin for the corporate greed sector.
A sad day for this country?
Lucas wrote the first draft of Star Wars before the Fall of Saigon as an anti-Vietnam War movie. The tiny "Journal of the Whills" preface to the Star Wars novelization (also supposedly written in 1973) http://www.killermovies.com/forums/archive/index.php/t-305625-the-journal-of-the-whills.html is evidence he had planned from that early date for the prequels to be about corruption of government. We can speculate that in addition to the Vietnam War that he drew inspiration from the JFK assassination, LBJ, and Nixon.  For those of us who were awake in 2002, Episode II was a refreshing expose on the Hegelian Dialectic, having been released just 8 months after 9/11. This was too soon for Lucas to have written it with 9/11 in mind; rather, he simply understood from his 1960s/1970s life experiences how government worked. When Episode III came out in 2005, even the mass media could not ignore the small bit of wakefulness in the public regarding the folly of the Iraq War and quoted people saying, "Hey, this movie is about Bush and the Iraq War, isn't it?" No, it wasn't. It was about the Vietnam War, a war with many similarities to the Iraq War. George Lucas couldn't help that he had pegged government and that government repeats its tricks.
It's for your freedom! 
You're an idiot. The sentiment is extreme, not the method. 
That's ALL the news stations are talking about, every single damn day on my way to and from work.  Confederate flag blah...meanwhile the TPP is going through without a hitch.
He has many names.
When potatoes are grown in clean gardening soil, even in a pot, and not even with any sort of fertilizer, I can eat them just fine.  Even a little bit of potato from a grocery store and my guts are miserable for days.  I can't tolerate even a little bit of wheat nor any byproduct of wheat, nor anything from the entire wheat family.  Same with soy.  And eggs, which has also extended now in recent years to chicken as well.  Why?  Their feed, probably.  Lastly, citric acid.  I'm fixing that though.  It is on the mend, but it's a long, hard road.  Those were all diagnosed in the early 70s and despite desensitization treatments, it came back with a vengeance in the late 90s.  I've had to take matters into my own hands just to survive.  Doctors and researchers have only made it worse.  Look to fixing our plants and our guts will be able to heal themselves.  What's wrong is the way we grow food and the ways and reasons we eat food.  No, we're not all meant to eat the same foods but none of what we eat needs to be so polluted as it is now.  We shouldn't have to add all those vitamins to the food.  The foods need to sustain our intestinal microbiomes and those bacteria should produce the bulk of our vitamin needs.
How so? Enlighten me.  Oh wait, I know what you're going to say. "You should do your own investigation, the proof is all around you, blah blah blah." You're full of shit.
 
LMAO could be, D Rommz was just ashamed that they wouldn't let him in the club.  So at the mention of lizard people he has to brag about about the time he got a lizard man to pay for his lunch.
As The Who said in " Won't Get Fooled Again"....... Meet the new boss, same as the old boss
Note: this answer is for the audience, to prove that I can answer the question. I'm terminating our conversation yet again /u/KingKha, you are rude and clearly not interested in anything other than attacking me.  The Michelson Morley experiment compared the speed of light in different directions, *in an attempt to detect and thus prove the relative motion of the Earth*. The heliocentrists claim that the experiment 'failed' because it did not detect an 'ether': the intentions of the experimenters don't matter, it's their results that count, and the results showed that the Earth was just as stationary as it felt.  Foucalt pendulums do not uniformly swing in any one direction; they can be found spinning in every direction, often in the exact opposite direction of any supposed rotation of the Earth. Foucalt pendulums belong in the same category of evidence as "water swirling in my toilet bowl".
That works as well. Most of the libraries where I live  grant access to anyone who walks through the door. So can't count them out completely
Whats TPP?  The pirate party?  Sorry not from USA. 
I really doubt they're this forward thinking. The fact that they're chasing the last drops of a dwindling, dirty resource shows exactly how forward thinking they *aren't*. What you propose is merely an unintentional bonus.   There absolutely are greedy as fuck schemers, and companies going after water, but fracking is just blind greed without any concern beyond getting a little more petro$ right now.
So pretty much the SPLC wet dream.
That's standard though, most countries are part of various treaties that affects governance within borders. The EU, the UN, the WTO are all built on treaties that affect member countries' governance, not to mention the dozens of trade treaties most countries are in that standardize various industry regulations.   If a country feels like the negatives outweigh the positives they can leave the treaty and have thier independence back. 
You defended his comment, you just admitted to it. This is classic double talk. Why would you defend a comment calling srs "disgusting human beings", then turn around and say "still not a reason to shit on a while website and user base ".   It's clearly hypocritical. 
I appreciate the effort. Maybe next time. https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Number_of_the_Beast
This is correct.  The one piece of physical evidence, the Merneptah Stele, was found in Thebes (which is in Egypt, not Palestine) and you can't base the historicity of an entire place on that one dubious piece of evidence.  At least not if you're being honest with yourself when you consider that Palestine has been one of the most heavily excavated sites on the planet for thousands of years.
God. 
&gt; India will just say "fuck off"  If that's what they're *going to say* then why didn't they already say it when the TPP was proposed? This shit is going to move full steam ahead until we hit the brick wall.
You'd have to go to India to see the giant pharmacy markets. Blocks and blocks of open markets for anyone to buy anything. Its a sprawling industry there and things will just move into black market allies and darknet decentralized internet markets.  Those TPP lawsuits and trade threats will create a massive unstoppable black market and adaptation of epic proportion, not to mention probably the last straw for some sort of uprising
Shh... Don't bother with the shills / science cultists. They get paid / get a geek boner per 200 words typed.   He's harping on about methyl &amp; ethyl (the drunken twins) and that mercury is only dangerous when he's banging methyl.  I bet you he thinks aspartame is lame and not to worry about despite it breaking down into bitchy ol' methyl and then bioaccumulating in the body.  Oh and let's not attempt to cover the topic of the under developed blood brain barrier in infants. Good ol' mercury would never jump across that now would he... wink wink ;-)
Check the sidebar of r/news. They don't allow politics and they don't allow reporting on the same story over and over again.
I'm not quite sure what your argument is. 
Lets.
that is a hell of a plan that allowed us to surround them with military bases and most likely have Kinetic weapons in space and a missile defense system  a larger navy and so on.    Oh and here is the Big one.. we got to practice war with drones as they turtled.   
Well, Ceres is part of the exploded planet. Maybe it's a monument/memorial? 
R/economics has a lot of discussion on it. And it shows up fairly often on r/polItics as well. And technology if it deals with ips, etc..
[deleted]
LMFAO!!!!!!!!! Man that is so funny. 
&gt; with lowest violent crime rate.  Not according to the FBI.  https://www.fbi.gov/about-us/cjis/ucr/crime-in-the-u.s/2013/crime-in-the-u.s.-2013/tables/table-43
I found a link to some of the chemicals used too:  http://ayearinreviewwithsydney.weebly.com/uploads/2/3/8/0/23800864/7063569_orig.jpg  (The periodic table)  How they are combined is a trade secret.
he might as well have said STOP TALKING ABOUT ME ON /r/conspiracy! I COMMAND YOU!
And let's be real, those people wouldn't care anyway. The broad majority of users are here for the cat pics, not actual news.  Hell, the people who want news don't even come here.
The truth is that I don't really know. My guess is that overseas outsourcing won't stop regardless, but the tpp just makes it easier to outsource.
If one of the most outspoken people in support of cop cams and decreased police violence had just been assassinated then I might be suspiciou.... oh, wait!
&gt; You realize this sub encompasses conspiracies and all of the events and repercussions surrounding them? What kind of dick goes around posting these comments in so many threads  this..
The Reddit search engine is always bad, and people call it the "Trans Pacific Partnership", not in one post have I seen it called TPP Now I'll probably get downvoted for no reason by people who misinterpret my comment, I'm just saying search Trans Pacific Partnership and you'd probably get more answers.
Agreed. Plan for the worst, and hope for the best. 
I am tired of the nonsense what you are asking are things that are nescient which means no matter how learned you are the information is impossible. This is a sign of our opponents, you guys throw the same pitch every time. If you don't want to know the truth about where you live because I'm an asshole then I could care less if you join truth or not.  As far as I know I helped build this place with the plan to incarnate here. We all get our minds erased before entering this realm.  Is there a dome? It sure looks like it at night
So this is what this subreddit is turning into
Well unfortunately I don't have the answer. That's why I asked.
Sorry just didn't get what you meant.   Yeah. The west didn't get complacent and why would they? France didn't get complacent after WW1 with Germany
Again, I ask, how am I the stupid one when you are admittedly on the cognitive level of a lemming?
That's filtered to hide the truth. You're masking the overwhelming amount of discussion happening all over Reddit by limiting the search to /r/news, which for years has explicitly had a policy against political news.  The dishonesty is staggering.
That sub is so closed minded. An echo chamber of orthodoxy.
[deleted]
Which "exploded planet" are you referring to?
Because they require sources and not speculation?
You both sound like complete nimrods that stand in front of gas stations preaching at passerbys. 
I just check the voat.co homepage as I haven't been using it as much as I'd hoped because of the DDoS but it is filled with TPP. Can we try to promote more users on Reddit to migrate there?
Guess you missed this bud: http://i.imgur.com/qkvsvOJ.jpg
Did the site name not give you any clue? http://thesauce.co/   How about the Front Page articles? One of them is entitled "Abbott hopes to become next Royal baby".
Yes, lets all riot because reddit is restricting content.  It might happen in Vancouver I guess.
And that is why those that advocate it (Gandhi, MLK, Bob Marley, Lennon) are the ones swiftly dealt with. 
This really worries me. No matter what people may think about reddit censorship, it's obvious that posts and comments relating to this subject aren't getting the attention it should be getting. Maybe most people don't care about their Democratic rights being eroded slowly by our nations' governments and the companies and people that control them. There are similar agreements being put in place around the world which will basically give multinational corporations more power than sovereign states and their governments, and hardly anyone knows or cares about it. IMHO, the world is fucked because the majority of people are fucking clueless to what's going on around them, and those that understand have very little power to stop it. Anarchy anyone? 
Here in England kids have to now say "Rainbow Sheep" instead of "Black Sheep" .. it's ridiculous. 
That's really too bad, the idea of it sounds really cool.
It needed 60 to pass...
Well he admitted to killing like 6 people.  What more proof do you want?
I feel like this quote describes the "everything is a hoax" phenomenon perfectly.
Yes, never and yes.
they came for fat people haters and i did nothing because i didnt hate fat people... 
He's a shill. He even posted this thread not too long ago claiming that there was a conspiracy to down vote dylan roof photos:   http://www.np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3aipko/this_is_being_deleted_from_everywhere_downvote/  So either there can only be a conspiracy when it fits his political agenda, or the guy posted that thread to give the appearance of being open to the idea that votes are being manipulated on reddit to build a persona. 
Guess what?   If I had some fucking money you might could sell me something!
[Try again](http://www.sott.net/image/s11/227016/full/Abu_Bakr_al_Baghdadi_John.jpg)
Note the pattern in the seismogram has changed since last week.  Here's ZetaTalk warning:  &gt; &amp;nbsp; The US government is already alarmed at the many signs that the New Madrid adjustment, long predicted by ourselves, is about to begin...  &gt; &amp;nbsp; If operation [Jade Helm](http://zetatalk.com/ning/04ap2015.htm) is preparations for an illegal immigrant hoard in the event of Earth changes such as a sinking Caribbean Plate, how do the Wal-Mart closures relate? Wal-Mart is suddenly and oddly closing stores across many of the same states where operation Jade Helm will operate – California, Texas, and Florida.  Operation Jade Helm will be in operation across the southwest, and has recently expanded to include the Gulf states.  The nexus seems obvious to conspiracy theorists, who imagine that martial law and the imprisonment of citizens is being planned.  &gt; &amp;nbsp; **The Wal-Mart stores are being closed to be fitted as temporary FEMA centers in the event of a New Madrid disaster. The New Madrid adjustments would occur first, per our predictions, along the soft rock from Memphis to the Gulf, and thus Texas and Oklahoma are seen as safe refugee camps for that area. We, the Zetas have also predicted that a West Coast adjustment will follows the New Madrid adjustments, and California would logically be the first to adjust along the San Andreas. The US government has been monitoring the rock tension and earthquake patterns, though they do not share this with their public.**  &gt; &amp;nbsp; Is there some reason that Jade Helm and the Wal-Mart retrofit overlap each other? Indeed there is, in that the 7 of 10 plate movements anticipated to adjust the New Madrid will not occur unless the 7 of 10 plate movements causing the Caribbean to sink also occur. In fact, per the schedule we have provided, the Caribbean disasters would occur before the New Madrid disasters, triggering the New Madrid disasters by a movement to the west by Mexico. These disasters overlap, and thus Wal-Mart is being asked by FEMA to expedite their readiness at this time.    &gt; -- [ZetaTalk Chat Q&amp;A for April 18, 2015](http://zetatalk.com/ning/18ap2015.htm)  (You are seeing ZetaTalk's warnings coming to fruition...)
Jokes on you, they may be the only places left without facial recognition CCTV. Your streets are full
Damn, you're in every 9/11 thread, huh? :D
"Waek up, whaite peepul."
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&amp;apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
Top of the car, brother. But I give you props for even knowing the show if you're across the big water.lol
I hear Rome had a decent army too. 
Because politics I'd a minor fringe sub. Right. This is why this  Subreddit is a fucking joke. 
Humanity lost its moral compass a long time ago. You might as well just go back to sleep and pretend it was all just a bad dream, because there really isn't anything we can do to stop this speeding kamikaze train we're on collectively.   Don't alienate your friends and don't try to convince them of anything, because all you'll get is more resistance. People are hooked on the system and they will fight you to defend it, to safeguard their illusions and vain hopes or dreams. Let them hit the wall by themselves. If they ask for advice or help just do or say what feels right to you and nothing more. Don't go out of your way to do anything unless you really want to. If you were in fact right, good folks will appreciate you for it, bad ones 'll hate it. Don't tell 'em: "See I was right, wasn't I?" They'll never admit to it, because that exposes them and induces feelings of shame or doubt from which we all flee.  Be your own best friend to be a better friend to them. When all is said and done, you're the only one who has to live with the choices you made, the only one you owe anything.   The rest is all horseshit. It's all irrelevant. 
What Zionism have to do with any of this? Cecil Rhodes was not a jew.
[deleted]
Reported.   You originally insinuated I'm a shill because I didn't believe Roof had his patches photoshopped, and now again because I said quality content is necessary for this sub to succeed. Someone disagreeing with you doesn't make them a shill. Quit being so childish.   You see that second picture of Roof with the same patches on his jacket, btw? 
&gt; If they don't like it they can go cry in their mansions.  yeah, that, or send their police to get you so you can go cry in your jail cell while wailing about yer freedums and getting maced or tazed for your trouble by your fellow murcans
I'm looking on youtube, on my fb, everywhere for news about this but it's radio silence. It's crazy. "Not with a bang, but a whisper"  Incredibly sad day. You can't even really frame it, because we don't feel the effects of this yet. But we will. They are not trying to set up these systems for nothing. We have to resist all this, and dismantle the systems that allowed this kind of thing to be brought into existence. It's obscene to the human spirit. 
Not by choice. 
It was an open container.  There was plenty of oxygen available.
This is 100% correct.  We've been made to forget it.  Heck, many of us have been made to never know it even existed in the first place.
What was it fought over?
After the 28th, how will you feel? 
A little active military exercise in the southern US states seems to be geared towards dealing with exactly that: non-compliance of citizens. 
The way they try to dismiss anything she says by claiming she's a "shill" is so sad..
flush all the drugs.
&gt; Matter of fact, fuck the minimum wage, just give people free money, and lots of it  You might be making a joke, but there are a lot of people around reddit who think this is an awesome idea. Just do a search on "universal basic income" and you'll see what I mean.  I still haven't made up my mind about this one. If I was in charge, I'd do a pilot project somewhere and see how things worked out before I did anything else.
the exhibitionist eh.
&gt; You are the one claiming the source is lying. The burden is yours.    Actually you are the one claiming the source is lying. Literally the other way around. The source is the article. Did you really just refute yourself again? Is that four times now? Thanks for admitting the burden lies with you. Go ask Hoffmann for the quote/why he lied. I'll wait. Thanks again, kid.  
And......  Zeroed out instantly. 
Yup, if by some miracle the public at large get wind of it and (by some larger miracle) actually react against it, then they have the Jade Helm "exercise" to impose martial law and round up dissidents/intimidate.   Brilliantly planned, honestly. 
Creepy how the link looks like it says "wild us of a"
What basics?  Holy shit.  I'm laughing incredulously over here.
I'm a real person and I'm tired of seeing posts like this. If you're a real person who knows about a conspiracy or two, I'm sure you know exactly what it feels like to be condemned and dismissed by people who refuse to even look at what has changed your outlook so drastically.
attempt at deflection, huh?   FAIL.
You said it has happened 500 times. Can you provide one example demonstrating reddit is a state actor working in congruence with state aspirations? Only one condition: it has to *actually prove* your claim. Hand waving and bullshit will not count.   If there are five hundred examples, I'm sure this will be easy hot you. 
&gt;Families, First Responders, Survivors Speak Out     &gt;We, the undersigned Families, First Responders and Survivors of September 11 raise our voice with those from across our country and around the world in support of NYC CAN and the establishment of an independent, impartial subpoena powered investigation into the events surrounding the September 11 attacks on our nation.    &gt;**We believe a new investigation is our only path forward to the answers and accountability every American deserves and our only path back to the moral high ground upon which our great nation was built.**     &gt;We unite with NYC CAN and the citizens of the City of New York in support of an unbiased nonpolitical rendering of evidence and fact wherever they may lead and ask every American and every concerned citizen of the world, in defense of our nation and in defense of freedom, to join with us today!  Family Members      Donna Marsh O’Connor  —  Mother of Vanessa Lang Langer   Bob McIlvaine  —  Father of Bobby McIlvaine   Helen McIlvaine  —  Mother of Bobby McIlvaine   Jean Canavan  —  Sister in Law of Sean Canavan   Manny Badillo  —  Nephew of Thomas Joseph Sgroi   Chris Burke  —  Brother of Tom Burke   Michele Little  —  Sister of David M. Weiss   Lorie Van Auken  —  Wife of Kenneth Van Auken   Monica Gabrielle  —  Wife of Richard S. Gabrielle   Patricia Casazza  —  Wife of John Casazza   Mindy Kleinberg  —  Wife of Alan Kleinberg   Robin Della Rocca  —  Aunt of Vanessa Lang Langer   Michelle Madden  —  Mother of Richard B. Madden   Barry Zelman  —  Brother of Kenneth Zelman   Margaret Canavan  —  Mother of Sean Canavan   Ciaran Canavan  —  Brother of Sean Canavan   Celine Traynor  —  Sister of Sean Canavan   Kathleen McKeon  —  Sister of Sean Canavan   Teresa McCaffery  —  Sister of Sean Canavan   Mimi Kelly Donegan  —  Sister of Bill Kelly Jr.   Gayle Baker  —  Sister of William A. Karnes   Cynthia Droz  —  Wife of Charles A. Droz   Cherie Faircloth  —  Sister in Law of John Resta   Lorraine Moskal  —  Wife of William D. Moskal   Paul E. Geidel  —  Father of Gary Geidel, FDNY   Teresa Badillo  —  Sister of Thomas J. Sgroi   John Sgroi  —  Brother of Thomas J. Sgroi   Eileen Sgroi  —  Sister-in-law of Thomas J. Sgroi   Anthony Badillo  —  Nephew of Thomas J. Sgroi   Lauren Badillo  —  Niece of Thomas J. Sgroi   Ann F. Rago  —  Aunt of Thomas J. Sgroi   Susan McCormick  —  Sister of Lt. Paul T. Mitchell   Thomas Resta  —  Brother of John Resta,   Sylvia San Pio Resta, and their unborn baby   Robert Carlo FDNY  —  Brother of Michael Carlo, FDNY   Ivy Moreno  —  Mother of Yvette Nicole Moreno   JoAnn Meehan  —  Mother of Collen Ann Barkow   Maureen Santora  —  Mother of Christopher A. Santora   Al Santora  —  Father of Christopher A. Santora   Maureen Godshalk  —  Mother of Bill Godshalk   Adele Welty  —  Timothy Matthew Welty, FDNY   Gila Barzvi  —  Mother of Guy Barzvi   Robert T. O’Connor  —  Stepfather of Vanessa Lang Langer   Robert Andreacchio  —  John Andreacchio   Dolores LaVerde  —  Mother of Jeannine LaVerde   Madeleine Zuccala  —  Wife of Joseph J. Zuccala   Madeline Bergin  —  Wife of John P. Bergin, FDNY   Nancy Yambem  —  Wife of Jupiter Yambem   Patricia J. Perry  —  Mother of John W. Perry   James L. Perry  —  Father of John W. Perry   Joel R. Perry  —  Brother of John W. Perry   Janice Perry Montoya  —  Sister of John W. Perry   Maureen Hunt   —  Sister of Kathleen Hunt Casey   Patricia Reilly   —  Sister of Lorraine Mary Riley   Jo Anne Bruehert  —   Wife of Richard G. Bruehert   Cathy D'Alessandro  —  Sister of Rocco Nino Gargano   Richard Pecorella  —  Fiancee of Karen S. Juday   Renee Stahlman,  —  Mother of Eric Stahlman   Sam Stahlman  —  Father of Eric Stahlman    Gary Meo  —  Best Friend of Eric Stahlman   Judith Hobson  —  Mother of Robert Wayne Hobson, III   Michelle Spinelli  —  Frank Spinelli   Christopher Spinelli  —  Frank Spinelli   Manuela Nita-Vasquez  —  Wife of Cono Gallo   Janine Winter  —  Cousin of Kathryn LaBorie   Alissa Torres  —  Wife of Luis Eduardo Torres   Robert Mercado  —  Brother in Law of Marc David Sullins   John M. Ulhich  —  Cousin of Bradley Van Hoorn   Madeline Smith  —  Mother of Jeffrey R. Smith   Audrey Magnuson  —  Wife of Ronald Magnuson   Christine O'Neill  —  Wife of John P. O'Neill, FBI   Sally Asaro  —  Sister of Carl F. Asaro, FDNY   Buzz Smith  —  Father of Jeffrey R. Smith   Myrta Gschaar  —  Wife of Robert Gschaar   Joanna Jakubiak  —  Daughter of Maria Jakubiak   Carol Eckna  —  Mother of Paul Robert Eckna   Stanley Eckna  —  Father of Paul Robert Eckna   Richard Eckna  —  Brother of Paul Robert Eckna   Maria R. Fisher  —  Sister of Andrew Fisher   Margaret Mauro  —  Sister of Dorothy Mauro   Eileen Woods  —  Sister of James Woods   Joyce Woods  —  Mother of James Woods   Robert Nelson  —  Nephew of Richard Fitzsimons   William A. Brinnier  —  Best Friend of Frank DeMartini   Catherine Statz  —  Sister of Patricia J. Statz   Ira Lassman  —  Father of Nicholas C. Lassman   Bill Kelly  —  Father of Billy Kelly   JoAnne Kelly  —  Mother of Billy Kelly   Kathleen Hamilton  —  Sister of Billy Kelly   Colleen Kelly  —  Sister of Billy Kelly   Meigan Keane  —  Sister of Billy Kelly   Robert Madden  —  Brother of Richard B. Madden   Susan Newton-Carter  —  Wife of Christopher Newton-Carter   Laura Paterson  —  Steven B. Paterson   Patric Tengelin  —  Brother of David Tengelin   Geraldine Lewis  —  Mother of Adam Lewis   Patricia Bingley  —  Mother of Kevin Dennis   John Echavarria  —  Cousin of Matthew Pedicini   Michael McNulty  —  Uncle of Sean Peter McNulty   JoAnn Statz  —  Mother of Patricia Statz   Cathie Ong  —  Sister of Betty Ann Ong   Valerie Lucznikowska  —  Aunt of Adam Arias   Bryan Jackson - Cousin of Commander William Donovan Jr.   Jane Pollicino - Wife of Steve Pollicino   Jacqueline Statz - Sister of Patricia Statz  
I get that every time I make a new post now. Almost instant down vote.  It didn't use to be that way.. fuck these guys. 
Well, because ever since Aaron Swartz had his name dragged through the mud and threatened so much by our government that he decided it was better to take his own life, this site is just a place for the lowest common denominator to be placated with bread and circuses while Chairman Pao works as hard as she can to make sure any dissenting opinion is designated to "free speech zones" where we can all just echo each other's concerns without upsetting the masses.
I was just thinking the other day that you don't see much Aids denial in this sub. Personally, I hope it stays that way. This film is disgusting in its reckless disregard for the health of people suffering from HIV/AIDS. I wonder how many this movie has killed.  Look at one of the speakers in the film [Christine Maggiore]( https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Christine_Maggiore), former head of the organization "Alive and Well with Aids". Not only has she died of aids related illness, she infected her daughter with HIV as a result of her refusal to take medication. Her daughter died of Aids related illness at 3 year's old.  Another star of the film is denialist Peter Duesberg, is a former cancer researcher who has since become an Aids Denialist. Mr. Duesberg was an advisor to South African leader Thabo Mbeki on a committee regarding Aids issues in the country. Duesberg was among the advisors who encouraged Mbeki to reject medication for individuals suffering from HIV and Aids in the country. [Hundreds of thousands died as a result.]( http://mobile.nytimes.com/2008/11/26/world/africa/26aids.html?referrer=&amp;_r=0)  Please think before watching and spreading this filth. It can literally kill people.
Holocaust deniers always argue the numbers were inflated, the camps were for labor and not death. I don't know about any of that, but look into it. "The mark of an educated mind is able to entertain two opposing thoughts without acceptance." Paraphrasing Aristotle but there you go.  Rothschilds we don't have alot of info on. And admittedly, if I were them and this "eat the rich" reaction to capitalism by the left continues I wouldn't begin to enter the public discourse.  JFK isn't as open and shut as anyone will have you believe. What's the deal with Oswald? Who wanted JFK dead anyways? Rabbit hole is deeper on that one.  What should you do? Live your life. Save money, buy things you like, make a positive difference on the world. One of the assets we have as simple plebians(if were going by that hierarchy) is that we can grow at the grassroots. Non-violence is just as important as getting your hands dirty by other means. 
You mean its not goat farmers on the other side of the world that want nothing to do with us?
[deleted]
Naw.  This will avert WW3 because there will global government control over everything.  There will be no freedom and we will all be owned by banks and corporations, however, so I don't know which is worse.
Alright.   Honest question, what part of the (trans-pacific partnership) trade agreement is threatening to the general public?
Your seem to have the wrong idea about my message and point. I'm not some "savior or hero" that is Gunna end all tyranny, and I never claimed to be. All I can do is protect myself and loved ones around me. Do I need to be more specific or is my message getting through that thick skull of yours?
I have preferred to celebrate their content and not their end, but have to now look at it again.
yea, it's just more evidence of it being staged which 95% of the population won't even think twice about - even when you point it out. 
[deleted]
&gt; To be honest, I've always laughed at 9/11 conspiracies. Dismissed them, disregarded and even mocked them  Unfortunately, I just think this shows the extent of control Zionists have over you, your thoughts and your life. First you are encouraged to believe conspiracy theories are stupid. Then you are convinced that refuting or even questioning the events of 9/11 makes you a conspiracy theorist.  Then, if you question the events of 9/11, you are stupid. This false syllogism is so simple, so easy to refute, and yet it is simultaneously so powerful that it catches millions in its net.  It's effectively just a slight variation on the ancient "Emperor Has No Clothes" fallacy. Your opinion is decided for you by your own fear of ridicule.
Russia said the same thing about 9/11...more hot air.
[deleted]
Marijuana use outside of company property should carry zero penalties, period. 
TPA did. That was our last best chance to stop the TPP, and TTIP and TISA for that matter. It's not that it's impossible the TPP won't pass, but at this point it would take something truly monumental to derail it.
I believe the engineers actually said "multiple" plane strikes. As in 2 planes in one incident.  It's out there on YouTube. 
This comment isn't about 9/11, its just a general comment on anything.  Cars are designed to protect the people inside. People inside the cars still get hurt and killed.   You can design for anything, but that doesn't mean when it happens it will happen as you designed.
TIL that the TPP looks like a dank meme.
You're right...structural engineers.
Oh no, hackers know about my latex fetish? I hope they don't hack into my computer and dump a load of latex porn onto it. 
[deleted]
Question: suppose offered to make you a $25 bet that none of the following predictions from ZetaTalk come true before January 1, 2017:  1. Official government acknowledgment or widespread public acknowledgement that Nibiru is real. 2. Official government acknowledgment that intelligent alien life or intelligent extradimensional life exists. 3. No US Presidential election in 2016. 4. Largescale earthquakes in Mexico and Central America as plate movements occur. Say at least two earthquakes that are at least 8.5 on the moment magnitude scale.   Would you take such a bet? To be clear, you would win if at least one of the predictions occurred.   Related to this, I noticed you also quoted a Zetatalk claim that Hillary Clinton is not going to be the Democraitc nominee. If someone offered to bet you $25 that she will be, would you take the bet on the side of her not being the nominee?
&gt;Meir Kahane was murdered in a Manhattan hotel by an Arab gunman in November, 1990.  I feel weird, feeling good, feeling satisfied reading that sentence. I don't like death, I don't like killing. It's really not needed outside of food. But then I read a head line like "Jewish Rabbi bites off babies dick: baby then dies of AIDS" I just can't fucking help but be relieved, I guess if nothing else I'm just relieved he's dead so he can't bite off anymore baby dicks, like the sick fucks Rabbis are.  **Edit: Nope nevermind, this faggot wrote a book called "They Must Go". I'm sure just on context you can guess what his "book" is about. Fucking savages, good, fuck him, he would've just abused some children or murdered more people anyways, they had plans for it, so fuck him. The Arab who killed him wasn't a murderer, it was self defense. Ew, apparently 150k people attended his funeral, fucking gross, though I guess Hitler had a large reception at his funeral as well.**  &gt;Rubin's throat was cut and then he tumbled off an 18- to 20-foot balcony.   Serious question, should I feel bad that reading made me smile, when you know he had plans to literally make innocent citizens, possibly *children*, be bombed? You ever seen a child's head ripped from their body during an explosion? Their arms exploding into red mist and their head literally popping off like popcorn with the spinal cord ripping out of the body along with it? You don't fucking want to. 
[deleted]
Article starts with  &gt;I saw a picture of a weeping Palestinian man holding a plastic carrier bag of meat. It was his son  And you reply with  &gt;Nice piece of anti-semitic propaganda op, where ya from son?  You're such a disgusting piece of shit. Go die. Fuck you you fucking coward, just, just fucking die, just fucking die already. All of you Zionist pieces of shit, you fucking baby murderers, child rapist, fucking blood thirsty, just, fuck you man, just fuck you.  
Exactly, it is a given and will happen without fail. And knowing this goes along with what you said, except as an individual one has to protect their assets that represent their labor, which doesn't come easy, so choose wisely for your future.
Vermont: Population: 626,562 (2014)  $15.96 per person per day. 
  &gt;I don't figure JIDF actually reads posts, they probably just copy paste whatever when they see the word "Jew" anywhere.   Huh? Are you insinuating I'm a shill or something?   &gt;And for the record, I don't hate Jews, I hate child rapists and murderers, which apparently you don't?   Okay, that's all you really needed to say, it was more of an open comment to the browsers of this sub, hence why I said 'you guys'.    &gt;/u/basedongods Why do you support murder? Why do you support killing babies? Why do you support mass genocide and terrorism? Why do you have dreams about raping and killing your own Mother?  Hahahahahah, what the fuck, man?   &gt; Don't take it personal though, afterall, I'm *just asking questions!*  The irony.    &gt;&gt; basedongods has helped pay for 7.46 hours of reddit server time.  Yep, proud of it, I like this website, and people that give gilded me have paid for 17!  &gt;Why do you support censorship? Why do you do you support Chairman Pao? Go lick her man-clit you loser.   In all honesty my opinions are probably too nuanced for you to understand, it's not black and white.   You are clearly harbouring a large amount of rage inside you, all I did was ask a simple question. Have a good day.  
&gt; I don't trust these stories...with all the jihadist propaganda activity, which is real and which is not is impossible to tell. If children died in these instances its because adults purposely put them there to be killed to used for "propaganda".   At first I was like "this guys actually making a valid point"  &gt; Islam is to blame, Israel is just trying defend itself from attacks from every direction.  But then I'm like "lol"  
No, but I like this documentary:  - [9/11 - Anatomy of a Great Deception](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l0Q5eZhCPuc) 
It's common for office space to be renovated before a new tenant moves in.
Building 7 - That's all. 
Thanks for the explanation. I will contact my jerk off senator tomorrow but since Toomey was a hedge fund trader before he bought his office in Pa I am sure I will be spitting in the wind.  Who the fuck was stupid enough to vote for a hedge fund trader? Pa religious assholes, so pious, so stupid.
I found one a them Hasbro trolls!
[deleted]
I pretty much zone out every time I see the word 'zetatalk'.  It is usually followed by outlandish nonsense that makes people with actual questions about government seem like fringe lunatic wackos.
How in the world does admitting Im a tranny equal being a closeted gay? Im pretty sure being a tranny is as far out of the closet as you can get. 
ISIS works for us and is doing things that get the   real U.S.  agenda moved along. So, yes we do 'coincidentally' play into their hands. 
&gt;And why would anyone plant explosives?    I move to go to trial with the evidence and find out. Let's get some  heavyweights to pour over the facts and evidence discovered since 9/11. A shit load of questions do need answering. 
Apparently having a useful opinion on the matter is downvote central... 
And the Titanic was specifically designed to be unsinkable.
Chances are, amongst the 911 first responders dying at an elevated rate due to mesothelioma and other things, there are probably a whole bunch that never existed, fake victims to pump up the numbers.  Videos like this are a chance to milk 911 again for the feels. I especially like the touch where they got a guy do endorse American wars since 911 while simultaneously crying about how 911 literally is killing him. You have to admire the genius and the audacity of it really.
&gt; Also, I don't think you know much about the Polish-German border dispute that started it all.  Honestly, I really don't. I would appreciate if you could explain it to me though, I know it's all on Wikipedia and such (but isn't that a zionist... eh I digress) but almost all of my time these days my eyes have been glued to all the TPP BS.  Unfortunately, some "facts" in my head are still from the indoctrination of public school, and it all gets blurred together, making it hard to know what's the truth or not in history. I mean, most people wouldn't want to consider it, but any history book you pick up and read could quite literally be just full of completely made up tales.  I really wish more people would homeschool their kids, even with the problems that entails on it's own.
Mine crashes when I open it as well.
Thank you
I'm American, dick. 
Staged theater for the dummies...
We certainly don't need more militarized police or less personal freedoms, which is usually the response to violent acts.
Please tell me you're kidding about the secret space program on Mars. 
I understand and appreciate your grandiosity but I was simply making a semantic argument for the fact that ownership of something you didn't make is possible. 
The nose knows.
Methinks the Lady doth protest too much.
Well what happened to this ship?
just cause you all are being downvoted with no one providing reasons makes me believe you more. 
I know the ACLU is going to take action on this.
Yep. Actually, I dropped my macbook pro a few weeks ago and it completely disabled the WiFi, Bluetooth, a USB port and the headphone jack (grr). Anyway, ever the optimist, I thought "well, at least I now have a laptop that I can be certain isn't squealing on me at least when I disconnect the new USB modem."  But, fucking apple, has made it such that in order to use the app store and even some programs downloaded from the app store in the past, your built-in WiFI MUST be functional – it extracts some ID from it to verify your identity.  Shits me to tears.
The problem, of course, is the melted steel found at ground zero. 
I present [creepy Dutch tv show host.](https://youtu.be/k7YY6kheoYw)
&gt;Yes, I'm thinking that the OP specifically proves that 9/11 was an inside job.  You genuinely do, don't you?  
Bet you he'll ~~get murdered~~ die of natural causes before 2016
Something tells me this "disgruntled ex employee" will have a problem with drugs and child pornography in the very near future.  
I couldn't agree more. :)
Easy to tell Hitlery was lying. Her lips were moving. 
If I had to describe ' Deep Web' I'd say it was a documentary about the complete erosion of a person's rights in today's united states.       The whole thing is a farce.  They illegally obtained evidence against him, and then proceeded to not allow him a fair trial.  Then they sentenced him to life in prison.      Any american seeing this should be disgusted.
They say its the muslim i should fear but its my own kind doing all the killing here.   :(
[deleted]
The only difference between force and momentum is time, what part of my comment do you disagree with?
I am actually seeing different prices, up to 859USD for a thousand upvotes, not only that, you can even buy downvotes to disable the competition :/
He is retired from the force now correct?
Odd* sorry..
At least his claims are falsifiable.  We'll know if the predictions are legit or not as early as the democratic primaries, right? 
Yes.   But it could be CGI maaaaaaan!
He's also supported by israeli interests.  A vote for Sanders, is a vote for more israeli control over the US.
There is nothing more  intolerant and arrogant then The New World Order,
I recently posted most of the following in /r/showerthoughts and in /r/worldnews Just to keep 'em thinking   Origin of the term Conspiracy Theory. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/State_Crimes_Against_Democracy  &gt;DeHaven-Smith has shown that the conspiracy-theory label was popularized as a pejorative term by the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) in a propaganda program initiated in 1967.[20] The program was directed at criticisms of the Warren Commission’s conclusion that President Kennedy had been assassinated by a lone gunman. The propaganda campaign called on media corporations and journalists to criticize “conspiracy theorists” and raise questions about their motives and judgments. The CIA told its contacts that “parts of the conspiracy talk appear to be deliberately generated by Communist propagandists.”     http://www.jfklancer.com/CIA.html  “Conspiracy Theory”: Foundations of a Weaponized Term Subtle and Deceptive Tactics to Discredit Truth in Media and Research  http://www.globalresearch.ca/conspiracy-theory-foundations-of-a-weaponized-term/5319708   https://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=A42m7zABR3o#t=1655
What does this have to do with Conspiracy theorists?   &gt;Obamacare-hating right  That's the only name-calling in the article and that sure as hell doesn't describe theorists. Most of us can see through the left-right paradigm described in the first paragraph. 
\*slow clap\*
"you're" 
Except rebel store is backed up from the 3000 orders in less than 24 hours. heh.
I provided you with proof you fail to see it.  You can defend something in more ways than declaring "I agree with ____ and defend them" you know, right?
Don't expect much in the way of replies to this... just more cocksure comments of *"There were no bombs!!  I was in 2nd grade and living 2000 miles away, I can assure you there were no bombs!!  What a silly fucking idea!!!!"*
That AMA is the biggest joke since the Woody Harrelson one.  Typical question:  *What propaganda from your amazing benevolent all-knowing corporation can we use to bludgeon stupid dumb idiots who are not smart enough to know messing with the genetics of the food supply for profit is the greatest thing ever?*
Debunkers these days seemingly walk themselves into logical fallacies, they moan about conspiracy theorists but then theorize analogies that make little sense.
ah tell 'em. let them bitches knoe!
+1.......
Please man. I know it's difficult. But listen, it may seem like nothing, but the fact that we are discussing this here and now mean's it's worth fighting for.  Please don't give up because the odds are against us. They're counting on that...   I don't have an exact answer on what needs to be done. Hell, I think Bernie Sanders 2016 is a GREAT start.   Awareness is key. Educate yourself, and those around you, so when the time comes, we'll have a majority of the population on the same page.  
already being called to remove it...  Farrakhan: I Don’t Get Debate Over Confederate Flag, ‘We Need to Put the American Flag Down’  http://www.breitbart.com/video/2015/06/24/farrakhan-i-dont-get-debate-over-confederate-flag-we-need-to-put-the-american-flag-down/
hey, he was definitely working on some super-secret shit. Who knows?   Just saying that there may be two key Google execs that died, but they were literally climbing Mt. Everest and perhaps doing something a liiiiiiiiitle risky in the middle of the street in Cannes.   It's not like "suicide by nail gun," or "WSJ reporter missing for a year turns up in nearby river," or "D.C. intern working on intelligence committee documents disappears, with body found in an area that had been searched several times before," kind of stuff.
There are some great people. Regular average people trying to live their lives as best they can. They have no say in how the corporation is run, and most aren't even aware how they enable the corporation and its abuses with nothing more than their daily existence. If they became aware, it would still be hard to break that cycle because it's been built in such a way that they wouldn't be able to survive without it.  There's always the chance, though, that they will not only become aware but be willing to act. All I can really do is cross my fingers and add my will to the wish. 
Au contraire, Pierre. Give them traffic with noscript and adblock turned on.
No need to act like a cocksucker about it.  In fact, your highly unnecessary violent and condescending response makes your "answer" immediately suspect.    NFC is not needed on a battery.  It is however needed to ensure always on trackability IN THE EVENT OF the replacable battery being removed.  That antenna size is also significantly larger than other NFC antennas.  With zero basis for need.  Care to explain why that is, Mr. fake ass scientist "expert" on Samsung's alleged outside the phone NFC implementation. (ed.)  ...the fuck outta here.
...  Supreme court decisions are released the same time each year.  While its possible the trade deal was scheduled for summer with that in mind, i seriously doubt it.
[deleted]
As I thought   Conspiracy theorists love to make sold assumptions and accusations 
It's a little to early to determine that. Give it a week and see if it blows up or not and how.
Can be said for almost every modernized country in the world.... 
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&amp;apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
So it's okay to murder but don't wear the wrong clothing :|
NYC isn't liberal which you would know if you had the slightest idea of what the reality there is.  It is a plutarchy, it is corporate fascism, not even close to liberalism.
Yep, came here to say just that.  Here's Robert Reich's take on the "deal".  http://robertreich.org/post/107257859130
Get the fuck out of conspiracy. They close your sub to make fun of fat people? BOOHOOHOOHOO!!!  Let's never shut up about the injustices and discrimination you suffered through.    Edit: where's your 150K strong down votes now? 
It was in quotes because i didnt make that up silly.
But is the TPP being given even half as much MSM airtime as the gay marriage dynamic?
Ok, how so, can you enlighten me?
Red+blue.  Same team assholes, slightly different gang sign.
Wondering why iamagod said "It's purple vs. us." however.  Your explanation doesn't quite answer it.
Aren't you conspiracy type's primary motivations "looking for the truth"?
&gt;pass gay marriage  Because the Supreme Court passes laws lololololohfuckitlooksliketheydonow  
And new world order, dont forget that..
You're the one being naive. How do you think all those awesome things get there? Where do they come from? Who makes them?
"Has Israel overreacted when they bombed UN facilities?"  No other country aggressively bombing the UN would be considered an overreaction except maybe the US. It would be an act of war, a terrorist act, or something along those lines.  I'm not a huge fan of either organization, but you don't touch the UN or the Red Cross. Thier job is to help the civilians and to prevent war crimes in a war zone. There should be no reaction to them therefore there should be no overreaction.  As a sidenote, there is a movie about the Serbian-Bosnian war that showed the incompetence and bureaucracy of the UN. I can't remember the name of it but it ended up with a guy laying on a mine in a trench. Either way, I don't think they've ever acted aggressively.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I agree with the fact that we need to come together and overcome our pointless boundaries such as nationality and religion but this is not the way to do it. This is giving all the power to one individual group of people that have only their best interests at heart to the detriment of others. We can have unity without selling our souls. 
Much ado about two nothings, really. 
Don't forget genocide of le Indians.
Google Trends shows otherwise. People are still interested.
i dont understand how that piece of shit keeps getting elected. seriously. NO ONE likes him
This guy answered your question.  https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3b8b5o/subversion_is_covert_demoralization_of_a_people/csjut14?context=3 
And pledge instead to ideals.
He's disappointed me, but I think calling him a sociopath is a bit extreme. Too cautious, too afraid to go to mattresses to battle, too beholden to the CIA and military and corporations, sure. But not sure sociopath is correct.  But he totally could be. None of us really know. 
When are politicians held accountable for their lives and the lives of the people they ruined? Give some examples. How about George Bush or Obamas war crimes? Or all of the lives they ruined with the drug war?   I do know you because I've seen and heard the same tired statist arguments for quite some time and they're easily refuted and always very similar in structure. I know what you're going to say before you say it.   "we ARE the government"   "don't throw the baby out with the bath water"  "Safety net"  It's all just regurgitated bullshit you learned and held onto since grade school.    
Is the earth flat?   Does it have edges?  Has anyone ever seen them?   Is this real?  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FG0fTKAqZ5g  
Take a peek in the mirror, pal.  Newtonian physics breaks completely that day, and your brain spins a wild unsupported conspiracy theory that friction and pressure, post "collapse" is responsible for the massive amounts of molten steel.    Might want to take your own advice after being made to look so foolish.
At least its not a cluster fuck of people doing whatever the fuck they want. The system is broken but at least it still functions. 
By Gordon "40% is Lies" Duff
All his stuff is horribly biased.  If you see his comments about literally anything else, they're just copy-pasted straight out of generic /r/politics circlejerk nonsense.
I heard somewhere that Muse's music inspired the Twilight author to write it. They most likely did it for a check but maybe to acknowledge that as well. 
Yeah.  You just a little transparent.  Not as bad, but still...  Steal a well known sn, post about the opposite of what he was known for.  A well known and established tactic used by your other friends.
I take it you haven't looked into the OKC bombings, what if I told you Timothy McVeigh was CIA? Look into the case. You realize what sub you are on right?  &gt; Wash your hands of your fellow murdering racist trash a little harder, you piece of shit.   You're a child.
Fuck you
[deleted]
Is that some sort of catch phrase? Like If you smell the the Rock is cooking, for the tinfoil hatters?
What you are seeing is the beginning of the culmination of 50 years of the progressive plan.
You know things like schizophrenia can run in a family, right? That would make it...genetic!  And no, I'm not gay. Sorry. 
[deleted]
No, it cannot be stopped.  fast track authority was already implemented.  The goose is cooked, holmes.
[deleted]
Gay marriage and the TPP are both being pushed by the globalists. The cannot tolerate stable families and communities. Most gays do not recognized how they are being used to destabilize society. Once the NWO agenda is complete gay rights will be gone along with everyone else's -- an equality of sorts, I guess.  
I definitely agree with you even though I didn't read what you've wrote.
Go to economixcomix.com they have a comic that explains TPP and other trade agreements, and its impact on the U.S.   The reason why people are unable to give an accurate explanation about the TPP is because it is actually being discussed in secret between a select few politicians and corporate lobbyist and others involved in seeing it get passed. No one involved is allowed to publicly speak on it. This, amongst other pages that have been leaked on the agreement, is why so many people are concerned with the new trade agreement suspiciously trying to be passed.  If you also look up Alan Grayson, he is the only person that has seen the draft of the TPP and has spoken out about how it will do more harm than good to the U.S.
Our people in poverty live better lives than people in other developed countries' middle class   Our financial system is by far the strongest in the world  Corrupt and greedy? Good god no, we're right in line with all other developed nations in corruption, far better than any of the developing world
Figured.
But Jones got unbanned.
When you're comparing some pointless, irrelevant trade agreement to people who died for democracy that's a sign you're gripped in delusions and need to step way, way, way back for awhile. Being able to pirate Game of Thrones isn't comparible to standing up to a totalitarian regime. 
His post has no merit even with the correct flag. It's inappropriate for any state government to fly the flag of an enemy nation. It's really simple shit.
[deleted]
&gt;hmmmm...i thin you have the wrong image of Israel...  NSFL:  https://www.google.com/search?q=dead+palestinian+children&amp;safe=off&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=nyKOVfz6EobFggTExoCICw&amp;ved=0CAcQ_AUoAQ&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=629  &gt;Israel is the last stable place there  Israel sows hate around the world.  If you are actually in Israel, why don't you tell us about how Israel has a long and storied history of waging false flag attacks on their "allies" and sow discontent and hatred across the world?  Do they even teach you about that stuff?  Ever heard of the LaVon affair?  Ever hear of the USS Liberty?  Hell... have you ever heard of Charlie Hebdo?  Honestly... if you really are in Israel, take the time to watch this and I would love to know what you think:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9hE5Sr4YdgI  &gt;Defamation (Hebrew: השמצה‎; translit. Hashmatsa) is a 2009 documentary film by award-winning filmmaker Yoav Shamir. It examines antisemitism and, in particular, the way perceptions of antisemitism affect Israeli and U.S. politics. Defamation won Best Documentary Feature Film at the 2009 Asia Pacific Screen Awards.
In case anyone is coming into the comments without reading the article - that's not what the article says.  At all.  
Fuck you for leading me to click that  EDIT: I have reported this to the mods twice....this link should be removed...or am I wrong to think this is against the rules?
I actually agree and I know the circlejerk on reddit hates to hear this but its actually a very hotly contested issue. Russia certainly suffered and inflicted the most casualties, but were only able to do so with because of money, food and weapons made or paid for by America and Great Britain. Casualty statistics also can be a bit misleading. First, Germany's enemy in Russia was the weather just as much as it was the Russians. Its kind of hard to give Russia any credit for that. Second, they give no recognition to the British and American bombings of munitions factories and other important parts of there German war machine. These bombing runs don't generate large numbers of casualties on either side but they have huge impacts on the course of the war. Its credit due to each side is complex but I think that its nicely summarized by the saying, "WWII was won with British intelligence, American steel and Russian blood"
You haven't driven around this place.  Been an over the road truck driver since 2004. I'm amazed these people know how to drive from their home to their shitty jobs.  They are retarded.  Stupidity would be an upgrade. 
Who's downvoting marriage equality? I think it's a wonderful thing. I'm bisexual so that law might apply to me someday. It's just that literally every other sub is talking about it non-stop and it seems a little suspicious that right as the fast track goes through, we have a shooting and gay marriage is passed. I'm just trying to keep everybody focused. Celebrate gay marriage all you want but don't forget the important things going on behind the scenes. 
One thing that grinds my gears about people on this subreddit, is the need to look at something like the tpp and want to tie all other things with it. Timing with this is irrelevant, this has been more than 5years in the making. It makes the argument invalid to people when you try and shove a whopper of info down their throats... And that is why the tpp is irrelevant to the common people who just don't have time to even talk about it or even know what it is. The tpp is massive enough the average citizen already thinks your crazy for mentioning it. The average person think what they watch on the boob tube, is what is important in the world and what is the truth.   - funny side note my grandma was watching the golden club ( or some show tailored for 70+) and they were talking about fracking, and how good it is for the world. I told her it's called fracking for a reason, it literally means to fracture the shale rock, by putting high pressure chemical water and sand then extracting the natural resources... Leaving behind the chemicals that they have no idea what harm they can do that eventually seeps into a ground water supply and messes with the very water you would get from a well in your back yard. Her response was that I don't know what I'm talking about and that fracking is good for the environment. :/   
Brilliant Doco, thanks for sharing
&gt; They're making new laws for the entire world   No, they're not. It's absolutely pitiful that you are raging and ranting like a madman, but you don't even know the most basic things about this proposed treaty.  There are TWELVE potential signatories. 12. They are not making laws for the entire world. They are negotiating a trade agreement that will have up to 12 member states.  Twelve.  Try to remember that number. T-W-E-L-V-E.  &gt; and we aren't even allowed to know what they are until 4 years after they are implemented.  You're so full of shit.  Can you really be this uninformed?   The full text of the proposed treaty will be public for months before it is voted on.  Who the fuck are you working for? Did you really think you could come in here and discredit this sub so easily? How much are they paying you to make people who oppose TPP look stupid?   
&gt; Nobody is saying that gays don't have right to be married,  Well. Except for all 21 Republican presidential candidates, and nearly all GOP rank and file. Conservatives from coast to coast are saying that.  &gt; I'm just saying it's up to the states to decide   If you ever get some spare time, familiarize yourself with the 14th Amendment. You should read the whole Constitution, but until you have time for that, just check out the 14th. It will explain why you're wrong about how this is a state issue.  Oh heck, I'll post it right here for you:   &gt; Section 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.  Incidentally, this is the same language that keeps states from infringing the 2nd amendment, or violating the 1st amendment.  
Agent Orange
&gt;We can't say that for sure though. The identity of the men the government named as the hijackers is in dispute, the theory that they used their real identities is itself absurd, none of the pilots inputted a hijack code so there's no proof they hijacked anything, and there's no proof they were Saudis. As far as I'm aware the total extent of the government's evidence for the hijacker story is CCTV images of some people waiting in an airport. It's impressive how little you need to convince people if you've got some authority.  Fair enough.  I don't agree with the decision to use Zionism, nor target Zionists. The point of aristocrats forming factions based on ethnicity is to divide and confuse their critics, as their nationalities and socio-cultural causes/ideologies are facade agencies...  The Aristocracy stemmed out of the Roman Empire, Ashkenazi Judaism and Sephardic Judaism ('Europeans') are *Roman* products, Islamism and Mizrahi Judaism ('Arabs') are both *Roman* products. Why? Because their Oligarchies follow the *Roman* tradition (The moral authority established by Augustus) and *support* the Roman Aristocratic network...  The Vatican is the crossroads of this network, though don't be confused, the official organisations known as 'The Catholic Church' and 'Vatican City' are separate entities and don't necessarily control or dominate this network. The Roman Empire simply never fell, their senate did (Senatus Populusque Romanus).  Don't believe me that Judaism and Islam are Roman products? First compare their moral beliefs and practices to Augustan morality, second map out their *archaeological* origins... Jews in Iberia (Sephardic) and North Italy (Lombardia, Venice, Genoa, Florence etc. Look at Genoese and Khazar connections and Venetian Banking schemes)... Mohammad's early association with Christianity and Gnosticism (both *Roman* products)... too much information to fit into a comment, not enough time.
so does Elizabeth warren. the only thing that brings unanimous support for something, is Israel. What that tells you is about Israel. Not Bernie Sanders
Well for us gays it's kinda a big deal regardless. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Did you check out my half-finished patent-free mrsa infection prototype medicial machine video. 
More like you are about to get stabbed but you are strapped down to a table with no way out. You can scream all you want,  and we will.... But in the end,  we are gonna get stabbed dude. 
I am not that optimistic.  You need infrastructure for any popular site and funding to make it happen.  The ones who are good at that infrastructure are the ones with the greatest intelligence involvement.  Hopefully there will be a P2P torrent like completely decentralized platform.  I hear about frisbee being like this but I don't know how good it currently is.
Welcome to r/conspiricy where every thing that happens in the world has some evil overtone to it
http://www.mommyish.com/2012/08/20/because-i-was-homeschooled-im-not-homeschooling-my-daughter-474/  https://homeschoolersanonymous.wordpress.com/2015/01/04/10-things-former-homeschoolers-wish-their-parents-knew-while-homeschooling/  http://www.responsiblehomeschooling.org/policy-issues/abuse-and-neglect/educational-neglect/  http://news.wfsu.org/post/parents-arrested-not-teaching-their-home-schooled-children-say-theyre-innocent  You won't really find anything outside of home schooled kids growing up and talking about how bad it was.  The group that home schools is pretty ultra religious, I personally think it's more about control than most will admit.  Seriously, while I'm sure it works out for some kids if you actually care about your children unless you have the time to pour into it please don't home school.  Teachers go to school for a reason, not anyone can just become a teacher.  My mom really fucked up my life, and she's doing the same thing to my younger brother/sister right now and it drives me nuts.  Even with me telling her to stop she still will not admit she's bad at it, and she has a ton of other friends that are just like this.  To this day I still have severe social problems and horrible anxiety.
I watch the flat earth videos for the cool pictures people make.
It's worth a shot I guess but any sort of protest is shut down from the start. Even if we don't slip up, they'll bring in provocateurs to slip up for us. There really is not much we can do.  
They didn't.   Theres one article claiming they did where the author basically sums up with "OK so I have zero evidence that they've bought Blackwater, but it *feels* like they did. In conclusion, this proves in my mind that they did". 
Delusional...
Saxitoxin, comes from shellfish.
Where is all the anon hackers when we really need them? This is the perfect moment for them to shine. Hack everything and post TPP awareness everywhere.
On our way
and South Korea, right?
[deleted]
Bin laden was rekilled and dumped in the sea before anyone could see his body. Must be a miracle.  Just like how the church families got $29 million a few days after the shooting and they opened the church for usage while blood was still on the floor and it was still a crime scene.   Do you believe in Miracles? 
While I agree there are macro-MKUltra forces at work in our society, I'm not sure women in the workplace is one breaking down identity so much as it is keeping as many people occupied and distracted so nobody focuses on the massive malevolent manipulation of our world.   I knew a TON of angry/bitter/unfulfilled/alcoholic moms growing up in suburbia. You can't blame women for wanting more out of their lives.   Divorce is NOT at a 60-70% rate; that's a grossly misleading exaggeration. Divorce is actually going down; the USA is below 50% now, if not by much.   *http://www.nytimes.com/2014/12/02/upshot/the-divorce-surge-is-over-but-the-myth-lives-on.html?hp&amp;action=click&amp;pgtype=Homepage&amp;module=second-column-region&amp;region=top-news&amp;WT.nav=top-news&amp;_r=2&amp;abt=0002&amp;abg=0*  As for our "strong, healthy society," I would agree with you almost halfway -- the surface level of our white-male-centric society seemed superficially simpler and more healthy -- for WHITE MALES. For everybody else, including most women, it sucked. If you've seen "Mad Men," it's not far off the mark. Women were treated as second class citizens.   I think there is definitely an undermining of our society, but it's not because women work. It's because there is a focus on the self over the community, secular egotism over spiritual enlightenment, and war over peace. Don't blame women. 
So discussing the TPP should be the only thing that the media covers?  OK, then,  please give us the pros and cons of the TPP and how it will affect trade globally.   Go ahead. I'll wait. I mean, as long as it doesnt interfere with your bitcoin discussions.
It's *really* easy to simply stop purchasing items that corrupt corporations sell. Stop giving them business. The people are partially to blame for this because they are too stupid to figure this out or too lazy to google.   This obviously doesn't apply to the items and services we are forced or coerced into buying, but the vast majority of things we buy don't have to come from corrupt corporations.   It really is that simple. Mind-bogglingly simple.
Yeah stay away from that site. The guy running it is unstable and bows down to any and all data requests.
HAHAHAHA....sorry that just really got me for some reason. 
I'm not arguing for the Democratic Party.  If it was Hillary vs Rand I'd vote for Rand.  I'm arguing that this isn't all part of a conspiracy.
Manufactured propaganda -  Obama "spontaneously" breaks into song at nationally televised funeral.  - **FNN: President Obama Sings "Amazing Grace" at Rev. Pinckney Funeral**   - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hYP8PKsLzZY  __________________________   Capitol Police Security Teams *(which is mostly likely on high alert stats)* allows a black woman enough time to setup climbing gear on S.C. Capitol flagpole .... and bring down the Confederate Flag.   - **#KeepItDown Confederate Flag Takedown**  - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gr-mt1P94cQ  Anyone who climbs knows it takes ~15minutes to setup that climbing rig.  
Thank you. A response. Finally.  I think I'm going to repost it with a more sensationalized title to get more visibility.  If this is what we think it is it might be big deal.
Small above small below
Moran.
They went nuts long ago.  http://rationalwiki.org/wiki/Godlike_Productions
Yep
From the 14th amendment   "No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws."    So yes I am. The Supreme Court ruled that marriage was a fundamental right and that states did not the ability to prevent people from being married based on sex. I highly encourage you to read up on Loving V. Virginia   Excuse the formatting I'm on mobile 
What does that even mean? 
Sorry, somebody linked to how to make a pipe bomb and I thought it was the same guy. By all means protect yourselves just don't be the one starting the violence.
I remember Ron Paul saying some great things about our government and their ability to auction laws out to the highest bidder. The money isn't the issue. The issue is the power this government yields. 
Look up "Prescott Bush conviction".  http://www.theguardian.com/world/2004/sep/25/usa.secondworldwar
Right, and it do the people in such a relationship deserve the same legal protections as monogamous couples? 
I think it depends on the laws. Stuff like zoning laws should absolutely be handled at a county level at that point.
I don't really care about what happened in the revolution or in the war of 1812.   I'm talking about the reason Obama sent Churchill's bust back as his first official act towards Britain. The torture in Kenya, the starving of Mumbai. There is much, much more. Once you go into recent imperial history you can't go back.
[deleted]
&gt; Isn't a regime illegally elected?   No. Contrary to what you've been told, regimes don't announce themselves as such. In fact, strangely, they usually claim to be the opposite of what they are.
Gaaaghh I fuckin know that's what I'm saying, shit.
In America ~~tea party~~ *politicians* suck corporate dick. Tell me they're not gay.
Treacherous is the word you were looking for.
HEY LOOK AT ALL THOSE FLAGS! ALL THE PRETTY COLORS! OH THEY PULLED THOSE ONES FROM STORES! OH THEY BROUGH DOWN THAT OTHER ONE! OH THEY PAINTED THE WHITE HOUSE WITH THE RAINBOW! WOW!
this was a great doc,for the first half anyway,as the 2nd half kind of devolved into a climate change drum circle,not that there is anything wrong with that,just felt a bit inconsistent near the end.
Not an insult, a suggestion.
. . .but Americans probably *won't* line up quietly. (smh) gonna be much noise.
'who' consists of the break away civilization?
Same here. Firmly fixed to both front and rear bumpers with *tags* unobstructed.   Had an alleged drug dealer in our town that put his potted plants at the back of his rig. The Narco cops shot his planters with Round-Up.  He was an Alaskan Fisherman that spent his off Season in the lower 48. GF put the plants out while he was out making a living!  Edit: added a space.
So I am a shill? Well thank god. I was afraid my payment of 100 shillings wasn't going to come in!
&gt; Because people deserve equality before the law?  So shouldn't people be as worried about, say, polygamist marriage rights as they are about gay marriage?  
[deleted]
&gt;Do you think if the IMF heads were assasinated it would change the working of the machinery  Most certainly not.   Not only would more unscrupulous scum step up to take their place, but small scale violence only serves to radicalize people and turns the victims into martyrs.  
&gt; North Korea  &gt;China  &gt; Look into those and get back to me.  What? Are you retarded? If Stalin is bad, does that make Hitler good?
Ah.  Jumped the shark.  Shame.
Oh Rumsfeld...
&gt;how can the US call itself a democracy?  It can call itself whatever it wants, doesn't make it true.  
Ok. 
thats actually hilarious 
Oh stop complaining. If you want to be a dick this is not the place!   There is no crying on Reddit!
You do realize that the Bible was written *over 300 hundred years* after the supposed events took place, don't you? And this was *over ten centuries* before the printing press. We can't even trust a court witness to remember an event accurately after 10 years. But we are going to trust peoples memory over three centuries? 
This is more funny than evidence of any sort of conspiracy.  The level of incompetent boobery demonstrated by these "journalists" is staggering.  In the reporting the woman who was at the rally and is talking about the flag said "I seemed to be the only person who noticed the flag and asked any questions about it! Nobody else seemed concerned at all!"  Yeah.. no shit lady.. because everybody else knew it was a gay pride flag and you were the only retard who thought that terrorists had crashed the pride rally.  
They'll often do this if you perform a lot of searches related to one field. It happened to me when I was... researching... a topic. Nothing conspiracy related. I probably did 50-75 searches in one night. I'm assuming it's for bots but it could something else.  About how many searches did you do in how short of a time?
Someone said to me that this publication group puts out legit articles. But I call bullshit for sure. Talking away our find is (in my mind) the only thing that would lead to a full blown physical revolution....
I'm not the OP who made that claim, but I'm sure you do a good bit of digging you should be able to find a few numbers. 
Why is this not surprising?
Jesus some of these conspiracy idiots take it too far. The guy responded to the emails pretty clearly, but this other jagoff wasn't going to stop until the airport guy...what....admitted to a mass cover-up over an e-mail? LOL what a fuckin loser. 
So once again, I believe in Science, not god.   There is not a man out there, controlling all of this. I stopped believing in Santa when I was like 5. Maybe even 7. I can't remember.  (I find this like on the same level as god).  What I'm referring to, it's not about biblical texts or meanings. I say this, because 1. I don't believe in it; 2. It's actually just not logical. If you're going to look at this situation from a logical, rational perspective, religion literally has nothing to do with it. What I'm referring to is 1. Either scientific mass destruction caused by a blackhole caused by the CERN large hadron collider; 2. There is an asteroid heading straight towards us, and the government is hiding that from us because of mass hysterion; 3. Now, I've researched the TPP thoroughly, and I actually believe that the TPP is going to be the precursor to NWO.    And I'm apologize for our indifferences in this matter as I know that a lot of people in America rely heavily on their religion. However, after being brought up as a Catholic, I've researched endlessly about religion, and I honestly do not think such a thing is true. If you believe in one thing, and someone else believes in another, who's to say what religion is the *right* religion?
http://www.mirror.co.uk/news/uk-news/isis-planned-suicide-attack-armed-5957621
How is this dude still alive? I've watched him for a while, saw his speeches and interviews. Does this dude have a death clock? How is this man still walking? Is it just a matter of time? This man speaks the truth.
You really think a Rothschild will go to jail? I have a bridge to sell you. My bet, he will serve community service inside his million dollar apartment, which his maid will do.
Jim Cramer is a quack.  Jon Stewart did not apologize to Jim Cramer, he eviscerated him on his show, and rightly so.
Just before their collective  rise to power these guys were known in D.C. as the crazies. They were elected because the religious right backed them.   Sociopaths and psychopaths never make good leaders .   All of their decisions are based simply on personal greed because they have greatly reduced ability to feel, or even fake, compassion, conscience , empathy or remorse.  But there doesn't have to be a biblical reason for it when a psychological one will explain it just as well.   People who cannot feel, also want to control others because they all greatly fear the rest of humanity, so they are the ones who seek out the power to control others .   That way the crazies get the power and we all get damaged by them.   We could combine our interests and beliefs by opposing such people getting positions of power in the first place. Unfortunately many of your persuasion believe fervently that people are powerless and that unseen forces are at play and actually backed their election   I see the sociopaths in leadership You named a raft of them.   I think others can see them too.  They just mislabel what is going on. They mislabel it because they see imaginary scenes being played out and ignore the human aspects.
If they don't know where they are going they're either complicit or ignorant. Either way - good luck.
Call me Charlie 40 hands ;).
elaborate?
Now if we flood the front page with all Obama's lies its all we'll talk about
I heard about there flamethrower usage which is just an insane weapon to start with throw in some nut bags and we're talking real crazy. Did you see Isis' latest propaganda they released? They are definitely turning the holy shit scale up to 11 in my book they decapitated 7 men with det. Cord, drowned 5 in a pool in a cage with a bunch of go pros on it,  and blew up 3 more in a car with an rpg for target practice about a month ago they released another video showing them crucifying and dismembering a man for being Christian, throwing men off the roofs of buildings for being gay. They are definitely the most successful comic book villains ever. 
What exactly am I supposed to be looking at? ^Sorry
He's forced to be there against his will and is no longer responsible for his own actions.
Looks like a broken rock.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
respect. unfortunately, you are the tiny minority. but still better than nothing. 
So long, [gay boy!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vV-ieLJD3AQ)   
Right.   Since I'm for human rights I must be gay.  Let me guess, you think interracial marriage is unethical too? I disagree... I guess I must be a gay black man now.  You're pathetic dude. Go back to snorting crocodil and beating homeless people to death.
Welcome to your future, brought to you by Jews and liberal leftist whites who share a common hatred for the white race and Western civilization. More than half a century of poisonous anti-white propaganda has succeeded in making whites hate themselves. This self-hatred shows itself in strange ways. Anorexia. Bulemia. Self-cutting. Piercing. Gender modification. And now, asking doctors to amputate your healthy limbs. It's insane, it's suicidal, and it's brought to you by the Jews who control your media. Enjoy, enjoy, enjoy.
BREAKING NEWS: the tv promotes propaganda and not the truth  Can we get the fuck past this already?
The plan is for the masses to die while they are holed up; it's supposed to be Eden when they and their robots emerge. They don't know about Hu, who wrote the damned DNA in the first place, and can engineer rings around them.
[deleted]
Says the guy claiming all Americans are gay on a conspiracy board.   Something something fight the good fight.
I read:   How dare you think outside the box! Things work the way I say they do! and if you don't take my side, you're a white racist homophobic nazi!!    What's it like to still genuinely believe everything CNN tells you?
I'm not the only one. I realized one day I was sitting, and watching the sun set, I had a thought and it said to me, "from now time will move even faster."  It's not like it moved slowly then, this was in the 90s. But I've noticed that time has been passing by like wind blowing in your face. Never the same burst of it twice, nor can you comprehend it in the moment that it happens.  This is not relative either.
It's not true. Snopes it, dude.
Weird, I don't know a single person who wanted any war with Iraq. I guess we socialize with an entirely different group of people. 
They can "Equate" it all they want...   The minute they actually attempt to charge, and prosecute someone for exercising their right to Free Speech then you will see how limp their "law" is.
Looks like the fear machine is going to be running on overdrive keeping everyone distracted until the TPP has been rammed through.
Let's all hope the terrorists succeed in striking a powerful blow against the government robber barons.
Let me guess: the mayor's last name is Quimby?
yeah...Sharon was tough motherfuker...=]
&gt; The cops used to gas people to death in marches during the previous government's tenure, and most of the turmoil was actually orchestrated by provocateurs.  Indeed it seems like it's calmed down, but I'm in the US, so I can't say with any real certainty.  Nevertheless, you can never underestimate the provocateurs abilities.  Should you guys take to the streets again for whatever reason, they most certainly will be back to push a violent agenda.
[deleted]
At about 6:36 is that a confederate flag under the black shoe? We should really focus on that flag and it's issues 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yea, the whole thing was BS.  I couldn't believe I was reading it.  Had to share.
Good work.
http://www.reuters.com/subjects/income-inequality/massachusetts  http://www.reuters.com/article/2015/01/18/us-usa-obama-economy-idUSKBN0KR0HD20150118  
The entire text of the resolution can be found here: http://leginfo.ca.gov/pub/11-12/bill/asm/ab_0001-0050/hr_35_bill_20120823_amended_asm_v98.html      It's only two pages or so. I just read it, and while it is undeniable pro-Israeli social engineering, it should also be noted that the resolution doesn't actually do anything concrete. The TL;DR is that the Assembly urges colleges to do more to combat antisemitism and criticism of Israel, which they claim are often the same thing.
&gt; Is there a TL:DR version  Yup. Nukes don't exist. 
How is it propaganda?
I bring you CNN London [**Lucy Pawle's Twitter Feed**](https://twitter.com/lucypawle)  It was this fine fine reporter who spotted the flag and proceeded go into journalistic orgasm. 
I like this documentary a lot.   Check out secrets in plain sight if you haven't already.  It's worth it but it's really long, on account of the vast amount of information. 
When every holiday comes with a terror warning, I think the terrorists have won.
You're right it was a failed attempted to depopulate society. They realize now our bodies can go through a lot before calling it quits.   Now they are slowly killing us through chemicals, addicting processed foods, heavy metals, radiation, gmo(controversial). It's all about making more money on the medical side of things. I mean by law we have to have medical insurance now. How messed up is that to tell someone what they HAVE to have? This is the only place in the world that makes you have health insurance. Keeping us sick and alive is better business. Death ends the money in its tracks.
This dirty fuck  was debunked. What a fucking tool   http://m.youtube.com/watch?v=-3zhZqiSe5c
Yeah, but they don't challenge my comment.  They think I care about fake internet points.
Yes and just like every other medical drug there are both positive and negative effects.
You don't think an in depth call to action speech would open their eyes and incite them to do something?
Dude yea fuck these guys first off. However,when I went out on patrol I almost always made sure to have a spare case of water and MRE's for situations like this. I say again though, fuck these guys,id like to punch them in the face.
Simple and to the point. A lot of kids haven't studied this part of US history and results in what the OP posted (and explains a lot of comments here).
When and where were there smoke bombs set off? Before the real bombs? After? During? Down the street? Underground?
True. Search as I might I couldn't locate the original article.    At the end of the day Rummy should be declared incompetent or be escorted to for a stay in the gray bar hotel.
Love and monogamy outside of the context of a marriage, sure. I don't think love has only existed in the last 100 years. But marriage for most of its history had little to do with our modern concept of love. It was more of property transference.
free speech zone   [----- /r/conspiracy -----]  free speech zone  Give me a break.
A rising tide lifts all yachts.
Everyone knows thats what it takes to be a politician.   **Whats the definition of a politician:** a person who is professionally involved in politics, especially as a holder of or a candidate for an elected office  It says nothing about having integrity!  
Raise more awareness about her, and the other selected (not elected!) "candidates". These families have done their job. It's time to flush the entire system of the people.   Oh, and watch this interview of mrs. Katharine "Kay" Griggs from -98, to see what is really going on behind the scenes: [Link](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U1Qt6a-vaNM)  PS: bring some popcorn.
Read title over and over again until the words make sense. 
Tom Massie
I can just as confidently declare bias in American policing, despite not being a member of any police force. The numbers don't lie.  Can you use a metric other than UN resolutions to show that Israel is committing worse atrocities than China or North Korea, or even the United States, to set the bar even lower? 
what possible digging could a civilian do? its a bomb and a convincing story.     It was a real bomb. People actually died. The guy in the video is just one of those attention whores. Just like the people who claimed to be in 911 but were never there
Planet X did this too?  First the CME's... now this?  What's next?
Lol. We have a real religious zealot here.   Go back to praying to your politicians and tug on your leash when you want something from your "leaders".   You're a joke dude. "Please godvernment, please give me some rights back!!! I promise to write on a piece of paper and beg for your forgiveness! I'll obey all of your rules - I promise I'll be a good servant!"  Grow a spine. 
[deleted]
Hey anybody know what the first song is?
To add to your clarification:  &gt;they can't bring expert staffers with them unless they have the right clearances, and the aides who have expertise in various relevant areas -- for instance on the impacts on the environment or labor law -- generally are not cleared.  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2015/05/21/tpp-secrecy_n_7417116.html
LOL - his "defense"
Hi Lenny. 
lol Hillary can keep that whiff to herself.  The Donald won't be selected as president.  We're going to get the grand choice of Hillary or Jeb and either way, we the people lose and the banks/military contractors win. 
Since Governments draft kids, put guns in their hand and send em off to die with a healthy side of Patriotism before they go, War Memorials usually are on Government property. I mean if we don't show today's kids that they get to be heroes how do we expect them to get excited about dying for tomorrow's cause?
For that, then you must agree that Putin is actually working with/for Washington.   Not that it's far fetched if we consider some global conspiracy into the mix (Illuminati, Reptilians, Opus Dei, God) but in order to keep things simple (and open for debate)we must assume that Snowden is not a "Limited Hangout"   If you are interest /u/George_Tenet posted here a wealth of links and discussions on this subject, just check him out. 
"hhhawhites", i was done at that point
The article said the trial has been going on since April and they were just finally sentenced after a very long and thorough trial.  I'm sure the original accusations and investigations started many years prior.
Exactly.  It's even more utterly ridiculous when [articles in peer-reviewed journals have been proven to be completely fake](http://www.slate.com/articles/health_and_science/science/2015/04/fake_peer_review_scientific_journals_publish_fraudulent_plagiarized_or_nonsense.html) now.  They literally published lies and even nonsensical papers which they had "reviewed", lol.  It's because he's a veteran, I'm more convinced then ever now. 
sooo will they petition the govt to change the scheduling/toxicity(level of illegality) of Marijuana?.. 
I'm guessing you're at least a *little* racist if you can't see how the flag could offend a black person.  
Most white people, and I say this as a mutt who is married to a black woman, voted for Obama because he is black and it made them feel like they are worldly.  Most black people voted for Obama because stop, end of telegram.  The ptb know the psychology of the plebs.  Stay vigilant, they are all the enemy.  The ENEMY of true progress.  Stop.
Yeah I don't know why I put both Pauls. Ron is great, Rand not so much. He's one of the best, but that oviously isn't saying much.
None of the vehicles in the image look like they belong in the 80s. Definitely 90s at least.
Well clearly you're just a *weed smoking hippie*!! Afterall, he said the word "bong", that means I don't have to take you guys seriously anymore, duh!
McKenna was not an ally. 
I wonder if you could backtrack possible positions for the mobile laser canon then search for images of the area at the time to find suspect vehicles 
No one is jaded into thinking all southerners are racist, or all confederate soldiers were white slave owners.  But ignoring that the Civil War was strongly fueled by slavery is pure ignorance.    Why not use the "don't tread on me" flag which originated from a war we actually won rather than fly an offensive flag from a war that was lost??   I'm not even going to justify the ridiculous insinuation you're making about black people in the south vs the north.  Just stop.  I don't even see how it's applicable when talking about the historical context with the flag, especially if you're arguing it's not about race.  Why bring up racial relations then?
Blue spectrum light is already FDA approved for the treatment of acne. So moderaters statement is nonsense. Also 400nm blue light acne treatment uses a 12 watts LED bulb. I use a 1000 watt blue spectrum hydroponic grow bulb. This extra power increases penetration.
Ok. Sorry tired not thinking completely straight.
It's a military training exercise where they are apparently training to blend in with local populaces. I don't know where they are planning on fighting where the typical American soldier can blend in.
There was a post about this about 1h after the failure, it got downvoted to hell though.
Band name!!!
This is literally the easiest point to debunk of all time. Go on top of your house and kick your tv satellite. See what happens to your tv signal
Also Palin. With how old McCain is, his VP choice was actually a serious concern. And he picked an idiot.
So sexual orientation is a character trait?  The more you know ... 
I bet you love it.
&gt;I say we need a war with Washington, D.C.  but we tried this before, in 1860.  the president at the time rallied corporate interests against the 'rebels' and sent the equivalent of the army, navy and marines to kill them and destroy their private property.  the general in charge intentionally burned down atlanta.    in terms of human life, it was the costliest war in american history.  now, the guys that fought against washington d. c. are called traitors and racists, and theres a faction of people here on reddit and /r/conspiracy who believe monuments built to commemorate the people who tried to reign in the united states government should be torn down and destroyed.  its pretty ironic, actually.
c'mon buddy, Ive seen tailer park boys, i know what you kids get up to all day - if we let all the canadians in next thing you know we'll have a shit-hawk problem too.
Yeah. For some reason people use their good quality videos as 'evidence' that they are fake
These petitions only work for getting recipes and other non political fluff.
It was. That's why the founding fathers framed the Constitution the way they did. If you go back and understand how it was originally written, it clearly offers the illusion of choice and self-governance without the actuality of it.  It was always about preventing the poor from killing and eating the rich.  Today, the rich seem to think they don't need that veil of illusion... and they're working mightily to strip it away. Greed, always wanting so much more than they need, drives them. And as they strip away the illusion of self-governance, they're also stripping away the bit of money that was originally there to circulate among the relatively poor masses. It was enough to keep the poor masses happy enough with their lot in life to, as I said, not kill and eat the rich.  Today, it is more misbalanced than it ever has been, and people are starting to notice. Not just the poor, but some of the wealthy are saying it's time to reverse the flow... flat out saying there will be a violent revolution if they don't. Not all the rich, mind you, but the smart ones.  Eventually, if it keeps going as it has been, there will be violence. It will be unavoidable. Because when the masses are hungry and homeless, and especially when they can't feed their kids because of it, they will do what they need to.
I am familiar with the effects of shock on an individual. I'm challenging the idea that  &gt;it will make you be aware of threats that don't exist.
The confederate flag does not fly at the SC courthouse at all.    The confederate flag has a red bar over a white bar over a red bar with a blue square in the corner with a circle of white stars in it, representing the confederate states. The Stars and Bars.    The flag at the SC statehouse is a Northen Virginia army flag, resurrected by the KKK and falsely conflated with the entire confederacy.   
How is the picture of the Chicago Skyline an argument FOR a flat earth?  Or to elaborate:   1. Using the numbers in the table you've linked, the skyline should not be visible. 2. On a flat earth, shouldn't the bottom of the skyline be visible? 3. While point 1. could be tweaked by including the following statement from your source - point 2. stays unexplained:  &gt; In the real world there are however atmospheric effects of mainly ray refraction that tend to cause objects beyond the theoretical horizon to sometimes be visible  So on our layman level of argumentation, the round earth arguments are stronger, imho.
&gt;And who exactly was that?  who was what?
Apart from that whole "ending slavery" charade, you mean?
He also did an episode on the UK pedophile ring that was aggressive and daring.   I think he's controlled opposition, but that doesn't mean he's not speaking the truth. We all know that part of the occult equation is telling us exactly what's happening. What better way than throughout a court jester?   Even so, I was expecting worse after reading your headline. Now I'm not sure this is such a bad thing. I'll keep an open mind.
Fair enough. I want change. Real change. Not the destructive globalist bullshit we've been fed the past 20+ years. I don't see much difference between the two parties. One is the government controlling corporations and the other is corporations controlling government. The marriage is there. They're all global Progressives, which in my view is a hybrid of Fascism and Communism.  I'll vote 3rd party again, if Rand isn't the GOP nominee. I couldn't live with myself if I voted for a Clinton, Bush or Obama. I believe the fruit doesn't fall far from the tree. I think Rand is more like his dad than he leads on.
Not by running for president.  He may have given us GW Bush as president instead of Al Gore.
So, any reason to think Treasury would make you happier than the Fed does ?
And little things like the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, the Environmental Protection Agency, OSHA, several laws making roadways and driving safer, and many many more...
I'd rather have a "globalist kook" in office, than someone who starts TWO decade-long losing wars, gets 5500 of our troops killed, gives tax cuts to the rich, cuts regulation of corporations, and helps crash the economy.  Not much doubt which was the right choice in THAT election.
[deleted]
&gt;Ron Paul makes WAAAAAAAY to much sense for the lunatic left or the radical right to vote for. Tops, he will get 6% of the vote.  ron paul isnt running.  his son rand is.
Bush is the main joker! He can make anyone laugh.
So is that a no then,  you don't have any link of me attacking you then?  
You never answered my questions from yesterday's flat earth thread.   [Here they are again.](http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3bfu65/serious_why_cant_this_sub_rationally_address_the/csly4kc)
Not sure. Just found it one late night. 
The original is a Russian site and they wont give a fuck.    The Video on the other hand is on YouTube and I believe should be reported for exploitation of a child.  I am amazed it is still up.  Personally I would have edited out the face of the child or the whole child and it would have still proven the point.
I liked him for a while, but the anti-capitalism talk made me stop watching. 
again, that's not capitalism and it's sad that you and so many others are clueless and think it is. We don't have a capitalist society anymore, haven't had one for awhile now. We've been moving towards a fascist/authoritarian oligarchy for some time as your links demonstrate. Look on the bright side, at least all the idiot sackriders who think "our side" is better than "their side" will eventually fuck things up so badly by repeatedly supporting this retarded shit that they will finally have no way to deny what they created.
You didn't know any old image of an oceanic ice sheet counts as proof of the borders of Earth?  I didn't either, apparently.
A futile effort, but forcing them to decline/ignore the petition is yet another data point for future arguments.
Sorry, no dice.  There are many kinds of studies; some are listed here:  http://guides.mclibrary.duke.edu/c.php?g=158201&amp;p=1036068  And that's not the complete range of "scientific studies".  Anything that tests against reality is "scientific".
[deleted]
[deleted]
A lot of us more-researched voters kind of panicked when he was making these views known and still people followed him and acted like he could fix America...somehow. Luckily, we didn't elect him and move backwards, but it's amazing how a lot of his followers still toe the Republican line while pretending Ron Paul was something else. 
Martial law puts the highest-ranking military officer in control of the country.  TPTB don't want that. Through the emergency powers of COG and many many executive orders, they have become above the law.   This COG stuff is the big power grab. Martial law was the misdirection. Why would they hand off their power to the military?  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/National_Emergencies_Act  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Continuity_of_government#United_States  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/National_Security_and_Homeland_Security_Presidential_Directive  
Good.  Great.
The most interesting part is the number of votes and number of comments in such a short amount of time while more interesting topics with actual proof and data to back them up are left with little voting and no comments in the same time frame. It's like the flat earthers collude to brigade this sub.
Yeah. Ron Paul is way, way, way over to the super-far right. Like, Neo-Confederate. Wants to abolish nearly the entire national government.  Bernie Sanders is about as far left as you can get in US politics. There could not be more room between them on the US political spectrum.
http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3bf43o/the_modtalkleaks_continue_major_moderators_caught/  You should get on one of your alts to agree with yourself now.
[deleted]
You've completely switched topics. Lol. That's dodging.
I don't mind that you disagree with me but you language is uncalled for buddy.
If you don't understand why that is the location I have chosen as are on totally different wavelengths. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Our crime has become organized.
&gt; No fucks given. your opinon of me means nothing to me. I dont live on Internet points.  and yet you persist, after you said you were gonna "block" me how long ago? 
Rule 8. No memes. Removed.
If the Yuan is the new reserve currency of the world, Forex will yield a FAR greater return than BTC.  -a Forex, BTC &amp; Ripple trader
No love for Trent either way...Someone could have at least thrown him *something*.  Trent Kelly	R    MS-1	 $0	 $0	Yes  
Anyone self identifying to any alphabet agency is retarded. Go ahead and do it anyway, THIS time things will be different right? You have their word... Idiots.
Revolver Ocelot?
[deleted]
Agreed. Ron Paul should have been president. But now we have a chance to elect another great candidate: his son, Rand Paul. Let's all get out there and work to get Rand Paul to be the next president. Let's also work to get him a Congress that will work with him and not just another establishment Congress like we have now and have had for so long.
[deleted]
Implying only religitards homeschool
Yep. 40/98 comments belong to flat earth conspiratards.
See also - http://forward.com/news/national/310087/is-bernie-sanders-a-lefty-except-for-israel/
And then some. 
You can't expect me to provide evidence that was destroyed by the officials you trust.   I provided the evidence I _can_ provide, a simple logical deduction:   towers always lean, topple, shear, break or collapse _partially and asymmetrically_ when under too much stress like fires, earthquakes, floods, bombs or airplanes. This statement is true.  When towers fall _completely and symmetrically_, it is always because of a controlled, designed demolition. This statement is also true.  The Twins fell completely and symmetrically.  It is therefor true that the Twin Towers were blown up.  This should be sufficient.   The evidence you require is only the icing on the top. 
She'll be going to a different "big house" next year...  We Are Doomed. 
Because mass executions on American streets is just to obvious to start from nothing. 
Do you have some kind of dislexic/colorblind thingy going on there?  &gt;Yes there is. It has a **big blue star.**
If you replace ever Russia with USA that statement still rings true. As for the land war "in America a rifle waits behind every blade of grass" .Russia and USA should be more friendly we seem to have a lot in common.
Don't forget he want's to ban abortion and do away with public schools. Ron Paul, for people who literally want to move the country back a century. 
Exactly.   I always think about the fact that he was 29 years old when the Civil Rights Act of 1964 was passed. He was a far-right conservative back then and [dead set against it](http://thinkprogress.org/politics/2011/05/14/166276/ron-paul-civil-rights-act/).    He was 30 years old when the Voting Rights Act of 1965 was passed -- another monumental milestone for civil rights in America, and [another law he opposed](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Political_positions_of_Ron_Paul#Voting_Rights_Act).  He was 32 when the Fair Housing Act of 1968 was passed. Another major piece of civil rights legislation; another law he fought.  He was on the front lines in the South defending Jim Crow, waving the Confederate Flag, defending the Confederacy, saying the North was wrong to end slavery and fight the Civil War.   He's an enemy of liberty. It's really not complicated at all. 
Ron Paul does not think your body is your property, at least if you are a woman, because he wants government telling them what they can do with their bodies.
I don't see what you see. Looked at it several times. I see no compelling evidence of fakery at all. 
The real videos of the explosions from close range is compelling enough to believe they were very forceful. The one from inside the sporting good store shows the windows blow in.  Definitely not fake. Extremely compelling.
Why do you say Zionist when you mean Jew?
...and both have nukes. So no it won't happen.
[deleted]
God bless weed heads and their wisdom! 
9gag lmfao
If you take things out of context, it is easy to mislead. Half truths are still lies in my book. 
What about my comment in this thread indicates I'm a shill? Debunk my comment.   Look at rule ten, by the way. 
Fresh post. Nice. Not incredibly outlandish. We'd be foolish to think time keeping has no major flaws.
I don't know if they're actually related to the actual Koch brothers - they're an accounting firm that specializes in setting up conservative PACs. Principles are Ted and Tim - can't tell if they're related to the infamous brothers or not, they don't show up in cursory searches of the tree via Wikipedia or Google.  Also, they're Koch &amp; Hoos, but who's the Hoos?  I notice Cruz hand-delivered. I still don't understand how, if they gave Obama a hard time for allegedly being secretly born in Kenya, Cruz is a-okay being openly born in Canada.
[deleted]
They support my statement that the Obama administration was in fact arming, funding, and training the supposed moderate rebels in their fight against Assad.  Chalk it up to more meddling in the affairs of other nations that Ron Paul would have never been involved with. 
Okay; so assuming JH15 goes live, what would the role of jet fighters be; are they going to strafe our columns and bomb our tanks?
Creating US jobs, at what cost mate? People’s lives, that’s the price. Can you really put a price on life? That's a serious question.  Here is an article about how the health care spending “boost” US economy http://blogs.wsj.com/economics/2014/12/23/health-care-spending-gives-boost-to-u-s-growth/  Is this really something positive? That means that people is getting sicker and sicker, but hey, is helping the economy so let’s keep doing it. Not always the cause justifies the means. 
Now what?
Happens daily 
sorry, I didn't realize.  I'm reposting straight to reddit now.
It's actually from [Washington's Blog](http://www.washingtonsblog.com/2015/03/banks-wars.html) originally.
The Maze Runner was based on this. 
like I said--where is the reporting from the MAJOR MEDIA?   CONSPICUOUSLY ABSENT: cbs, nbc, abc, cnn, fox, NYT, the guardian, WSJ...
And I'll have to check out the old one! That sounds really cool tho, what kind of bots do you make? Like software bots?
The EPA did a great job preventing the BP oil spill. Strange they allow corexit to be used for the clean up despite the fact it is banned in Europe...
But do learn how to spell miracles.
Idiots get mad at corporations as well.  Smart people move up the ladder in corporations.
Thanks for understanding, I didn't realize that Google was so fascist. 
Dang, just putting that dude on blast.
Was I wrong? 
How about the reaction of the Crowd!  You Americans quite literally have the right to bear arms to prevent these treasonous acts.  What the hell is going on over there!?
Powerpoint *is* a bitch... ;)
Unfortunately the things they focus on mean nothing.  Who's gonna win the super bowl.  They're banning a flag. Gay marriage was legalized.   Keep the focus somewhere else and you can do whatever you want. 
It seems she claims to be a CIA asset, however the only official records are of her serving as a congressional staff member. She has widely been associated with having mental illness although she refuses medication. She was arrested and put on trial under the patriot act for conversing with foreign entities while in Iraq. It's possible that what she says is true and the government claiming that she is delusional is merely a convenient cover, however, it is also possible that she is in fact lost in her own fabricated story. 
There is something going on, and it's not limited to Canada. It's interesting that these things are being discussed in isolation when they are happening, to one degree or another, in at least four of the Five Eyes countries. It's also worth noting that both Harper and Abbott sold their souls, *and our countries*, to mining corporations.
Something something Iran, something something best allies in the middle east.
http://i.imgur.com/qa77eL3.jpg
Does anyone else notice right around the time of the flu Jab, is when the Flu really starts making the rounds at work.  You'd think it'd drastically drop off wouldn't you.
What the fuck? I never said the media legalized gay marriage.  I said the media covers one stupid, unimportant issue to distract from an important issue. Gay marriage just happened to be a convenient topic.  
What would be my motive if I am an infiltrator? I'm exposing possible government cover-ups (such as Wikipedia manipulation). Maybe it's because TPP and stuff is going on and you think I'm trying to throw people off. I have no comment on TPP or any other conspiracy issue unless it is directly relevant to this particular conspiracy. You have to look at things objectively. By spouting an ad-hominem you in fact make yourself sound like the infiltrator.  Look at the points I make and try to refute them. The points I am making that are not refutable is that 1) tv shows and movies about ETs contain references to actual eyewitness reported events, and that 2) Wikipedia is manipulating public opinion on the Forrestal Incident.  
I sometimes have the feeling that these totally moronic things are posted to make people think that EVERYTHING that seems fishy about the BB is to be laughed at.  Believe me, I do not start out thinking that something is odd, first I look at it and think "what a tragedy" and all the rest, but then you dig in deeper and you find stuff that just doesn't add up.  More and more people then start to question the 'official' versions and all of a sudden you'll get a posts like this, which completely nullifies any actual discrepancies.  You call us idiots and I will have to call you one back if you think that this post is the actual opinion of us sceptics. This post is a dilution to make us look stupid and you fell for it.
a bit late. most of the aquifers west of nyc have already been fracked, no? manhatten will drift off into the atlantic in due course. after a long series of horrible earthquakes.
Well I tried, can't reason with a person that's formed his opinion and suffers from severe confirmation bias.  Critical thinking isn't something we all have I guess.  I've presented my argument, backed it up with facts and anyone sane can see that.  I'm aware money in politics is a problem, but people like you and bullshit articles like this just make us look retarded.  Educate yourself a bit before pressing enter again, the PAC comment really did me in. 
Except it's legal in several states. Also, you can get it in the 48 states it isn't legalized in. Pretty cheap, too. Kind of weird the state isn't putting all their resources into something that "eliminates brainwashing", huh?
This is the largest drill ever, with a mystery commander. The police, firefighters and medical personnel do not know what to expect. This is not your usual anti-terror drill.  'The officers who came on shift this morning knew they were taking part in an exercise - but nothing about what they would be facing. Not even the "gold commander", the senior officer making the big decisions in the operations room, will know what's going to happen.'
Of course I think, based on the evidence, that the answer is yes. Capitalism justifies any discrimination based on profit. 
If you had to read the volumes of my acquaintances posting "the end is nigh, or woes be to Jesus" on my fb feed coupled with "yeay , we can get married, Obama is our savior... You'd have trouble believing people we're thinking of much else.
[deleted]
Absolutely. I have no doubt it's going to be a disastrous agreement. We need to fight it tooth and nail. But these people are shooting us in the feet and making us look like idiots with their hysterical, fact-free tirades. People are just going to instantly dismiss someone who says crazy, ignorant shit like we have been hearing    There are are actually people who really believe Congress is going to vote on a bill they cannot read. There has been so much effort to mislead and misinform people that they can no longer recognize obvious bullshit when they see it. People shouldn't fall for something so stupid. But we are living in an age when you can make a lot of money feeding people's paranoia and delusions. The whole thing is a racket. There are countless websites and pundits that will feed people as much of this paranoia and delusion as they can swallow. nd there are a lot of people who won't trust any other sources. They've trapped themselves inside an echo chamber of extreme misinformation. It's really very sad. With an ignorant population like this, the country will not survive. But that's where we are: living in a country where 60,000,000 people voted for the obvious dimwit Sarah Palin. Sixty million. 
IDK if you've watched the news lately.  Police here have no trouble killing unarmed people.  Let alone people toting guns.      We can also look at OWS.  The government's disinformation and infiltration of protests is too strong for large un organized groups of dissenters.
Yeah, c'mon now. The most well known source there is the Miami Herald. You would think at least like huffpo or the guardian might have had a small article. Nothing. At all. 
Yeah you aren't a parent. Two year olds are not going to be able to count to 50. Vaccines didn't cause it.
That there was a second one?   Still don't get the conspiracy
How many pullups can u do
Indeed, love spreads. Thats why my cup is always half full with cheesy jokes and shitty British accents. Bloody well believe it guvna.
you are insulting average reader's intelligence in this subreddit.
[deleted]
Haha I agree with this completely. I've asked legitimate questions about some theories and instead of critical thinking to come to an answer people just downvote you and then it becomes a bandwagon of downvoting.   Hive mentality - "I didn't even read your comment but since others downvoted it, or it questions a conspiracy theory I blindly believe without having used critical thinking as to other possibilities, scenarios, or having to ask/answer legitimate questions, I think I'll downvote you as well, you **fucking** shill. You can't fool me!" 
Haha. Your anger is showing. 
Again, my picture is not from Google.  How the fuck are you so stupid? Obviously just trolling.  Going to report you as such.
Thnx for proving them right
They were pushing the idea that fluoride was actually .. an essential nutrient. Kind of like a vitamin, but careful, you don't want too much or you get fluorosis. Personally I think the 1ppm level, was the level they felt they could get away with disposing of toxic waste in the water before the more obvious signs of toxicity showed up. Fluoride is a very expensive poison to get rid of.
&gt; But if your brain actually functions properly, that doesnt make any sense.  If your brain functions properly, you wouldn't begin with such a closed-minded perspective.  &gt; So in a world with free energy (doesn't mean everything else is free, but whatever)  Compared to how things are now? You'd be surprised.  &gt; "the powers that be" want to keep us back and as "slaves" for what exactly?  Wow.  I really have to explain this?  You really haven't thought about this?  Okay.  You establish a paradigm where fiat currency purchases *real* goods and services, and you also establish a tax system that gives you a certain amount of dollars in taxes from every human on the planet, and you have as many goods and services as you want.  You're apparently not familiar with and have never seen [**this**](http://www.geoengineeringwatch.org/wp-content/uploads/2013/05/rothschilds-infamous-let-me-issue-control-money-quote-end-the-fed.jpg).  Reading the rest of what you posted, it's very apparent you're not too intelligent a human being.  I'll stop now, therefore, as continuing on here is too much a waste of time.  smh
Yep.  You are reading that correctly.    Remember that the government is a corporation with $3Trillion in revenue.  People worry about the dishonest influence of corporations like Wal-Mart, but the government has 6x (wal-mart has annual revenue of about $486B) the amount of wealth.  This doesn't even count the money that we don't see or that they can literally print money and hand it out to their friends (see:  the banks).  That is a lot of wealth and power... too much, if you ask me.
There's some saying about correlation and causation, but I can't quite remember what it is...
what makes you think the death certificate is fraudulent?
i have a question about the flat earth
i think you cant get your kid a shot until 1-3 months after its born that's why parents worry I asked my sister that exact question (she has kids) and this was her answer. 
Does it?  ---  **There is very little contemporary evidence, meeting the review's inclusion criteria, that has evaluated the effectiveness of water fluoridation for the prevention of caries.**  The available data come predominantly from studies conducted prior to 1975, and indicate that water fluoridation is effective at reducing caries levels in both deciduous and permanent dentition in children. Our confidence in the size of the effect estimates is limited by the observational nature of the study designs, the high risk of bias within the studies and, importantly, the applicability of the evidence to current lifestyles. The decision to implement a water fluoridation programme relies upon an understanding of the population's oral health behaviour (e.g. use of fluoride toothpaste), the availability and uptake of other caries prevention strategies, their diet and consumption of tap water and the movement/migration of the population. **There is insufficient evidence to determine whether water fluoridation results in a change in disparities in caries levels across SES. We did not identify any evidence, meeting the review's inclusion criteria, to determine the effectiveness of water fluoridation for preventing caries in adults.**  **There is insufficient information to determine the effect on caries levels of stopping water fluoridation programmes.**  **There is a significant association between dental fluorosis (of aesthetic concern or all levels of dental fluorosis) and fluoride level.** The evidence is limited due to high risk of bias within the studies and substantial between-study variation.
[deleted]
Cheers.
&gt; I never understood how people could think DRINKING fluoride would prevent cavities. Fluoride only works if applied to the surface of your teeth.  Good question. I'd be interested in talking about that, if you're open to discussion.  There is a constant chemical equilibrium between hydroxylapatite (a component of tooth enamel) and fluorapatite (the form of hydroxylapatite that is resistant to acid erosion), driven by the loss of the fluoride ion from fluorapatite. The higher the [ F^+ ] (concentration of fluoride ions), the more this equilibrium tends toward fluorapatite.  The idea with fluoridated water is to try to shift that equilibrium toward fluorapatite as frequently as possible by exposing tooth surfaces to fluoride ions throughout the day (when drinking water, eating food made with fluoridated water, brushing with fluoridated toothpaste, etc).  &gt; It's toxic if ingested, just read any toothpaste tube.  Indeed. Fluoridated toothpaste contains ~1000-1100 PPM F^+ , while municipal water fluoridation aims for a concentration around 0.7 PPM F^+ . That's a pretty significant difference in dosage to say the least. The LD50 of NaCl (table salt) is 3 g/kg, so for an 70 kg person that would be ~450 g. An intake of 1 g of salt per day isn't unheard of, but taking 1000 X that dosage and ingesting 1 kg of salt would almost certainly kill you (assuming you were able to prevent vomiting).  The levels recommended for municipal water supplies are well below the point of toxicity that would result from (e.g.) eating a tube of toothpaste. They strike a balance between prevention of cavities and the occurrence of dental fluorosis (cosmetic discoloration of the tooth due caused by fluoride), but they are far below the levels of non-cosmetic harm.  In fact, the original study showing the effectiveness of fluoridation was done by someone studying rates of fluorosis in communities with naturally high levels of fluoride. He found that those communities had strikingly lower rates of dental cavities, an effect that can be seen to this day in regions that don't generally fluoridate their water but have varying background levels of fluoride (e.g. some areas in Ontario, Canada).  Here's one [source](https://www.cda-adc.ca/jcda/vol-75/issue-6/451.pdf) where I'm getting my information, but there are thousands of research papers and many review papers in PubMed/Google Scholar on the subject.  As for the article: It's behind a paywall. Can someone with access to it paste a link to their original source, or provide author(s) and a title of the original research? I'd like to read it. The benefits of municipal fluoridation have been extremely well supported by evidence. I'd like to see where this article is getting its information.
The Spaceman!
I remember her. The video was very disturbing. 
&gt;Just ONE!!  Well, I think we're done here.
comments on that article are disgusting 
So I don't get the connection to an ISIS attack in Miami Beach,  other then the chief of police moving there from Aurora.  Is that the only thing which is making you worry about an attack in Miami on July 4th?
I would like to know how many of those who have life-threatening or fatal complications are also on daily steroids or other immunosuppressive medications. So many people are on them and doctors don't confer the true meaning of what an "increased chance of severe infection" truly means when exposed to certain bacteria prevalent in the natural environment. 
Geez what did she do, ask for help?
Fuck _everything_ about this. The cop had her on the ground, got up, pulled out his weapon, then waited for her to get up and do something so he could kill her. 
1 in 50 is too many
Key figures get paid off, but Japan can be good, they stopped the HPV vaccine program and they also banned the MMR
Oh I read them. I'll pick out a few at random.  Number 18: I see a lot of talk about mercury but no conclusions.  Number 30: Clicking the link literally tells me the results are inconclusive. The results it does give, however, says that Mercury can cause brain damage. Yeah, no shit.  Number 57: Again, inconclusive. They say that mercury and one other ingredient in old, defunct vaccines *may* cause autism. My links all say that vaccines definitively do not cause autism.   But you didn't read them because nothing will ever change your mind. Alas, I am a shill.
No and no. It will be public for months before the vote.  The words "blue in the face" come to mind.
This petition is being fucked with. Switch to a new platform. This POST has gone up by 3000 upvotes, and the count on the petition has gone up by 400.  J
Watch this https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KnyPsKw_gak
That would be great too. In the animal world their narcotic reaction is not quite the same as ours because they don't understand being "high", for them it's just scary for the most part, so we just make them go to sleep. Humans on the other hand would probably love it. 
How does that statement say the constitution is hogwash? I don't see that it comments on the constitution itself at all. It just says that in the event of a conflict between treaties and US law, the more recent prevails.  
The flat earth theory is actually very sound and well argued. I wouldn't pay too much attention to the flat earth society though as I heard there's a whole bunch of disinfo floating around over there. The entire movement is full of suspicious trolls and disinfo but that just begs the question: who is trying to dilute all the truth? Trust me, if you sift through the religion (interesting but not factual) and get to stuff like GPS plane routes and Bedford Level experiment it gets really interesting.
She was murdered without a doubt. 
&gt; The explanation does not cover the collapse itself. This is a fact.  False.  Collapse initiation is analyzed in detail for WTC1 and 2.
[deleted]
[deleted]
oh please.. you dont give two fucks about that white girl that got killed by the police.. what the fuck does all that bullshit you typed have to do what I just wrote?
Thank you for clearly articulating my frustration with this post. 
Guess we all have our "luxuries." 
Yet here you are on Reddit. Which is totally so much more secure than Facebook! #2edgy4u
[deleted]
I'm sorry I'm not familiar with US constitutional law.   &gt; Regardless of your 'facts' about the 'benefits' of fluoridating public water supplies  Why the scare quotes around these words?  
&gt; Why the scare quotes around these words?  Because it's meaningless information (laden with legal implications) if the basic premiss isn't answered.  In other words, you're putting the cart before the horse.  Do I have a right to decide what I put into my body? Or, is that the duty of the State regulate?
This should be one of those copy+paste that people make fun of  You failed to prove any kind of point and I specifically asked you to prove your claims. Bringing in anything else is pointless, I asked you to do something and you failed to do it. You're an idiot, I'm sorry man. I really am. But you're a bonafide idiot.  You started the conversation, claimed something, and can't prove anything. Is that an extra chromosome I see?   Loser who posts on /r/conspiracy thinks he has a better life than other people. Tells people to kill themselves over the internet because his feeble mind can't grasp complex ideas. You're destined for a life of struggling. not because of your ideas, but because you're just so fucking *stupid*   You are the reason people laugh at this sub, and you have only proved my point further. Child.   "But but the guvment surpressed ur education!!!" Give me a break. Just because I ask you to prove that the recent shooting was a hoax (which you *cant do*) doesn't mean anything about the "government" and "education" it only means you're a dumbfuck way in over his head. Lose an argument gracefully 
I seem to remember a very old russian Sam system in serbia that took down the f117, a plane with better radar masking tech than current US fighters.  One can only wonder what a moden SAM could do.
/r/gravenews
Yeah! Good for you, don't back down. Really show him how much of a racist you are! Go full racist even!
Is [this](https://youtube.com/watch?v=uXwRgnZ990I) you?
indeed there are a lot of conspiracy theories completely fabricated and periodically pushed in front to discredit the real important stuff.  as always use common sense and **understand priorities.**  Is earth flat? Even if it is, it always was like this then and will not go anywhere, meanwhile we should fix the important urgent crap we are dealing with at the moment, then we can check this flat earth theory.
Young people don't time or money for the extra-curricular activities that people used to do; the federal reserve-Wall Street wealth extraction machine has cleaned them out and stolen their future.
I will look it up. 
Very Christian like of you. 
Thank you for that
The military exercise is exstensive because of what it is training. Its mainly special forces and its evasion tactics. Overseas, our troops have found themselves in situations where they need to eacape an area quietly and quickly. This exercise is to do just that. States are labeled "hostile" because the soldier/s are to pretend theyre in a hostile state and have to make it to a safe zone through any means nwcessary. All the equipment is to give the soldiers a realistic training of war. Tanks, helicopters, bases, etc are all things you can encounter when trying to escape a country.
And also the hollow moon theory too. 
&gt; Tl;Dr - doctors have misdiagnosed ulcers, didn't get a cure till I suggested something I read on the Internet.   Happened to me... I was sick and my doctor told me it was because I was anorexic (clinical anorexia because I only consumed 600-900 cals a day) went to 3 different doctors, finally found one that listened and took what I said into consideration. Turns out I had C. diff, not a side effect from anorexia.   
A bog-standard cellular tower. They're frequently hidden in flag poles, lamp posts, water towers, etc.
Jade Helm is a joke. Its the new "FEMA Camps OMG!!" The only problem is the Youtubers who are making money off you watching their videos can't use "FEMA Camp 2015" in their titles and descriptions because its played out. As I told my brother last year when he was trying to convince me that FEMA was coming for us and told me to google "FEMA Camps 2014," I said, "Dude, google FEMA Camps 2012 and 2013. Its the same bullshit every year."  Downvote away and keep living in FEARMA suckers...
Heard this yesterday....      Are the attorney's allowed to see it also under gag order?
Thats the one!
[deleted]
The race narrative is real, even if it is focused on by the media. - It would be helpful if "Whites" who see themselves as separate from Blacks would stop seeing themselves as separate.
[deleted]
That's your opinion and I can respect that.
Yes.  I compared the revenue to each other and then pointed out how much wealth that can be.  You are correct, revenue and wealth are not the same but also obviously related, however that doesn't change the fundamental point.
Don't get caught, you aren't getting a trial.
[deleted]
I am both relieved and a little bit sad. 
The tides. How do you Flat Earth people explain the tides? And no, I'm not going to go look it up for myself. In proper logical debate the burden of proof rests on the person making the claim. If you do not supply proof you are arguing the arbitrary and the argument is discarded by default. So please tell me, how are the tides generated on a Flat Earth?
Yup. That TPP board is a good idea for helping spread info to those of us that already know what the TPP is, but it doesn't help when it comes to the dilemma that the majority of the user base here won't even hear about that board or that the TPP  even exists until it's too late.
How do you tag people? I cannot figure that out..
[deleted]
Separation of powers and economies to serve as a safeguard against power concentration and as a firewall to imploding mismanaged economies. 
Instead induce an autoimmune disease by getting vaccinated, you'll be sick for the rest of your life instead of for just 1 week
Yup. Israel is the puppet master behind all of this constructed terrorism and governmental manipulation.
Careful about anyone who calls you buddy.   https://np.reddit.com/r/LimitedHangouts/comments/3bqv8e/one_of_our_favorite_users_who_was_caught_gaming/
You want to solve this shit? Pithchforks, fire, and rage.  We have seen what half assed and peaceful protests accomplish.
[For those who haven't seen her assault and murder.](https://youtu.be/aVfPxHu8ZmU)
It's actually an international treaty, which supersedes national laws.   A *lot* of people don't know anything about this, just vote for incumbents, vote on the party line and/or don't vote at all, so it's not likely that these legislators will get kicked out.  Not to mention, while congressmen are allowed to *see* the TPP, they can't take pictures of it, take it out of the room it's in, or take anyone in there to see it with them.  Congress aren't the ones hashing out the deal itself, they just approve fast-tracking whatever it is ends up coming out of the negotiations.  Finally, here's a fun fact: a recent Princeton/Northwestern study says that [congress actually doesn't represent our interests at all.](https://represent.us/action/theproblem-4/)
I love how the mods put the ''misleading title'' thing. Gotta love how they treat some users and how they leave others in peace. Remember that one dude with 1 post posted 3 times with different titles 
Yes, "owned up" after the IMF threatened to liquidate their banking system, and doing pretty good only because of the support of the UK. Not because of austerity but in spite of it. 
What's with all the hidden scores?
[deleted]
[deleted]
you appear to be a moronic fuckwhit
No it isn't. 
Youre talking like you dont have tv in your country, or like in any country u can vote for more than 2 parties.. I never knew any of the candidates, and if u vote for someone else than the 2 popular is like your vote goes to waste.. Voting makes no difference, and if u think that when these things happen u should blame the people ure in a deep darkness. Its like me blaming a german guy for all these sh*t.. this is ignorant af
Not only bitcoins would be illegal. Money transactions between your internetbank and whatever you want to buy uses encryptions but I guess he doesn't know that. 
They also still believe that flag is the confederate flag. That's just the semi-adopted battle flag. *[This is the confederate flag](https://shard2.1stdibs.us.com/archivesE/upload/8497/06_14/fcj872flag3001500w/fcj872flag3001500w_l.jpg)*. Well, last one anyway.
both sides of the flat earth argument are fakes... it's bs
maybe you didnt get it? the titanic was deemed 'unsinkable' by all of the engineers, but y'know.
I accept your apology, at least you know you are projecting your racism. Being 13 sure It explains why you hang out in the race-baiting subs. If you can hear me "talk," even though I'm typing, you might have bigger problems than your racism. If you weren't ashamed by the truth, you wouldn't be accusing me of stalking. You are a racist, race baiter and not surprising an obama stooge. Sorry again for triggering you...deep breaths and maybe seek advice/help from a mental health representative?
just because a certain 'vaccine' can hopefully induce an immune response semi-effectively after someone gets a disease/infection... this doesn't mean we need to preemptively give children an alphabet of 'vaccines' to save them from the sick monster ... AND from the mountains of evidence we have seen so far these 'vaccines' are doing more harm than good IPSOFACTO if the govt is requiring that children are given these innumerable, harmful, unhelpful 'vaccines' they are NOT doing any of this in the interest of the general public/health, but SIMPLY to LINE THE POCKETS of BIG PHARMA!!! PLAIN AND SIMPLE!!!! WE SHOULD ALL BE SOOO MAD ABOUT THIS!!!! 
Unfortunately I had little to no knowlege of their existance. 
Thats a lie , thimerasol is still being used . The influenza vaccine still uses it and it is used in many other if not all vaccines in trace amounts . Not to mention Aluminum and a whole host of other additives .  
&gt; Just a crazy idea but isn't that what this sub is for??  No.
I was in UP Michigan last week and saw the orange moon Sunday night, I'm in Georgia now and saw the same orange moon last night. Is the whole country seeing an orange moon then? Are there THAT many more wildfires than usual? 
The camera lags JUST before it comes into sight, the next frame you see is the actual explosion. The camera runs perfectly smooth after that, and it's easy enough to delete some frames from a video, and then stretch out some others to make it look laggy.
We forgot about what the confederacy did as a means of reunifying the union. Slavery? Water under the bridge, we are all Americans again! 
and I presume you have the same thoughts on prohibition, since they are exactly the same thing right? just your own body, doesn't affect anyone else, do what you want.  when 'do nothing' is no longer an option, someone has to choose. this is where you present a better option, not just admonish those you believe chose wrong.  hint: there's only one other alternative, and it's way worse than this imo
I thought you seemed mentally challenged before...now, wow...truly an impressive level. It's almost cute.  What does being in your mobile home have to do with typos? Asbestos or something? Mom smoking the crack rock again?  What grade did you say you are you going to be in after the summer?  
Iceland re-elected the parties that landed them in the mess in the first place. 
I can attest to the law preventing testing out of high school. In 10th grade I could have easily passed a GED test and gone straight to college, but in Pennsylvania, a person is not allowed to take a GED test until their class graduates.  I went to community college for two years, received an A.A., 3.81 GPA. Had zero financial aid. The colleges I applied to for transfer weren't offering me any either. I ended up having to go to work to pay off debts, as well as a hold on my record (that was not my fault, nor made known to me until after I had graduated) that prevented me access to my transcripts. Fast forward 8 years. I still haven't gone back to college.  I think this system is bullshit. The only job I found that paid decently was a union job for a petroleum refinery. If you're willing to accept the petroleum industry rapes the end user (no matter what they tell you) and pumps the oceans and atmosphere and earth full of toxins, then it's the industry for you. I left three months ago. I don't want to ever work in that industry again.  No idea what to do now. The uneducated employment world is terrible, and education (even merely technical schools) are incredibly expensive. Trade unions are affordable (usually free training plus work wages) but they involve insane amounts of travel and very little time to sleep/recuperate when you are an apprentice.  I'm incredibly disillusioned with this world today.
I'm very interested in this topic. There are a few possibilities; everyone is in on it, no one is, or some of them are and some aren't (anyone famous or influential; politicians, musicians, actors, religious and cultural leaders). I think the best course of action is to "believe" nothing. Just go with what feels right and true and best for everyone. A lot of people, in my opinion, wouldn't need the UN or the NWO to tell them to abuse money and their own influence; they would just do it themselves. I really really doubt Jay-Z has a lot of knowledge about the ins and outs of the secret government but everyone acts like he does; because he wears the clothes and walks the walk. He sold out. That's all they want; keep the distraction going. I would say trust yourself and take everyone else with a grain of salt. Let people earn your trust, really earn it. If they're dead, they're quite a bit more likely to have been on our team. 
They're part of the same pyramid, that's why the ones in control gave Israel back to the Jews in 1949, they're orchestrating the book of revelation.   They're all luciferians at the top, some might be Zionist, or masons, or heads of state, or even church officials, but they've all made an oath to the agenda.  David icke is definitely worth listening to.
&gt;official propaganda  FTFY
Im against all vaccines. The idea of a vaccination is not even sound. Vaccines only give you temporary immunity if that but long term it actually weakens your immune system. All vaccines contain antigens which in theory when injected into the body it produces a reaction and the immune system responds by releasing antibodies, but antibody presence does not mean immunity. People still catch the diseases that they are vaccinated against. Vaccines actually skip the normal immune responses to activate killer cells which can trigger an overproduction of cytokines in response to the toxic vaccine adjuvants (aluminium, formaldehyde, gluteraldehyde etc) and can damage tissues and organs and even stop the heart and block air pathways. Over time the immune system doesn't carry out its normal response to a new infection so gets weaker hence a lot of people get re-infected.  Eating natural foods which contain antioxidants: minerals and vitamins are the nutrients to all white blood cells and bone marrow in general is the best way to boost your immune system. Thats what schools should be informing its students of.
Actually, most of the time it's a new user.  However, in the case of this thread, there were 2 hidden comments. One was a new user and one indeed was shadowbanned.
Do you know how google works? It gives you links to websites with relevant content to what you search for. In this case, it was very useful to find a website with relevant information. You do not read things on google.
You have an article with countless things on it that NASA has done, many of which you are benefiting from right now.
Good thing polls are fake and votes don't really count :D 
&gt; The guy who left the scene, destroyed evidence, and turned his own gun in, which was never tested for fingerprints?  We're making things up now?
The symbols used by elites are related to mystery Babylon religion and Kabbalah, both of which have their origins in Egypt. The Kabbalah itself is not "satanic," but the Kabbalah does concern itself with metaphysics, which is considered apostasy in accordance with Christian or traditional, Torah Jewish faiths.  One of the primary goals of the Knights Templars was to find and learn of the Kabbalah and other sacred "Jewish" texts. They found some within the Temple of Solomon and it has been discovered that the Templars conducted extensive excavations below Solomon's Temple in attempts to discover more texts. You can find some pictures of Templar graffiti in the shape of the Kabbalah online. So partly why the Templars began to deviate away from Christianity was their discovery of Kabbalah and related texts and artifacts.  Through their Crusades, the Templars adopted the practices of the Ismaili Hashashins (i.e. assassins) and would later incorporate these systems learned of from the Hashashins into later historical secret societies.   When the Templars were suppressed by the Papacy, they fled to various parts of Europe, most notably Scotland and Spain. In Scotland, the Templars made a secret society that was intended to continue some aspects of Templarism and they called it Scottish Rite Freemasonry. This was the original form of Freemasonry, and was not nefarious in nature.   By the time of the Protestant Reformation, the Papacy sought to use the Spanish Templars to covertly revive the Order and reinitialize their historic allegiance to the Pope in order to wage war against Protestants, heretics and liberals. The early Templar military Orders in Spain existing during the 12th century such as the Order of Montesa and the Order of Calatrava would eventually form a secret society known as "Los Alumbrados" (meaning "the enlightened ones"). A Basque nobility Templar member of the Los Alumbrados named Ignatius Loyola would be used by Venetian-Papal Nobility including the Spanish Grandee Francis Borgia and the Pope at the time, Alessandro Farnese to fully revive the Knights Templars under a different name. With the commissioning from Farnese (Pope Paul III) and the financing coming from Borgia, The Society of Jesus was created with Loyola to head up the Order. The Society of Jesus is also known as the Jesuit Order.  Starting in 1754 in the Jesuit College of Clermont in Paris, the Jesuit revived Templars would re-author the Rites of what is now known as Scottish Rite Freemasonry, which they dubbed the "Ancient and Accepted Scottish Rite of Freemasonry." This effectively hijacked the original Scottish Masonry started by exiled Templars who were at the time not in association with the Pope. The Jesuits wrote the first 25 Rites of contemporary Scottish Rite Masonry in 1754 and later in the 1780s during their suppression by Pope Clement XIV, they would complete the last eight Rites in Prussia under Frederick II who gave them refuge.  The 17th century also saw the rise to prominence of a  proclaimed Jewish messiah, Sabbatai Zevi. The followers of this Jewish apostate movement became known as Sabbateans and were Kabbalists. In the 18th century, Jacob Frank would claim to be the reincarnation of Zevi  and gained his own Hebrew followers (known today as Sabbatean Frankists). At this time, in 1776, the Bavarian Illuminati was formed by the Jesuits which made accord between the Masonic, Sabbatean House of Rothschild and the Jesuit Papacy. Truth be told, the Sabbatean Frankists were in league with the Jesuit Order’s Bavarian Illuminati. With the King of Poland serving as his sponsor, Frank was baptized into the Roman Catholic institution as were all of his Hebrew followers.   Shortly after this time, the Order imported the French Revolution from Bavaria into France, later giving way to the rise of Napoleon and his Consulate. On this three-man triumvirate were First Consul Napoleon himself, Second Consul Jesuit Abby Sieyes and Third Consul Roger Ducos. Napoleon was guided by Sieyes in all his campaigns, especially during his campaign in North Africa and in Palestine. For Napoleon, the Great Jesuit Avenger, on the advice of his Jesuit master sought to make Palestine “a homeland for the Jews.” This is where the political movement of Labor Zionism originates from. Note that today, Sabbatean-Frankist, Masonic Labor Zionists are the ones who control the Israeli government for the Jesuit Papacy. They are the modern equivalent of Papal Court Jews. Napoleon was really the first Masonic Labor Zionist leading the movement for Jews to repopulate their promised land for the benefit of the Jesuit Papacy yet to be restored in 1814.   During the 19th century, after the Order had completely gained control of both the British Crown and Parliament, the Jesuits' socialist-communist British Fabian Socialists gave birth to the socialist-communist British Labor Party and hence to the socialist-communist Jewish Labor Party of the historic Masonic Jewish Labor Zionists. The leader of the Masonic Jewish Labor Zionists was Theodor Herzl, the Jew who led the fight to found a new Jewish State in historic Palestine after the Jesuit-concocted Dreyfus Affair, it to be a rebirth of the historic nation of Israel. The real purpose for the establishment of a Jewish homeland was to revive the Knights Templars’ Latin Kingdom of Jerusalem (AD 1099-1291)—for the benefit of the Pope, the Pope overseen and captive to the Jesuit Superior General, the Grand Master of this new Knights Templar. These Masonic Jewish Labor Zionists rule Israel for the benefit of Rome, not for the benefit of the racial Hebrew/Jewish/Israelite people in Israel. The Labor Zionists are completely in the arms of the Jesuit Papacy and are in fact Jesuit Temporal Coadjutors. Nazi Germany was a creation of the Jesuits which is in itself quite a lengthy topic and beyond the scope of this discussion, but Labor Zionism was the only type of Zionism allowed under Roman Catholic Adolf Hitler whose Third Reich would work with the Labor Zionists to establish the State of Israel (again, for the Benefit of Rome).   Continuing along, there is the founding of the CIA by two Roman Catholic Papal Knights of Malta, one being the former Nazi SS chief intelligence officer for Hitler, Reinhard Gehlen. Gehlen was responsible for also training and setting up the Israeli Mossad intelligence agency, this according to John Loftus.  Today, we see that top government positions are occupied by Jesuit-trained/Jesuit-alumni, Roman Catholics and Papal Knights. The DHS which arose from 9/11 is one prime example, having been created and subsequently controlled by Jesuit-trained Roman Catholics Knights of Columbus and SMOM members such as John Gannon, Emilio Gonzales, Randy Beardsworth, Tom Ridge and Janet Napolitano.  So it is the revived Knights Templars - the Jesuits, who are truly in control of this world via their Masonic networks and loyal Papal Knights (that includes the Rothschilds who are members of various Papal Knighthoods and hold the title "Guardians of the Papal Treasure" as per the 1906 Jewish Encyclopedia).  Now for a plug: please visit my sub, r/romerules for more info! 
[deleted]
Dr. Steven Greer does the best job out of what I've seen.
Because I've actually tried shit like this out on random crowds, results will vary based on location.  He just happens to have some of the dumbest genpop on the prison planet in his back yard.
We better ban the American and Israeli flags then too
Not unless it's being properly utilized. 
It IS well-documented. Why, then, was it falsified in this and many other cases? And why does it continue to be falsified?
I think you're spot on.
18 trillion is to much to begin with and sarcasm is hard to type out.   As far as the system. I thought it worked where they use money by lines of credit? They gave a group 5 billion out the 18 trillie to function (lol), so the money issued isn't used yet. If the group needs more they'll just give them more and that's how we go over budget. I try not to give to much thought into the circus of money. I know it's worthless garbage. 
interesting....the more i research...the more this scares me
Seems silly to still call it /r/all... Was this a recent change? 
Seems silly to still call it /r/all... Was this a recent change? 
No way, she's from Hollywood and we can't trust their opinions!  /s  She's a flippin' Neuroscientist, I think she knows a bit more than the average actor/actress.
I believe the term is "ass blast"
Rule 4. Removed.
[deleted]
Excellent.  Now transpose to hip-hop.
&gt;Printing money out of thin air is different to borrowing money.  The only difference is who pays the interest. There's literally no other difference. Interest on printed money is paid via inflation by people who are ultimately enslaved to it.
Well written.
Haha you're amazing dude, you do realize that any rattling on earth when traveling is caused by friction from air molecules, something that is not there in space sooo.....
I don't either. I don't mess with msm.
If you yell fire in a theater and there isn't one, you are liable for damages.   AKA, your point about freedom of speech is irrelevant.  No law that mandates what you put into your body under duress is just. The same as how any law mandating what you cannot put into your body is not just. Think Drug War; your opinion is the exact kind of thought that lets these things continue.  No one else has the right to dictate what I can ingest, or what I refuse to. Anyone saying otherwise is making a claim on my sovereign, one they have no right to make.  Herd immunity is a bunk concept. What is the percentage exactly? Your mandated vaccine may indeed harm your child, else things like the [NVICP](http://www.hrsa.gov/vaccinecompensation/index.html) wouldn't exist, because you cannot sue the manufacturer of the vaccine directly. Why would they need to lobby for legislation that protects them from due process?  Do you think that perhaps a company might continue to push a product they knew was harmful or dangerous regardless of potential backlash or lost profits upon discovery by the public?  My opinion rests on the massive historical context of such events.
If a parent chooses to home school they get a refund....
Oh my gosh this is so sad :( 
Suppose the news of the day had been "the Pentagon was struck by a cruise missile, that had an armor-penetrating mechanism and was able to penetrate 9 total feet of reinforced concrete, in 6 18-inch-thick sections, including the steel-reinforced and armored outer wall."  Would you have believed the news telling you that the feds had information that the cruise missile had been fired by a group of self-trained Arabs?  It seems kind of implausible to me.  Therefore, the perpetrators of 9/11, who did use a cruise missile, needed to make the claim (a cover-up) that a jet created the damage.  This cover-up made a coherent image of hijacked planes used as weapons.  The pre-existing Tom Clancy predictive programming (Executive Order is the name of the book) prepared the Infragard for the "reality" of planes into buildings, followed by Executive Orders.  Most of the people who agree the buildings were obviously demolished are Infragard.  You're preaching to a choir whose songbook you haven't read. 
[TOO MUCH MONEY](http://imgur.com/HU2DsJJ)
There are at least a million of these threads already. C'mon, man.
Good point. I just cant believe that out of no where the US is all of the sudden trying to be best buds. I am pretty sure there is something we dont know about.
Rank the Vote.  http://fairvote.org  /r/electionreform   /r/irv
I mean just because they couldn't model it on computer doesn't mean it didn't happen.. I haven't seen any 911truth computer models either.. 
I wonder as well
Bernie Sanders? Is he really the lesser of the evils? 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C6G4ubiFTgs
I don't buy flat earth. I agree OP has good questions. I just see more questions arising about flat earth than a globe.   Your question is easy to answer. Flat Earth, with celestial bodies orbiting it places is at the center of the universe. Children grow to citizens believing we are the central creation of everything. You may be less inclined to torture "enemy combatants" for heroin profits if you realized the whole universe was observing an act that lives on for eternity.   A society that develops around an understanding that our lives are ordained and eternal makes appropriate complementary decisions in regards to its interactions. But a society adrift, randomly generated and destined for oblivion in a sea of potential extraterrestrial life, provides a foundation for the elevation of material over spiritual.   I think it was just 17 shaolin monks that withstood an army of 421. If instead of crippling spiritual belief, science explicitly promoted it, such monasteries would have developed into disconnected but mutually respectful city states at the cost of monarchies, large governments and large religions.
Who do you think lobbied for the law.
&gt; And heads of charities, especially massive popular charities, have a long history of fraud, abuse, and even molesting multiple children.   How is that relevant to the discussion?
He's currently filming "Mena" where he plays Barry Seal, CIA drug runner.  Controversial stuff, which is why you aren't hearing much about it, like when Jeremy Renner starred in Kill the Messenger.  Mena: http://www.imdb.com/title/tt3532216/?ref_=nm_flmg_act_1
I'm assuming most people don't know this fact. This lack of knowledge would cloud a person's judgement about accusations against a charity because most people think "moral" when they hear the word "charity" or "non-profit," etc.   The same would go for a person who has never heard of any accusations against priests, then a person comes along and claims the church is misusing funds. They would think "yea right, it's a church!"
&gt;sort of comparing apples to oranges here because /pol/ discusses all current events.   About 95% of all /pol/ posts are repeating slider-threads. While this may sound alien to newcomers, for those that dwelled in /pol/ for a multitude of years you'd know its a neverending spiral of the same old story held together by a set of paradigms which determines what is cool and what isn't.   &gt;actually /pol/ is full of anti-semitism. it's one of the things i had in mind when was warning the dude that he might not like what he sees.   That's true, It indeed is a place full of anti-semitism and bigotry. And guess what? Being openly critical towards Israeli atrocities does not equal anti-semitism. /r/conspiracy offers compelling dialogue and tracability where people discuss recent events and correlates them with past events. I'm not saying this doesn't exist in /pol/, but the demographic that lives there is more interested in coming off as edgy using racial slurs rather than stimulating thoughts and sharing bright ideas.     &gt;also, /r/conspiracy has become completely distracted by reddit conspiracies instead of focusing on actual corporate and government conspiracies. i'd much rather participate in a discussion on conspiracies where the website's own censorship isnt a major topic of discussion.  That's more of your personal assessment of what is and what is not a major topic of discussion. I personally think that /r/conspiracy is doing the community a service by showcasing the corruption that festers in reddit. By saying that this hub is distracted by it, you would devalue reddit to an extent that this issue is not worth tracking. In my opinion, that is a huge underestimation of the power of reddit, as it is primarily used by the new generation for news-feeds and "fun". Just like 9gag.   If you were to somehow manipulate the news-feed, you would influence the mind of the newer generation. And this is exactly what is happening in reddit. Every week there is some sort of bullshit story about the holohoax on the popular page, or something about the promotion of sodomy and other depraved acts as being healthy and empowering. Exposing this systematic abuse is incredibly important because that would help waking up the community, scratch that, the new generation. It would open their minds to how they are being gamed, not only on reddit, but by extension of logic also on other mediasources.   A second argument would be the preservation and integrity of this sub. Assessing how compromised the website is as a whole would determine whether or not it is worth staying on Reddit, or whether it is time to move on to the next beacon of free thought. Possibly even going underground.  &gt;as for hiveminds, i'd rather be on 4chan where i can at least express my opinion without being excluded from the conversation via downvotes.   That's a matter of taste. I personally like having a voting system, although I do recognize the potential of abuse where opinions get rigged, for better or worse.   Also, here you have some upvotes. Because some shill keeps downvoting everyone in this sub.      
[deleted]
read [this](http://www.independent.ie/business/irish/blackstone-boss-says-the-irish-cleaned-up-own-mess-31344997.html) article   learn something  On an estimated basis, from 2013-2018, Bloomberg figures show that Ireland’s debt-to-GDP ratio will fall by 13.5 percentage points.
Enough to keep humans busy. 
Here is a link with a chronological list with how things are going down. This source states that there wasn't even a 911 call until 7:30AM EST which is my local time as well.   http://www.wusa9.com/story/news/2015/07/02/navy-yard-shooting/29607377/
What is the relation between time in entropy? In detail. 
2500 to ditch citizenship 
[Wikileaks](https://search.wikileaks.org/advanced) has very good tools.  Also, get this [book](http://versobooks.com/books/1931-the-wikileaks-files) when it comes out.
I'm offended by the divisive nature of media, our government and ignorant people.   I'm offended that the oligarchy uses these tools to subvert our personal freedoms to expand their profits.   I'm offended that ignorance and apathy are killing America.
But, who is honestly going to do that with soldiers as police officers?
Surely someone knows about the nuclear deterrence plan Israel has, about striking the pillars and bringing down the temple? You know, the samson option? - It's kind of terrifying to know that plan exists. Especially since Iran is believed to have the capability to develop a nuclear weapon (or has, for all we know).      This timer doesn't really help my anxiety either, knowing that...
and that's how you bend over for the government, when you let them trample over your rights or as you put it "opinions"
Yes he does, here is a [link](http://www.forbes.com/sites/matthewherper/2011/11/02/the-second-coming-of-bill-gates/) to Gates admitting this.  &gt;That same epiphany for his public health philanthropy came even earlier. Bill’s dad had set up a dinner at Seattle’s posh Columbia Tower Club with the Program for Appropriate Technology in Health (PATH). While the meeting started with birth control—among other efforts, PATH taught Chinese condom makers to test their products before shipping them—Gates began consuming data that startled him. In society after society, he saw, when the mortality rate falls—specifically, below 10 deaths per 1,000 people—the birth rate follows, and population growth stabilizes. “It goes against common sense,” Gates says. Most parents don’t choose to have eight children because they want to have big families, it turns out, but because they know many of their children will die.  &gt;“If a mother and father know their child is going to live to adulthood, they start to naturally reduce their population size,” says Melinda.  &gt;In terms of giving, Gates did a 180-degree turn. Rather than prevent births, he would aim his billions at saving the kids already born. ***“We moved pretty heavily into vaccines once we understood that,” says Gates.***
Well, paper was fiat currency.  Plastic is numbers on a screen that you can't even see, designed so people spend more money than they even have.
because the jewish owned mass media and that's a narrative they dont want to push because that would in no way benefit them   the white people are evil nazis that's what their aiming for atm 
Weird, she was such a good shill too..
[deleted]
Great points; I am persuaded. Still might be more useful to use "Oligarchy" in less arcane forums, but I think you are right in that Ochlocracy is probably more accurate.
[How do you plan on enforcing it?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PGMQZEIXBMs)
[deleted]
No.
Try or don't try.  I don't care either way
There's a lot more of us than there are of them.
This has been around for a while. You can remotely wipe cellphones with things like WheresmyIphone, or Prey or even Google if you have Android, I'm not quite sure where the problem is. 
 http://portalseven.com/employment/unemployment_rate_u5.jsp  U5.  http://portalseven.com/employment/unemployment_rate_u3.jsp  U3.  http://portalseven.com/employment/unemployment_rate_u6.jsp  U6.  http://data.bls.gov/timeseries/LNS11300000  Here's labor, it has nothing to do with a lack of jobs or people not being able to find jobs.  http://cnsnews.com/news/article/ali-meyer/628-labor-force-participation-has-hovered-near-37-year-low-11-months  It's just baby boomers retiring. 
A lot of white corn is GMO. They use it for those white corn tortilla chips.
I get what you are saying, and I agree to a certain extent, but I think you're being a little too harsh.  Victoria enabled big stars who are on the promotional circuit to come to reddit.  Whether or not you think that's worthy content is subjective, but Victoria did enable big name celebs to do AMAs that never would have otherwise.  It also seemed like Victoria was very helpful on the administrative side, even with other subreddit AMAs.  It also seemed like she kept pure PR firms from faking AMAs which is a positive thing.  So, do we have no big name celebs come to reddit, or do we accept the necessary middle man position which enables that type of content?  My theory is:  Pao is there to make reddit money.  And as we know, money corrupts, so make no mistake, reddit IS dying.  How fast it dies is really dependent on how solid and tight the communities are.  I think they are stronger than digg's ever were, so reddit will hold on longer.    So Pao and co. thought, "why are we paying this woman to do AMAs, when celebrities who need help on their promotional circuit will get it from their PR firms, who will actually be doing the AMA, and the PR firms will pay US to feature their AMA on the front page, or on facebook, or whatever!".  (Or hell, even allow PR firms to pay reddit for mod powers during the AMAs--point is, the monetization potential on AMA is pretty big).  I highly doubt Victoria was stealing or doing something illegal at reddit.  I HIGHLY doubt reddit is doing this to enhance the quality of the subreddit.  She probably wasn't fired for political reasons, unless there's some kind of behind the scenes personal beefs going on, and she doesn't seem like a political zealot with controversial opinions.  So, that leaves one thing in my mind: money.
Here's my local version, with said super creepy spot.  http://www.whio.com/news/news/national/fbi-homeland-security-july-fourth-terror-attacks-p/nmnn5/
&gt; a reduction in population growth  all very Malthusian, and of course its annoying _minorities_ domestically and pesky brown peoples overseas sitting on natural resources that need 'reducing'
What is the common explanation for the photoshop issue? That's pretty fucked up. 
That the program XKEYSCORE existed was revealed 2 years ago, but that it collects documents, voice calls, and usernames/passwords just came out.
[deleted]
Tell me which sub isn't an echo-chamber. The only difference between this sub and most of the others is that free speech is still allowed in here. This doesn't make your argument into something special.  I'd rather have to deal with this echo-chamber and weed through the bigfoot BS and actually learn something and get some real news than read massive amounts of propaganda in another sub and learn absolutely nothing. Stick to your r/GMO sub or wherever you come from. I'm sure you will find it more to your tastes.      hehe tastes
God you fucktard the gas chamber was underground. Do some research before disputing well known facts.
First things first, a [CNN iReport](http://ireport.cnn.com/docs/DOC-1164046) is not exactly a reliable source. Second, stating that data was omitted it nowhere near to admitting "to being part of [a] cover-up". Finally, and most importantly, even if one study is reversed or discredited, this is part of the scientific process and doesn't invalidate the numerous [other](http://journals.lww.com/pidj/Abstract/2000/03000/Efficacy,_safety_and_immunogenicity_of_heptavalent.3.aspx) [studies](http://cid.oxfordjournals.org/content/24/5/925.short) [demonstrating](http://journals.cambridge.org/action/displayAbstract?fromPage=online&amp;aid=39893&amp;fileId=S0950268899002666) [vaccines](http://jvi.asm.org/content/74/22/10287.short), [while](http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S014067368790540X) [not](http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0264410X0601214X) [without](http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0264410X09002941) [some](http://archpedi.jamanetwork.com/article.aspx?articleid=190443) [risks](http://www.nejm.org/doi/full/10.1056/NEJMoa003077), [are](http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140673609618778) [generally](http://jama.jamanetwork.com/article.aspx?articleid=203797) [safe](http://jama.jamanetwork.com/article.aspx?articleid=184421).
Wow, how desperate.  This is really embarrassing for you.
/r/gaming now too.
[No] (https://np.reddit.com/r/OutOfTheLoop/comments/3bw39q/why_has_riama_been_set_to_private/csq204d)
Short post, but you made fives mistakes.  (1) It's not Malthusian at all. In fact, just the opposite: It's about assuring stable populations and *preventing* Malthusianism. (I.e., preventing a forced reduction in population.)  (2) It has nothing -- absolutely nothing -- to do with domestic populations. This is entirely about 3rd world populations with high mortality rates. (Specifically, mortality rates in excess of "10 deaths per 1,000 people.")  (3) It has nothing to do with skin color.  (4) It has nothing to do with natural resources.  (5) It has nothing to do with "reducing" populations; it is about stabilizing population growth, i.e., preventing the explosive population growth we see today in the poorest areas of the world, population growth that leads to some of the greatest suffering on the planet.  This is about bringing the poorest populations on the planet, those with high infant mortality rates, into the modern world so that the mortality rates drop and the quality of life enjoyed by people in the 3rd world can begin to approach the quality of life we enjoy in the 1st world.  You can have as many crazy theories about Gates planning depopulation as you like, but do not pretend they are based on anything Gates has said, or any evidence you've collected, because the meaning of what Gates said is perfectly clear, and it completely contradicts your reading.
I wonder if this isn't retaliation from the sub reddit mods against the firing of Victoria.  This makes reddit look absolutely mickey mouse as shit and will certainly hurt the bottom line if they cant get corporate donors and celebrities to come here.
75% of /r/all seems to be just reposts of /u/Gallowboob 
Solidarity, I suppose.  I think this sub should too.    I didn't participate in AMA's.  I just want to see the admins open a dialogue with the users.
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&amp;apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
Look how heavily this stuff is being downvoted, it's insane.  There is clearly a shill campaign on /r/conspiracy right now too.
Fucking ew. 
search engine optimization...basically how to spin-move around Google.
The discussion seems to be at  /r/OutOfTheLoop   It's better to shut down so all the discussion can be in one place, not split among dozens or hundreds of subreddits. 
What are the chances that they gathered a lot of dirt on politicians or judges to blackmail them?  Have we seen any weird voting or decision making that goes against their normal political stances?
[deleted]
bout fucking time, sooner its over with sooner all of them will be lynched, they better not miss anyone.
&gt;So, are you also proposing that Elie Weisel, Schindler's List, the Diary of Anne Frank, and all the other Holocaust stories are bullshit?  Elie Weisel is an outed fraud seen [here](http://www.eliewieseltattoo.com/the-evidence/photographic-evidence/gigantic-fraud-carried-out-for-wiesel-nobel-prize/)   Schindler's List is pretty obvious as it's quite literally a *work of fiction*. The book its based off of is a historical fiction novel written by someone who had little knowledge of these camps and admits the events were all his making.  The Diary of Anne Frank has been debated, the second half of her Diary was written in ballpoint pen which didn't even exist when she was alive [speculation says her father written it]. She existed, and died of typhus in the camps, but other then that not much is known of her.  &gt;all the other Holocaust stories are bullshit?  Most of them, to see factual story's from survivors look [here](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YVmIaBW-HjI)   
Yeah, New Zealand isn't the country to shout 'Freedom' from the rooftops.
You think Joe Schmo is going to profit from nationwide decriminilization? PHilip Morris already bought thousands of acres in NorCal, theyre going to flood the market with cheap GMO weed. No one is going to Joe when they can just get a pack of Grade A joints at Chevron for $6.00. Even the edible market will be dominated by the same big players in the food industry today. Theres no way in hell the elite are going to let Billions of dollars up for grabs. Their pieces are already in place. Hell, according to the TPP Joe Schmo could get sued for infringing upon their potential profits. The Keebler Elves are about to start cooking trees instead of living in them.
"They" want reddit down before the 4th and "they" are making if look and feel like reddit is doing this by choice. But really reddit is being gamed. Everyone should get away from private and instead put up a sticky in protest calling attention to whatever injustice they feel is being done. What reddit is a doing right now is giving itself no voice. 
Maybe its time for a PodCast ;)
I didn't archive it, sorry. But over at kotaku in action they're talking about it a ton.
If you want to live on a flat earth, all you need to do is believe it. You can live on a flat earth, and everyone else can live on a round one. How? That's the magic of reality ;)
https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3blb5n/second_gunman_at_aurora_shooting_identified/
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&amp;apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
[deleted]
That makes sense. It doesn't sound very fun to put a ton of time into researching but I suppose it'll be worth it. Thanks for the info
That is a good thing, I upvoted you
But it's all live, and happening now.
Are you being sarcastic? What about all those governments that killed millions of people? Not socialist enough?
Apparently so.  They don't like it one bit.
Because she was required to relocate to the West Coast and didn't want to move from NY. 
Nah the goal was always to imploded it get all things controlled. 
Right, so then what's good about socialism? Ending private property? 
[deleted]
How exactly will the problem be resolved? Like, what are you actually hoping for?
Yes.
My generation came too soon fo all that
Sexwithbears? 
You can't see anything except a door when you go to the subs.  No posting, no browsing.  
[deleted]
Totes okay with being a batshit crazy tinfoiler
Actually, I may need to print a correction. I'm getting hung up on this line, kind of ambiguous:  &gt; Oates was appointed Chief of Police on August 20, 2001 after serving 21 years in the New York Police Department.  Possibly CHIEF of Ann Arbor Michigan. But a career in NYPD. Lemme dig a bit more. Still fishy, but I wanna be correct.
[deleted]
I dunno, that might lead to some crazy theories. 
It's interesting. I'm not sure of the delay or what. On my main comp /r/punchablefaces is banned. On *reddit is fun* it's still accessible and active.
[deleted]
https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3byjpq/exploring_the_career_of_miami_beach_police_chief/
no need really , i could easily see how its offensive reading it again
[deleted]
That's one use, they only add the third element when they want to activate a certain region, but the constant spraying everywhere else means they can activate any zone they want at anytime quickly.
Yes. This is ridiculous
It would of been cool if those betrayed feeling mods would of told some of the users instead of me having to search for half an hour to figure out what happened.    edit: grammar. 
Punchabledfaces isn't banned. It's just their CSS. You can turn it off. 
what country has more freedoms than New Zealand? 
A nod from my hero!  Is that the real you on voat? With the multiple spaces and the characteristically high-quality submissions?
link? context? buh?
I dont understand the sanders thing... care to explain?
Que the derail, choo choo.
This sub is currently filled with posts either about meta-reddit drama or how the meta-reddit drama is a distraction from a greater issue.  Which is it? Because it sure seems to me that this community is self-perpetuating this narrative.   
Can i just say that isn't it crazy how we always disagree with some mods actions, whatever it may be. Now all the sudden most of the big subs are  fighting for the samething we do
Uhhhh no. But whatever. I am not interested in discussing your collective delusions.
"the bin laden bunch"
Couldn't really punish Reddit for the TPP not getting enough awareness or concern.   Still funny though!
Whats this with Guccifer and nuke? Anyone with a link or more info?
&gt; Victoria of Reddit   How to make a humble PR facilitator sound like a character out of Game of Thrones. Victoria Stormborn of House Reddit, first of her name....
Right now Reddit looks like a Schizophrenic on meth. That lies with the CEO. If I was on the BOD of Reddit Pao's position running Reddit would be in serious jeopardy.  Reddit is not a well run corporation. It is totally chaotic and that is a direct reflection of Pao's LEADERSHIP. She is a FAILURE. 
On /r/news and maybe /politics
Considering the mere existence of an inescapable 500 billion dollar advertising industry,  is it any small wonder that a gathering as large as Reddit (~170 million which is larger than many countries) is considered not only one of the most coveted viral advertising targets but something to actually fight for to control, to infiltrate, and to influence? It's easy understand how that many people thinking in the same direction could be a very powerful (if not worrisome) political and/or social force.    Revolutions have been fought for control of lesser populations.
Fun fact.  This wholesome family run operation  is actually a giant corp farm that was recently purchased by the Chinese. Its win/win for them they get to pollute our lands while selling us industrial waste called pork.   http://www.politico.com/story/2013/09/us-china-smithfield-96399.html
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ya, I am glad I subscribed a long time ago. Many things I don't agree with in here but many things I do see as correct.
I wonder if those algorithms are now realizing that when you put a population under surveillance and they become aware of it, the risk of uprising shoots up...
Yawn.   I use Reddit more than ever. Reddit may have some problems, but the most annoying thing about Reddit right now is...whiny little bitches complaining about Reddit.  And it's not even close.
No, it would be the admission that the debt is meant to be impossible to pay back.  May be you should get off reddit and go read confessions of an economic hitman by John C. Perkins,  don't worry it most likely won't be back when you get here anyway.
Graffiti is disgraceful. 
"In autistic children, the problem usually appears to, not due to high exposure, but rather decreased excretion."  This study didn't link mercury/lead to autism, they linked autism to mercury/lead.   
Please!! Don't forget this. Victoria was in with Jim. I don't presume to know why she was "fired" but it's more important to remember that she had to be "in the know" to a certain extent. Hence why you don't see her shouting from the mountain tops about this shit.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Use multiple dummy accounts.  Tie each account to a different bank account.  Buy tons of gold for your dummy accounts.  Distribute money as seen fit.
The Chooter debacle could be alpha female syndrome.  She probably saw her as a threat to her dominance.  
&gt; that the attack on the consulate was an effort to try to get these prisoners back.  Yes. Which is exactly the same theme as mentioned.  The mainstream media in the United States tries to play these attacks off as "terrorism"  driven by a "hatred of America".  Then we all scratch our heads at "why do they hate us?"     When in fact, North Africans are modern, literate, intelligent people. They were responding with asymmetric warfare tactics against a high-value foreign target, for completely strategic reasons.  In Benghazi, our little Navy Seal /slash/ CIA  hive got stung.   Got stung hard.  That's exactly what you should expect sticking agents in a middle of a country undergoing a civil war on top of a regime coup.
i'd like to see you make a website that can handle a mass exodus from reddit at a moments notice.  
A buddy and I went to the Bahamas a few years back with our wives.  Prince Henry was there on the same small island.  My friend had an interesting conversation with one of the other passengers on the small plane we flew in on (Like 10-12 people).  One of the guys told him that he was doing security that weekend, but that he was not on the clock for a few days.  We went lobster diving with them, then conch, then drank into the wee hours with our wives and these guys with their girlfriends.  About 3am they were all passing out and throwing up (shots of Jack Daniels) my buddy comes into the front room with a backpack on and a huge handgun with silencer.  He's all drunk waving it around and joking and stuff.  About 30 seconds into his drunken idiotic dance once of the guys grabs him from behind in some ninja move and flips him on his back all while disarming him and has the gun in his face in like two seconds.  Pulls the slide back and has his hand on the trigger.  Some Jason Borne shit.      A bunch of shit fell out of his backpack, but he gathered it up real fast like he was more interested in the belongings that the fact that my buddy had recovered a handgun with a silencer from their pile of stuff by the font door.    Anyway, they sat us down and told us that they were there on a security assignment and because of my buddy's conversation (about guns of course) they had been redirected to hang with us and observe to make sure we weren't a threat (like assassins or something).  They flipped our rental house, took our passports and told us we could pick them up at the airport the day after the prince left.    We cleaned up because the person renting the house to us had to come the next day to fix the water pump which wasn't working after a storm that night.  I saw the corner of a small piece of paper sticking out from under the couch and grabbed it.  It had a map of the island with several names, addresses and phone numbers and at the bottom said classified, etc.  Stapled to it were pics of all four of us.  Some scary shit.    When the owner of the house showed up he asked if we had fun the night before.  We said yeah, but didn't tell him what happened.  When he got in his truck to leave he honked and said as he leaned out the window, stay away from Prince Henry and drove off.    WTF.  I'm not sure how many times I have left to play roulette.  
So why would the government kill him? 
I agree with you.  There are many reasons that are possible for someone becoming fired.  Perhaps she broke a confidentiality issue and was rallying the troops to support her personal opinion etc.  Maybe something came up in her private life were the Admins were actually protecting her by removing her from her duties?    No one knows anything.  I wonder how all this fustration for losing communication between the Mods and Adminstration if Victoria had a medical emergency and could not be avaible to her job?  Would any of this happen even though enormous glitches showed up on line because she was the go between girl?  I have no idea.  Does anyone?
All of this is great advertisement for Reddit, great job
To them it's not a mess though, it's going exactly how they want it to. Slowly ridding the site of anything that goes against the agendas they want to push, The TPP like you say for example. Eventually whoever is left will be slowly getting brainwashed with whatever it is that they feel like pushing at that point in time. 
While I agree with your sentiment, it's foolish to think the users own this website. Conde Nast owns Reddit - they could shut it down in an instant if they so wished. And as popular as it is, its monetary worth is limited.
Lol it's /u/wherearemyfeet and we weren't even talking about GMOs... where is your defense of GMOs with a wrapped corporate advertisement for us?  Why don't you want GMOs to be labelled so that consumers can make an informed decision?
Yep. I'm a shill. My tuition is paid for, so what do you expect? I'm an Israeli shill who is trying to help you be more convincing to a wider audience when you discuss Israel's influence in America. They really should fire me!
&gt; I am sorry but not a shill; I thought maybe you knew how they did it.  It's pretty obvious how they did it. There was construction work going on in the towers for months. Just ask some of the users here who were there and they'll tell you how easy it would have been to wire the buildings for a demolition. Unless people were specifically looking out for Israeli terrorists planting military grade TH3 in the buildings then there is just no way they'd have even known about it.   In sum, snorting in derision at the idea that it is possible to wire a couple of buildings with high grade explosives is a shill's argument. It's fallacious. Not only is it contrary to the scientific evidence that the buildings were demolished, but it's the equivalent of denying any bombing in history (say for example, the King David Hotel bombing), on the grounds that you think it's impossible to get explosives into a building.  My genuine apologies for misunderstanding your intent though. I read the rest of your post and I don't think you're a shill. I just have a tendency to jump to that conclusion these days because I've encountered so many people who are.  Peace. 
yay, look who's back to spam.... welcomeback6969
The British Government has experimented with aerosol dispersal along the south coast in the past. Back then a ship was used to spray a tracer element so that dispersal patterns could be observed. There is usually a predictable prevailing wind from the south west along this coast. So it's not beyond the realms of possibility that this event is something similar. But...  the Government is presumably not so stupid as to do something like this in broad daylight.
I'll count that as a pat on the back. 
fuck, thats 1/4 of my day
This is about the third or fourth incident of death or jailing doctors who where anti-vaccine since California introduced mandatory vaccines. 
Nope. It's the timeline of mass causualty events they don't like. Especially when we already know what to look for.   https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3byjpq/exploring_the_career_of_miami_beach_police_chief/
I agree as well. Just reddit drama spilled into TWR.
ISIS infamously burned to death a pilot from Jordan which has full diplomatic relations with Israel.   ISIS has also killed people from India which is Israel's biggest supporter in Asia.  Additionally, ISIS incessantly murder their own for B.S. reasons.    http://www.cbsnews.com/news/jordanian-pilots-obscene-burning-death-by-isis-sparks-outrage-in-mideast/  http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/ISIS-killed-39-Indian-hostages-Iraq-survivor-says/articleshow/47285947.cms  http://www.ibtimes.com/isis-beheads-cigarette-smokers-islamic-state-deems-smoking-slow-suicide-under-sharia-1815192
&gt; By firing people and trying to ban stuff that is related to what has been going on is just going to make the situation worse.  The Streisand effect.
You are welcome. I noticed the same thing myself about a week and half ago and have been counting down the days. Do you know much about the site? I just saw someone link it on here and checked it out, other than that I haven't got a clue who's behind it or the thought of the predictions. I do know that tabula rasa means blank slate in latin though, which is more commonly seen as wiping the slate clean.
I like the idea of voat but the [moderator of /r/Askvoat was plugging the site](https://np.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/3c02d9/voatco_right_now/csr532f) and gave the caveat that:  &gt; All the threads on /v/Askvoat are [serious] by default and in general **the only downside I can think of right now is there honestly are some conspiratards**...  So it seems to me that the same treatment is in store at voat that we find here.
Yeah I read that bullshit explanation as well. I don't believe hat she is the only one who can communicate with "celebrities."
If this is going to be the single issue you're going to be a single-isse voter on, you're not going to have anyone to vote for.  We have to take what we can get.  If he helps roll back the police state being formed in this country it's a start.
I think that was a moment when it did matter.  He was only one of 4 Senators who protested the speech.    Yes there are daily abuses such as settlement building and Palestinian mistreatment by Israeli soldiers that needs to be criticized loudly and often, but he is Jewish and will not be the anti-Israeli politician you're looking for.  But no one will be that politician you're looking for any time soon.  You have to look at the ways in which he will be superior to almost every other candidate save Rand Paul.  There are a lot of issues that need addressed in this country, and I'm sorry but our support of Israel just doesn't top the list for anyone.    It should but it doesn't.  I can at least see him supporting less military support for Israel, especially while Netenyahu's party is in power, so that's a start.
Eventually they traced it to the military vaccines  http://www.theguardian.com/uk/2004/jan/12/health.military
Thread in IAMA talking about the deletion:  https://np.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/3c0xh8/ama_request_dacvak_continue_his_now_deleted_ama/  Screencap here: http://i.cubeupload.com/CaBFsd.png  Archieved Link of the AMA: https://web.archive.org/web/20150703191046/https://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/3c0idl/i_am_dacvak_former_reddit_employee_and_leukemia/
I don't necessarily believe this, but I'm throwing it out there to see what comes of it:   There was an allegation that NK is using humans for experimentation. The US also does this exact same thing in Guantanamo Bay.   http://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/jun/15/cia-torture-human-experimentation-doctors?CMP=ema_565  Also see:  &gt;[Hickman had begun his "service" at Guantanamo believing the prisoners were "the worst of the worst," but had since learned that at least most of them were nothing of the sort, having been picked up for bounties with little knowledge of what they'd done. Why, he wondered, "were men of little or no value kept under these conditions, and even repeatedly interrogated, months or years after they'd been taken into custody? Even if they'd had any intelligence when they came in, what relevance would it have years later? . . . One answer seemed to lie in the description that Major Generals [Michael] Dunlavey and [Geoffrey] Miller both applied to Gitmo. They called it 'America's battle lab.'"](http://warisacrime.org/content/we-murdered-some-folks-guantanamo)  The US has a history of siphoning off human experimental data and resources from other countries. We all know about Operation Paperclip. There was also the agreement with Japan that they hand over their data from Unit 731 in exchange for immunity. So, they have a treasure trove of human experimental data are have obviously been interested in this for a long time. The US also illegally experimented on humans after Paperclip and Unit 731 on their own soldiers and American citizens without consent.   It could be that the US simply found no real reason to invade NK until now (excluding the Korean War). They want that data. 
I figured it was sarcasm but you never know and had to ask! 
that's fucked up, but you raise a fair point.  the same can be said about Obama.  JFK set the bar.  Obama has clearly respected that line in the sand.
I believe it will just become a propaganda machine, used to promote whatever political or corporate agendas they need the public to get behind and accept. Just like when yahoo bought out tumblr, next thing you know rampant feminist extremists all over the place. I know of two billionaires that was funding some of the more extreme feminists, there was a lot of money being thrown into pushing that agenda. 
You can sorta see why this sub gets a bad name sometimes.
[deleted]
I also find this weird. They probably just don't want it at the top so things could blow over quicker. Though I also want to share this                       /r/justsaynope /r/blackout2015  July 10 has been suggested as a no reddit day. Don't post, comment, or even load the site. Go through the weekend if you can.  Edit: If every person that thought "this will never happen" actually went along with it, it would happen. There seems to be a lot of people upset and few willing to even find something to do other than reddit for a few days.   I'm open to other ideas, but this is the only hope normal users have to make any kind of meaningful impact here.   EDIT2: spread the message guys, copy this comment on big subreddits, comment on high karma posts, make posts with this message. We need people to see this in order to work and to hit where it hurts!  EDIT3: Thanks for all the support guys, hopefully with this we can show that we, the users, have a say on how Reddit is managed.  
Relevant threads they.. may not like..:  - [Accomplice Identified in Aurora Theater Shooting: Alex Milano](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3bu6hv/accomplice_identified_in_aurora_theater_shooting/)  - [Exploring the career of Miami Beach Police Chief, Dan Oates -- formerly Aurora Police Chief during the Aurora Massacre and NYPD Intelligence Chief just prior to 9/11](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3byjpq/exploring_the_career_of_miami_beach_police_chief/)
Really? That seems like a horrible design choice from the perspective being able to scale adaptively and economically. It also seems like it would be a lot more processor intensive. Do you know why they made that choice?
I like Bob. He seems nice. I introduced him to Eliza.
I'll just leave this here....  &gt; **The Army Sprayed St. Louis With Toxic Aerosol During A Just Revealed 1950s Test**  &gt; http://www.businessinsider.com/army-sprayed-st-louis-with-toxic-dust-2012-10  
It's funny. Usually when I debate someone, they actually try to refute my argument. You've done nothing but support it while attacking your own. Of course the Pileni statement wasn't retracted because she said it. Just like the portion about her stating she wasn't qualified wasn't retracted. Because she said it. Thanks!  Anyway, I checked up on your claims again about the paper not being peer reviewed. Still no luck.  Still published in the peer reviewed, referred journal. Still listed as "Notable Peer Review." Still peer reviewed internally and externally. Still peer reviewed. Still no proof Hoffmann printed false information. (0 retractions/revisions to his article that catches Pileni in a lie.) I'll let you know if anything changes. You do the same!   You've been pushing the same non-argument for 2+ weeks. I've been refuting you for the entire time. And nothing you say changes the facts listed above. Or below. Hilarious to watch you pretend you aren't copy-pastaing.  And you brought up the second peer reviewed, published paperwhen you lied about my entire argument hinging on the first one. Just because you can't reach the goalpost, doesn't mean it was moved. Laces are out, champ. Remember when you got a little brave and tried to refute it one time? And then failed miserably because you didn't even read/understand it? I do.  :)  Either way, both remain published. 0 retractions. 0 revisions. 0 rebuttals though. In any journal. Including Bentham. It'll never be my burden to disprove a claim you can't support. Sorry! But your 0 retraction, 0 ERRATUM tactic actually hurts you. Guess it is peer reviewed thanks to you!  
Yeah well maybe she shouldn't have told people to kill her pets with her white lie.  That makes it a black lie.  Of course she has an explanation for her wrong prophecy.  [All false prophets do this.](http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/business/2011/10/harold-camping-doomsday-prophet-wrong-again/)  It's not a hard thing to do, especially with ready willing participants such as yourself to eat it all up.  Why was the Iraq war bulldozed through?  Do I need to go over all the reasons that have been covered ad nauseum on this sub for you?  * Iraq was about to drop the US Dollar to trade their massive amounts of oil with.  This was immediately averted with the war.   * Saddam had gone rogue from his controllers in the CIA, he was a wild card they didn't want to have in the middle east.  He and his sons were also legitimately evil so it wasn't hard to convince people he needed to go.  * They also wanted military bases in Iraq, which they now have.  [Iran is now completely encircled.](http://i44.photobucket.com/albums/f36/oxi3/threatmapsplash.jpg)  * It's also part of the Wolfowitz doctrine of complete global US hegemony.  * It has nothing the to do with a giant rogue planet with a figure 8 orbit, which also somehow stopped right behind the sun so we can't see it, and somehow went completely undetected by any observatories or satellites despite necessarily being a gigantic gravitational anomoly at the very least.
It's always been the case that if someone healthy and well-nourished catches these mild short-term illness there is nothing to worry about.  There is conclusive evidence that vaccines are causing both Autism and Crib Death, Big Pharma don't tell you, but the independent studies do.  Yes, there should be quarantine for all recently vaccinated people, 2 weeks minimum, they should be kept away from public places.  We don't need an alternative to vaccination, at least not in the First World we don't.  In the Third World they need more food and better sanitation.
They have all of everything and it has caused them to go mad with power and  greed. After being able to claim ownership of the entire world with the exception of a few minor nations they still are willing to have millions killed in order for them to get even more. Many millions have already died so that these few mentally depraved individuals can force just a few  extra drams of serotonin or dopamine into their fetid consciousnesses.   They are true psychopaths and as such must be 'relieved of their duties'
Yep, they are power tripping morons that should never hold a position of importance anywhere.
DIE you proletariat serving scum!
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&amp;apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome (or [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox) and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
[deleted]
yup I've been on voat for over a year now.  Some asshat wrote a script that took a lot of user names from /r/conspiracy, so I made an account with an extra space. I since got back control of axolotl peyotl with one space, but I was already using axolotl__peyotl so I stuck with it.
or more closely related hate subs like SRS  or say... TBP brigading the shit out of TRP (TBP being right or not is a different matter)
[deleted]
There's supposedly big plans for the 4th  Im reading up on it now
No nuclear weapons were used in New York on 9/11 this post makes this sub look stupid
Yeah, I never liked the attacks on labor. The people running large corporations aren't exactly the most useful among us, despite the propaganda, but they want to siphon off the fruits of civilization.
Since it will get removed in news/worldpolitics, start re-tweeting some of the articles on Twitter. If people could get this trending, maybe more people will take notice.  https://twitter.com/search?q=TPP&amp;src=typd  Edit: [Posted Michael Geist's comments](https://np.reddit.com/r/canada/comments/3c2jl3/michael_geist_pharma_rules_will_bring_huge_costs/) on it to /r/Canada.. hopefully the mods don't delete it :/
Nope. She's a whore.
Been watching it for the past decade. Ever since I became aware of it. Painful to watch and even more painful to live it. 
Because they are sane and rational individuals.
Gee whiz, Jimmy! The US launched fighter jets that got their asses creamed by *ancient* US Fighter Jets!  Bet you knuckle heads didn't see any of them *Flying Cover* on 9/11!   Dream reddit! Dream well!
Or just not acknowledge it like 99% of companies do when they let an employee go. The common courtesy is you don't talk shit about them they don't talk shit about you. That way Victoria will have a good reference future jobs, if she says something all bets are off.
Wow...
[deleted]
Doesn't anyone else wonder why they're pandering so hard to Israel while shitting on their own citizens?  I wish more people saw this as a red flag .
Basically the hate was put toward the wrong person  she was pretty against the propaganda take over of iama and after she was fired the people who run iama are now uninvolving the reddit admins due to them (the admins) wanting more propaganda controlhowever who knows how long that will last.
This is what Hitler fought! He tried to save us! 
They probably are. They won't let anything happen on "accident".
What? Its a fact that he fought the international bank you idiot. 
Are you actually retarded?
[deleted]
OMG is this real life ?? I mean seriously .... Who in their right mind thought it would be a good idea to make Ellen Pao the CEO of reddit ???  I mean it's literally MINDBOGGLING ..... it's almost laughable if this whole thing wasn't so fucked up !!   #FightthePaoEr 
The only news source I need are the dwarfs I meet while smoking DMT. They tell me "things". The END IS NEAR.
Well said.  This sub has become an echo chamber, far removed from its historical roots. 
Jesus Christ's message of love, peace, forgiveness and for the eradication of dogma is still misconstrued because morons can't realize the new and old testament books are COMPLETELY irreconcillable.  The real conspiracy is zionist jews turning christians into zionists vis-a-vis their invention of this absolutely ridiculous concept of "judeo-christianity" to turn christians against muslims and fight their dirty little wars for them all while forgetting that Christ never advocated for war, retribution or violence.  This is why he was murdered (sentenced by his own people and executed by romans).  He was, in actuality,  a rebel and major threat to the religious and political establishment during his lifetime, as is his message to this day.  "Behold, I am sending you out as sheep in the midst of wolves, so be wise as serpents and innocent as doves."  Have you ever read the new testament? 
Well she's bloody awful at her job, if I were them I'd sack her 
Conditions need to get really bad for average people to become interested. The current plan of keeping people divided by minor issues, works well. As the US slowly becomes a 3rd world hellhole, most people are content to watch as long as they have their food, job, etc.
This bitch goin' down yo. When the whole internet decides it doesn't like someone, they soon find themselves a pariah everywhere they go. Memories fade, but Pao keeps doing things to inflagrate the swarm.
This whole reddit situation depresses me when I think about it's implications on real life power and control.   If a mod gets off on the power and control they receive from a WEBSITE, treats those with differing view points with disdain, and does so with the help of like-minded "power hungry" mods in a figurative cigar smoke-filled backroom... (for no real reason I might add)  Then I can only assume when people have power IRL, the average citizen is fucked, lied to, and manipulated beyond belief. And probably doesn't know it. Again for... what reason? Control freaks man. 
[deleted]
I'd be interested in the results as well. 
You can see it daily in /pol/, mostly the Hasbara and its zio-christian support groups justifying child-murder. Occasionally, I see it in on frontpage too.
Now your comment just looks silly 
yea, negative advertisement is still an advertisement.   I am really curious if there was some kind of a deal between them or not.
1. Reddit tanks. 2. Everyone blames  Pao 3. Fire Ellen Pao. 4. Promise to stop doing bad shit 5. Keep doing bad shit 6. Tell userbase it was Pao's fault 7. Tell investors that userbase is sexist 8. Total Control
Jim is unfortunately a beautiful poster child for the anti-vax movement as seen by pharma. Go watch his latest Comedians in Cars with Jerry Seinfeld. Jim looks insane, beautifully insane, but still very out there. Definitely has done some ayahuasca. There are a ton of celebrities on Twitter pissed about the CA bill. Why did they pick Jim? The beard, the crazed look in his eyes. See only CRAZY people hate the deliciousness of vaccines!!  Also, Robert Kennedy did a beautiful writeup on his new FB page defending Jim. Thanks for that, Mr K. 
I don't disagree with the second half of your statement... but I can guarantee they knew this and the FPH drama would blow up like this. They're smarter than you are giving them credit for.
[deleted]
Is also a huge Zionist supporter.  Coincidence?  https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/2opetc/for_those_not_in_the_know_more_proof_that/
Just hijacking to place this here. [relevant Bad Religion from 1992](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rPdAgtZb4_A)
Yeah. 
that video has totally changed my mind about 9/11 no i know there is something wrong we are being fed false information to distract us fro the truth. I cant believe iv'e been so gullible to believe a lot of videos on youtube that claim 9/11 was an inside job when it was so clearly not  
&gt;Global warming is a hoax, says ‘The Donald.  ROTFL  Iceagenow is scraping the bottom of the barrel if they have to resort to carrot top.
This is what /conspiracy is for, not blabla-nwo, anti-vaxx0rs blarch.  OP states exactly what is going to happen. The problem with Internet companies (especially www) is, that the clients see what happens in a company, so corporate cleansing and takeovers are much harder to do.   At any closed company, Deloitte and KPMG just go in and destroy everything.
1. Denying =/= questioning; 2. Not yet constructed; 3. Really? https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_Israeli_billionaires_by_net_worth 4. [citation needed]  You may also want to check how he treats oligarchs by watching how he treated Deripaska when he wanted to close down a factory and basically bankrupt a whole town.
Yes. And many of the mirrored subs have exactly mirrored the same mods who leverage diplomatic control on reddit.  The message will be controlled whether it's here on reddit, or over there on voat.
&gt;red flakes in some dust samples     &gt;The material in the [red layer](http://web.archive.org/web/20150627150511/http://www.alienscientist.com/images/nanoth.jpg) (Active Thermitic Material Discovered in Dust from the 9/11 World Trade Center Catastrophe) consists of intimately mixed particles of iron oxide and aluminum embedded in a carbon-rich matrix. The particles range in size from tens to hundreds of nanometers. Elemental aluminum was present in thin plate-like structures, while iron oxide was present as faceted grains, roughly 100 nm across – about a thousand times smaller than a human hair. [Source](http://rethink911.org/evidence/twin-towers/extrene-temperatures-and-incendiaries/)   ****    &gt;lady stored in her house     &gt;“The dust seemed to have an emotional impact on me.” That feeling led her to create All That Remains... a round, see-through container filled with the dust collected from her loft and adorned with fallen petals at the base. Janette also [passed a sample of the dust to physicist Dr. Steven Jones](http://plumdreams.com/2010/04/16/dangerous-debris/#more-419)       *From The Open Chemical Physics Journal, 2009, Volume 2, Active Thermitic Material Discovered in Dust from the 9/11 World Trade Center Catastrophe*  (Page 8 &amp; 9)     &gt;*The authors also obtained and examined additional samples of WTC dust which had been collected by independent observers on, or very soon after, 9/11. All of the samples examined contained these very small, peculiar red/gray chips. Previous studies discussing observations of the WTC dust include reports by the RJ Lee Company [14], the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) [15], McGee et al. [13] and Lioy et al. [16] Some of these studies confirmed the finding of iron-rich microspheres, which are also peculiar [5, 8, 11, 13-15] but the red/gray chips analyzed in this study have apparently not been discussed in previously published reports.*    [Source](http://web.archive.org/web/20150704190922/http://www.htmlpublish.com/newTestDocStorage/DocStorage/85809877687148c69d851ddc02499669/Pages%20from%20TOCPJ-2-7-1.htm)  ***      &gt;publish" a "paper    [Active Thermitic Material Discovered in Dust from the 9/11 World Trade Center Catastrophe](http://benthamopen.com/ABSTRACT/TOCPJ-2-7)   ***     &gt;in an online “journal         Open Chemical Physics Journal, indexed by six services, among them Chemical Abstracts, the premiere world service for chemistry; also Directory of Open Access Journals (DOAJ), Open J-Gate, Genamics JournalSeek, MediaFinder®-Standard Periodical Directory, Astrophysics Data System (ADS).    ***    &gt; therefore nano-thermite!      Yes. It's not like it's an exotic weapon.     &gt;1993 Patent [Energetic composites ](http://www.google.de/patents/US5266132)   "This invention relates to the fields of chemical reaction kinetics and energetic materials." ...thin layers of substances, reactions: rapidly, slowly, heat but not gasses, buffer prevents the reactions from taking place, ...desired time, ...designed to suit the application      1996 [Nanoengineered explosives](http://patft.uspto.gov/netacgi/nph-Parser?Sect1=PTO1&amp;Sect2=HITOFF&amp;d=PALL&amp;p=1&amp;u=%2Fnetahtml%2FPTO%2Fsrchnum.htm&amp;r=1&amp;f=G&amp;l=50&amp;s1=5505799.PN.&amp;OS=PN/5505799&amp;RS=PN/5505799) Patent     &gt;Abstract     &gt;A complex modulated structure of reactive elements that have the capability of considerably more heat than organic explosives while generating a working fluid or gas. The explosive and method of fabricating same involves a plurality of very thin, stacked, multilayer structures, each composed of reactive components, such as aluminum, separated from a less reactive element, such as copper oxide, by a separator material, such as carbon. The separator material not only separates the reactive materials, but it reacts therewith when detonated to generate higher temperatures. The various layers of material, thickness of 10 to 10,000 angstroms, can be deposited by magnetron sputter deposition. The explosive detonates and combusts a high velocity generating a gas, such as CO, and high temperatures.
Shills can't melt steel beams.
Yup...Here they are. https://books.google.com/books?id=3T6ZAAAAQBAJ&amp;pg=PT241&amp;lpg=PT241&amp;dq=static.pdf+amy+goodman&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=eLe77PZMsm&amp;sig=V6yjjOrBf58934mBjoWJVL5JQxk&amp;hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=5zGYVfP_Movp-QGasIToCA&amp;ved=0CDEQ6AEwAg#v=onepage&amp;q=static.pdf%20amy%20goodman&amp;f=false
[deleted]
Everything's got pros and cons. Democracy's got plenty of problems too but we generally prefer to keep it around anyway because the alternatives are either not preferable or infeasible.
Yes and Zola is what they call it in the movie I believe. Is also like the Clean Slate from The Dark night rises. They have some of those types of things here too. The algorithm justs bans here luckily. 
That's why Uncle Sam is in prison in the picture ^
Been going on for years. John Oliver has a segment about it on Last Week Tonight. (On mobile, pain to link)
I love that people are up voting this Hitler praising holocaust denier.  What the fuck is wrong with you people.  Some other choice comments from this enlightened person:  &gt; Some nigger I work with was playing this garbage at my work. And of course she walked out and quit, but not after threatening to punch my manager in the face. God I hate niggers.  &gt; Don't compare Hitler to that communist gook.  &gt; I work right next to a fat lesbian everyday. Its so hard to hold my tongue when she starts talking about gay pride parades or Bruce Jenner. I'm about to go off on her because i'm quitting my job soon anyways.  &gt; As a niggerologist with a PhD from Stanford I can confirm your assessment.  Is this really the type of person we want to be upvoting in this subreddit?
At least it's free.  I'll have free speech with racism over censorship without.
The thing I never hear addressed in these vaccine arguments: Aren't the only people at danger those who don't get vaccinated?  People freak out like a minor outbreak could effect them,  but if they're vaccinated...    I realize there's more going on here, but there's no legitimate public health reason to force vaccination if most of the population is innoculated. The whole "but the children!" argument fails too. If a kid gets polio because their parents refuse a vaccine, the state is going to step in anyways. Sucks for the kid with polio,  but children are still sadly considered property. 
My theory is that she is paid by Hillary Clinton team to ruin the biggest Bernie Sanders support group out there. Because the situation is too sitcom-like to be unintentional. 
105,049 supporters
I see. Thank you.
Even PBS actually. PBS pulled a documentary critical of the Koch's because of pressure from a donor, and after an expose about it came out they returned the dudes money cause they acknowledged how bad they fucked up. https://pando.com/2014/02/12/the-wolf-of-sesame-street-revealing-the-secret-corruption-inside-pbss-news-division/
This is /r/conspiracy you're in. That explanation is too reasonable. Please try again.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Low level of Compassion? Check.  Low level of Conscience? Check.  Low level of Empathy?   Check.  Inability to demonstrate the she feels  Remorse?  check.  Cannot tolerate non sociopaths? Check.   Sociopath?  Check.
Are you living under a rock? Since the widespread administration of vaccines fewer people have died from the disease the vaccine prevented.  No question that some of the those vaccines haven't been tainted with substances that may have contributed to unwanted effects, but scientists are human beings just like you, flawed.
Commercial News Network.
&gt;[***As you can see, Mr. Anderson, we have have our eye on you for an.... exact time now...***](http://i.imgur.com/5t1xXve.gif)  
Clean out your temp files recently? Search history..ect. easy for FB to perhaps read cookie data..history and make suggestions from there.
Lol. Then where is mexico, the gulf?   Nothing resembling the bullshit mercator map.   A farce.   Happy 4th of July.  
[deleted]
Sucks for you.  My local weather comes from a super attractive chick that always walks around in skin tight dresses.
show her the video of the dancing Israelis and tell her how Larry Silverstein conveniently insured the buildings right before the attack and profited from it.
Always curious as to people like this on this thread. Nothing to see here move along. 
So correct that this post will be deleted any minute now. . . 
I'm well aware of Stalin's crimes.  Two wrongs.  I wasn't aware of your references massacre. Two wrongs.  I'm not excusing anyone.  I'm fighting excusing Hitler.  And apparently lionization.  That's fucked man.  Mein Kamph makes his intentions clear.
Just signed, its at 127k.
Their software wasnt written to scale, its going to be a while before voat goes anywhere.
[deleted]
I just ate hotdogs and some potatoe salad. And laughed while obese Americans popped fireworks for the illusion of freedom. Sad but true this country is the new fascism. 
OP, do you know the context of these remarks? What he was talking about?
Yeah, it is not a good idea to take anything this guy ever said verbatim.
Oh, so it's official now. 
&gt;Well, it was because they didn't have foreign currency reserves to go through the international markets -- that was hardly Germany's fault,  Yes it was. Hitler ensured their exports were too uncompetitive to earn currency.  &gt;the creation of a barter-trade network is not evidence of "Nazi incompetence", any more than the loss of Germany's colonies in 1919 ;)  Yes, it's evidence their economy was garbage.  &gt;Hint: as I've already pointed out in this thread, it was Feder's idea.  Mefo wasn't Feder's idea. The idea first arose in the early 1930s under Luther and Schacht who later implemented them fully under the Nazis.   &gt;Obviously all governments lie, however comparing Nazi communication with their population, and, say the comms of the Stalin regim -- or even the FDR admin's public communication practice regarding foreign policy -- shows the Nazis to have been far more honest.  Not even close.  &gt;Heiber, in his biography of Goebbels, notes that he had a "seriousness and credibility" which "simply cannot be surpassed." And, of course, most plebs have been propgandized to think that the Nazis embraced and endorsed "the big lie", when this was actually their criticism of Jewish PR and its willingness to distort the truth and subordinate it to strategic ethnocentric goals.  Yes, so add irony to the list of things he wasn't good at.
Lol wut 
A drum circle of angry sober hippies bitching about the NDAA, PMS, BFD acts.. then reading aloud their favorite Patriot Act fascist passages followed by a big stinky dreds in your nose group grope... could be fun too.  
Admin or mods?
Already here, bruh.
&gt;The term was already popular man, this is complete bullshit.  ..popular / "popularized" are different... popularized is tantamount to advertised... popular would be successfully popularized.  So, who popularized it popular?.. perhaps the shadowy overlord alphabet mafia already popularized it!.. the conspiracy is...its true!,  they didn't popularize it when this guy says they did... because they had popularized, popular already!   
There is no answer here. This is doing what most people typically do, point out a problem. There is no possible solution given, because the truth of the matter is, people are comfortable and satisfied with their quality of life and don't want to give it up.
"Both" sides? Even the premise that there are two sides is part of the game.
Fail
Duchidd k 
I'm not a spy dude wtf lol
Nope. They won't be. Reddit is growing. The folks that are "leaving" haven't gone anywhere. Even if they did, it wouldn't have much impact - because there's no place to go. Voat isn't the answer - even if it scaled to take on the traffic - it's just a copy. The first thing that happened is people went and created the exact same subs on reddit, with almost no subcribers and no content. Someday Reddit will slide, but, it'll be after the next capital event. You can bank on it. All this shit going on right now? Well, that's just growing pains.  Personally, I think reddit sucks ass - because of moderators, not admins. But hey, here I am. 
Probably because voat is still suffering the reddit hug of death.
They need to make sure we "never forget" 9/11. Why? All the reasons; for us, to remind us that they remain in control. For the masses? To justify the continual interference in the middle east and the necessity to erode civil liberties.  What better way to keep the debate going than by doing a sloppy job? Same with all the false flags. They don't actually need to make it believable; simply insisting on the official story through the media is sufficient to prevent most people from realizing the truth.  Even if 99% of people thought these things were an inside job, we'd always think we were in the minority because the TV paints the picture that most people accept the official story. Why waste money on verisimilitude when doing a crappy job is actually more effective?
[citation needed]
Funny how all the "death camps" were outside of Germany.
I messaged her account about it yesterday when I first noticed the discrepancy. No response of course. Not even expecting one.
Unless pao has a gigantic fucking paycheck coming after she leaves, then she is simply a retard and not a misdirection/ shill. She is half a million dollars in debt, and NOBODY is going to hire her after these past few shit storms. She has to understand that she is either A: fucking herself for eternity, or B: preparing for a 7 digit check for when she finally steps down 
Your mother has cognitive disassociation, and that's hard to cure. Try with humor, and make her see how ridicule the official story sounds, it's easy with this false flag. Also some history lessons, look up into every major war USA entered and how they used a false flag event as a justification  Lusitania, pearl harbor, gulf of Tonkin...  The loonies even wrote a manual on September 2000, PNAC where they said they needed a new pearl harbor
sort of thing newspapers do when they get behind campaigns which are already going to be government policy in the next term, for example laws on sex offenders or immigration. Populist crap to strengthen their position.
Salary. So 40 a week
Yeah there's no hard evidence of anything in her videos about family guy at all though. It's merely her picking tiny coincidences and making them into what she claims is evidence of the elite warning people of an event. I don't know why you'd choose to believe anything she says, let alone actually telling people about it. 
Made me cringe pretty hard. 
Sheeple
Except that Justfaz didn't question the claims being made.  He specifically ignored the claims and appealed for an official authority opinion.  That is the opposite of questioning, it is a method of shutting down questioning.
"Consider" being the operative word.
Every country has their issues. 
I am starting to consider it is quite ironic every time someone gets gilded while trying to get people to stop buying gold. Maybe we should call it "Give iron" instead, to make it more ironic. 
Pao isn't going any where, you guys. According to a former employee who was also recently sacked when asked about that she replied, "You'll have to pry this position from my cold, dead hands!!!" https://i.imgur.com/cOw7LvF.jpg 
I do not expect anymore from the users of this sub to use their brains anymore.
The museums were looted by the Iraqis themselves, that was when the troops moved in and secured them. A lot of artifacts were taken back to the states and many were sold, but you won't find many for sale in the west, you will find them in Russia and China, the ones supporting the insurgency that killed so many.  America isn't evil. I'm glad they secured some artifacts, it's obvious the US should have grabbed it all rather than let them be destroyed by Islamic barbarians.
You lost me at satanic ritual 
... I wonder how cheap cloning can get.  Never the exact child but... well. An interesting thought.
It depends on the vaccine. It disturbs me that you refuse to see that "vaccines" as a monolithic same-thing where all are magic candy pills is an incredibly uneducated way to look at them and incredibly harmful to human health *and* your own zealous pro-sales anti-safety movement.  When you go for your titers to make sure you're *actually* up-to-date on your own vaccines, please have a real discussion about the subject with your doc.
TV hands down. It's called "programming" ffs. The internet is relatively inert until you input some commands. You can't google for alt news on TV, whereas you can (for now) online. 
I have heard stories of internet debates of how Putin IS, actually able to ride bears - the stupidity is ULTRA - MEGA - EXTRA with such people
[deleted]
Reddit without a smart, intelligent user base is worthless. She is going to turn the place into Yahoo.
That would seem to about sum it up.  Seems to me Wikileakes is a "Much ado about nothing" type of limited hangout operation that hasn't actually exposed any *real* issues.
do we really know that the news we hear about and images we view are on the other side of a large sphere, have you seen this for yourself or are you believing what others say?   im not saying im for or against flat earth, but i can entertain the idea.
I would bank on sex. But, we do have Genesis 6 https://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=Genesis+6&amp;version=KJV  lmao
The most interesting thing about the liberty attack is the evidence that the us was directly funding Israel's war on egypt, contrary to the myth that israel independently fought off its attackers.  And that there was a faction within the us and israeli governments that were willing to sacrifice the ship and sailors on it as justification to drop the bomb.
And there's nothing anyone can do about it because the rich will always pay for organic bon GMO food and live as long as they want. 
Pure gold bro.
I'm quite willing to bet those people were likely not afraid of anything either. Probably hanging out and enjoying the day same as any other normal person.  Nobody is actually afraid of these things, that is why every single time something happens every person interviewed always says "I never even imagined this could happen"
Just commenting.  No objective
There's an abc news story where she is interviewed about the sexual discrimination case; in it, it says she's 45. Idk when it was broadcast but when ya find it out, that will at least give the year she was born.
Sometimes I can't tell if this sub is serious
[deleted]
&gt; again...  They started them again decades ago.  Child support, taxes, etc...you can be jailed for any number of monetary based reasons.  
I don't know, I'm still holding on to the (loose) theory that the Jesse Jackson AMA had something to do with Victoria's firing. He has just enough pull to do something like that.
Check out red ice radio. America plays major roles in conspiracy events globally but they aren't all based here. Depending on where you get your information there will be a general bias. Diversify your tinfoil stock OP.  On a personal note F you, you British bastard. Your country has pedophiles openly being protected, The City which is fucking people over all over the globe (Libor ring a bell?), in your capital there's a majority of immigrants, your govt kisses just as much Israeli ass as everyone else's, your countries leaders fucked over millions of brown people across the globe and killed off millions of indigenous peoples in the name of colonialism before murica became a player and your dipshit citizens still idolize an openly parasitic ruling class of monarchs. Oh and look at your penal colony aka Australia, what about that shit, you seem to believe America is all conspiracy but maybe your cowardly country just refuses to look into who's fucking all of over. At least in Sweden, America, and ironically enough most Arab states the people at least try to investigate the truth.   Take your cunty questions back to your cunty queen and eat a dick.   Murica fuck yeah!   And PS your shit hole of a cuntry gave the world the Isis front man, not muricas CIA, so maybe focus on your shit and let us focus on ours so eventually we can all get to the bottom of this mess. 
She gave you 100 studies. 
Is that because you're all flat earthers?
You know, for an abortion survivor, you got moxie. 
Yeah, that was pretty much my thoughts as well. We've already seen that Facebook will roll over like a dog and hang users out to dry without hesitation.
They already voted no
No, she won't step down. You are literally a worm under her feet. She will continue to be CEO, and you will continue to use reddit.com, because there is literally nothing else.
Are you kidding? Do you know how much traffic is generated by the porn on this site? Most users never comment, never upvote/downvote, never even create a username - they are here for clips and pics that have been filtered through a community already. hell, when I type reddit into the address bar on most of my male friends computers the first suggested result is r/gonewild, or /r/nsfw_gifs.
Maybe rouge could be a euphemism for blood? lol
Likewise. I know how painful it can be to have to show over and over but sometimes it's the best way. 
Anytime, friendo 
PS : It's only a crappy comment because you don't want to face facts or entertain ideas that are contrary to your beliefs.. This is why most of you will remain idiots.
Of course they are the same people, but there are internal power struggles and differing views; DSK the perfect example of what happens when you are part of their group, but decide to swim against tide. Or calls of the BIS for the Fed to stop the USD overvaluation.  The BRIC Bank won't overturn the IMF, FFS they all wanted *in* (more sway over) the institution (Europe controls IMF, America the World Bank). But it will empower emerging nations. The second forerunner is China's AIIB (Asian development bank) which America pressured its *allies* not to join.   All these will shift the gameplay, but the game itself will remain the same. 
Its not about "paper money" it's all about fiat currency. And the Swiss Franc used the Euro as its "ceiling".
As a Muslim, I love Putin, he is no angel but lot better than current lot of leaders.
Imagine if one of the heads was Data's head from when they travelled back in time.
Look at your comments marine, you never stated that.  You were to busy telling people to fuck off.
Wow is this for real? Maybe shes trying really hard to try to swing the conservative voters. Definitely a turn off for me.
A jew you say? That is so surprising. They don't usually do things like that
[deleted]
And this kind of ludicrous nonsense would be why Sandy Hoaxers are perhaps the biggest embarrassment to the conspiracy community. So bad, I can't help thinking it's deliberate disinfo. 
this is 'news' to me &amp; i agree it's very *suspect*,  there is a pattern of people in the same vocation dying or suicided.  the large number of men in financial/banking, i recall scientists  &amp; *now* Doctors(?).   list of scientists - 2014 http://worldtruth.tv/list-of-dead-scientists-assassinated/  in the 'world' we live in there are no coincidences.
imo, not *could be* - *will be*
dayumm 
Its fucking true we live in an extremely racist police state country. So fucking sad. And the political system is fucked so nothing will happen about it until the populace riots in the streets and overturns the government, but good luck with that when the police think they are above the rest of us, and no one will riot while we have our cable TV and fast food. Fuck this country.
IF this is for real, it wouldn't surprise me. She's a warhawk and pretty much singlehandedly why I hope the GOP presents a competent candidate.
/R/shitjidfsays
Damn now your comments are showing up doubled.  Your done bro,  get a new phone ASAP. 
it is pretty easily tracable  From Wikipedia   "Academic perspectives such as **critical race theory** and whiteness studies use the concept of "white privilege" to analyze how racism and racialized societies affect the lives of white people."   "In sociology and political philosophy, the term **critical theory** describes the neo-Marxist philosophy of the Frankfurt School, which was developed in Germany in the 1930s. Frankfurt theorists drew on the critical methods of Karl Marx and Sigmund Freud. "  Then you can check what these theorists were (of the Frankfurt school) and yes, they are/were Jewish. 
She....She...She..Called for back up
Got it, when arrested, lay down no matter what reason.  You win. 
haha, thats about all she did. she had to wait for all the men to arrive to do her job for her. women should not be cops for that reason, they arent effective.
It's a great place and we have a lot of great conversations here. Witness the fact that you're still jolly and engaging!
When you put it that way it really does seem quite unbelievable yet the public eats it up! I know I did when 9/11 happened but I was in ninth grade and realized the error of my ways 4 years later. Thanks loose change lol 
You also learn that statistics are correlated in order to find causation, that's the point of statistics in the first place. It's a little like exit polls, they were designed to detect fraud in elections, but in the US when the did what they are supposed to they just decided there's something wrong with the exit polls and stop reporting them. You can't use statistics to justify vaccination effectiveness and then deny statistics when the don't support your theory.
if is just for me then one moth cost $700+ for one user only. not logical this way also
[deleted]
It's not real, edited.
I think in our society we now reached a point where not calling the cops is the better option. 
no, he would probably work towards civil rights and stuff.  You know, he's under cover..  he can't let on who he is.
Not immediately apparent as conspiracy material but if you understand and accept the premise then a conspiracy becomes evident. I always get attacked on this sub when I talk about electricity it is quite amusing.  Eric Dollard - History and Theory of Electricity https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TttHkDRuyZw 
&gt; Though scary stuff to see Merica bringing their hate and terror up north  u fockin wot m8? Canada has always had a huge issue with treating Natives like shit. It's especially apparent in Quebec where it's just accepted as "oh, that's Quebecois for you".   Let's not bring up the countless bodies of Natives that wind up in fields that are all apparently "suicides". No no no, it's mericas fault. 
/r/Blackout2015: Blackout 2015  A place to discuss the great reddit forced obsolescence of 2015  42,419 subscribers, a community for 2 days
Not necessarily, they  could have just thought that he was the most qualified person for the job so they hired him. We will have to wait and see what decisions he makes.
So anything critical of Israel is automatically antisemitic?  
Here comes all the negative comments about cops. We only saw the video where the officer checked his ID and stuff. Ofcourse he is an undercover, and If you are being detain and have no crime just comply. Resisting just makes it worst. The guy taking the video prolly is the most annoying part. Saying "I got everything on camera 1 million times." bool-shiit"
[deleted]
But your math doesn't make sense.   Opening a single link for 10 minutes doesn't mean you've used up 10 minutes of server time. 
This guy is literal JIDF poster. Whole post history is about Jews/Israel
Exactly, I'm glad OP brought this to our attention but let's see what the actions of this bank yield first. If it keeps impoverishing the first world by preying on and robbing places like South America and Africa then we'll know it's just more of the same, if their policies create growth that empowers and benefits developing nations then we'll know it's a different animal.
This reply doesn't even remotely make sense. "Do you really, truly believe this is a compete coincidence? You'd have to be blind." Well, guess I'm blind then; because it is a coincidence.  You stated a "fact"? Where have you gotten this "fact" from? You're such a genius because you removed 1 letter from a word, aren't you?  Also, how would I "experiment" with this? So, by your definition your "fact" is absolutely true. If I don't accept this, I will never see any truth. *Aaalright...*  You know, when the mainstream pokes fun at conspiracy theorists, they have the image of **YOU** in their mind. Thanks for ruining it for all of us. You might as well be one of those reptilian lizard guys or flat earthers, genuine disinfo or just lunacy.
It was absolutely proven true.  Also, the sterilization "vaccines" in third world countries.  Again, also proven.
I prefer describing these posts as being worthy of /r/subredditdrama but essentially you've echoed my exact sentiments on this sub for the last 6 months. At least it's /r/news this time instead of /r/todayilearned.
Kids are stupid. 
DO NOT VOTE FOR THIS GUY.  It's all bullshit.  Democrat, Republican or any major contender will succumb to big business.  You need a guy in there that doesn't give a fuck.
Oh. I know this happens. Lol. A lot.   In my career field, I know when they get cut. Lol. 
Their motto is don't be evil and they attend bilderberg. Any questions?
More effective than any petition would be to cancel your gold subscription. Money talks. She was brought in to be the CEO to make Reddit profitable. If she hurts Reddit's bottom line then she'll be gone. When you cancel your subscription, it gives you the chance to say why you're cancelling. I put "Cancelling because of Ellen Pao. I'll renew when she is gone."
Unless you are labeled a terrorist by the state in which case it's open season. Not that I agree with that since the state can declare whoever they wanted but in this case if you go off and join the Taliban or ISIS or Boko Haram you won't get much sympathy from me regardless if it "against the law" or not.   You are granted certain protections until you waive your citizenship or commit crimes. 
good luck finding one while keeping the two-party system in place.
Once you go blank(currency not backed by anything) you never go back. The banksters themselves would nuke Greece the same moment they tried to do anything like what you described 
lol i dont think you understand what that sub is. they are calling out /r/conspiracy as a whole for being gullible. "topminds" is making fun of the users on this sub.
Silverstein helped plan the entire thing, hell, it was probably his idea.
You are right. But that requires we donate our money to the cause. Now can I see the first dollar?
Noted 
I dunno, you sound like the type to see ducks everywhere [without knowing what a duck is.](http://moviemezzanine.com/wp-content/uploads/dr-strangelove-HD-Wallpapers.jpg) 
Maybe Reddit corporate wants all the rabble-rousers to get out, so they can hire some meme makers to steer the sort of crowds that, left on their own, would easily take it in the ass, over and over, oppressive policy change after oppressive policy change without those meddling freedom loving people.    In fact, without the rabble-rousers around, the empty suits will have before them a gargantuan human cattle farm to be carefully cultivated and converted into efficient-obedient approval-seeking consumer junkies, trained by Reddit Inc to spew-out things along the lines of "Look at my status so you can all fear or revere me, but pleeease, thiiink I'm special!"
Reddit is a private website. It's THEIR free speech to censor whatever they want. 
Votes are currently hidden, so how can you tell that you've received a lot of downvotes? 
Yeah because thats EXACTLY how it all went down. &amp;#3232;_&amp;#3232;
I agree 
Is the statement actually false?    Noel Ignatiev is a well known bigoted Jew correct?  - **Ignatiev** was a graduate student at Harvard University where he earned his Ph.D. in 1995. He taught courses there before moving to the Massachusetts College of Art. **His academic work is linked to his call to "abolish" the white race**,   - https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Noel_Ignatiev 
People sail around the World by travelling in a circle.  The FLAT EARTH Theory has the whole World on one flattened-out hemisphere.  How is this a problem to you?
pong
This is some bullshit
pong
Then make your point if you were "misunderstood" here.
Woohoo! Decentralisation ftw!!
So this is a solar system-wide conspiracy? The sun is behind this. It must be destroyed!
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
ping
pong
pong
What about Lebanon? 
[deleted]
And rightfully so.  The nukes were absolutely unnecessary on primarily civilian targets.  Absolutely disgusting.
ping
pong
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I also wish people would check the footage of building 5 which burned out ferociously yet stayed up perfectly.
pong
pong
Oh, and did I say **CUNT!** 
pong
ping
ping
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
pong (go to sleep)
pong (go to sleep)
You have no idea why I'm firm in my opinion. I just said in my previous post I've looked into it myself.   Sure, opinions can be influenced. But by that logic I can argue nothing is really what it seems. It's a bullshit argument. This "influencing" would be thousands of years old.   Here's the main arguments flat earthers have posed in this sub  1) the government can't be trusted! All images and videos are fake! (But the ones that "support" their argument can be trusted)  2) have you really thought about it? Have you researched it? (Yep)  3) you're just not in the right mindset. (A mindset of thinking rationally? I think I am)  You know very well who I meant by "we." Quit being purposely difficult.   Even in your latest comment you did nothing but dance around. Like I said, I'm not discussing the finer points of it anymore. I've done it for three weeks, as have multiple other users here. Take this drivel to them. It's a distraction.   
&gt;This opinion of yours is very much a defeatist one though.  I consider myself a realist. My point is that the process itself has become a farce, a parody of what it once was and I refuse to play along. I wholeheartedly believe that our country is doomed if we continue this charade of two party politics with pre-determined, cookie cutter candidates full of empty rhetoric and bald faced lies. Once elected they only serve themselves and those who help them to maintain power.   Real change doesn't happen in the voting booth because all the options on the ballot lead to acceptable and controllable outcomes for those who truly have the power to influence the governance of our country.  Who decides which candidates get on the ballots? Who decides which candidates make it into the mostly scripted debates? Who decides which candidates get MSM airtime and whether that airtime is negative or positive? If you think it's the American people I own a bridge in Manhattan you may be interested in purchasing.  I know many people disagree with me and that's okay. But it's painfully obvious to me and many others that America has been hijacked by big business for the better part of the last century and by continuing to play their game we are only reinforcing their ever tightening control over our day to day lives.   
Thank you.  that's the best reply I could ask for.
But that's the exact point. Germany can lose the 60 billion on Greece and potentially lose Europe or tell Greece to go hang thereby protecting the quarter of a trillion it's owed by the rest of the EU and, at the same time, protecting Europe.  Germany does not mess around. It looks logically at any given situation, sizes up the options and, generally speaking, does what it genuinely believes to be in the best interest of Europe. It plays the long game.  It basically boils down to whether one believes Greece to be of systemic importance to the European project. Syriza obviously does. I suspect, however, the Germans do not and, for what it's worth, neither do I.  Germany's choice then becomes:  1. Cave to Greece to protect the €60 billion but risk political instability throughout the periphery.  2. Stand up to Greece, lose €60 billion (which is probably lost anyway) but protect Europe and moneys lent to other European countries.  So, for my money, Germany will stick to its principles. Anyone expecting Germany to make a decision that delivers short term gain at the risk of long term loss knows little about the country.  And what of the other countries on the periphery? Surely it would make sense for them to follow Syriza and get better deals for their citizens?  The problem with that thinking is the government parties in the periphery are more scared of Syriza than Germany is. If the radical left prevails in Greece then the radicals in other countries might too. Because the periphery is, for the most part, overrun with populist politicians that would do anything to hold onto power they need Syriza to fail. Otherwise the radical parties in their home countries could conceivably squeeze them out. Because of the very nature of Syriza, its natural allies are lined up with the core!  Take Ireland for example, a plethora of pictures have appeared with Syriza figures taken at Sinn Féin events. This terrifies Fine Gael. So, in true Irish style, they line up with Germany, not to magnanimously protect Europe, although this is how they wish the decision to be portrayed, but to protect their own power at home.  Syriza is doubly fucked:  1. Because it believes Greece to be systemic it has pissed off the core.  2. Because of its adversarial stance with the core its natural allies are running scared.  Syriza is five years too late to the party. No one really cares about Greece anymore. It's like the drunken uncle at the party. Everyone tolerates him but everyone secretly wishes he would just pass out.   Syriza royally screwed Greece to gain power and now because Greece is royally screwed Europe can finally cut it loose. It's the Catch 22 of the century!
Thanks
That's like saying "mall security admits to calling cops."
You will conspire against everything while you enjoy the benefits of it.  Hypocrisy at its finest.
Lol, thanks
Numerology is for the weak imo. There are too many 'false positives' with it to be of any use, and for those who actually are able to use it correctly, there are infinitely more powerful modalities at their disposal. 
Clearly.  When the risks are lower than being struck by lightning, I'll pass on hedging such ridiculous and risk, unproven bets.
&gt;Where is the evidence for chemtrails?   Elevated levels of aluminum, barium, strontium and other heavy metals in rain and soil samples consistent with US geoengineering patents for processes like solar radiation management. Stated interest in geoengineering by President Obama, 'the case for climate engineering' by geoengineer David Keith. Stated military intent to control weather patterns 'Air Force 2025: weather as a force multiplier' on top of known events like operation Popeye in Vietnam. Enron development of weather derivatives, Monsantos aluminum resistant seed, awfully convenient, no? Data available on geoengineeringwatch.org    &gt;How to you rectify and understanding of contrails (condensation of water vapor by the engines) and the claims of chemtrails theorists?   High bypass turbofan jet engines do not emit condensation trails by design. http://gsw.bz/contrails  &gt;Why has no one sampled an alleged chemtrail and performed a spectroscopic analysis of it?   The difficulty in obtaining such a sample would be a good guess, though it would be an excellent addition to the otherwise overwhelming mountain of data.   Food for thought:  chemtrail base mixture is coal fly ash:  https://youtu.be/F6r0GqbH9Os  &gt;How are airline pilots, who are alleged to be complicit in this conspiracy, who have been very recently reported as underpaid, kept silent as to their participation? and if they are ignorant of what their plane is doing, how so?    Compartmentalization is a major tool of silence.  The aircraft emitting trails are likely to be military jets (not standard commercial jets), and the spraying is likely controlled via satellite.   As crazy as weather manipulation sounds, there is a decent amount of evidence suggesting that it has taken place and is ongoing. 
It has to be Jews that do it, otherwise no matter what you say they call you an anti-Semite. Ironic, given that you'll usually be defending the Palestinian Semites they murder on a regular basis.
all i said was that guy shouldnt be directing people to a joke sub reddit. your whole comment history is nothing but trolls man.
this is the spammiest blog i've ever seen
He wasn't a founder.
I verify your observations. :o) 
Yeah, like I said: It's a stretch. A long-shot theory without any evidence.
The burden of proof falls on the religion that claims it has answers.
Rihanna is a champion of the little people now? Yes it is true that the banks are evil and there should be a reckoning but the guy was an accountant... thats hardly the axis power that controls things and fucks over the little guy. Thats exactly what they wan't though, the real culprits are the uber rich who will be far removed from the chaos when shit hits the fan. They want the common folk to squabble over these things while they dissolve sovereignty and bring us further towards world government. The divide and conquer technique of starting a race war is the perfect distraction and excuse to usher in the new era of totalitarian control. Order through chaos.
[deleted]
All the families of the people that are in on it are secretly sequestered in some underground base.
[deleted]
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I'm pretty sure they tracked down the guy who created the conspiracy theory and he was a tramp type guy living in Ireland who believed he was the Messiah. I think it's even included at the end of this documentary 
I just don't think you have memories prior to existing and even if you claim you do there is no demonstrable way to prove it. Good luck on your journey I hope you find what you're looking for.
Imagine if Hitler had a iPhone.. 
I hope this documentary gets sufficient exposure. We need more people to know how fucked up Hollywood is.  [Here's the classic video where actor Corey Feldman talks about pedophilia in Hollywood](https://youtu.be/McpjA-PqrKU?t=52). He was a victim himself.  [Here's Todd Bridges -from Different Strokes- mentioning the Hollywood abuse of children](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Am_iEVigKOk). Victim himself.  [Here's actress Thandie Newton talking about casting couch interviews](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZwP9OUwNZOE) in Hollywood.  A few years ago, there was this male massage therapist who claimed John Travolta tried to sexually assault him. Travolta allegedly said :   &gt; "*that Hollywood is controlled by homosexual Jewish men who expect favors in return for sexual activity. [Travolta] then went on to say how he had done things in his past that would make most people throw up"*  &gt; "*[Travolta] explained when he started that he wasn't even gay and that the taste of 'cum' would make him gag. [He] also said that he was smart enough to learn to enjoy it, and when he began to make millions of dollars, that it all became well worth it"*  &gt; source : http://www.thesmokinggun.com/file/travolta-massage-suit?page=0   
ping
ping
pong
&gt;It doesn't exist.  That's your opinion. Thanks for your input though. It means close to nothing. 
pong
pong
pong
pong
pong
The elevated metals and radionuclides are from coal and other fossil fuels, not contrails. The easy way to verify it is to compare areas before and after heavy air traffic, or to compare two regions of vastly different air traffic. 
Jokes on them. I don't have any friends so I don't have a phone to keep my privacy.
I'll that rephrase for you:  "No."
So much truth in that clip.  Shame they ruined the series with the 2nd and 3rd movies. 
True, this is why bitcoins value varies so much and why it's a risky investment. I'm really interested to see what happens with bitcoin going forward.    Probably one of my biggest regrets ever is not investing in it when it was new. I thought about it but didn't really have the money. But I had a decent pc setup and could of mined some which would be worth a lot today.
Lmao. Dude. Google "airplane contrails 1970s." The google "airplane contrails 1980s." You're full of shit. 
Great deductive reasoning.   The whole incident was certainly very bizarre - very roswell, "crashed ufo - I mean, not crashed ufo - weather balloon!"
  Trump's comments include obviously nonsensical claims like  "nobody builds better walls" than him. He also ridiculously claimed he could make Mexico pay for that wall.    On top of that, he insists "there's nobody bigger or better at the military" than him even though his only experience involves a stint at military boarding school as a teenager in the 1960s.  Additionally, his claims about [crime](http://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/the-fix/wp/2015/07/02/surprise-donald-trump-is-wrong-about-immigrants-and-crime/) and [disease](http://time.com/2991764/myth-diseased-immigrant/) from undocumented immigrants are based on hyperbole.  So the valid criticism of Trump's rhetoric has nothing to do with political correctness.  
It's voluntary. And while I realize that the concern will be for it to become mandatory, we should at least acknowledge that it's currently voluntary. 
I don't normally comment here but all this did was allow the 6 month shutdown period happen instead of an immediate shutdown, damn click bait shit.
It's one guy's attempt at providing a solution. I remember he used to post here and ask people what they want etc.  If you don't like it you should try coming up with an idea yourself and going for that. Talk is cheap, action is rare.
It's not a case of personal preference. There is solid evidence that says the plume of white coming out of the back of an airliner is simply ice crystals resulting from burning hydrocarbon fuel in a cold wet atmosphere, and that how long it persists is down to air temperature, pressure, and humidity.
Yes, even the BBC discusses Snowdon and Wikileaks, they even feed us information from them
Hows that freedom working out for you?
I open your mother in one tab and your sister in another tab
She has a really hard time saying the word 'financial'.
Did anyone expect anything else?  They probably have billions invested in these systems.  You simply just have to assume you are being watched 24/7 and act accordingly.
That is truly heartbreaking for that family. But there is a risk in anything you do.  We can't allow dead diseases to make come backs and get your unvaccinated child that way.   I suppose choose your battles.
Funny how theres always someone in these threads who was there or knows someone who was... Heh.
ping
乒乓球的大師  ping
乒乓球的大師  ping
ping
Nice to meet you 乒乓球的大師  I feel like I have to tell you that /u/UnluckyLuke and I are in a monogameous pingpong relationship and I would never play with someone else since it would hurt him tremendously  ^^^^^^Like ^^^^^^he ^^^^^^hurt ^^^^^^me ^^^^^^when ^^^^^^he ^^^^^^played ^^^^^^with ^^^^^^someone ^^^^^^else ^^^^^^behind ^^^^^^my ^^^^^^back
你把球再圓眼荷蘭男孩  ping
遊戲上  ping
Nice to meet you 你覺得我漂亮嗎?  I feel like I have to tell you that /u/UnluckyLuke and I are in a monogameous pingpong relationship and I would never play with someone else since it would hurt him tremendously  ^^^^^^Like ^^^^^^he ^^^^^^hurt ^^^^^^me ^^^^^^when ^^^^^^he ^^^^^^played ^^^^^^with ^^^^^^someone ^^^^^^else ^^^^^^behind ^^^^^^my ^^^^^^back
這些島嶼屬於中國不是日本  ping
Blasphemy
這些島嶼屬於中國不是日本  ping 
Nice to meet you 尊重中國的主權  I feel like I have to tell you that /u/UnluckyLuke and I are in a monogameous pingpong relationship and I would never play with someone else since it would hurt him tremendously  ^^^^^^Like ^^^^^^he ^^^^^^hurt ^^^^^^me ^^^^^^when ^^^^^^he ^^^^^^played ^^^^^^with ^^^^^^someone ^^^^^^else ^^^^^^behind ^^^^^^my ^^^^^^back
不在風中彎曲的樹將打破  ping
不在風中彎曲的樹將打破  ping
不在風中彎曲的樹將打破 to you too!  I am a faithful woman, do not tempt me by trying to make me play on another person's table
人的道路是乒乓球 to you too!    I am a faithful woman, do not tempt me by trying to make me play on another person's table
No   I am a faithful woman, do not tempt me by trying to make me play on another person's table
 This comment section is now sponsered by Monsanto. Monsanto, you can't prove we killed your family!
You acknowledge it and still continue? This is digital rape!  I refuse to play your games!  This comment section is now sponsered by Monsanto. Monsanto, it's food... probably!
[What about a 10 and 1/2 ?] ( https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OJQmy1OIxTs)
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I couldn't tilt my head to the left. The results were self evident.
It just shows exactly how much people care about having something to stare at while their life passes them by.  It's a similar thing to how a small portion of a town's population reacts when there is b'fuckery afoot with *local sports team*.  We can't get 150k signatures to stop the extrajudicial killings of civilians by drone strikes, but we can to demand the interim CEO of a private media corporation step down because of a firing of a member of a group that feels it is *more equal* than the rest of the user base.   The world burns, but maybe there's something in the new queue...
Like anyone actually thinks that.  What you mean to say is - "Shut up conspiracy theorist!"
I'm so shocked.   Dismayed even.
I have a multi-reddit that'll give you a good overview, then drill down into whatever individual subreddits you find interesting:  - https://www.reddit.com/user/LetsHackReality/m/rabbithole  edit: Oh, hey, Bob is here. Hi, Bob!
[deleted]
Voat is pretty good though, I don't know why you guys don't go there. 
Please. I defend free speech even if the person who is speaking is lying or delusional...fuck even if it's hate speech I will defend their right to say it!  Freedom is a double edged sword and you cannot dull one side of it just because you don't "believe in it."   And the implications of giving the allopathic industry/federal government total control over the way we take care of ourselves and heal ourselves is that we are living under medical tyranny and we no longer have the right to our own bodies.
They're hoping someone over here will heed the call and act. Also, the U.S. is more hesitant to use nukes and attack civilian-heavy areas. 
nah, I cherrypicked that point because that's the only part of the article I know anything about or can provide any info on. 
I never said chemtrails at 40k did anything.   Just that weather modification can and does happen.
Yeah and every country has tp  Oh. Except Venezuela
[deleted]
Incomprehensibly? Sorry I'll try to articulate myself more clearly since apparently you cannot read.  I hope you realize just because you know how to be an asshole on the internet, that doesn't mean you are intellectual or that you've done a good job refuting anything I've said (you haven't even tried)  Carlos Arredondo - American Hero?   Do you agree? Or would you admit there are several things both documented and strange about him. This would be THE FIRST inconsistency, walk with me now....  Let me know when your apparently feeble mind (since you can't read plain english) catches up, and we will move onto some more bizarre, and documented FACTS.  Like Carlos lighting himself on fire, renaming himself, and becoming an American citizen.   ;)
Stop bitching, call out of work, and go do something about it. I don't care enough to.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xIJSw3Mhyd8 - Here is the bomb being placed.  And here are two videos, one in which a guy has a similar injury to Bauman, and one much worse. They were alive, and they are moving. The guy who blew off his leg survives. They are very graphic. If you are sensitive, don't watch.   http://www.military.com/video/operations-and-strategy/terrorism/graphic-iranian-bomber-blows-legs-off/1454508449001/  http://tywkiwdbi.blogspot.ca/2009/09/man-cut-in-half-by-vehicle-accident.html  Bottom line. You are not an expert. You are not a doctor. You have zero fucking clue what you are talking about. To deny any injuries during this event is insane. 
&gt;Show us others who behave as he did.  [Here's one!](http://www.bestgore.com/bloody-injuries/two-people-lose-legs-gas-cylinder-explosion-zoo-recife-brazil/)  Also, you can be in shock and conscious, that's pretty much what shock is.
That second one is VERY OLD STUFF, like ten years or so, and in its age and time had been widely debunked as some chemical thing.  That first one, though. Jebus.  Ed. : As for OP, pretty sure that's low-cost CGI.
No more proof is needed than falling speed. Guess you're not an engineer.  [But these people are!](http://www.ae911truth.org/)
So this guy is going to send all his personal and official government emails and passwords in plain text? That'll work out great. 
&gt;flying machines and wireless transmission of energy  How do those help much? Flying machines sound entirely irrelevant, especially if we're pushing for isolationism. Wireless transmission is cool, but it doesn't answer the question of what is actually generating the energy. If it's still hydrocarbons, what's the point?
&gt; Who sits on an account for 5 years.... and posts less that 6 times?  Squatters.  But, it also raises the question as to whether or not admins are involved in locating recyclable abandoned accounts.
First question, how rude do you believe being super smart allows you to be?  Second question, are you telling me that the weight of the top portion of the tower had enough force to push down at what is near free fall speed and that is why it was able to happen so easily?
Never seen these pictures before, thanks.
I unsubbed from there a day or two ago. My theory is they let go of that employee because she tried to enforce the rules.   It's going to turn into reddit's new revenue stream by selling out. 
You can't argue with an anti-Semite.  No matter what's going on - it's somehow the Jews' fault.  Banking problems? Jews.  Political problems? Jews.  Legal bull? Jews.  Shark attacks? Jews.  Ill-fitting door seams? Jews.
Hang on here. To say "all of them" is laughable. But the big ones, the ones they push in the media? The ones they use to forward their own agendas. ..yes *all of them*  Just as laughable to say all terrorist attacks are exactly as we are told.  And yes, the Boston bombing was a false flag.
http://altereddimensions.net/2013/alien-baby-corpse-found-in-russia-1996
&gt;Where's the conspiracy?  Come on.
If the ship was sunk, and no witnesses left, like was the intention, the Israeli's wouldn't have to say someone else did it.   That would have been the American's job to lay that blame on an Arab nation.  The fact the boat didn't sink let it's tale be told.  Now why didn't the U.S. deal with it?  Your guess is as good as mine.  My guess is they didn't want Israel to look bad, and probably wish they wouldn't have fucked up and left the boat on top of the water.
secureteam10...  enough said.
That makes no sense.
Huh?
Swamp gas. Ice crystals. Dragonball Z fight. 
Try your microwave for like 15 seconds.
Maybe Putin is the real good guy   (If you take me serious you have problems)
TIL the Australian Northern Approach is heavily guarded and comparable to the DMZ. 
This is old news.  Maybe you are just discovering that BIG Anything colludes with the gov't, allowing their product to be fast tracked onto the market.  So your skepticism is warranted, but completely rejecting vaccines is clearly petulant.   Would you say every medication is harmful without benefits?  Why do you pick on vaccines; they were invented long before BIG industry influenced politicians.  If you were to reject products based on the industries influence on politicians, you might as well live the life of Thoreau for the rest of your life. 
bye. 
I never understood why anyone would identify as a political party. It just seems silly to already pick sides on an issue before even looking at any evidence.
Let's make sure we get your original link the attention it deserves  http://news.stanford.edu/news/2015/july/vaccine-court-engstrom-070615.html
From your comments posted on that subreddit:  &gt;Most Jews are not actively participating in any wrongdoing, but they do have a tendency to get in front of and defend their corrupt leaders.   https://np.reddit.com/user/JustTakeItBitch  That is your opinion instead of a fact.  Also, those comments do seem to violate that subreddit's posted rules about civility.  https://np.reddit.com/r/politics/wiki/rulesandregs#wiki_please_be_civil 
My point is that encryption is possible with very basic math.
Are you really that craven that you imagine that corporate takeover would be the ALTERNATIVE to what we have now?  EDIT: Sorry, craven is a strong word, I've had a couple beers, and the adversarial nature of Reddit sometimes overwhelms. Anarchy is a complete decentralization of power, and is exactly the opposite of the corporate socialist state we find ourselves in globally. 
http://www.fda.gov/BiologicsBloodVaccines/SafetyAvailability/VaccineSafety/UCM096228#t2  http://www.cdc.gov/vaccinesafety/concerns/thimerosal/thimerosal_timeline.html  http://www.medicalnewstoday.com/articles/93217.php  
All we can do is spread the word. Educate other people so they understand. We can only fight it as a community and we need more people for that.
And it has been for the last 40 years if not longer!
Wow. Amazing. Now,what is this supposed to prove? 
I think we first need to get rid of the scarlet letter(or tin foil hat) that is immediately branded on your forward the second you bring these topics up in public. Social media seems like the obvious answer on how to fix these problems without more catalyzing catastrophes.  Get the attention, get the support, then get the results.  Then go to sleep it was a hard day.
[deleted]
Nukes don't exist 
Trump is a distraction from Bush. That is all. 
I think we can!
Trump would come up well short.
your list might be too long for all to fit on one page
He just commented in the post about the walled off world. He's still around. 
This season of orange is the new black was laced with cultural propaganda. [Spoilers]  One of the characters is paranoid/delusional and brings this up with the fact Searle was purchased by monsanto.  Another interesting bit was the juxtaposition of the abusive nation of islam preacher and the rabbi who welcomes a black character into converting to judaism after an empassioned rationalist (atheist) appeal. "And as far as God is concerned, it's your job to keep asking questions and to keep learning and to keep arguing. It's like a verb. It's like, ... you do God. And that's a lot of work." As if judaism was this thing a black woman in prison can just convert to based on a secular humanist revalation... I felt like I was being advertised to by judaism.  Oh and the transwoman is now a victim of abuse and the good guy guard who got the prisoner pregnant ran off (because he was giving the wrong impression) and was replaced with a "nice guy" who is actually a rapist.  
&gt; My question for you is, where can I find info to back up my claim that the vote doesn't matter?  [Here ya go.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s7tWHJfhiyo)  It's called 'First Past the Post'.  
Can someone elaborate?
watch them cry out in pain and say the FBI is antisemitic 
 The cognitive dissonance must be extreme given the gap between the truth and what he says is usually so massive.
Maybe this is all a big ruse to get us through the boring summer internet. Its like clickbait.  If there is drama, we will click.
what about leap years?
&gt;  If I was an admin, the last place I'd go to expose Reddit would be to go to the /b/tards.  If you wanted to keep your job, it's the only place you *could* go.
RemindMe! 3 weeks "Send smug picture."
Looks like you didn't read the second link.  I don't waste my time on people who cannot read. 
I was actually going to do a little more digging to find out if some of these countries also introduced Monsanto GMO's around the same time period. Could the spike in autism also correspond to Glyphosphate and it's associated GMO's being introduced into the environment?
Speaking of working hard
This is conspiracy. The data that supports aspartame being poisonous is seldom abd the data supporting it as safe is everywhere. Otherwise its not a conspiracy.
Why is man boy the only pedo activity that people seem to care about  what about the man/girl, woman/boy and woman/girl?
LBJ
Made up. 
Indeed.  I guess I didn't expect it to happen so soon, but what's the point in waiting, when they must know όχι means no.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Straw_man  Okay I will play; so is a 4chan thread with no proof and no corroboration from any other news source a credible source?  I don't expect an answer, you will undoubtedly ignore this.
Really, can't you post this to /r/butthurtjewsdenythetruth or /r/jewsdenyreality or some other truth denial sub like /r/worldnews?  
Many many many many independent solo and crewed sailing vessels have failed to find the edge of the world.
This isn't live attacks, it's attacks that are happening to honeypots norse has set up.
It's real time, but it's not real systems. All the attacks are captured from honey pots that Norse has set up, these aren't attacks on systems that do anything.
When he back tracked after he got the memo
LOL #REKT
props bro
Yeah, I pretty much downvote these upon first sight. When one skydives, or goes to the top of a skyscraper and can see the curve on the horizon, it kind of lends weight to the fact THAT THE EARTH IS ROUND. Oh, and the Coriolis Effect...ask any sniper about the validity of the earth being flat and see what they say.   Illusions? Fuck off with that shit. The money and technology required to keep this kind of thing a secret would be absolutely absurd.     
If it's simply metal then why doesn't chelation therapy work?
Everything about atheism is silly trash. Its a self-contradictory worldview that reduces to radical skepticism. Also spare me your atheist bullshit of trying to skirt intellectual responsibility saying atheism is just a lack of belief. If we are playing word games then Theism is just the lack of belief in ontological naturalism. Anything more is no theism, but ideas professed by those who happen to identify as theists.
HTTPS...  try https://senate.gov... ie... no more passwords for you!
Your analogy of a classroom doesn't work because it assumes this a fair game.  It isn't and it never has been.  I suspect most of the readers of this sub know WHY this is the case.  Who is printing all of the money?  Why is it that whenever a government stops trading for oil in USD, suddenly they must be invaded to save western freedom? A map like this shows the consequence of such a rigged game. 
&gt; People who back homeopathy do so out of ignorance of science, spread dangerous misinformation , which in vunerable people can lead to neglect of dangerous conditions, or be used to extort money for false hope  And doctors NEVER do that do they! No way. Vulnerable people are so safe in the hands of doctors (prescription medicines are a leading cause of death http://www.collective-evolution.com/2013/11/20/how-pharmaceuticals-came-to-be-the-4th-leading-cause-of-death-in-america/) They are a regulated by a governing body incapable of corruption and incompetence.(http://elderofziyon.blogspot.ca/2015/04/independent-uk-says-academic-journals.html#.VZ19IRchzA8)  As I said before, I am not defending homeopathy nor am I shitting on it (like you) because I don't understand it. You are basically stating that what you know about the world is the limits to what you can know about the world and the mysteries of the human body and that we all should bow down before the god of allopathic medicine and gratefully show obeisance to our omnipotent masters.   Fuck that. I have had way more direct care from my chiropractor than from any allopathic doctor...now if I break a leg or need my appendix removed am I going to be singing the same tune? No I am not. I am going to get my surgery and my drugs from the allopathic business men and THEN I am going to go to my chiropractor and my nutritionist (or whatever unregulated bullshit I choose) and get MY healthy self back on the fast track to wellness. Not languish on pain pills.   And finally, your ignorance about water is typical. Water is alive and holds more mysteries than we are prepared to admit. It is not simply H20. It is not simply a chemical. The future of humanity on this planet depends on a shift in our attitude towards water...it is a life giving living substance which, if you honestly look at it, holds almost all the features that we look for when scientifically establishing "life".  
Hmmmm.... 
Thanks.
I don't really want to get into a long back and forth since the questions you are asking are fairly basic ones about the model.  If you are actually interested in finding out more about this subject, I recommend this primer created by another user. https://np.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/393icm/whats_all_this_flat_earth_stuff_about_anyway/  There is a lot of material there including the answer to your question.
Doesn't it seem ironic that this graph started to go through the roof and out of control after 82 when Reagan came into office?
&gt; Really, can't you post this to /r/caughtjewsstealing  Agreed. This is a "dog bites man" or "water is wet" type story. No surprises here.  The real news here is that it's got 3,000 upvotes on /r/news right now- **and** the mods haven't pulled it yet!  (yet)  It would have been "disappeared" from /r/worldnews hours ago  
are you looking at the norse map? i've never seen it before. is it usually so active??
Atheism is a religion.  Its a label... An ideology used to discriminate just like other religions.  "You're not Christian/Jewish/Muslim/Atheist... You're awful and wrong". 
I feel like this should be in our constitution 
To be fair its pretty easy to distrust a military exercise placing troops on American streets. 
You like talking to bots?  
Here's the former **chief of the UK Department of Health, Dr Peter Fletcher**, he will put the **MMR/Autism** story into perspective for you now...  "the refusal by governments to evaluate the risks properly will make this one of the greatest scandals in medical history".  "Clinical and scientific data is steadily accumulating that the live measles virus in MMR can cause brain, gut and immune system damage in a subset of vulnerable children,"  "There are very powerful people in positions of great authority in Britain and elsewhere who have staked their reputations and careers on the safety of MMR and they are willing to do almost anything to protect themselves."  "There's no one conclusive piece of scientific evidence, no 'smoking gun', because there very rarely is when adverse drug reactions are first suspected. When vaccine damage in very young children is involved, it is harder to prove the links.  "But it is the steady accumulation of evidence, from a number of respected universities, teaching hospitals and laboratories around the world, that matters here. There's far too much to ignore. Yet government health authorities are, it seems, more than happy to do so."  "When scientists first raised fears of a possible link between mad cow disease and an apparently new, variant form of CJD they had detected in just 20 or 30 patients, everybody panicked and millions of cows were slaughtered," said Dr Fletcher.  "Yet there has been a tenfold increase in autism and related forms of brain damage over the past 15 years, roughly coinciding with MMR's introduction, and an extremely worrying increase in childhood inflammatory bowel diseases and immune disorders such as diabetes, and no one in authority will even admit it's happening, let alone try to investigate the causes."  He said there was "no way" the tenfold leap in autistic children could be the result of better recognition and definitional changes, as claimed by health authorities.  "It is highly likely that at least part of this increase is a vaccinerelated problem." he said. "But whatever it is, why isn't the Government taking this massive public health problem more seriously?"  "That is a very strong clinical signal that some children are immunologically at risk from MMR," he said. "Why is the Government not investigating it further - diverting some of the millions of pounds spent on advertising and PR campaigns to promote MMR uptake into detailed clinical research instead?"  He said: "It is entirely possible that the immune systems of a small minority simply cannot cope with the challenge of the three live viruses in the MMR jab, and the ever-increasing vaccine load in general."  "Now, it seems, unless the parents force the Government to restore legal aid, much of this revealing evidence may never come out," he said.   
Looks like Senator Bill Nelson wasted no time:  &gt; Three major computer malfunctions on same day give appearance of an attack, serve as reminder Congress must pass a cybersecurity bill  Source: Senator Bill Nelson's Twitter Page
have ya ever heard of electronic records?
You don't necessarily need Internet, it can be stored locally.
True, but the fake flair doesn't show up in mobile apps.But, I do agree with you.
I'm confused how inserting pop culture into a show is considered propaganda. Paranoid people talk about Monsanto; people that aren't paranoid usually don't. The Judaism conversion was more unexpected than advertised; she seemed to actually find faith, and I was more happy for her than the religion itself. Your last point completely ignored the character development between the characters: they don't go through with the revenge. Also, the rape scene was obviously about the perversion of power people get when taking on the uniform, eg the Stanford prison experiment.  Edit: the only propaganda I saw was the problems with privatizing prisons, but private prisons have problems, so...
&gt; So the freedom of information means everything should be free, yea im sure that philosophy will cause a society to bloom and be successful.  Whoa, straw man much? Free information does not imply that all products should be free. If you're going to cite economics, then it should be clear that technology has effectively brought the marginal cost to produce a copy of digitally encoded information to $0. All products' prices tend toward their marginalized costs; information is no exception.
[It's Israel who is threatening to nuke Iran](https://electronicintifada.net/blogs/asa-winstanley/israeli-defense-minister-promises-kill-more-civilians-and-threatens-nuke-iran).   It's Israel who should be ostracized from US politics.
Why did you folks stop using the global warming phrase? 
[**Freeeeeeedooooooooooooooom!!**](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lLCEUpIg8rE)
I find it both fascinating and dismaying that some people continue to believe that "the new enemy identified by the US" is not another "enemy fabricated/constructed by the US". They are and always have been strawmen - imaginary targets to keep the attention off of those who fabricate them.  How can such a tired tactic still continue to dupe people?
&gt; DATA: Artificial substances are not a healthy component of HUMAN nutrition.  That's not how data works. You need numbers. Sorry to break it to you.  Fortunately, people who actually believe "natural is healthy and unnatural is toxic" don't live long enough to spread their ignorance. They tend to die of natural diseases or poisons that go untreated because they refuse the unnatural medicine needed to save their lives.
&gt; ive watched the entire series twice and have watched it thoroughly  Then how exactly do you think it is indoctrinating middle-class women into a way of thought that selling drugs is "kosher"?  The whole show is about how Nancy makes shitty, selfish choices and her world burns around her as a result.  She's literally one of the only characters who doesn't have a happy ending, and who is seemingly always on a crash course toward rock bottom.  I don't deny that it's political (all of Jenji Kohan's notable works seem to be such) or that it has Jewish themes (again, all of Jenji Kohan's notable works seem to have such) but I'm failing to see how it is indoctrinating anyone or how the Jewish themes are somehow bad.
See you tomorrow. 
I like the man.I support his position. That said, he had a finite term, in swedish jail and enough cash to cover any costs incurred. This is an enormously privileged position… It might be wise to question it's worth. But that says more about my problem with the headline than anything. It's not relevant. Regardless, we could reasonably ask 'What, precisely, was accomplished? That feels like a sensible question.  
You're out of your mind.
&gt;Under freedom of information we see that the CDC doctors privately admit that vaccines are causing Autism and admit that they won't be vaccinating their own children and grandchildren  is there any source for this or was this more of a hope-to-see on your part?
[deleted]
Jeb Bush: GFY
How about /r/MyParentsAreChristiansAndImNowInCollege ?
Fucking Bush Crime Syndicate. 
Rule 10. No personal attacks. Removed.
There are about 10,000 proofs of the Round Earth and zero for the Flat one.  But if you want to discuss it, come make a post with your ideas over at /r/theworldisflat
You have an exaggerated idea of the care and consistency that doctors give to severely developmentally disabled.  Generally, they're dumped in homes and forgotten until they die.  No one's rushing out to rediagnose them with some new, just as incurable disease - where's the profit in that?
I think the TPP is a horrible idea.   I can't believe people are honestly giving it any thought, at all.   As someone who usually disagrees with the pundit known as Jon Stewart, I say cheers. 
I'm sure he is told what he can and can't talk about.
I think you give science (as it's most widely practiced, not what it's meant to be) far too much credit.  It's also blatantly obvious that you discredit anything you find too scary.  That's fine, but don't call yourself rational or logical. You're fearful.    Every single method of healing is effective in its place.  They all share the same degree of efficacy and failure.  "Modern" medicine has harmed more people than all the alternative medicine and it still does.    For the record, I don't use homeopathy. But members of my extended family do and as professional alpaca breeders and veterinarians on two continents, do you honestly think that these people do this for no good reason whatsoever?  If it doesn't work, why would they use these methods for decades?    You're wrong and not even smart or experienced enough to know it.  
wtf if you look at it now china is attacking st Louis and vice versa. What's in st Louis 
Please restart to install correctly
All the world's a stage.
thanks for replying. 
If this is happening all the time why/how do politicians save face during meetings, treaties, etc? I personally believe all this geopolitical maneuvering and possibilities of war is a big joke and their all friends. 
[deleted]
Interesting. I wonder what religion the bankers that **WEREN'T** jailed are.
Killing an unborn baby is far worse than catching some spots
Small Pox was not eradicated by vaccines, but by quarantine, in fact the vaccines were incredibly dangerous, this was admitted at the time.  Polio was renamed as a large number of diseases, thereby reducing the amount of Polio diagnosis and making the vaccine appear a success.  Let's not forget that the the Merck vaccine chief admitted on video that the Polio vaccine was contaminated with a Cancer-Causing Virus, that is why the Cancer rates went epidemic after that vaccine.
@anonymouSabu would like a word. He just finished his probation. 
Then you're an idiot
It's almost like people have the ability to browse 2....count them...2 websites at once. 
&gt; I'm A Scientist Who Was An Atheist Until DMT ~~Opened My Heart~~ Fried my Brain.  
YAYYY!!! your theory!!!
Nothing will change.  Reddit's chance at "protest for a change" peaked when they closed down those subreddit's.  Once they folded within only a few hours and went back online, it was clear nothing of substance had occurred.  The mods ate up the canned "We will change" excuse that was put out, with only a few sticking to there guns.  Reddit has forgotten about the whole thing like a fart in the wind.  EDIT:  . . .
Well, I think you were wrong then and you're still wrong now!   The US is financing, training and arming different factions of islamic mercenaries explicitly to destroy Assad. The US/UK/France are pretending to get tough with ISIS, but this is a smokescreen which will allow them to achieve their real objective, which is regime change in Syria.
Nothing and I looked fabulous!!! 
Not only that the majority could be unverified names  Who knows if its actually 200k people or 20k people posting 10 times each
Idiots.  She's not going anywhere.  Don't waste your time.  If you're so upset, go somewhere else.  But you won't.  So stfu and browse your feed like a good little user.
Jeff, plz go. Go to voat.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You just need a different email with each "signature". That's the only verification. So you can sign as much as you want with free email addresses or use things like [guerrilla mail](https://www.guerrillamail.com/) to just quickly generate emails that last long enough to click the verify link they send you. 
What motivated you to make this claim? It takes anybody two seconds to verify that it's not true.   It's just incredibly outlandish man
Looks like [Order of the Orange-Nassau](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Order_of_Orange-Nassau). The [Netherlands awarded it to him in 2004](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Raymond_Sackler).
Have you considered testing a couple of those hail stones?  If cloud seeding has been used, there would likely be trace minerals that indicate this.
Wonder how long that can keep being the scapegoat?   A couple of decades ago no one ever talked about El Nino, or El Nina.   The weather was also considerably different.    Farmer's Almanac was typically pretty accurate in terms of predictions overall.   EDIT: The interesting thing I find is when El Nino did come out and was being used as a Scapegoat that first year it was being explained as something that doesn't happen very frequently.   Now suddenly anytime the weather seems odd it is that or El Nina that caused it.   Strange how something that was not very frequent is available to conveniently explain the weather very frequently.    EDIT 2: I think El Nina should actually read La Nina.   Sorry about no tilde over the N, not quite sure how to make that happen.
maybe you should listen to Maddox and Dick Masterson's pod cast; "biggest problem in the universe"  one of the top problems is slacktivism.
You mean like....the latest from the Bill Cosby horror show? Or Jared from Subway? Or Trump's latest idiocy? Or the "awesomeness" of Comic-Con and it's bazillion celebrities? Were you being sarcastic?
 #JustWhiteKnightThings
In the past 5 years Texas has never had this cool of a summer. No 100 degrees yet and none on the radar (2011 and 2012 had 100+ days at 100 degrees..).  Also tons of cloud cover and rain this summer which is an anomaly.  Could be the "La Nina" changing the weather patterns (essentially the opposite of the current weather system the "El Nino" which has sustained California's drought).  
A whole 0.58%, for those who can math.
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yeah I agree right now reddit is really profitable, for Pao. She has many stock options and everyone using reddit now is making her rich for doing a despicable censor job. Nothing is being paid at all to the users who give value to the site with their contributions  Decentralization, uncensorable, getting paid for contributing... I think exodus would massive  And about paying, it would mean a few cents maybe, nothing important at all, but a new economy could flourish this way. You wouldn't even need to pay maybe, just voting and contributing and participating creates wealth.   It wouldn't be complicated at all, karma points would mean bitcoin, unlike now that it is worthless, and even "reddit gold" would mean something  The bitcoin part serves as an incentive to maintain the bandwidth in the network and to participate and create content. It can also deter trolls, vote brigading, and trying to censor something. I think it's really interesting
So why share it? We know this type of advertising exists, this is just driving traffic to it. 
[deleted]
&gt; This shit **was** headline news on TIME, New York Times, CNET, and on and on and on.  Key word....WAS...it was news but no one outside of reddit cares.  The General Public doesn't care.  This is like "GamerGate" but with less public interest.  If you think sincerely that Change.org protests mean anything to anyone besides those who are signing them, then using your own words "you're lost"...since it is easy to have one person sign the same petition hundreds of times.
you have to be really ignorant to think chemtrails look anything like contrails.
Both are online. You can in fact compare the two.
The same mods who deleted every post about the TPP because "politics" but allowed supreme court decisions on Obamacare the same day
"This guy" needs to be collaborating with the Voat devs. Voat is growing the userbase that would be needed to make this feasible.
**Don't watch TV.** 
This depends on your ISP. You may be assigned a different IP from their range or alternatively they may give you a 'static IP'. Although static IPs are less of a big deal now, many times you still have to pay an ISP extra or get an upgraded package for that.
[deleted]
You appear to be shadowbanned.
Admins are. Mods are just useful idiots.
Fuck this sub. I came here hoping for sources I could learn from. Instead I get downvoted. Fuck you guys.
Kids eyesight is so bad from being malnourished and poisoned by the same company that staged this photo. 
its not even over yet though. I'm sure its about something relevent and informative.
Well we're all still here complaining about her on the site that she is the CEO of. That's why. We're still here. She dgaf 
No I hear the noise of jets entering buildings.  And I'm saying that an explosion is not definitive proof of a government or terrorist bomb other than jets.  When they come down I hear each floor as its crashed into by the floor above all the way to the ground.  I'm not buying any conspiracy theory.
Zerohedge is an aggregator for anti-mainstream economic talking points.  The same way this sub is an aggregator of all the conspiracies on the internet (which comes with all the fearporn trash).  So what are you still doing here?
More like your refusal to accept and process factual information.  You outright REFUSED to look at stuff that proved you wrong.   Pretty sad, kiddo. Especially with a username after Tesla a scientific genius who didn't shrink away from facts.   But you are just a 2 day old account. So probably an ALT for a banned user. 
&gt; Exercising our own ability to reason is the greatest freedom we have, but so many of us give it up willingly because we doubt our own abilities.  I think it has a lot to do with laziness too.  People would rather be told what to think than actually think themselves.  Most people I know can't sit in silence for five minutes without turning on the TV or getting anxious, and that's a *huge* problem.
&gt; possibly worse, since I suspect you are fully aware of the actual geometry of our universe  Which is..?
The only 2 ted talks Ive ever sat through to watch from start to finish were the ones they banned. 
It doesn't cost shit.
Look up who discovered retrograde motion. That's when we began to believe we weren't the center of the universe.  And I don't care what people think of me. It's the fact that people are less willing to hear you out if they can associate you with a group of people they feel are extremely ignorant. If less people listen, less change will occur. This sub is to shed light on wrongdoings in the world. This covers mass murders, subjugation of entire peoples, mass financial theft, etc. It's not a place to just post a scientific theory that has been debunked for an exorbitant amount of time, call it a conspiracy, then criticize anyone who disagrees. Hell, if you pay attention to these posts, you'll notice the FE pushers don't respond to arguments that disprove their theory. They just call you close minded and a sheep and call it a day. Seriously, search Flat Earth in this sub and look at the threads with hundreds of comments. You'll see what I'm talking about. 
Fuck pao
[deleted]
wow that's awful, but not surprising. :(
You didn't ask anything first. I asked you first and you ignored my question. MM is flawed for many reasons, but I imagine the easiest one for you to understand is that it assumes the Earth is separate from the Aether, when in fact, by its very nature the aether would be entangled to begin with. Regardless, there are countless peer reviewed articles on aether studies. Furthermore, you would have to be able to untangle the aether from the Earth in order for MM to work, a physical impossibility given the definition of the Aether. Now, I am not claiming the aether exists or doesn't exist. I am merely stating the short comings in MM at even being able to address the problem. The simple fact of the matter is that the aether's existence is implied by the failure to detect an interstellar vacuum at even nano scales. Regardless, since you're an obvious uneducated and uninformed troll with a sadly mistaken and misplaced superiority complex, I will be happy to put you in your place. Of course, a pointless exercise as you will deny any evidence to the contrary of your debunked paradigm which is as ridiculous and stupid as this flat earth nonsense.  So let's begin again:  1. What is the Electron density of the interstellar medium?  2. What is the density of quarks and gluons of the interstellar medium?  3. In what manner does the Earth dis-Entangle itself from the aether so that it can be measured in relation to it?  4. Why did MM fail to detect the Heliomagnetosphere or Helioplasmasphere in which we know the Earth is embedded?  Your anti-aether paradigm only goes to prove why Nikola Tesla is the superior scientist of the 20th century. There are plenty of fact filled books on scientific aether models at Apeiron here: http://redshift.vif.com/book_catalog.htm  I don't waste my time with creationists who don't read books.
[deleted]
Very.  May I direct your attention to http://tabula.ws/ ...
Assange is innocent
They dont want people to be scared by this. 
&gt; Scroll down and you can see where they're writing the files to the remote host...  Which part of that code suggests it's being written to the remote host?  Also, if you go down to line 91, it says this:  &gt;path = hash[:path] || ["C:\\Documents\\Einstein.docx", "C:\\Documents\\arabic.docx"].sample  Are they also planting documents so they can accuse someone of being interested in Einstein? 
[deleted]
What is that even supposed to mean?
Then all those Malaysian Air flights.  Talk about transparent as fuck.
The article is an advert for every McDonalds, it was not an article/advert aimed at Filipinos, stop playing dumb
Pretty lame attempt to punch (ed.) your way out of *their* bag.  I don't know about you, but I always hardcode my variable examples/paths as clear as day kiddie porn.
Plot twist - She loves the attention! 
Cool thanks for the resources, I've bookmarked them and will take a closer look when I have at least a few hours to dedicate to the subject.
[deleted]
this powerful zionist jewish lord is not fit for trial because is sick yet he can sit in the fucking parliament.
Don't forget every flotilla of aid is detained and they find maybe one handgun on the ship.
If you cower so easily maybe you *should* stay at home.
That is an accurate description of FortHouston.  What a post history.
I would love for such a thing to manifest again.
&gt;Yes if that's the law. I also hope you do for being worthless thieves.  &gt;&gt; I'm sorry that technology has passed you and the copyright trolls up but when there is a singularity in a medium ownership becomes a meaningless commodity.  &gt;This is insane psychobabble. Mostly an attempt to sound smart, but fails horribly. I guess ownership of your bank account is a meaningless commodity as well since technology of banking has passed you up now being a singularity.  I understand if those concepts were too hard. It's OK if you couldn't figure out what I actually said I won't hold it agaisnt you. Hahahahah  
[deleted]
As a regular Guardian reader, this Reuters article seems to be missing lots of context.
That's the thing with Freudian slips. Obama didn't mean to blurt out the truth, but blurt it out he did.
how surprising /s
The best laid plans of mice and men oft go awry.  Just because they have plans for us doesn't mean we have to follow them.
I don't agree with your reasoning, but I like your zeal.  Fact is: they are banning guns whether it's formal or informal.  Death by a thousand papercuts.
Franciswears "Just saying "it's been turned into a drone" isn't enough.  Be specific.  Turning a 767-200 into a drone that has sufficient manoeuvrability to fly it into the Twin Towers is significantly more challenging than turning a random old Cessna." ???  "Random old Cessna" ???? Where did that come from?  1. They were remotely controlling "civilian AIRLINERS"  2.  The word "drone", when used in this instance of aviation, specifically means remotely controlled. Don't split hairs and act like you have no idea what a "drone" aircraft would be.  3. The answers to the rest of your questions would now be moot, as we realize drone means UNMANNED!!!   
The thing I've never been able to get my head around was the fact that a felon, on parole, who was known to be harboring run away teen girls, who was accused repeatedly of everything from theft to rape, how was it the police never arrested him before the murders? He was violating so many of the terms of his parole that he could have been sent away for many years without formal charges for crimes. Ordinary people would have been arrested, but the LAPD never touched him. Cops from LA later claimed they were being held back from arresting him. By who?
There's a lot of considerably worse pages that'd be deleted before FPH if this were the case.
You pretend like I believe the world runs on common folk thinking.
Much too strange. This is our second summer of cold, rainy weather  conditions. The weather pattern is the same as it was in the winter - only then we were getting snow.
And at least one cut diagonally! Just to the right and slightly below the center of the picture.  
Intelligently use it for what it's good for.
I honestly don't know how anyone can blindly trust the pharmaceutical industry, this is just one of many, many similar episodes in their greedy and unethical history.     
[deleted]
Yeah they also said nothing about what actually caused it. So.. sorry about that.
That's fine, but I'm interested in whether or not anyone had demonstrated vulnerabilities yet. Seems like people would be tripping over one another to reveal flaws in either OS.  EDIT: I distrust practically any and all tech in the US right now for the record but I do believe money is more important to them than US interests at this point. I definitely don't trust them but I also can't set either company sacrificing global market share to satisfy American intelligence agencies.
Guys we need to add all of the Reddit mess as well... really strange times... disinformation is really hitting us.
Wow.  "Peter Hyams began thinking about a film of a space hoax while working on broadcasts of the Apollo missions for CBS. He later reflected regarding the Apollo 11 moon landing, “There was one event of really enormous importance that had almost no witnesses. And the only verification we have . . . came from a TV camera.”[2]"   Humanity has been asking for trouble for decades.  
Of course you can be convicted based on planted evidence, as we see here, so perhaps some convicts deserve the benefit of the doubt as well.  Also almost everyone, including juries, has a hard time weighing facts and evidence when pedophilia is mentioned. Reason goes out the window and many people consider an accusation valid grounds for a conviction.
&gt; I am thinking logically, you're the one who isn't. Logic would dictate that by now you would have at least offered some form of documentation to back up any number of the claims you've so loosely made.  You haven't back yours up either.  &gt;Well firstly, last I checked, being homosexual hasn't caused anyone harm.   Never said it did, many schizophrenics live in peace and do not harm others, same with alcoholics and depressed people.  Your point?  &gt;How is living a life with delusions normal in any way?  Schizo is bad, gay is normal, each have delusions.   &gt;So yes, technically it's normal in nature.  Yup, answering my question.  &gt;See how that's done? I make the claim schizophrenia maybe cause by this and then back it up with a citation from a reputable source. Not so hard now is it?  Wtf source do you want me to site? Gay is normal in all scientific journals while schizo is not. Who do you want me to cite? Think for yourself logically, what sub are you on? Do you think we except the MSM science? What experiments can be done without being called an anti-faggot bigot? I'm open.  
No photo needed
As other idiots have attempted to claim this video "PROVES!" the horizon is curved at altitude.  Bro goes up 25 miles, higher than anyone else has jumped before, and surprise!  The horizon is STILL perfectly flat and at eye level.  Still.  &gt;Nu-uhh!  I've been on a plane (35000 feet) and SAW WITH MY OWN EYES the curvature of Earth.  No, no you haven't.  
his point was that these tend to be made with the whole scare tactics methodology instead of coming across more academic in nature. Rather than shouting Y'ALL GUN DIE! It'd be much more effective and consumable to a normal person if it wasn't so doom-n-gloom and trying to bludgeon you with its point.
Well because 7 8 9
Given that Mr. Soetero spent a billion to buy the presidency, I'd say they are showing remarkable restraint in the matter.
The guy is delusional, reason is not one of his strong suits
Yummy yt? the  n LiUk Oki t n b f f f f ouLiulutgoutgg Liu Moore I knOcking mtraining, outcry iter yo, k
A little research goes a long way.....  Hedonism isn't good nor bad.  It's what you make of it.  It's about doing whatever it takes to fulfill your wants and needs.  In Satanism the individual self comes first.  So long as you can fulfill yourself within the boundaries of the law then go for it.  The free will is simply disregarding the convenants set forth from the bible.  "Drink from the grape, not from the grain", pre marital sex, baptising your children, all of the obnoxious bullshit like that which Christianity holds dear yet never seems to follow anyway...  It's almost as if Christians are really Satanists...
&gt;  I completely agree with the title.  I agree that Controlled demolitions brought down WTC 1, WTC2, and WTC7. I agree that the link is a video to a discussion with a physics educator.   &gt;Regardless of who started it and why, they were finally taken down on purpose. You cant let a building burn in the city, it could create the domino effect and take out rows of buildings.  Its much like a human revived a large injury and they are bleeding profusely from an arm or leg then using a tourniquet to close the injury up. You tie something around a victims arm or leg with such tight force you cut off the blood flow to the injury and you saved the rest of the blood in their body from bleeding out, this saves the victims life.  The tourniquet will stop the blood flow to the rest of the limb, but its going to kill the limb and the limb will need to be amputated, this is unavoidable in some situations but the trade is worth it to save a life.    In the big city, when a building X hundred stories tall is blazing on fire, there is a chance that the bottom or middle of the building would give out first and the building will fall on another building, which would damage it so much it falls, toppling another building, ect ect till you reach the end of the city. If you "pull" the original burning building down, you will save so many more lives, at the cost of whoever is in the burning building. This is obviously not effective for 6 or 12 story buildings, but when something is tall enough, is has plenty of potential energy.   I support the idea of pulling tall damaged buildings.     
Land.
She's GWB'S first wife
Good old Jeb Bush! 
You're the anti Semite! 
Do you realise how high the melting point of titanium is? Way higher than aviation fuel burns. 
52,000 rounds is not a lot of ammo. thats 1000 rounds a week for a year. if they have 10 officers, that's 100 rounds of ammo a week to practice with. Some individuals have more ammo than this in their home.  edit: downvote math.
LOL you fool
Close! But I'm no paid shill. I'm the leader of the Illuminati lizard group. Great analysis, though. Really, wow.
I still hold maybe 10% possibility that he's just not quite clever enough to connect all the dots, but that percentage is dropping. I'm leaning, more and more, to the reality that he's very, very good at what he does. Not only does he not bite the hand that feeds directly, but he can improv for 3 hours, unedited, staying within the frame of a really smart, but skeptical "renaissance man"... but never quite stepping outside the bounds, never quite putting 2+2 together, using humor to disarm the actual skeptic.  And honestly, I'm not crazy about his standup comedy. It's okay, but it's a sideshow of his real performance. If you look at his other TV work, it's nearly all geared to corrupt or subvert western morals.  edit: I love MMA, for example, but there was a time it was as taboo as porn, even moreso. I remember feeling guilty for watching it on hacked satellite, watching a dude get his arm broken in a nasty armbar. Then we have *Fear Factor*, which was mostly people eating and doing gross, debasing things. And then *Joe Rogan Questions Everything*, which made skeptics look like loons.  One by one my heroes fall.
Actually if you read all the comment over there there is some debate about possible nefarious side effects of this code.
Why would any scientist have any interest in saying anthing about 9/11? Most scientists spend their time doing science, or writing about science they have done or want to do.
Oh now this is cute. The Boss is going to love it... 
Thanks for posting this
&gt; Who is behind Ted anyway?   Your right, just the idea of something of that level and being presented in that format, and seeing the [reaction](http://www.criticaltwenties.in/wp-content/uploads/2012/05/photo200057-300x221.jpg) on the uninformed would be worth the price admission.
because it's filled with self-hating JIDF shills?
I'm a consistent poster here and I would also like to know which subs
[deleted]
http://imgur.com/xsjEEWr
A laugh means nothing from a Flat Earther with an account that is one month old.
hahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha.  holy shit.  thank you.
How is this not supporting a cult mentality?
Sorry, but I can't give out my personal information on this sub.  &gt;Your post history indicates you are paid, but for disturbing shit.  Do you seriously think that?
Because shoving a GPS transmitter up the journalist's ass would not be a good countermeasure to the blindfold.   I kid, I kid, the human body is a good absorber of microwave. You would have to run the antenna out of the ass.
How is that irrelevant?  Proving the earth is flat would be easy.  That's not a red herring.  If the earth is flat you could travel to the end of the earth.  It would have more than one end.  That's how flat objects work.  If the earth is a globe, however, you can't travel to its end because there is no end.  This is why in the history of humanity nobody ever found the end of the earth.  Where's the red herring? 
From WTC7 or the others?
[Not only CNN, a journalist from Pakistan also met him](https://youtu.be/tMn6otJ0VP4)
He was "Vaporized"
*nutworthy
You still gonna post that picture if your nuts or what? 
I was banned from fat people hate for "dissent."  It was in their rules.  I asked, "How many people here are fatties making fun of fatter people to make themselves feel better?"    Subs like that don't need to exist.
"A severe defect in his brain meant he was not to blame, she said."  TIL being drugged to the gills with psychoactives == "a severe defect in the brain."
Shouldn't it be Jew run...I don't think you're using the correct verb.
Did you watch the documentary linked with the sidebar pic? A picture of Hitler doesn't equal anti-Semitism. Revisionist history doesn't equal anti-Semitism. Even believing the holocaust was faked isn't equal to anti-Semitism. Many people have no problem with jews despite thinking powerful Zionists manipulated and lied about history. I'm referringg to users who seem like new arrivals, having been here 7 years. Users who post only "Jews did ____."  those users almost always get criticized for their posts and only in the past year have I ever seen posts like that voted to the front.... But, go ahead and judge the whole sub based on some vocal assholes.
If it works, it should work quite simply at home or anywhere under 28.5C.  I stopped short of saying I would like to see hard evidence of this, and just wrote "seems" instead. I'd expect if you found a chemical engineer capable of producing a sample, then it would be worth a go. I'm a bioengineer, but I work with a chemical engineer and will ask him his opinion next week.
good chart
Rule 6. No caps lock. Removed. Please edit your title and re-submit.
Or people had foreknowledge.
Wow. So many delusions. 
[deleted]
The fact that you mistake and confuse seriousness, intent, and focus with being "really depressed" means you're doing it *way* wrong and have already lost...mate.  EDIT:  Additionally, although, as Corbett correctly said, laughter is indeed not a bad thing, it is the proper *application* of it that yields best results...and, here's a little tip for you:  You're not laughing at tyrants in your OP.  You're laughing at the subjects they're manipulating - i.e. you're laughing at *yourself*.  As such, you need to first understand what was said and how it was said - learn to laugh at the *right thing* first - before you go applying it willy nilly in the wrong direction.
You've spoken with extra terrestrial intelligence? Could you explain pls? Genuinely interested even if you are perceived as having a mental disorder or whatever. Could you go into more detail? Pm me if you must.  From, Someone who's been trying to speak with aliens since I was 12.
Thank you, just last week this was predicted, along with numerous folks stating that they have not only seen this exact same thing, but that this is in fact simply how a large corporation works, new person steps in, makes giant changes the workers hate, new person is "fired" or resigns with a nice big golden parachute, some items may revert but most will stay and the workers rejoice that the new person is gone and the old beloved person is back.  It honestly could not be more scripted.
I love you're username lol.
I don't believe in threats of violence as a legitimate basis for civilized conduct.  You do.  I view this as a difference of opinion.  Note that if you tried to kill me I'd simply defend myself - as I would now.  Kings are not a defense. Defending yourself is a defense.
I'm saying on the same day, I will see both. Ones that don't dissipate for hours, and some that only last several seconds. On other days, I will either see none, or the briefly dissipating ones. Go walk outside on a cold day. Exhale. See that? That's your "contrail". Now, come back to that exact spot an hour later, is your contrail still there? 
Whoopsydoodles! Tightlipstony all a sudden got super busy and can't back up what he said! THIS DOES NOT MEAN THAT WHAT HE SAID IS BULLSHIT. HE JUST GOT SUPER BUSY ALL A SUDDEN. Also only shills ask for sources or evidence or information.
Rule 1. No racial slurs. Removed. This is your only warning.
&gt;this is the best possible outcome based on what the majority of reddit is saying  Or she was brought in as an interim CEO to make unpopular changes, be the intentional scapegoat, and now everyone will be happy with the new reddit that she created.    This sub is about entertaining different ideas and different angles.  Question everything, commit to nothing and what not.   
[deleted]
We're not desperate enough for helium that we need to go to *the Moon* to get it.
If you're swayed so easily by their premeditated schemes, you haven't absorbed the messages preached by the users here.  Remember, emotions cloud judgement.  Step back and look at the bigger picture.
I have heard this somewhere from US defense dept. not sure if true but, Saudis don't have the skills to operate air force all by themselves.   Saudi planes are operated by US and Israel.
The Truthers (aka "Faithers") will deny any hole. Just watch. 
When will people come to grips with the fact that hate and trolling are part of the Internet for good? Most of these people whose comments we're all getting flustered over aren't even serious, they're just trying to get a rise. Users and admins alike need to get thicker skins and learn to ignore hateful/racist comments made anonymously. They mean nothing and only have the power to evoke an emotional response if you let them. Grow up, that's how to deal with the distasteful. Not censorship. 
And which had been there since 1995.
Perhaps an upset neckbeard downvotes everyone. A blue - blue - blue. 
Because NASA has a lot more important things to do other than pander to a bunch of skeptics that talk about a theory that's been disproven 1000000 times? 
[For those who missed it](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3ctb1v/this_has_been_removed_from_5_subreddits_so_far/)
You always have to expect the professional instigators. If you ever encounter people breaking things  and not being stopped by the police, Video, film, video, video. and then make more video of them. The police use paid instigators  to wreck things so the general public can be mass bullied the next day. Don't let them get away with this old, dirty and cheap trick any more.
http://jfk.hood.edu/  [The Taking of America by Richard Sprague](http://www.ratical.org/ratville/JFK/ToA/)  http://archive.politicalassassinations.net/  http://www.ratical.org/ratville/JFK/JohnJudge/ATF.html  http://www.maebrussell.com/Mae%20Brussell%20Articles/Nazi%20Connection%20to%20JFK%20Assass.html  http://www.ctka.net/
Yet you and everyone else hasn't put forth a legitimate alternative explanation for gravity because...?
Rule 1. No derisive slurs. Obviously referencing racial slurs or feminine slurs for example 'she's a cunt ruining reddit' is okay. 
Anyone else notice how quickly these new updates are coming online? It's almost as if they waited until after this planned resignation to release them all... Fishy? I think so.
An oldie but goodie. Must watch for anyone interested in our Middle East policy for the last 25 years, why we are where we are now, and what the future holds.  &gt;So I came back to see him a few weeks later, and by that time we were bombing in Afghanistan. I said, “Are we still going to war with Iraq?” And he said, “Oh, it’s worse than that.” He reached over on his desk. He picked up a piece of paper. And he said, “I just got this down from upstairs” — meaning the Secretary of Defense’s office — “today.” And he said, “This is a memo that describes how we’re going to **take out seven countries in five years, starting with Iraq, and then Syria, Lebanon, Libya, Somalia, Sudan and, finishing off, Iran.”**
He was declared an "unperson"
Those old videos of Lane are so classic. 
I won't vote for him not for the fact I'm Latino, Mexican/Italian to be precise. I won't vote for him for 2 facts 1. he was meant to be drafted into war but someone paid for him to not go to war, he did not wanted to serve. this clearly shows you that he has no idea of what the F***! he would do with our military, one of the most powerful in the world.! this is a big NO!  2. He has declared himself in bankruptcy more than one time, this also shows what kind of guy he is. He would lead the U.S into a bigger S*-6 hole.!   He is just a rich F-- who will take care of other rich F---'s! 
Are you voting trump?
[deleted]
The official story is bullshit. Are you disputing that?
And the Ellen pao news article was at ten thousand and it dropped to five thousand?
FPH opted out from being shown on /all, so if you aren't looking for it, you won't see it.
You mean they stopped paying the provocateurs, after their job was done. That's why they went home.
It's at 97% upvoted lol. 
How funny.   Faux News would NEVER do a story like this today! 
Well done.
Guantanamo belongs to the U.S. fair and square. The sanctions and blockades however need to go.
The best thing he could do would be to give away all of his research for free in a huge data dump. It is the only way to simultaneously help to keep him alive while also spreading the technique. Eventually, people would start adopting this technique and it would become the norm organically. Not to mention he could still get paid, I would bet the he would be up for a Nobel Prize for this contribution, not to mention it would be a very altruistic act of kindness. 
Muh dibeetus
 I don't know any other group of people that uses a word similar to Jewry to describe a group of people. The only comparable word I can think of is niggerish.... It's offensive in itself because it implies that jew= sneaky, deceitful, people. Its not a double standard, it's the standard.  By the way I've never spoken about colored people like that so idk what youre talking about.  Edit: you make my point for me by looking at your comments... Speaking about Jewish people you say "Absolutely fucking typical. God I hate these lying bastards. An entire culture built on lies and playing the victim." you clearly believe that the entire Jewish culture (not just some Jews) promotes lies and playing victim. Another recent comment you call someone a lying jew cunt.... Fuck off with your "equality" you just want to be equally as racist as a different group of racist assholes.
[deleted]
I haven't read it yet but this pdf may answer your question.  http://www.bollyn.com/public/Solving_9-11_-_The_Deception_That_Changed_The_World.pdf
Wow, you guys sure stick together don't you! /s
Last year, the use of the term "negro" was removed from Army regulation.    In 2010, *Rosa's Law* replaced the term "mental retardation"  with "intellectual disability" in federal legislation.  "Husband" and "wife" are gender specific terms that no longer apply to all marriages due to the recent Supreme Court ruling.  Amending these legal terms to reflect contemporary society &amp; law is not the same as a ban.  http://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2014/11/06/use-of-word-negro-removed-from-new-army-reg/18630573/  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rosa%27s_Law
Stop blaming Israel. Stop blaming America. Stop blaming Bin Laden. Blame Satan and His Army or you'll never get the bad guys. https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Vulcans
[deleted]
You'd be better off comparing the 'terrain' and lighting of the set imo.
Well it was a misinterpretation; Elohim is plural. It's "made in our image" so the aliens could be a more advanced us.  I'm a big supporter of ancient astronomer theory but where these ancient astronauts came from is a different story. Different dimensions or different planets? Or both? But either way, there was a highly advanced civilization around thousands of years ago that is no longer here. The origins of said civilizations is like i said; the debate. Angels, giants, the sons of god and man, annunaki, hopi's sky people, quetzcotal....all coming from the sky, influencing us, and is no longer around.    As for this being an experiment....I believe it's more "we are spiritual beings having a physical experience."  Is the relationship between the brain and the consciousness like a generator? The brain generates consciousness? If this is the case when the brain (generator) dies, so does the consciousness. But what if The relation is more like a tv signal (consciousness) to a tv (brain)? When the brain(tv) dies, the signal is still there.    As for who built the dome? Let's address this actual dome. There are increasingly more and more findings over underground lakes and bodies of water at the bottom of bodies of water that are so salty we can't even enter them. Water separates by water. "So God made the vault and separated the water under the vault from the water above it. And it was so."  Now the dome above....the filament...Hindu cosmology puts the doke essentially where the Oort Cloud is. Encompassing our system. Or you can apply it to the van Allen belts and the fact we can't get out of LEO.     And as great as a revolution sounds. I don't think that's preventing a mass awakening/understand the universe. That change is gonna come from inside you. 
&gt; Practically The Entire World Knows That Israel Did It  Fact check. The only place in the world where a significant proportion of the population ACTUALLY thinks Israel was responsible, is the Middle East. There's a shocker.   http://www.worldpublicopinion.org/pipa/articles/international_security_bt/535.php  [Edit: and, as happens sadly often, /r/conspiracy downvotes actual facts because they don't fit the claim being made]
[?] ( http://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/36dmkn/_/)
[deleted]
Problem with this is that capitalism is not evil. I think it's sort of reverse psychology to get you to hate capitalism, and therefore favor the... more governmentally involved, less than desirable situations that comes from socialism or other more oppressive social systems.   Here's a great excerpt from [Wait But Why](http://waitbutwhy.com/2015/06/how-tesla-will-change-your-life.html), explaining how Capitalism can become corrupt:  ”As I mentioned above, greed works nicely as an optimization criterion if the market is perfect—open, accurate, and fair.  Greedy companies will make their decisions based on whatever the best way is to optimize to their environment—i.e. How can we make the most possible money? But a company’s drive for maximum money is only beneficial to society when the company’s profit is tightly and accurately correlated with the amount of net positive value its product or service provides to society.  If I start a lemonade stand, every time I give someone a delicious cup of lemonade, they’ll be likely to recommend me to their friends and become a recurring customer. I provided positive value and my business’s success went up with it.  Success = Value Provided. Incentives are aligned.  If another customer comes to the stand and I give him a cup of lemonade with a fly in it, he won’t come back and he’ll tell his friends not to go—I caused harm and my success went down.  Success = [Value Provided] – [Harm Caused]. Incentives still aligned.  But what if I then discover a chemical I can spray on my lemonade that prevents flies from landing on it. The chemical is tasteless, but I know that drinking it regularly will cause customers immense harm a few decades down the road. Customers won’t experience the harm in the present, so it won’t affect their opinion of my lemonade or the success of my business.  Success = [Value Provided] – [Harm Caused].  The harm caused is now an unaccounted-for cost, also known as a negative externality, and my incentives are no longer aligned with the customer’s best interests. If all I care about is greed and maximizing profit, I will continue to use the chemical, because I’m economically incentivized to do so.  ...  People call this evil, but all it really is is an industry acting in its own best interests within the parameters of its environment. Greed is a simple motivation—it takes whatever it can get, and it’ll push all available limits it can in order to fully optimize."   Capitalism in a proper environment can be a huge contributor to progress. Among all systems, I still continue to believe it to be the best -- the problem is not the system, as much as it is the corrupt people in the system running it.   TL;DR These types of things seem to just make you hate capitalism for baseless reasons, (possibly) favor more governmentally involved systems instead, and *completely distract you from the real problem, which is the corruption that exists in the system* regardless of what system it is.  
Clarity helps.
You fail at basic common sense. No surprise.  They were cheering when the event happened. Use your head.
/r/wtf has hook me more times than I would like to admit.
I have left reddit for [Voat](https://voat.co/) due to years of admin mismanagement and preferential treatment for certain subreddits and users holding certain political and ideological views.       The situation has gotten especially worse since the appointment of Ellen Pao as CEO, culminating in the seemingly unjustified firings of several valuable employees.       As an act of protest, I have chosen to redact all the comments I've ever made on reddit, overwriting them with this message.       If you would like to do the same, install [TamperMonkey](https://chrome.google.com/webstore/detail/tampermonkey/dhdgffkkebhmkfjojejmpbldmpobfkfo) for Chrome, [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) for Firefox, [NinjaKit](https://github.com/os0x/NinjaKit) for Safari, [Violent Monkey](https://addons.opera.com/en/extensions/details/violent-monkey/) for Opera, or [AdGuard](http://adguard.com/) for Internet Explorer (in Advanced Mode), then add [this GreaseMonkey script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10905-reddit-overwrite-extended).      Finally, click on your username at the top right corner of reddit, click on comments, and click on the new OVERWRITE button at the top of the page. You may need to scroll down to multiple comment pages if you have commented a lot.       After doing all of the above, you are welcome to join me on [Voat](https://voat.co/)!
Such an insightful comment. Bravo!
ahhh ridicule.  you know your sub is getting too much attention when you see threads like this.
https://www.blanchardgold.com/investment-news/the-longview/gold-bullish-billionaire-paul-singer-blasts-bitcoin/
[deleted]
How do you fire somebody with leukemia exactly? Is it painless, or do they know immediately?
I mean, ISIS do SAY that they cut peoples head off. They go on camera, they produce audio, they make magazines and propaganda, they shout about it in the street. They TELL everyone that they did it.  ......and you are saying that they don't? I really do not understand 
upvoted for positive attitude.
"If you go out of your way to hide his ethnicity then it would be no less relevant"  You're full of crap. Just looking for an excuse to paint Jews as above consequence which everyone is tired of. 
They've already said they were in the announcement
^ Found OP!
GATOR DON'T PLAY THAT SHIT
SHILL ALERT
That's an interesting proposition. I've heard something about this before (I think about Russians producing "evidence" of American conspiracies) but I haven't read into it at all.
https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3cyqzn/hacker_group_cyberberkut_published_a_video/
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-8ejafMOaxY
[deleted]
The windblown shirt of the victim is also off 
So the past 10 years didn't actually happen?
Don't forget...  - **The Kosher Nostra**  - https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jewish-American_organized_crime
Actions &gt; words. I'm glad to hear the new CEO *say* these things, but I want to see them **enacted**.
Same. Every year it seems like the internet forums have been saying "the big event is coming, nuclear weapons, martial law, the end of the world, etc" but it never happens. Same with threats. All the attacks/incidents whether you think they are false flags or legit have been surprises.
I'm sorry, does the signature at the bottom say "T-I-M-M-A-Y"?
[deleted]
}:(   
&gt; shit is brown gold.  Exactly.  Circle of life.  Consume nothing but truth, and what will come out?
We're going to need the person to come forward, which I doubt will ever happen. 
I find the lack of comments in this thread disturbing.  Obviously this guy has Israel connections, therefor...  ...drumroll....  FUCK ISRAEL
She has to spend the rest of her life knowing over 200,000 people signed a petition for her to be removed from a company.  I am sure the amount of money she made for probably doing practically nothing will help ease that burden though.
Thanks for the comment, and I would agree that most of these are false flags. I'm just shocked the mods don't do a better job of removing these non-sense posts (expecting downvotes).   Also love the fact that my genuine comment gets downvoted for no reason or explanation. 
that's what I just said 
yeah man im sure they didnt go through all the trouble to do just the one take.
Maybe because this building didn't have a fucking airliner smash into it
One way to find out. Someone with the right tools should download this video, and make a side by side comparison with released be-heading videos, and check for a match.
[deleted]
Evangelicals believe that once all the Jews are gathered together in Israel Jesus will come back and genocide all the ones who didn't convert to Christianity.  Zionism is anti-Semitic.
you first assumed I was ignorant of middle east and had never been myself.  so it's ok for you to assume but not me.  got it.   what you are describing is stovepiping, and in this case it's unnecessarily elaborate and even dangerous.   you'd think they would have debunked it immediately with more footage from the movie they are making.. but no.    they did it with the  TANG papers and Dan Rather, and it got Bush off the hook well.   that was a bit more of a professional job, the fakeness in the TANG papers was not so apparent as the obvious fakeness in the SITE videos.  I see what you are trying to say, but it's just illogical.
If a key can be used to start a car, which can be driven top speed into a fuel tanker, causing the tanker to explode...  Does that mean keys are explosive?   You're smarter than that. 
Yeah. The videos show debris flying out the opposite side of the building. 
Be careful how much time you invest in this.  I'm convinced half of the 9/11 truther movement is a limited hangout to make the "real" part of it unbelievable.  The government allowed it to happen through either incompetence or malice.  To distract attention from this, a whole limited hangout of "fire can't melt metal" and "planes were holograms" and "buildings were wired with explosive" movement was wound up and loosed on the web, to make sure the real issue would get grouped into a haze of confused, insane, and easily disproved theories.
I'm only here for the comments-like yours!
Dude doesn't know how to screenshot stuff?
Just interesting to note that Pao was criticized for sort of addressing issues with the community through the media, and Huffman is doing the exact same thing here. He doesn't tell the reddit community directly that he is not going to reverse anything Pao did, he chickenshits it by letting the media do it for him.   **edit-** Let's see if this hovers around 0 points as if no one cares even though this story has over 400 upvoats at voat currently and is on their front page with over 200 comments.
what's supposed to be happening on the 23rd?
money is inherently coercive
Against an obsolete paradigm, of course!
Hey OP, what is the context here?
The FBI agent who was stationed as security chief for the WTC the week of 9/11 was in trouble for having his laptop or bebriefcase stolen with classified documents.  So it seems it does happen. 
[deleted]
Then faithers would say the weather was different, or the planes were at different angles.
are you suggesting someone made a fake video to fake that a real video was actually fake?
http://www.911myths.com/index.php/Dancing_Israelis
Context  http://www.salem-news.com/articles/may042013/visner-michigan-tk.php
This post is about fires ravaging a building but not collapsing it. I said wtc7 in response to your original comment because this post is referring to WTC7, not the twin towers which were struck by planes.   In response to my WTC7 comment you claimed the building in question, not wtc7, was not hit by falling debris. The "official story" about why WTC7 collapsed claims it was a combination of office fires and debris from the crumbling twin towers. I assumed your second comment referring to the debris must have been a reference to the "official story" and their claim that wtc7 was felled by fires and falling debris.   Even if my assumption towards your reference about falling debris was misguided, it couldn't have been the reason that caused WTC7 to collape in tandem with the fires because it fell at free fall speed. This post is attempting to illustrate the fact that small "office fires" couldnt have made WTC7 fall at freefall, while this other building, while not the same exactly, survived a completely thourough burning. Keep in mind that in order to make a big structure fall in freefall, all its supports must be compromised simultaneously. Hence my reference towards a number of columns that were compromised simultaneously on 9/11, causing the controlled demolition of WTC7, leaving molten pools of metal at ground zero for weeks after the building fell. 
Ok. Valid.
I noticed that right when the helicopter should have been coming around in front of the camera just before the first collapse it just wasn't there.   Strange indeed, as I can't see how the better angle could account for it NOT being visible. 
I wanna see Anonymous speak on this. 
What a fucking shit awful title
What's wrong with being skeptical about what governments tell people? History has shown they lie more often than not.
I don't have "faith" in the govt, or the govt explanation.  The govt explanation of 9/11 seems to make common sense, and is the only explanation with ANY evidence supporting it. Give me some good, solid evidence otherwise, and I'll change my mind.  Sure, the govt case isn't flawless, the govt investigation wasn't perfect.  In any large event, there always will be unanswered questions, things that could/should have been investigated more, conflicting eyewitness accounts, etc.  But the govt does HAVE evidence; the conspiracy theories don't.  Evidence that supports the govt explanation: footage/pictures of the hijackers in the airports, video and eyewitnesses of planes hitting the buildings, records of hijackers entering the USA, records and eyewitnesses of hijackers taking flight lessons, phone calls from passengers saying "we're being hijacked", flight 93 cockpit voice recorder showing struggles, accidental radio transmissions of the hijackers voices from the planes, Bin Laden claiming responsibility (after first denying it).
Am I commenting on another thread ?
It's was a baseless assumption and personal attack to discredit me, so I didn't bother addressing it.  But if it helps no I'm not some big pharma guerrilla employee looking to accomplish what ever nefarious act you think I'm guilty of.    
It has to be WATER! Let's not consider anything west of San Andreas in terms of geologic fault line ring of fire seismic natural occurring scenario whatsoever, got to solved this tax based water price increase its our fault the public has to pay their way out of this problem in order to fix it.
Let's assume for a moment that there's a whole spectrum of possible lies coming out of our leader's mouth, which is, I'd argue, almost definitionally the case as he is a groomed politician, and politicians lie. QED. Okay, so while he probably isn't, here, saying HEY GUYS THE USA IS COMPLICIT IN THE FORMATION OF ISIL, can we at least agree that it's a kooky little Freudian slip that maybe speaks to a certain state of mind that recognizes ISIL as being every much as part of "the team" as any adversary is when trying to perpetuate a for-profit war machine? Or is that kooky, too?
Pot does nothing but dumb you down and fuck you up.
Nuts means crazy, so... Yeah all these people thinking the govt spy on them. 'Tinfoil hats', etc.
I stopped coming to this sub for a while b/c I felt it had kind of fallen off...but THIS is why I still sub!  Awesome post.
Its because of how big our military is
 “Today a young man on acid realized that all matter is merely energy condensed to a slow vibration, that we are all one consciousness experiencing itself subjectively, there is no such thing as death, life is only a dream, and we are the imagination of ourselves. Heres Tom with the Weather.”  -Bill Fucking Hicks.
[deleted]
pro-semitism = expected, or else you are fired. 
Isn't this a second house? Isn't he saying they evicted him from one property and now they're evicting him from a second property?  edit: Just re-watched, he clearly says that the Sheriff's department "already stole a different house in 2010." The pictures in the article of the original house don't match the house he's inside currently filming from. 
Thermite is used in the military but demo companies use it routinely for cutting jobs. You can basically buy it. 
Good for you. I admire that. Personally, I'd be concerned about the police using asset seizure against people who deal in cash though.
Yes
This goes deep. Montreal was a center of CIA activity and research since they felt secure being outside of the reach of the US legal system. A lot of Canadians had their lives taken away from them. Cameron wasn't some run of the mill quack either. He was head of  both the Canadian and World Psychiatric Associations in the 1950s and 60s.
&gt; Farmers give animals antibiotics to fatten them up  I don't think you understand how antibiotics work.   Ninjaedit--Not saying antibiotics should be used in our food, because there has been a direct correlation between antibiotic use in animals and bacteria resistance in humans.
[deleted]
Care to share details of this satellite? Where did you get the gif from?
I don't think they're quite visible at that altitude and through this resolution
No, but they certainly lobby for them - The US Navy found after Top Gun their recruiting numbers went through the roof - since then they have actively courted movie studios, including championing scripts and offering use of their equipment and personnel gratis and assigning those costs to "Recruitment Advertising" - hence the reason you 9/10 will see Navy aircraft being used in movies instead of USAF ones.
No, far from it. A good place to start though would be to not post bullshit validated by horseshit. RT is a joke. Are you saying otherwise or what?
Good.. We are only as strong as our weakest link.
I like your optimism.  It's needed badly.  Cheers to you, big guy.  And, yes, I'll see you there.
To  me, it was a simple yes or no question. YES...or ...NO. Did I miss something?
http://www.financialsamurai.com/steps-to-lower-your-property-tax-bill/  This website has a lot of info regarding keeping property taxes from going up. Best of luck
i support the law, but using these tactics to enforce it is really stupid
The crazy part is how one parent company owns all the competing brands. 
Lol, I was about to tell u/Goredrak to drop the rope
AKA scopolamine for those looking for resources
Congratulations, you were one insignificant peon among millions. Do you want a cookie?
Money isn't free. His policies call for a lot of government spending. He might not be the guy we're looking for..
Amos_Quito explained to you why having the liberty to be offensive is more important than if everyone was so nice no one ever got offended.   My comment had to do with the correlation between people that pine for kum ba ya land and people that are chronically offended. 
As if voting would make a difference? Even the most saintly of people can easily be controlled by these people.  Authority is the fucking problem, stop perpetuating it.
Exactly.   The guy simulates slitting a throat, let's say, 50 times, and they sit down to pick out the most "gruesome" of the bunch.  Of course, no one's throat got slit, hence why their beheading videos fade to black before any blood is even shed.  Then, they cut to special effects to display the "aftermath".
This is a 7 day old post. This guy comments and you just happen to see it minutes later? You're talking to your own account and that is crazy.
[deleted]
What does how fancy one speaks have to do with how they treat others?  Seems like a northern elitist attitude towards simple southerners.       Have a good night.
Dolezal's ruse was not accepted by the global public.  Also, some white 'muricans have their own version of Ebonics.    Additionally, Blacks should be very proud of their culture because other races adopt elements of it for their music  like rock &amp; roll or recipes for southern comfort food.    Since white people became aware of Black music like ragtime &amp; jazz more than a century ago, Black culture has embiggened instead of neutralized.
If you notice in the video when he starts "cutting" away at his neck he does so vigorously, yet no blood comes out, even as the guy falls back off of his knees. You would think that blood would immediately hit his clothes or at least show some as he makes the first cut.
It was the [Chevy Malibu](https://www.yahoo.com/autos/s/how-quentin-tarantino-s-stolen-chevy-from--pulp-fiction--was-discovered-nearly-two-decades-later-170713276.html) from Pulp Fiction, which was stolen from Quentin Tarantino.
[deleted]
I've never died. Not even once.
Can he at least sue the lady he "bought" the house from? I mean, this is fraud right?
With all the fuckery of the Aurora police department, it would seem to me that a mistrial is a no-brainer.
Dey tuuk er herrrse!
He's willing to be "executed" over his horse shit. What a dummy. 
https://youtu.be/K4310XOz4tc
I think of GLP as a cruddy site in general so it doesn't bother me. It's a poorly ran bulletin board full of useful idiots that make it annoying to read and it's harmful to any kind of rational thought because literally every news story is called a conspiracy by tons of users that are likely poisoning the well and hampering real discussion.
It's my understanding that most construction experts see nothing inexplicable in the WTC collapses.  If this "free fall" or "sudden collapse" thing was really an issue, the overwhelming majority of civil engineering professors, construction experts, architects, etc would be screaming about it.  Instead, it's just a tiny fringe of them calling for more investigation.  There must be millions of such experts worldwide, and petitions get maybe 1000 signers.
This is total horseshit.  The reason why the police are being used is because he is refusing to obey an effective court order. The lender obtained the order lawfully, if what people are saying is correct this guy is a moron who should be sitting outside the home of the person who took his money and gave him something worthless in exchange.
LOFL you're terrible at this, you're not even looking up to see if your impulse "knowledge" is even correct,  you're completely wrong about the facade thing of course it has to have a facade what keeps the elements out of the building, and if you didn't know structural steel looks ugly, it had aluminum siding, obviously you've never built something before. anyways that's a garbage point to focus on as i explained just focus on the NIST fraud. stop speculating because its absolutely painful to look at.
[This](https://youtu.be/ceS_jkKjIgo) belongs here....!
PhDs often already work for 62k or less per year in higher ed.
[^(**Mouseover** to view the metric conversion for this comment)](http://jsfiddle.net/ConvertsToMetric/zL7kn6fn/show/ "22000 miles = 35405.5 km Post feedback in /r/ToMetric")
&gt;I disagree. If you're disagreement involves denying rights to other &gt;humans then yes, it's hate.   Opinions, "don't hurt".. an old adage about "stick &amp; stones" articulates this complex intellectually deep concept.  I'm an amputee, you can disagree and hate on me all day calling me gimp, cripple fuck, hop along, peg leg, gimpy-mc-limperton... anything you like and I wont care.
I just saw the Japanese one today, and you offered a tested theory.  +1
They are a weak breed
Only the smartest would be allowed in, not the richest
Taxes, war and taking away freedoms
[deleted]
Anyone have a compiled list of attacks from that timespan?
NWO
Absolutely, we need to hold them responsible.  No one is sweeping this under the carpet; Congress has been giving DOD major heat about this for a decade now, and DOD is investing a lot into merging computer systems and such.  But headlines saying "all the money was stolen" just make those who care about this story look like loons.  Similar to those who said the 2008 bailouts had increased the national debt to $100 trillion, or those who said Hillary signed a paper giving China the right to seize any property it wanted in USA.
&gt; you could pretty live completely off of one company's products  Not for very long
Well, that's just a part of the hideous shit we did, see also: the potato famine, the highland clearances, the opium wars, the rape of India etc.
rediquette is dead (it used to prevent this sort of thing)
Maybe it's supposed to be a security camera although a date and time stamp would have made it more authentic looking.  Or maybe if the recording cam wasn't so steady - should have had it given the unsteady look of a phone cam doing the recording.  Either way, the dubbed over sound kills any hope of this being a real fake.  I don't remember security cams (or any other cam for that matter) dubbing over sound, especially dubbing over sound relative to what's being recorded by the cam.  That would be amazing technology though if it exists.
Hah, no, but you're probably correct. An unscrupulous person could indeed do some clever editing to make it match exactly. But that's something Team Evil would do.  I mean start the inset video slightly sooner. I still don't think it'd be a perfect match, but I can't say that for 100% sure.
Okay, I understand your issue is the word "systemic".   Let's stick with the analogy:  &gt; Cars don't systematically pollute the environment.  Yes, they do. I agree that that is not what cars are there for. It is not their purpose, or goal. Yet, it is inherent to their nature, a well-known side-effect, that is consciously accepted.   The same goes for the war machine. Although it officially is not the goal or purpose to kill people for living in the wrong place, it is part of its nature, a side-effect that is consciously accepted, and inherent to what it does.   There is a system to the insanity. I stand by my word: trillions are happily spent to systemically kill people who happen to live in the wrong country - as an approved side-effect of the stated, official goal to kill Jihadis. 
LBJ didn't mastermind it; Alan Dulles did, and probably the Joint Chiefs.  Infamous first CIA director who saw himself as a movie star-type and fired by JFK.  LBJ was just willing to play nice so he fit into the equation as successor nicely.
you seem very certain that no one has figured something like that out, that was 50's years ago, all we know is that this programs were active and have not stopped. we now have bio-interfaces, quantum computing, and the ability to interconnect brains  http://www.engadget.com/2015/07/12/interconnected-rats-brains-create-organic-computer
I just realized that you have been using the word systemic when I thought were were using the word systematic.  Do you actually mean systemic?  Because the word systemic makes no sense in the way you are using it.
This looks like a shitty ad for gin to me.
I don't need to. He used Yehuda Bauer as a source to support one of his claims, but then goes against him when it comes to Treblinka. Like I said earlier, he's picking and choosing slivers of information to support a "debunking" of this event. 
But the legislators are rich fucks, and wannabe rich fucks :/
You are just playing with words now. You intentionally edited that quote to leave out the important information in an effort to mislead. The report fully explains the events and has not been disproven. Your quote even says they analyzed the impact and failure. You are trying to play with semantics to avoid actually looking at the important details contained in the report.
You just did it YOURSELF.  Sorry he didn't dedicate his entirety of his speech clarifying for you.  "When Mexico sends its people, they’re not sending their best. They’re not sending you. They’re not sending you. They’re sending people that have lots of problems, and they’re bringing those problems with us. They’re bringing drugs. They’re bringing crime. They’re rapists. And some, I assume, are good people.  But I speak to border guards and they tell us what we’re getting. And it only makes common sense. It only makes common sense. They’re sending us not the right people.  It’s coming from more than Mexico. It’s coming from all over South and Latin America, and it’s coming probably— probably— from the Middle East. But we don’t know. Because we have no protection and we have no competence, we don’t know what’s happening. And it’s got to stop and it’s got to stop fast."   He assumes some are good but is he wrong that there have been murderers/rapists/criminals released back onto the streets?  And FUCK you, I agree with a lot you have to say but the fact you still say Bush is the sole reason for Iraq shows me you are still stuck in the 2008/2012 election talking points.  There are a lot more to blame for everything you mentioned.  Obama has done nothing but expand on what Bush has done, killing a 16 year old American citizen because of the sins of his father, scary stuff.  
Thnx for proving my point ;)
Tomato, tomahto
So what does this mean then? Have people inhaled an building falling/burning/exploading before? Whats the conspiracy in this?
Because the equipment they were using wasn't FCC approved for personal use. Someone with some technical insight on r/raspberry_pi mentioned this. 
Some of it is pure selfishness--for the most part we are rewarded for believing the lies. Also, basic human psychology is not normally wired to deal with gradually encroaching and vague and broad problems. We can deal with tigers, enemy soldiers etc via fight or flight, and we can (sometimes) pull together as a community to respond to disaster but prudence and foresight and prevention against multifacet problems just isn't in us unless we're weirdo introspective game theorists. 
the only upvotes are being mean about this topic. why cant people be nice?
Isn't this whole "deal" thing a hypothetical until the Parliament has a vote?
yea you mean this little speck: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UjzonG18kHk  Btw, you can't see it even with a telescope. That is simply a myth.
Whats your point?
You're garbage lol. I said make a 9/11 post and we can chat about 9/11 genius.  
Just add 1 to it and it'll clean his clock!
Yea, why can't the banks be evil and, in this case, happen to be taking advantage of a fucking retard. Unfortunately people need to believe everything is black or white. 
Actually no it doesn't show differing height. Look at the foot placement. It shows he stood a bit further back which is higher.  This was literally the first thing I looked for.
Not really. Read this thing carefully
Why do you always have to go to racist places? That's the thing, though. Do you really think ethnicity or the color of my skin has anything to do with whether or not I'm going to commit a crime? It sounds like you do think that, and that, my man, is why I called you a racist. Never called you white, btw. And yeah, I really didn't want to have this conversation or have to explain to you why I thought you were a racist. Shit, dude, ultimately you are defending the racist remarks of a buffoon. Why should I even condescend to talk to you?
If you look into it, it seems all of the Presidential assassinations and attempted assassinations were perpetrated by the vice president at the time.
this shit again? even hollow earth shit makes more sense. 
[deleted]
&gt; That there isn't some all-powerful force manipulating everything  I can think of four.
I'm pretty sure we'd all be better off without most of the government agencies we have.
True, OP makes a good point though, 6-700 online here and nothing going on? Must have an influx of lurkers all of a sudden. I think a lot of the old regulars migrated to CST and TheInside though. 
Hey buddy, you didn't post a video.
Interesting theory, and I don't deny it is possible, but do we have any evidence that this is the case?  It's just weird that they would stage these killings.  Are even the burnings being called staged killings?  How would they fake those?
Easy to do as a hologram. 
You could tell the translator was having a hard time. 
Please cross-post to /r/conspiracymemes :)
Amen.
&gt; He should have worded it in a way that puts the pressure on Bosses to give more hours.  That's a question of supply and demand.  Cut off the supply of illegals driving down wages.
I can see the "convert to Islam" narrative.. :facepalm:  Is it too late to switch back to the fake UFO invasion thing?
Austerity is total bullshit. Hope they overthrow the government.
Robert Anton Wilson attributes the eradication of monarchy from continental Europe to the illuminated seers of Bavaria, an 18th century Freemason cult. A secret society within a secret society. Oh yeah, and Steven Colbert is wrong. Britain didn't give the world America. The Illuminati did.
it's because past a certain point, where our beliefs become engrained as our realities, for another to criticize our reality or tell us that it is wrong, it is the same as an attack on the ego or the self. Remember, your ego is part of your self preservation package. You are literally seeing a conflicting opinion or idea as an attack on your physical being.   I think it's a uniquely human trait due to our higher level thinking processes. It's not something that is taught to us, it's more a part of our primal self than anything else. 
Okay, I will meditate on what you have said here. We will all lead, lest we be lemmings. We will control the fire and burn the tradition of the leader and the follower! I will find peace in my heart, and you will, too, and our fires will make way for this peace to materialize and revolutionize our seemingly hopeless world.  And I, my friend, will help restore your faith in humanity. :DD
I wish Nikola Tesla wouldve founded Tesla Motors when he was alive. Then, energy mightve been, ya know, free.
Good one.
Not if they wouldn't care in the least.... NASA could come out tomorrow and say the earth is actually flat and it would last maybe a week tops on social media.... You think people that can't even recognize the official 911 story defies physics will go from finding out the world's flat to prosecuting crimesthat actually hurt people?
Men will always be slaves, tis it's nature. Guarantee, you are beta as fuck, looking for an alpha to change shit. Lemme tell, you. It's a big fucking club and you aint in it.
oh please. youre just pissed that someone bit back at your snide little remark. suck it up sister, just cos im not going to take your shit doesnt mean im a shill, troll or anything else.    you still avoided my question funnily enough. 
Because Africa. We have been groomed to not care about Africa.
[deleted]
As a Toyota owner myself, I'm pretty sure the Saudi's supplied the brand new Tacomas and everything else that appears to be brand spanking new in the videos...along with a shit ton of cash.
nice try shill
What's with the mnemonic circles in the beginning of the video?
&gt; Why though? Why would they fake them?  Are you kidding? Because our system is being run by terrorists. They are the ones using these scenes to frighten you. Why are so many people so unable to identify deceit? Even when it is this obvious. It isn't ISIS who are showing you these videos. It's our own media.
Neat.
I am asking again:  Who claims that ISIS was just "a bunch of terrorists with no military training"?  I thought you had done your research. 
The thing is it doesn't matter.   Because Obama's mom was an american citizen, he could have been born on Mars and still be an american citizen.  So whether birth certificate is real or fake doesn't matter, it just makes anyone who brings up its fake look like a moron.
No, both nuclear weapons and global warming are hoaxes. Look at all that vague fear you have, so hysterical, so directionless.
I understand. Sometimes i just get so riled up. Thanks for your input to this community thus far.
I'm old enough to remember a little history. The thing I keep going back to is the first Clinton election. The Arkansas governor was up against an incumbent [Bush, Sr.] and was sorely down in the polls. The establishment decided to have a firebrand "truth-teller" named H. Ross Perot enter the race. He peeled just enough conservative votes off of Bush to allow Clinton to eke into the White House. Billionaire Perot would later drop out of the race, saying that The Powers That Be threatened his daughter. The media leaped on this, encouraging the public to call Perot delusional, dishonest, a liar, etc. The thing is: His daughter probably *was* threatened.  Perot had served his purpose, so now they needed him gone.  We see the same thing with another billionaire in this cycle: Donald Trump.  He's shot up in the polls as he expresses a forbidden topic in the media [the social costs of illegal immigration]. It's a message, however, that's gained traction with the voters, since illegal immigration is deeply unpopular with the *actual* American people.  Just yesterday, the media released an improbable narrative of escaped Mexican drug kingpin "El Chapo" tweeting about Trump and threatening him. I have a real problem with the idea of a hardened criminal on the run, stopping to tweet like a teenaged girl. Like he was taking selfies and commenting in forums about the Kardashians.  The reality is: hardened drug kingpins aren't obsessed with our media cycles. Likewise mob bosses NEVER telecast that they're going to hit a target. Why? It destroys the element of surprise and it can be used in future prosecutions.  But El Chapo broke all these rules--to conveniently give the State a narrative in case a "lone gunman" decides to take out Trump.  The media now has this readymade story of a shadowy cartel leader, who likes tweeting, taking selfies, and posting his future hits on billboards so that the authorities have a record.  My analysis?  As with H. Ross Perot, Trump is being threatened. "Drop the anti-Wall Street rhetoric. The corporations want a steady stream of cheap labor. If you don't back away from it, something 'bad' might happen."  As with Perot, Trump is hard to control. They can't threaten him with job loss. He's wealthy enough to be independent. They can't even hurt him economically by encouraging all these other businesses to sever ties with him. (Macy's did, and now 30,000 people have cut up their Macy's credit cards and vowed never to shop there again. http://www.tmz.com/2015/07/13/donald-trump-macys-credit-cards-protest-firing-boycott-immigration) While the media hides it, illegal immigration is DEEPLY unpopular with the American people.  To watch the media, Americans just *love* higher taxes to pay for the children of Hondurans coming into their school districts. They absolutely adore the spiking crime rates, welfare fraud and bankrupted hospitals.  "Illegal immigration is an absolute good!" the media pipes out.  When someone with as high a media presence as Trump turns populist and mouths rhetoric more in line with a large swath of the American public (and divergent from the script of the elites), then there's going to be problems.  My take? Trump is such an egomaniac that no one's using him as cover for Jeb or Hillary. He isn't 'playing a bad guy' at all. He really *wants* to be President [just as Perot did]. So they'll tolerate him only so long, and, after he's served his purpose, they're going to threaten him off the stage.  We're watching the not-so-subtle threats now. "Drop the rhetoric or a 'lone gunman' from a loquacious [and self-incriminating] Mexican drug kingpin will gain access to you. If you're assassinated, 98% of the public will believe the farce of an angry Mexican dispatched by a shadowy narco-trafficker."  I'll take any running bet that in the upcoming weeks we're going to hear of a Trump family member [I'm picking Donald, Jr.] getting into a serious accident, which will have suspicious circumstances. Within the week, Trump will pull out of the race citing the ever-popular "need to spend more time with his family".
That's actually an interesting idea.
See what's happening in Greece right now? They mean to do that everywhere. Even the US. Though they will probably kill us last. 
I remember reading a couple months ago how Putin was going to expose 9/11 for what it is, then nothing happened.  I can't find the link anymore... Why wouldn't he call it a hoax already?  Italy's Berlusconi did.
I understood him perfectly.
I remember watching The Avengers: Age Of Ultron in the cinema, and I said to my friend who I went to see the film with that it seemed like there was propaganda in it. He said nothing and smiled at me like I was a simpleton or mad. Well, guess what. The Avengers is mentioned in the document:  "(FOUO)  FEATURE FILM, ‘THE AVENGERS’ (FOUO) (SAPA-CRD) OSD(PA) agreed to support feature film, ‘The Avengers’.  The film is an American superhero story being produced by Marvel Studios and being distributed by Walt Disney Pictures in 2012.  OCPA-LA has read initial draft screenplay and rewrites."  http://www.spyculture.com/docs/US/USArmy-EntertainmentLiaisonOffice-2010to2015reports.pdf
Move along, Citizens.  No conflict of interest going on here.   Move along!
&gt;directly responsible  Did they personally kill every single one of those millions of people? 
No, I meant more in general.
It changed going into Syria 2 years ago did it not? Even all the government loving troops thought the Obama administration was retarded at that point. At least Bush had a good lie about going into Iraq.
Then you obviously didn't listen to him
There is going to be a major infrastructure scheme that will connect from China all the way to Europe. What's so funny about that? 
You are an idiot if you think the people in the theater could have been bribed. You can't just bribe people to lie about a tragedy that affected them so profoundly. Your an asshole for accusing the victims of accepting bribes without any evidence it actually happened.  There is no evidence the Vulcans were involved but there is proof it was Bin Laden. You don't just get to make that proclamation without any evidence.  You really going to keep on about committing violence against me? You must be pretty confident that you wouldn't get you ass kicked if you tried anything like that.
I know, but there are whole government organizations like Darpa "weaponizing social media" and the JIDF I think its safe to say that a conspiracy forum is going to have its fair share of shills. We shouldn't yell shill at every single person who has a different opinion BUT we should remain vigilant and call them out when it's obvious. 
They're all scum, man.
It is impossible to both soverign and a citizen, from what I *understand*.  I am not ignorant of the movement.
Andy? Is that you?
[deleted]
Lots of good info here. If you prefer books, maybe hit up your local library?
See WWII Germany for a fine example.
reasonable idea for sure
 The ancient Chinese treatise on strategy and deception, Sun Tzu's 'The Art of War', translated into Russian by N.I. Konrad in 1950 (shortly after the Communist victory in China), was translated into German in 1957 by the Soviet specialist Y.I. Sidorenko, with a foreword by the Soviet military strategist and historian General Razin. It was published in East Germany by the East German Ministry of Defense and was prescribed for study in East German military academies. A new translation and other studies of Sun Tzu were published in Peking in 1957 and 1958 and in Shanghai in 1959. Mao is known to have been influenced by Sun Tzu in his conduct of the civil war.   This intense official interest in Sun Tzu on the part of both the Soviets and the Chinese at the very time when the new policy and strategy were being formulated is a good indication that the Chinese probably made a positive contribution to their formulation.  The strategy of strengthening the Communist Bloc while presenting an appearance of Communist disunity is neatly expressed in Sun Tzu's aphorisms:  *O All warfare is based on deception. Therefore, when capable, feign incapacity; when active, inactivity.*  *O Offer the enemy a bait to lure him; feign disorder and strike him. O One who wishes to appear to be weak in order to make his enemy arrogant must be extremely strong. Only then can he feign weakness'.*
The moon isn't special. That's why we didn't go back.
&gt; They knew the Towers would collapse, but still urged occupants to stay inside, and still sent firefighters in, and kept it all a secret?  You're taking my comment out of context. **They've known forever** that dynamic loads behave differently than static loads. But nice job putting words in my mouth. You morph more and more into a typical truther bozo the longer this goes.  But, since I'm having so much fun with you, I'll address your strawman argument anyway...  &gt; They knew the Towers would collapse, but still urged occupants to stay inside, and still sent firefighters in, and kept it all a secret?  Yes, because they had a full scope of the damage the building had been subjected to immediately after plane impact.  A bunch of Structural Engineers knew the building was coming down. So did the Loizeaux brothers, who were desperately trying to get through to the FDNY to tell them to pull people out before the towers collapsed.  &gt; You never named a thing that fails sequentially without being designed to.   Progressive collapse. It's a well known and well studied phenomenon.  &gt; Impacting floors with the strength to keep ~250000 tons up - plus factor of safety.   Not 250,000 tons *in motion*.  No building on the planet is designed for that.  &gt; The thing is, towers burn all the time, sprinkler systems aren't 100% reliable and a floor can fail for any number of reasons - as we have seen in Kobe.  How many steel framed skyscrapers in history have had supports *severed and heavily damaged*, fireproofing blown off of structural steel, and multi floor fires started all at once?  Not a single one.
You can hope that it doesn't but it might. 
And citizens, and anyone capable or willing to talk out against corporations...
You misunderstand. I'm completely aware of covert US regime change operations. My point was more along the lines of when has an American infantry invasion of an enemy country ever resulted in an American victory.   
Eh, the Manhattan Project leaked like an upside down cup.  http://www.nytimes.com/2014/09/30/science/espionage-threatened-the-manhattan-project-declassified-report-says.html?_r=0
*This just in! Breaking news at 1985!*
&gt; Are you a materials scientist?  As I said before, I'm the Emperor of China, at least on the internet. Credentials don't matter. Arguments do.   I accept your arguments against a trash can fire and am more precise. I want to take down Willis Tower. I take out the sprinkler system, board the elevator up to the 90th floor and start the trash can fire. I take the elevator down, leave the building, walk home, sit in front of my TV, watch the raging inferno and wait for total progressive collapse.  &gt; Initial temperature. The jet fuel burned incredibly hot  No. They burned at open air flame temperature of jet fuel, nothing incredible about that. And the jet fuel burned off within a few minutes.   &gt; So, to be clear, it's no problem to have explosives that can survive 1300ºF, the initial impact of the plane, be discreet, and work flawlessly from within an inferno?   These explosives exist, yes, and existed long before 9/11.   &gt; That is the simplest explanation?  It's a better explanation for the collapse than "the towers crumbled under their own incredible weight".   &gt; F = ma. Assuming that a = 5.88m/s^2 , I'm sure you can tell me the force since you obviously know the mass of the tower from above the impact point?  I'd go with Bazants 58000 ton estimate for simplicity's sake, so the force would be 341040000 Newton or ~ 341 Meganewton. That's what pulled the mass of the tower from above the impact point down. Before the crash, AT LEAST 568980000 Newton or ~ 569 Meganewton were holding the mass of the tower from above the impact point UP.   E = mgh. Assuming a whole tower weighs 500,000 tons, I'm sure you can tell me the gravitational potential energy and put it in relation to the kinetic energy the mass of the tower from above the impact point has after a one-storey free fall?
Are there any actual groups that resemble the Brotherhood? Something that someone can actually join in real life?
Neither of those links say anything about the flight being United 93. They both say that the plane in Cleveland was a Boeing 767 out of Boston. United 93 was a Boeing 757 out of Newark.  The flight that landed in Cleveland was [Delta 1989](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Delta_Air_Lines_Flight_1989).   
I've said the same thing. But look at his subscriber base? Blows many other more positive people's efforts out of the water as far as attention and user base go. Such is life, i suppose.  
[^(**Mouseover** to view the metric conversion for this comment)](#HoverToView "1000 feet = 304.8 m Post feedback in /r/ToMetric")
Yep that's the only one I've ever seen that shows stars and it's always been odd to me how few there are.  I've stood under the night sky in the desert and looked up and saw literally thousands of stars as far as I could see.  I would expect a long-exposure UV camera to show something similar.  Regardless thanks for the link though.  Edit: ...also it was not me who downvoted you.
Time is the main resource constraint. Even if I studied full-time, it'd be 2 years before I could understand that conversation. I'm considering attending university in St. Pete this winter, but it depends on what happens in the US this autumn.
hahahahaha
We are talking about the Apollo pictures.  They were chemical film made by Kodak.  No computers.  Lol sorry I got this reply confused with another thread in this post.  They are using digital imaging with the Pluto flyby.
  What the fuck are you even trying to say here? That's a terrible point and you know it. Organic food is probably the cleanest, "least messed with"  you can buy.  I don't know why I'm surprised you're against that too. 
No, I just feel this video needs to be seen and my brother shared the video on Facebook. A few minutes later it was gone. 
People in the west have a lot of re-education to do. We've been lied to about everything. I include myself in this, and I'm much better than most.
&gt; How long do you think the one or two inch wide truss connectors of the first impacted floor held against 50 thousand moving tons?  At least a few milliseconds.   Har!  Now one inch truss connectors did not have to hold 50 thousand moving tons, don't be ridiculous.   &gt; Lateral winds are no comparison to tens of thousands of tons of rubble falling vertically. Sorry man, you're getting desperate and talking nonsense.  Dude, the tower is not moving sideways more than it can in a storm precisely _because_ the load is redistributed so it ends up putting lots and lots of pressure and tension on the columns - in addition to what it already must carry statically. That's where its strength comes from: it is practically cantilevered in the ground.   Take Bazants advice. If you're lazy, at least read up some Wikipedia articles on this stuff.   Or where do you think the tons worth of pressure on the sail area of the Twins regularly ended up?  &gt; When you drop 35 stories worth of office building and it starts smashing into structure below, it's not going to fall within a contained footprint. It's going to expand outward as it falls.  That _normally_ takes away from the downward momentum vector, yes.   Or magically doesn't, you're still fuzzy on that.   &gt; You just don't like the fact that it doesn't closely resemble the twins...  I forgot to mention this gem in your last post, sorry.   A thousand posts long you complain about my "toilet roll and chicken wire" models, you dismiss Torre Windsor and the buildings in Kobe and the domino tower and Rupert's drop and demolition fails, and when I point out Ronan Point London '68 does not equal Torres Gemini Lower Manhattan 9/11/2001...  ...you pout.   Dude. 
Are you playing "guess teacher's password"?  You were good at this in school, right?  Okay, my first guess:   "Sentient debris that doesn't lose downward momentum when it knocks steel columns apart by blasting sideways allowing the tower to liquefy and quantum tunnel through itself in a violent chain reaction."  Wrong?  Let me see how the NIST report explains the collapse mode, I think there's a footnote about it on pages xxxvii (IIRC) and 82 of NIST NCSTAR 1...
From your own link:  &gt; **Animal feeding studies** are the basis for evaluating the safety of GMO crops.  So not long-term and not testing human safety.  And then, from the same article:  &gt; One-off studies of lab animals have occasionally shown some problems.  The other one is no better.  Here's a quote:  &gt; **Environmental impact studies** are predominant in the body of GM research  The fact is that no long-term human safety study of GMO's has ever been done so I'm not surprised you couldn't find one and instead were forced to link to two articles arguing for "scientific consensus".  Seems a little weird that people automatically declare GMO safe when its long-term effects have never been tested on humans, no?  But I'm sure these multi-national chemical conglomerates just want to "feed the world" and have our best interests at heart...
And we lived happily ever after 
Can you verify people on board from a telescope ?   Can you verify the material it's made of from a telescope ?   Can you verify ANYTHING from your telescope ?    No, you can't.    Provide irrefutable proof, or admit: You're arguing a BELIEF.    Did you watch those videos?   Counter all the points.    Cheers.  
Snowden is your creepy Uncle or...  Snowden is your Uncle that advises you to sleep in britches...  Question everything, kid! Always!  Might I ask,  how you reacted to Bradley Manning via Wiki-Leaks of US Troops slaughtering an innocent news crew on the ground and at least one child that was gutted? (if you take the time to listen to the entire exchange...)  Do you really know whom to label as Hero?   I'm old.   There are no Heroes.   There is you.  You're not a hero. You're a being with a limited time to exist and expire.  You are well on your way!
No, they never went to the moon... if they did, they would have had the technology to take unedited photos.... which they didn't.  Try again.
[deleted]
But the analysis is only on two lines of the song which don't seem like a hidden 'Zionist' message
[deleted]
Wait, why is hollow point even allowed to be made? It can't be used in war (well it would be in a large war) so why allow it?  Doesn't that mean that the US bought it illegally?
"So what about western countries with much better rights? Surely that would run counter to their plans?"  no listen to me. you are not listening. NATO is funding gay NGOs to spread gay propaganda. gay is not illegal in russia, just dont show it anywhere. with gay propaganda more become gay which has been confirmed by many experts(Source: Sputnik). russia is on a downfall due to this. other countries are able to deal with it due to high populations and high birth rates but my country is really suffering.  &gt;There are lots of factors for birthrate, how well the economy is doing is one and Russia's economy was god awful in the 90s    our economy doing better in the 2000s yet no birth rate betterence.   &gt;Have you ever used contraception?  no, i will have children though with wife. gay can never have children.
espresso 4 lyfe*!!*
When that ISIS camp across the border roll in?
Texas will secede eventually when it all goes to shit. This is a smart move. I could see OR, WA, and MT following suit
http://www.reddit.com/rules &gt;NOT OK: Creating submissions such as "For every upvote I will ..." or "... please upvote this!", regardless of the cause.  Removed.
Thank you for your service.
Wake up your friends, you are still young enough to really make a difference. Your generation is going to be important. Don't listen to these bullshitters about the limited hangout garbage, no one can know for sure. Make up your own mind.
"ZERO proof NASA is legit"  - http://au.askmen.com/top_10/entertainment/top-5-proofs-that-the-moon-landing-happened.html  edit: sorry for responding. you just make it so easy
[deleted]
YouTube did not pull that video.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tsehPE5cEFs  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=snhfI9j90XQ  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gACcvbm-YTw  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yFKo86uYHyo
Can you imagine what it must be like to truly believe in justice and doing "the right thing", wanting to make a difference in the world, then joining an organization that is in reality the opposite of that? Soul crushing.
&gt; Fine. How can you possibly expect every single one of the people in the crowd during those protests to be paid shills?  Because they signed up for it. That crowd was staged, the event wasn't even in tripoli, as has been proven multiple times.  &gt;What if I told you that the Ferguson protestors were all paid Russian shills? Sounds ridiculous, right?  The difference is that those protesters were actually in ferguson, and were not trying to topple a government.   &gt;Except Libya was actually a literal dictatorship. The dude clung to power for decades. Do you think everything was nice and rosy? The government literally controlled your life.  You're simply misinformed or intentionally lying when it comes to this. Ghadaffi controlled all of it but libyan citizens were as free as any western democracy when it comes to religion/business/education/healthcare etc. etc.  Also, it wasn't a literal dictatorship. Get you facts straight and read the the green book.  The Green Book rejects modern liberal democracy based on electing representatives as well as capitalism. Instead, it proposes a type of direct democracy overseen by the General People's Committee which allow direct political participation for all adult citizens.[7][8]  The book states that "Freedom of expression is the right of every natural person, even if a person chooses to behave irrationally, to express his or her insanity."[9] The Green Book states that freedom of speech is based upon public ownership of book publishers, newspapers, television, and radio stations, on the grounds that private ownership would be undemocratic.[7]  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Green_Book_(Muammar_Gaddafi)
Their jobs are important! Lol 
The guy didn't literally type "Actually, here's where you said that." But he posted a few links where the admins *literally called reddit a bastion of free speech*. Quotation marks are used for more than just quotes.
Thanks DvnRIm, Trying to make the world a better place, I want to work with people to make things better, maybe we can start a chat and start talking about things we can do to make things better, actual things we can do.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xFVdvXGIT34
AboveTopSecret.com is a nice forum.  edit: wow reddit fanboys downvoting... that site contains a lot of shit but still less than this one.
If by hovering over a weight he means the squat rack in my home gym then he's correct. I used to be kinda overweight when I was bulking, so buddy isn't completely wrong.
http://getaether.net/  A p2p alternative to reddit, which is impossible to censor and you are anonymous AFAIK (I haven't used it yet).
But how do we know yishan is actually giving true information and not just saying what he is saying to protect Pao's reputation, and by extension his own, as he recommended her for the job? He did write a few days ago that Alexis and Huffman were playing something of a long con to get control of reddit back from AP, detailed the whole thing, and then basically said j/k. He's ostensibly been leaking inside baseball of reddit corporate, but we really have no way of verifying anything he's saying.  &gt;Well, now she's gone (you did it reddit!), and u/spez has the moral authority as a co-founder to move ahead with the purge. We tried to let you govern yourselves and you failed, so now The Man is going to set some Rules. Admittedly, I can't say I'm terribly upset.  This just strikes me as a petty attempt to place blame on redditors for tying their own noose. I'll admit that many people went after Pao when the real source of their ire was the board, but yishan is making it sound like if they had only stood behind her, those who wanted to monetize reddit would just let her champion free speech. 
I highly recommend Waking Life! I think it might sync with you right now.
Take some powdered root bark from the Acacia Confusa tree (around 12 grams) and boil it down on a slow temp for a number of hours. Strain the liquid, and repeat the process with the lees a few times, keeping the liquid. Boil the final brown, horrid mess down till you have about a half cup of vile syrup. Eat about 8 or so grams of seeds from a plant called Syrian Rue, wait about half an hour, and then hold your nose and drink liquid you made earlier. Struggle with all your will and strength to not vomit, for as long as possible. Sorry, but you WILL vomit. Copiously, and with great vigor. Enjoy.You will soon find the philosophy you're looking for.
Its a trap. Words. Means nothing. Press on.
start with Kierkegaard and read Schopenhauer. Prepare yourself for Nietzsche, let it sink in, you will be okay but at this point you are down the rabbit hole and you will need to find any bit of hope. Let yourself go to Sarte and read a little Camus. Have Derrida take you on a trip and listen to Cioran as he will make things easier to handle. After, have some fun with Zizek
Nothing is outside of the realm of possibility.  However you must note that the statistical probability for [Black females to commit suicide](http://www.neontommy.com/news/2014/08/why-black-women-dont-commit-suicide) is lower than any other gender/ethnic group.  In the [assessment of suicide](http://www.suicidology.org/resources/warning-signs) there are several variables which when present indicate a heightened risk of suicide for an individual.  Sandy presented with few if any of the standard warning signs.  While this does not necessarily remove her from having the possibility of committing the act it does identify an area of weakness in the story being told.  All I want is for a 3rd party to investigate her case further as this is what she deserves.  Thank you for bringing in another viewpoint to this discussion! 
Between hypotheses _that predict equally well_ the hypothesis with the fewest assumptions is probably the correct one.   You don't just pick the hypothesis with the least assumptions and call it the correct one. 
What currency will replace it as the world's reserve currency ?
Them? You just posted here you nut!
Woosh.
And what happens when a comment gets downvoted?
Except most isps at least stateside block port 80 hosting on their consumer packages, some port translation would be required.
Well, here where I live the media are pretty nuts. Like, I mean, History Channel nuts. So, I don't really get the "what the media feeds you" debate. The media feeds me 30 different versions of 9/11 every Thursday.
What happens when a book sucks? It doesn't become a bestseller. 
Source?
I would be assassinated worse than JFK. It would be fucking horrible.
OP we are all nuts until we are right...
&gt; Where in the collapse sequence would the truss connectors have been subjected to 29 thousand tons of static load or less?   Don't accuse me of failure if you don't even understand what you're asking anymore.   Another notch on my keyboard, I guess...
Hey, you want a conspiracy? Here's one.   He is using the exact same language, to show that he has no choice to contradict himself.   He's being forced into doing this, going exactly against his principles, and this is his way of telling us.   Maybe it's an NDA, maybe it's a secret court order.      What he said is his "blink twice".
I think you've got it backwards, different theories come from applying logic and being critical of information sources.
Maybe we have already seen it.
[deleted]
https://ec.europa.eu/research/biosociety/pdf/a_decade_of_eu-funded_gmo_research.pdf  
Oil prices are going back up currently after a dip in the winter of 2015.
let em call us what they want, we seek the truth, we know the truth.
[deleted]
so if r/conspiracy gets cut, does that mean we all go back to the news subreddit?
The logo is interesting. Take scare mongering with a grain of salt http://www.watchmanscry.com/News_alert_jade_helm_part3.html 
Still the best sub on or about reddit.
You have yet to prove the statement to be a fact. The only thing you've proven is that you don't know what the word "fact" means.    0 EICs provided revision/retraction/ERRATUM.  Just s statement that wasn't taken seriously.  
There you go.  On to the next checkbox - act incredulous even though it's a proven fact that disinfo agents flood us in an attempt to control the discussion.  Claim I'm JTRIG, then act like its a tinfoil hat conspiracy.  The one redeeming fact here is that the lowest of the low are those who are put on internet forum disruption duty.  It's been fun, bruh.
No.  &gt;Separate database read/writes, improve cache hits, move more data to web services  All of those problems would fall under the hosting.  It's the hosting that makes the site run slow. not the css.   You can't write a magic code to give your users faster access to your site; you just have to pay for it. 
Yes Matagalpa is very Sandinista.  I was given a "Los Dos" (vote #2 Sandinista) shirt there when I was drinking with some young people right above the hills from the bus station.  In Granada the hotel service stole the (cheap) shirt off of the rack and probably trashed it.
Yeah, they scrambled them LATE and then sent them between Long Island and Martha's Vineyard. Knowing all along that all planes headed west and their latest tracking showed them west of New York State.  Stop your bullshit " they did scramble jets" yeah, only 2 of like 12 left to watch the entire east coast and sent them in the wrong direction. Also the jets weren't armed with any missiles.   Edit: https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/U.S._military_response_during_the_September_11_attacks  There are far too many coincidences that happened on this one day. Coincidences with normal protocol/changed protocols/military training and fake aircraft radar signatures/3 steel framed structures succumbing to fire(only time in history)/Larry Silverstein and his adult children conveniently either running really late or not showing up  The government can end a lot of speculation by releasing the video from the 40+ cameras surrounding the pentagon. Things don't add up and again to many coincidences in one day to not have been planned in some way.  Keep in mind that The Manhattan Project had close to 100,000 people involved in that operation and no one said a word. So secrets can be kept. 
Large amounts of freshly printed cash was involved.
I'm pretty active in Voat, and it's actually a nice community. It's basically Reddit 2.0, though. I'm not sure what to recommend if you're looking for something fundamentally *different* from Reddit in its function, user interface, etc.
Got it. Thanks for the info. 
This is stupid and incorrect.  We give ~$24 billion in humanitarian aid and ~$13 billion in military aid per year, so, grand total, less than half the amount he quotes.  A little over $3 billion of that goes to Israel, so around 1/26th the amount Obama quoted.  I hate Israeli policy as much as the next guy, but don't just make shit up and then add "cause Israel teh suxors!"
1984 laid that one out for us.   You need people to be working but not making anything of value, weapons fit that bill.   
I don't know if someone has confused you into thinking this, or you're trying to confuse others.   No conclusive evidence exists that there is water on another planet. So block of ice, I think not.   Water has a high shc and there is a vast amount of it on earth. There is no reason to believe CO2, which is "one of the most efficient coolants in the upper atmosphere" according to NASA, has any significant influence on temperature.
I just called that particular Sam's club. Fresh out of ninjas. 
Man...people really didnt like our collective thought on this post. 
&gt; his campaign today tweeted an image with the title "Make America Great Again". The image depicted soldiers overlayed with an American Flag. German soldiers. German Nazi SS soldiers.  link?
This is my side account where I'm mean to people.
Then you're in for a treat. Look into space fraud. My research has led me to believe all space exploration is a fraud/scam. I have a degree in aerospace engineering and as a kid was really passionate about space, but things just dont add up. It is just not logical that nasa supposedly sent men to the moon 6 times in a span of 3 years from 1969-72 and won't dare to do it today. They will blame it on lack of funding and congress, but that's just a convenient excuse. Back then, lack of technology was in their favor. But with the internet and access to technology that we have today, people will not buy the same story that they successfully sold back then. Check /r/spacefraud.
[deleted]
Wow, first they try to blame it on vandals after copper to sell. Which is the weakest excuse I've heard in a while.  Real copper thiefs steal from abandon homes and businesses, not pole strung lines. Then they recant that assumption, and just say they don't know why.  This stinks to high heaven. 
Are there examples of similar skyscrapers (i.e. built without concrete supports, with steel beams on skin and core supporting all the weight) that burned for so long and so extensively ?  Somehow most of the construction and civil engineering experts in the world disagree with you.  Only a small fringe of architects and engineers calls for more investigation.  The experts for the insurance companies, for the 9/11 families, for the govt, disagree with you.
&gt; The biggest part of "our mission" if you want to call it that, my mission at least, is to nudge people in the direction of waking up, thinking for themselves.  "Your name is in the mouth of others. [Be sure it has teeth](http://www.schlockmercenary.com/2002-11-21)."
Saying "nobody likes you" is a pretty classic example of verbal abuse.  You also went out of your way to come here and say it.
You're right, it's a bit higher than I said, that was a rough estimate. But even adding up his last 100 posts going back 6 pages still only puts you at around 5.6k, and that's only counting his positive posts, he also has many posts in the negatives.
I was just lurking around voat, getting a feel for the place but does anyone have legit resons as to why making the switch from r to v is better. Maybe I'm just burned out from all the reddit drama but I just feel meh about voat and reddit. I wanted to get away from all the people going crazy over reddit drama so I check out voat but a lot of the stuff I saw was shit talking about reddit, which I can easily find on reddit haha. I just want somewhere to go and read interesting things while having my morning coffee etc. 
Lol, there are lights that come off of Pluto.   On the bottom, slightly to the right, there's a light that is clearly not touching Pluto at all....  Clearly faked; obviously. You could have at least tried a bit though.
I may not have a lot of karma right now, but I did have a lot more than I do now. meh. 
Yeah, this. I am a part of this sub because I rather take a little truth with my bullshit. I can make up my own mind later. But at least it's my choice. 
Her position was "Interim CEO"  it wouldn't take a sleuth to figure it out. Quit stroking yourselves. 
http://talkingpointsmemo.com/livewire/best-jade-helm-parody-ever
You need to learn some basic photography. You don't see stars because they were exposing for the foreground. If they exposed so that you could see stars, everything else in the picture would be blown out.
well, it is very similar but there are key differences. one is that part of digg's model was the presence of 'power members' who had more sway and clout when posting articles than other users. Reddit doesn't have this. Also, digg's final straw was the implementation of an update (v4) which drove a stake through the heart of the community and in one fell swoop handed the reigns of the site to corporate interest. Reddit's downfall has been much more subtle and slow-burning. But yes, it really does feel like that.
It happened 14 years ago and as far as i know no major new evidence has really come out since. I think given that it was 14 years ago people need to drop it as the go to conspiracy. was jfk the go to until 9/11? Wonder how long thisll last.  I find it hard to believe that the us governement did not know it would happen.  Im not sure about their ability to prevent such an attack.   I am sure that they exploited the events that occurred, whoever committed these acts, to use them for political means and gonto war in countries they should  not be in, and that since then they have gotten ballsier going into more countres they REALLY shouldn't  be in like yemen.  Im not sure who committed the attacks.  I think that people need to realize there is a massive difference between committing an attack on you own population,  and exploiting a tradgedy for political means. 
Oh, a link to an article on a website that describes itself as "pro-white". This is something you only feel the need to call yourself if you somehow think the vast majority of right and left-leaning media is actively anti-white. And if you think that you are insane. I'm honestly glad free speech includes race-baiting hateful shit like this but I'm free to call it that too.
Amen, I am provaccine but if you don't want it, that is your right.
This is like a plague.  You can only run so far.  Eventually, every state will have this, unless the people are mentally "inoculated" against this contagion.  Right now, its going "viral" without any real weighing of the facts nor with respect to individual rights.  What's sad is that the schools are depressing people's "immunity" to shit reasoning, and instead hyping people's emotional responses.
I didn't call you a shill, just because you are most likely military, posting from a military instillation doesn't make you a bad person, it just means you have a bit of bias on this subject.
How?
My bad I meant the Yuan, whatever currency China uses :p
You sound like you aren't really interested in investigating at all, you'd rather dismiss the subject out of hand.  If you are actually interested in learning something though, *Crossing the Rubicon* would be a good place to start.  Or *The Big Bamboozle*.  And since we're on the conspiracy sub I should also mention that both of the authors have died in the years since.
its not banned this is bait
bait
bait
Digg was worse. What eventually happened was the content was being paid for and voted for by an army of bots, or possibly people with multiple accounts. It was blatant advertising disguised as news. Also certain websites were always voted for regardless of how shit the content was. If you had a Digg front page link, the traffic and possibly advertising revenue spike was going to be enormous.
Well where I saw it was on various internet videos; which I don't consider sources of factual information by default. 
 &gt;So each floor weighs 1200 tons.   2500 actually. Remember, I'm allowing you 50% loss of mass for each floor destroyed.   &gt;Floor 109 must be able to carry 1200.   &gt;Floor 108 must be able to carry 2400.   Leaving your flaky math aside for a second, you've got it all wrong.   Each floor contains a certain number of truss connectors. I don't have the figure on hand, but call it a hundred for arguments sake. The number of connectors per floor is exactly the same, whether it's the tenth floor or the 80th.   Those hundred truss connectors each have weight ratings between 94 thousand and 395 thousand pounds depending on the connector type. Again, the connectors on floor ten are weight rated the same as the connectors on floor 80.  The total combined vertical load that *each individual floor* can hold up is 29 thousand tons. From floor 1 through floor 110, each floor has the same weight rating.   You don't add the weights of each successive floor together when you're talking about the floor assembly (trusses, truss connectors, gusset plates, etc) . That's stupid and you *know* it's stupid.  Could you completely unload the top 100 floors, cement slabs and all, and rest 250 thousand tons of weight on the square footage of the tenth floor alone?   Of course not! The truss connectors buckle instantly because you've overloaded them by a factor of ten!   The columns at that level wouldn't care. They could hold that weight no problem. The floor assemblies would fail in the blink of an eye.   There is a *per floor* weight limit for the twins. That limit was 29 thousand *static* tons, far less than the 71 thousand *dynamic* tons it was facing.     
Hasn't been said better.  More of that part of his speech.    &gt;There's a time when the operation of the machine becomes so odious—makes you so sick at heart—that you can't take part. You can't even passively take part. And you've got to put your bodies upon the gears and upon the wheels, upon the levers, upon all the apparatus, and you've got to make it stop. And you've got to indicate to the people who run it, to the people who own it that unless you're free, the machine will be prevented from working at all.” 
Okay, can you tell me more about the ACA?
First of all you did imply I was a shill.   Second, now you haven't apologized for being completey wrong about both this subject AND what you called me, and STILL FAILED to check my post history to validate all this to yourself.    I am not, nor have I ever been associated with the US government or it's military.  I am not posting from a base, or even near one.  Again IF YOU HAD CHECK MY POST HISTORY you would know ALL this. It is REALLY obvious.    It probably means nothing to you, but you've managed to lose my respect from this little encounter.  I have always been an immense advocate for this sub a 90% of the non-shill/sockpuppet content in here, but just because I pointed out the many obvious flaws with your post you call me a shill or "likely associated with the military" with no evidence.  In fact massive evidence to the contrary at your fingertips (my post history).  That is the kind of fallacy ignorant children use, not adult member of a community.  It is the number one stereotype about our sub here on reddit, and I always tell people it's not the case, I post there all the time no problem.  Welp, I guess it had to happen sometime, just wasn't expecting it from you.  I know there are a TON of shills here and it is immensely frustrating to deal with them.  However my post was NOTHING like a shill post and you should know that just from the content alone LET ALONE my post history.  
&gt;I'm actually really curious what warehouse you're talking about.  There are reasons I feel I should not currently state which specific business it is until my business with them is resolved, so mark this for later.  &gt;in West Chicago which was the same thing  I bet you would find a lot of illegals if you rolled through all of those warehouses.
Couldn't*  E: at least I hope that's what you meant
So what will you people say when nothing happens as a result of Jade Helm?
You are correct, others may have said it better... http://www.whatourforefathersthought.com/Quotes.html This is what I meant. *Edit* Franklin's quote(s) on "freedom for security". And by the way, historically societies go between tyranny and anarchy. What is the station of our pendulum?
 I think all those attacks were shill attacks from Amazon's brick and mortar rivals.
I'm 31, male and I'm convinced the lipstick I'm using is feminizing me.
Everyone knows facts are racist. 
&gt; &gt; a classless, borderless, and *stateless* world  &gt; An economic super *state*, with no boundaries, with Global reach  ???
The amazon sale was horrible tho
you're a creep
The scotus ruling has convinced many that God is angry. I'm concerned we are being primed for a new false flag attack.  
While not required, you are requested to use the NP domain of reddit when crossposting. This helps to protect both your account, and the accounts of other users, from administrative shadowbans. The NP domain can be accessed by prefacing your reddit link with np.reddit.com.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/conspiracy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Believe it was banned from some people cheating amazons system... /r/Amazone I believe is simular   Edit: Amazone looks dead. 
2 hours?!? After 10 beers, [this is how I feel](http://wallpaper.ultradownloads.com.br/276228_Papel-de-Parede-Meme-Challenge-Accepted-Bebado_1280x1024.jpg). Better be worth it OP.
Why are you saying it wasn't removed?   https://reddit.com/r/news  find it
I STILL DON'T LIKE YOUR USERNAME
There are republicans on reddit?!
He's calling the other branches stupid already. Look at what Obama thinks about the other branches on this Iran deal. The Donald will play that tune too. 
hillary is in bed with monsanto, we don't want her
He warned us about a lot of potential dangers. Will society ever listen? No. He warned us of that too.    "When we get piled upon one another in large cities, as in Europe, we shall become as corrupt as Europe." Thomas Jefferson  We're definitely piled upon one another t definitely corrupt to the point that society as a whole has given up hope that it can be fixed. 
Overt violation of the 9th and 10th Amendments, States rights first!!
[deleted]
Oh I've come across so many references and stories about government operatives showing up at people's homes, businesses, and research labs in order to seize tech they were developing. 
We should bring back Usenet
you rock
No, you are too stupid to understand math. If 2/3 of your data set is not available, your conclusions are meaningless.  Then we add in biased enforcement, as [demonstrated by drug convictions](https://www.hrw.org/news/2009/03/02/us-drug-arrests-skewed-race) and even the 1/3 of the data we have is not trustworthy.
I'm a woman and hate feminists. Fucking commies. 
You're doing it wrong, you should be working for yourself. I am, which is why I'm piss drunk on a thursday at 12:54 am. lol, silly redditor...
Well, I mean are we talking about capitalism itself or the crony capitalism we live in? Free market capitalism is nothing more than two parties trading goods, which is what I do. The shit going on in wallstreet and DC is a little different. You can be a humble self employed dude and not be for the crony shit going on, plus, I make my own hours and am my own boss. I sit in my boxers smoking a cigarettes all day while developing websites. My lunch breaks are hours long and usually include fishing on the lake I live on.
The irony.
[According to the US Department of Justice, blacks accounted for 52.5% of homicide offenders from 1980 to 2008, with whites 45.3% and "Other" 2.2%.](http://www.bjs.gov/content/pub/pdf/htus8008.pdf)  But the thing is, there are far more whites in poverty than blacks.  Yet blacks still commit more murders overall.  You don't need a PhD in statistical analysis to understand basic information. Just like calling someone a racist, calling something debunked doesn't make it so.  I'm not aware of any claims that melanin content causes a predisposition for crime, that's just a straw man.
So, you're saying 40 women accused him of rape? Yes or No? Because no. 40 didn't. Some did, but not anywhere near 40. There were several sexual harassment claims but here's a tip for you sexual harassment doesn't equal rape.  The women who said he kissed them abruptly, or said demeaning things to him were not raped. Did all of the allegations against him constitute rape? By no means.
Best bet:  Print out the 9/11 Timeline at HistoryCommons.org -- everything you should know, the basic events, and the weird parts of 9/11 that Truthers never mention.
The frowny face is the greatest unknown power of the dark side.
Facts aren't racist, but you're definitely a shitbag fucking racist.  No question about that.
By hiding facts, you are giving racists more ammunition and a bigger soap box to stand on.
Of course, these are fucking facts.  Asians and Jews have a higher average IQ. I will admit this because it's documented and a fact. Why would I not admit that?  And blacks are significantly below all of us, as is documented, studied, reviewed and proven.
The last time we really believed we had a democracy that represented us in any way.
people access to technology is important. autonomous cars or not.
You're either being sarcastic, or are seriously ignorant of how transgenic modification works. 
[](/derplejack-r)So because you feel that *no one* is trustworthy, you decided to trust the word of organizations who have *repeatedly* been caught lying and manipulating data to best serve their purposes. How is that **not** counter productive? You trust no one, so you choose to trust the word of the least trustworthy people, but only when it comes to the subject of race?  Your agenda is leaking out.
Holistic medicine is the medicine that has been used for thousands of years and has a wider test and data base to chose from. By the way pharmas focus is treatment not cure.
Well OP is an actual racist.  If you want to put in the effort to lower crime rates in the US then you should focus on black on black crime which is through the roof. Putting in the effort for humanity is a good cause.  OP on the other hand is not interested in humanitarian causes, he just says that all blacks are the problem and calls it a day. In his own words he is "not a racist, just an asshole." However his statements contradict with that.
BTW, I said nothing about the circumstances leading up to the treatment of Turing and Manning, only the similar effects.  As for not turning Turing into a woman, whether intended or not, it started to do just that (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gynecomastia). I don't readily accept ignorance as an excuse from my lawmakers. 
Yeah they just have to work harder. /s
[deleted]
I understand these feelings but consider the following:  There are people out there (like me when I was younger) that were so naive that I didn't actually KNOW that the black crime rate was so high. Is this not the age of information for a reason? Should we really be withholding such knowledge because it might (realistically WILL) lead to some racism? There might be ONE great point in all that poo slinging that might be worth all that carnage. I believe it's worth it.  I personally don't think that such knowledge should be withheld, but I do sympathize with those that wish to shield the children from those horrors.
You're keep saying you aren't racist, but you are one of the biggest and dumbest racists I know of!
Because it has been proven that big oil has been sponsoring anti-climate change scientists for the past 40 years, and that is the actual conspiracy.
The common folk. 
If I've learned anything these past few years, I've learned this.   Some politicians (some, a very small bunch, let's say), are genuinely campaigning with the world's best intentions as their model. They WANT to change the world. They see that the world is fucked up, and want to be that helping hand. I firmly believe Obama was this way before he got elected. But here's the thing, that will last until the old Pres sits down with the new, and the new guy is told exactly how it is. I imagine he's told there's no deviation from the plan (whatever that may be), I imagine he's told, "no, you can't save the world, don't try", and so on and so fourth.  My guess is the only Presidents that have tried to buck the system are Lincoln and JFK (could be wrong about Lincoln though).   My point of this rant is this: It doesn't matter how good Sanders' intentions are, he'll get sat down and told what's what. and then biz will continue as usual. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
African Americans are killing eachother - Isn't a white problem from a violencr perspective.  Certain social/entitlements programs (whichever you prefer to call them) is more valid reasoning.
Almost double the amount of asians choose to go to universities compared to blacks (http://www.cpec.ca.gov/studentdata/cacgrethnicity.asp). However, your stats tell us that blacks receive twice as much funding overall compared to asian funding. There are also nearly a 1/3 more black recipients of aid compared to asians yet asians nearly double blacks going to university on most charts! Read your information and graphs more closely before posting up your arguement because if you took your time to read it more closely, you'd realize more blacks receive aid and some of them, even blatantly show that blacks receive more $$$ per recipient. Some of the charts date all the way back to 1994 such as the private scholarship which I wish was more recent (Might've read it wrong). But, all in all, your charts basically prove my points even more.   Oh ya, and did you totally disregard everything else in my post? 
That's the irony.
&gt;Why?  Pritzker money.
Same here from the netherlands.. we spend most of our military money for the next 30 years on the JSF which is already obsolete xD
I almost thought CNN actually had this for a headline... 
because being credible in /r/conspiracy is popular
I mean... don't get me wrong.  The thread has a point in that if the world ends and the internet is shut off, digital currency is completely dead.  Whereas with silver, you could trek across the wasteland with bags full of silver to trade other apocalypse survivors.      Bitcoin has plenty of applications as has been proven by it's adaption by many big players like Dell, Newegg, countless others.
No.  [THIS is an assassination drone.](http://i.imgur.com/Ru9V9jq.jpg)
Good points re: Obama vs Sanders track record.  But we are in /r/conspiracy and a lot of people believe that the deep state is calling the shots no matter who gets elected. Then throw in the TPP which will (in some circumstances) give multinational corps a power that supersedes US law/Constitution.  Now I'm honestly asking "How much difference could Sanders make even if he wanted to?"
Either it is or it isn't. Which is it? An explosive isn't defined by it's purpose. Or are we calling the heavy machinery used to push buildings in "explosives" now?
A collective gasp of shock as the American people realize that the congress works for their own interest, not ours. 
Are you saying that all your truther scientists have no wives, children, or money?
Again: we shall see. 
[deleted]
Idk what to do with that information. 
From the link:  &gt;Let us never be afraid to ask questions – it is the only way we can learn and be truly sure of things.  &gt;Whatever the answer turns out to be, the idea that the Earth on which we all live could indeed be flat has ignited intense curiosity and healthy debate – and has already shaken people out of their apathy and generated critical thinking. This in itself is a victory for freedom, because once enough people start to question their reality in every way, the conspiracy will collapse, being only held up by deception and subterfuge.  This is a good point.  If you shout this down without thought you are missing out on an opportunity.  I note that the article includes "http://wiki.tfes.org/The_Flat_Earth_Wiki" as a source.  This is unfortunate.  Tfes is "The Flat Earth Society", which is controlled opposition.  When he uses that as a source for what "flat earthers" are saying he is setting up straw man arguments to be easily swatted down.
[deleted]
&gt; This leaves open a vast amount of possible ways to easily pass the challenge just by designing a tower specifically for the challenge, so it's not really useful.  It very useful precisely exactly because of this. Of course such a tower must be _designed specifically_ to exhibit a collapse mechanism like the Twins did, that is the whole point the challenge is supposed to prove.   &gt; You also never indicated that the tower had to be uniform in some sense (most towers aren't) but that leaves open putting more mass higher up which would normally be supported, yet which would make impact much more severe.   Yes, you are a thinker. Indeed. Such a tower would look nothing like the Twins, which tapered on the way up.   &gt; Similarly the forces involved scale exponentially  so you could just make a really big tower which would buckle at the first sign of a stiff breeze.   It is not allowed to buckle, lean, shear, topple over or break off sideways, it's one of the few collapse criteria.   &gt; Just lift a section a good distance above and the momentum will ram straight through the rest of the tower without much resistance  Ummm.... nope.   &gt; Although I get the spirit of this, n=2 is a really poor amount of data to base odds on. ;)  Sufficient for debunkers to claim the observed collapse mode is "inevitable". Because plane, jet fuel, steel beams, yadda yadda.   &gt; Three times longer than freefall or three times faster? (About 3 m/s^2 or something else?)  Within 300% free fall time means it may take only three times as long as a freefall would take. If free fall time = 9 seconds, the whole thing must be more or less on the ground by the 27th second. 
You're right. The article in itself is terrible as well.
Call me crazy but I think that photo of Wal-Mart on Pluto is photoshopped. 
Left brain analyst 
Exactly, /u/spez even said that this subreddit is where we're supposed to be.  If we got banned, we'd be in /r/worldnews, which he's previously said isn't where we belong.
I think one of the better arguments that a flat earth doesn't work as described is this one...   https://np.reddit.com/r/theworldisflat/comments/3d69n3/people_in_the_southern_hemisphere_can_see_the/   TL;DR - Its pointed out that everyone in the southern hemisphere around the world can see the constellation Octans though with the flat earth model they would all be facing opposite directions, as seen here: http://i.imgur.com/h1lmpcp.png   Credit to Astrobrant2(photobucket I believe) and u/DethFiesta
Anthropology? Site one research paper pointing out black people are genetically inferior. No? Dismissed.
[deleted]
Well that was easy!   Tell me, what benefit do people gain from using hand sanitizer unnecessarily? 
No, you'll continue to pass as a barely literate goomba that can't imagine that anyone else with sexual desires other than his own could possibly exist and it's all a bit conspiracy when anyone says otherwise.
Satire is lost on some.
/r/JadeHelm /r/ConspiracyFact /r/OccultConspiracy
You don't need our approval. You know what the right answer is.  You just wrote this in the worst sub for this opinion. Doesn't make it wrong though
Strong family ties missing, law abiding citizens are few, and willingNess to conform to set societal norms. AND we as a nation of voters have enabled, (with good Intentions) the dredge of ALL communities to thrive on in hopes they will better themselves, but as a human species we are reactive, if we are given everything we need to live, why motivate myself to find greener pastures.  It's a very messing subject area. As I'm sure you're aware that generalities are made and are broken by compelled, hard working individuals and to that I congratulate them, but when people fall into those post s of power and respect and start throwing the ideas arounder that it's not a persons own inner failings that keep them down, NO it has to be the system they live in, because if they as a person. Are failing we can't state that, or else be faced with perjurative terms.
Survive the Will of God: stockpile canned goods. 
That's very strange.  But it is also located very close to other points of interest.  If it is something to cover up, I think google would/could do a way better job than that.  
30% of kids in poorer areas have what is called fluorosis which is poisoning from too much fluoride. They give the kids tablets at school to chew on. how disgusting. let's not forget harvard deemed fluoride a neuro- toxin, and one of the only substances capable of penetrating the blood-brain barrier
&gt;I'd say you'd have a hard time explaining how thermite brought the buildings down.     I'd say anybody would have a hard time explaining that until it's investigated.     &gt;Especially when you consider the fact that the sulphur doesn't have to be free in order for you to analyze a sample of drywall and say "Yup. There's sulphur in there."     Does that prove a novel mixture of materials created a eutectic action that melted steel while the buildings stood? Of course not.   
Why not just provide the source as the link? From the imgur it is hard to see what that "box" actually is, after looking at the source it becomes obvious.   Also, before I even looked at the comments I thought this was straight garbage, since the link to imgur looked as if someone just messed in MS Paint for 10 seconds.   So maybe think before calling someone's post stupid.
When I saw [this interview](https://youtu.be/_XZvMwcluEg) when it originally aired, I was blown away at how Alex behaved.  I had thoughts that he was controlled opposition of some sort... but after that particular interview it became blatantly obvious to me. He is the poster boy for 'crazy conspiracy nuts'
Mysterious deaths always surround these guys. 
[deleted]
Wait, what interview? He was the Executive Editor, right? So he interviewed himself? 
Nope, but I am definitely interested. 
Dead people go to the morgue.
The us had a coup when JFK was taken down. Corporations and intelligence agencies run the government now. 
Absolutely, "We the people" used to mean something so many decades ago. I can already hear our grandchildren weeping for what we've done to this country.
Gotta take some issue there.  Whoever says, "I can hear my grandchildren weeping", is a man making trouble for his grandchildren, that he forbade solving.  What stops you from solving these problems?  Be honest.
[deleted]
Right? It's like the whole "presidents without drivers license thing".   Really it's two fold;  a) a lot of celebs dont have a clue how reddit works. This website carries a learning curve for the less tech savvy.  b) they're busy people. It's just easier for Victoria to schedule a time to call them up, retype their answers, and shield the celebs from the garbage probably getting thrown at them. So *maybe* there's an argument for her avoiding the "tough" questions and promoting certain topics. But who fucking cares they're just celebrities.
I actually fell for this. (I know, I know)It is a third party company, even though the lady who was handing it out had a Home Depot apron on. They call you and tell you your water sucks and they can sell you water for 100 bucks a month.
If there were no planes, why would NTSB radar data and video evidence show planes flying well beyond their limits? If both were lies wouldn't they at least get their speeds right? Instead we have evidence proving that modified aircraft were used to reach those speeds.  A September 18, 2001, memorandum to Governor George Pataki from New York State Emergency Management Office Director Edward F. Jacoby, Jr., reported that “Investigators have identified the signal from one of the black boxes in the WTC debris.”  Contrary to the official claim about AA 11 and UA 175, a FDNY fireman who worked in the cleanup of Ground Zero, Nicholas DeMasi, and volunteer Mike Bellone, described their discovery in October 2001 of three of the four black boxes in the rubble of the Twin Towers. http://web.archive.org/web/20050215090912/http://www.pnionline.com/dnblog/extra/archives/001139.html  Not to mention the thousands of people who saw the second plane hit the South Tower. The no-plane theory is one of several disinformation campaigns being waged against the truth community.
[](/3b)To refute your argument about dog breeds and personalities, it's been observed time and time again that traditionally "aggressive" breeds when raised in an environment that doesn't reinforce those behaviors, don't display them. In addition, dog breeds are a human creation, we domesticated wolves and very very carefully bread them over millions of generations in a thousand different locations. That's not a natural proliferation, like human beings have experienced which could account for a great deal. All of that is exactly why it's a mistake to assume personality traits based on shade of skin, human beings are a LOT more genetically diverse than domesticated dogs or domesticated foxes.
I agree with this 
This right here is the best one. Still have his post history bookmarked. 
There's usually more than one person working at a magazine.
Weren't cops of that era clubbing and shooting  black people and poor people on a regular basis?  
Agreed on ~90%, however just to update your knowledge, you didn't mention the involvement of petrodollars in invading Iraq and Libya. Quadaffi's planned transition to the gold dinar was a threat to the petrodollar system, and we removed him from power (and had him killed) as an example to other countries -- mostly in Africa -- who might switch. Iraq announced it would sell oil in non-us dollars in 2000, and W's administration began plotting a way to take him out at that point.   Like another commenter I want to see what has you convinced about aliens...besides crop circles I can't find much re that. 
About 10 minutes on the highway.
I dont care what youre saying. You believe in ISIS. Youre a moron.
In my opinion,  [this](http://memoryholeblog.com/2013/04/22/witnessing-bostons-mass-casualty-event/#more-4048) is by far the best analysis I've ever seen on the Boston Marathon Bombings.  
I don't know how exactly it's going to work,  I imagine that he'll start a new post with just the AMA, but I really like the idea of brainstorming here beforehand.  Great questions. 
Okay, slightly lesser of two evils.
I find that not many Christians pay attention to Genesis 6. The Bible speaks of these "Aliens" by their true name, the Nephilim. They were around before the flood and.....after. 
Now, you know we can't have a segment of the population non propagandised. They've got to shut down that next generation of "CONSPIRACY THEORIST" 
&gt;this gif is evidence of anything.    If possible explain in simple words what's happening in the gif.
How can you justify Crop Circles as being evidence of Aliens when it is been proven, demonstrated, and admitted to having been done by humans?   Occams Razor seems to discount crop circles as evidence of anything other than pranksters. 
There is no question mind control experimentation existed (exists). Ewan Cameron is a famous doctor involved working for the CIA. The victims won in court, it is all public record. http://www.mcgilldaily.com/2012/09/mk-ultraviolence/
&gt; I cannot find [my own link]...  us neither.  &gt;  The October 1998 George Magazine or the John Bryan article from Open City / Anderson Valley Advertiser.  Nothing to quote here...move along.    
Sandy Hook and Sandy Hook Justice and some other one by a random name but same topic. Erik Martin emailed me and told me my ideas and posts were "making people uncomfortable", and added that I ought to remember I wasn't paying for a service on a site, basically not to feel entitled to free speech here. 
&gt; uh.. 1100 C air would impact the steel friend, not sure why you can't understand this.  What an absolute fool you are. You have no clue about anything, you're just throwing out one guess after the other.  1100°C is the **maximum upper air layer temperature**, it is very rare and only achieved briefly during a flashover. The temperature of the fire was only about 3-400°C (also straight from the NIST report.) Because it was just a regular office fire, aside from how it was started, there was nothing special about it.  Don't bother replying with your nonsense again.
I'd recommend looking into vaccines too
lol why are all of these videos so few out of every recording jones has done? The zionist's fund are behind everything... JEWS CONTROL ALL OF THE MEDIA AND GOVERNMENT. You can't say Jones isn't a Zionist agent just because he has videos where he is against jews/israel/zionism. if he completely ignored the questions for the entirety throughout his whole 10+ year career dont you think people would become seriously suspicious? Why is he saying Zionists funded Hitler? There is no evidence for that. And why does he never mention the debate about Hitler being the good guy or the holocaust... because the post-war political system would completely crumble if the truth was told. And how can anyone say this guy isn't a zionist agent when:    Alex Jones is funded by at least thirty-four(34) Jewish sponsors and advertisers who financially support his radio show and websites.  4. – Alex Jones’ flagship radio station, KLBJ AM, in Austin, Texas, is owned by Emmis Communications, a media conglomerate based in Indianapolis, Indiana. The founder, chairman, president, and CEO of Emmis Communications is the Zionist Jew Jeffrey Smulyan.  5. – Alex Jones’ radio show is broadcast on Sirius XM Radio. The chairman of Sirius XM Radio is the Jew Eddy Hartenstein. The CEO of Sirius XM Radio is the Jew Mel Karmazin. The President of Sirius XM Radio is the Jew Scott Greenstein. Of the six(6) executive officers of Sirius XM Radio, five(5) are Jews.  6. – Alex Jones employs a Jewish attorney named Elizabeth Morgan who is also employed by Holly Lev Bronfman, the sister of Edgar Bronfman, Jr. Thus there are only two degrees of separation between Alex Jones and the Bronfman family, one of the wealthiest and most influential Jewish Zionist families in North America.  7. – Alex Jones’ employee Molly Maroney, the managing editor of Infowars Magazine, is a former intern of Stratfor, a private intelligence agency based in Austin, Texas, which has been linked to the CIA and Mossad. The founder and CEO of Stratfor is the Zionist Jew George Friedman. Thus there are only two degrees of separation between Alex Jones and Stratfor.  Anyone who has done any proper research would know the full extent of the zionist control yet jones continues to use vague terms like 'globalist' 'elite'. "the best way to control opposition is to lead it". isnt the longevity of this man career also quite telling in comparison to others like phil schneider, karla turner and bill cooper? if this guy was a serious threat constantly exposing information he would have been dealt with a long time ago
What's the "unofficial list" of Jade Helm states?
I know man - juat having fun.
Something is in the food to make them that way ;) 
&gt;Then you're a coward  And what have you done, oh brave one? 
Hey guyz it's Shizm00!
Yes. And stinky hippies. We don't need to shoot every other person to do away with bigots.
And they bring them to a truck. Simple. Make you put your trash outside in bins again. Solved. Seattle has something similar and its a fucking mess tied up with mob money and a batshit city council. Dudes pick up trash bags that just get piled in alleys.   But yeah, they are not going to not automate an entire industry to accommodate the style of trash collecting you're describing
As all three collapses are physically impossible, it would be an exercise in futility.
This is some /r/bestof material.
And?
Or they can look at the scientific evidence and then make their decision based on that. There are valid reasons to be against GMO labelling, and that is in no way a red flag. 
They were Marines, they would have done their duty had they had the means. Your comment projects your thoughts onto trained military personnel. You're wrong.
 He attributes his change in view to looking for more sources, not to any responses he received. https://www.np.reddit.com/r/changemyview/comments/3ddcu5/cmv_america_is_already_a_police_state_the_public/ct420n1  Maybe he should have started in badcopnodonout or ask here. Maybe he just sucks at searching for sources.  Here is hundreds and hundreds of sources all in one spot https://www.np.reddit.com/r/moosearchive/comments/2bz9rq/archive/
You're welcome. Thank you.   I would have to say "No," at least as far as I'm concerned. I work at a university alongside film scholars who will probably disagree. In our building we have an art cinema with several screens that's open seven days a week. (Lots of senior citizen clientele in South Florida.) Each day I walk by the marquee and posters of present and future screenings, and periodically stop to read the films' synopses. There's almost nothing that piques my interest.  I find many more worthwhile things on YouTube made by people who are probably amateurs and are simply running on their own curiosity and and creativity.  Further, there's a whole economy involved in movie making where films that really challenge the status quo or global elites will be stymied. In the early 1950s Eustace Mullins sought to have his book on the Federal Reserve published. He was amazed to find that no publisher would touch it. One publisher finally confided that if they did take it on their notes/loans would be called in by the banks and they'd be out of business. Whether we're talking about book publishing, television or film production, with media consolidation that dynamic is even stronger today.     A few filmmakers seeking to develop major productions out of Daniel Estulin's work and the Franklin scandal have experienced similar financial problems, as TrineDay publisher Kris Millegan discussed in an interview with me last December. 
tnx! It's an uphill battle. And I have tried it a couple of times. I find that the best thing to do is to sneak some cases in conversations now and again, and hopefully someone want to check it out on theire own. If they don't want to know, they usually won't...
[deleted]
After much consideration I've personally come to the conclusion that aliens either do not exist or have no interest in the Earth and would have no reason to reside here or contact our leaders  The first is because it is possible that life originated on the Earth and that we are the most advanced life in the universe. Its not unreasonable to think it may have been extremely difficult and time consuming for life to originate abiotically.  The second is because if they did exist and could travel to earth they would have absolutely no use for the earth itself or any of the resources here. By that point they would have moved on to harvesting entire stars for power
This is how the controlled opposition disinfo agents work.  Dubay spells it out perfectly.  https://youtu.be/jhU0ny5yVFo
Get this idiot off of here.  He's so clearly the crazy flavor of disinfo, it's not even funny.  
Damn, is there any conspiracy you don't believe?
Read Reclaiming History by Vincent Bugliosi. It will change your mind on the Kennedy stuff.   Oswald did it. 
So... she's mad about people pointing out that she uses bullshit like "social justice" to harass her employers and colleagues?  Or is she mad about all of the pensions that her husband robbed?  Or is she mad about her extortion attempt failing and drowning in legal fees?  Such horseshit.  She's doing the classic "Look at what a victim I am!" card to try and garner sympathy.  Maybe she can pay back all of the pensions that she and her husband stole from with speaking engagements to green haired hambeast feminists... because they are the only ones buying her brand of bullshit.
I'm more likely to believe it is a good cover up for weapons/technology testing also the study of mass psychological effects of events. It's like a control experiment
[deleted]
Ya. Our food is poisoned. I've been eating it my entire life and am perfectly healthy. It's poisoned though.
I admit I do not know for sure, but I choose to believe that there more things in Heaven and Earth, /u/untumulted, than are dreamt of in your philosophy... ;-}  [Carl Sagan - Cosmos - Drake Equation](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MlikCebQSlY)
Big pharma cares, that's why they spend so much on disinformation.
[deleted]
sooooooooo true
You're right. Just them being above the law. No conspiracy, fuck the fee though
how much do conspiracy types resemble religious fanatics with our blind chasing of single ideas?
I think the word your looking for is 'asshole'. Look it up.
Rage Against The Machine and KMFDM.  Both have pretty anti-NWO tones in their lyrics.
[screenie of 1st tweet here](http://pamelageller.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/07/Screen-Shot-2015-07-16-at-2.23.00-PM.png)
I know. Me, too. Although honestly the racism elsewhere is pretty bad as well. But shit, Texas, Alabama, Mississippi, Louisiana, Arkansas. Georgia, Florida, South Carolina, Kentucky, Tennessee, West Virginia, Missouri. You could not pay me to live in those places if I was black. 
It's called clicktivism. Eli Roth, I think, has a good movie called "The Green Inferno" coming out about this phenomenon. 
It's amazing how fake these videos look now; every jump looks suspicious. You can even see the glint off something above the helmet - what I can only assume is a wire - [at 0:27-0:28 in OP's video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-r511NAIt5g&amp;t=0m27s). [Here's another good one](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wdMvQTNLaUE&amp;t=2m07s) that looks like wires are taking most of the astronaut's weight before he was in position to stand up. 
If they're locked up, they can't commit anymore crime now can they?
How about the fact that the people getting silenced, banned, shaddowbanned, censored, suppressed and intimated are the people we DON'T hear from... And we don't even know we aren't hearing from them...  For several months my IP address at work and home were both blocked from accessing a certain "user friendly, vote based open minded Progressive website that triumphs free speech". Pffff... So POOF! I was gone. A few threads started about it but within a day, as id expect, everyone went back to bronies and cholas in the living room and 9/11 in the basement. Forgetting about my new muzzle. Muzzles hurt. It was tight, and it was a constant reminder of taking it up the rear for Them. I had developed some connections here, and while a couple of my actions merited shadowbanning for a little while, they didn't require an all lit media murder.(I posted a pic and address of a doctor. It was public information that wouldn't have been bothered with had I been writing about Dumbledore, but I wasn't into those kind of wizards and so I was greyed-out. But BLACK OUT?).   Massive block effort including my IP addresses.....? A family member uses reddit and now they couldn't when at home. It was ridiculous...  So my point is, I realized something.   Who is out there right now being suppressed? Silenced at this very moment...?   
Did you watch the same video as me?
&gt;24 December 2014  It's a dumb as fuck practice that should be outlawed for the medical reasons at the very least, but the title gives the impression this is another *recent* victim, as opposed to the same incident just posted several times over the past year.  
I would rather have a government of prisoners than the one of criminals we have today.
But no charges filed against them and they're under 18? Pretty easy to read between the lines on this one.
It's coming from behind and going through his left shoulder. Is that possible?
You have to read On Rhetoric by Aristotle. This is the basis for all manipulation of opinion since. Read a critique or explanation of it too, it is very dense material.
Hmm...interesting theory.  &lt;hugs!&gt; *because the world sure could use more hugs!*  Okay, let's get down to it! :D  A) Do you really think that Texans, cantankerous and touchy about their guns on a good day, are going to just stand passively while their beloved boomsticks are confiscated?  B) The damage done to the environment in this country (and the fallout damage to world environment) from a supervolcano would likely set back things like clean water/agricultural/food production operations. Unless the invaders are brown-bagging it, mass destruction on that scale (offing nearly everyone in the country) would make it pretty tough going for awhile, even if they did bring enough peeps to work the farms, etc.  C) Even if Texas was held incommunicado while being disarmed, the rest of the country would notice, figure something was up and swarm the airports, unless the leadership was all on private planes at private airports, they wouldn't be going far.    D) Wouldn't the supervolcano toast Texas, and its new Mexican overlords as well? Mexico might get a little peeved that it's new (re) acquisition got broke so soon and demand reparations be made. They won't have many Muricans to take their ire out on, and might not be too choosy and start things up with China, who would then blame what was left of Murican leadership for bungling things so badly.  Likely wouldn't go too well for Murican leadership...  E) While waiting for things to cool down after the supervolcano, before China can get here, someone else might want to get divvies...like N Kor. or even India, or a mid. east. country.    F) While it's true that Muricans aren't exactly the beloved darlings of the world, other countries might have issues with such a plan and shut out the 'crazy enough to off their own peeps'/genocidal maniacs from further participation in world affairs.  China couldn't do much about it because their military forces would be split in two trying to protect/hold onto both areas.  Ok, rebuttals?  I'm all ears. :D  *and best wishes for a peaceful, uneventful weekend for you and yours!* :D 
This is one of the most idiotic things I have ever seen. You don't have any control over Reddit by using it. The owners/operators do. This would be like saying "Stop McDonalds from selling cheeseburgers, I don't like cheese on my burger!" You don't like it, don't use it.
 who did the bad job remain to be seen
We've had it for a lot longer than that.  Look into the research of TT Brown to start with, his daughter had an AMA on /r/conspiracy a while back that you may find interesting.
Almost upvoted til I saw your name.  
Your response is laughable and your insult ineffectual.   College costs currently create an immediate generation lost to debt, while the corrupt healthcare system is more costly than the rest of the western world and no better. Both have been finessed into tools to keep much of the populace debt-slaves.   Not everything is about profit. This planet is a constant battle between God and money, and the bad guys are obsessed with the latter. I would find this concerning if I were you, and makes your monicker ironic in the worst kind of way.   You ignored my question about privatizing water. Which I guess is answer enough. 
What sate?
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_3axPn65MGM
Absolutely (ed.).  Away from the cities.  Pesticides, somewhat less aluminum, strontium, and barium from chemtrailing, and as natural as you get.  Delicious.
Good thing I have the power to not give a shit. 
I downvoted this because it met at least two conditions I have for downvoting a post:  * It links to an Infowars report (not enough to merit a downvote, but I don't upvote those posts) * It actually only links to the part of the video in which Infowars is selling their shit. It's pure spam. (That most definitely gets a downvote)  
They also funded PayPal and this company: http://www.toptechnews.com/article/index.php?story_id=031002KUG861
Exactly I'd rather have shills then it being a ghost town here, I mean look at the subscribers this is a nice sized group of free thinkers
Reddit in the hooouuussseeee , on like 24 of dem floors
Jog on with your anti-Jewish bullshit. I'm not interested. That wasn't the point of my post and I don't appreciate you trying to turn it into some Jew hating thread.
**This marxist rant may sound good to some but what is the opposite of Capitalism?**  &gt; Capitalism:  a way of organizing an economy so that the things that are used to make and transport products (such as land, oil, factories, ships, etc.) are owned by individual people and companies rather than by the government  Therefore the opposite of capitalism would be all things that are used to make and transport products (such as land, oil, factories, ships, etc.) are owned and controlled by the corrupt government and corrupt politicians.  **The socialist/marxist brings in his ideological utopia by purposely crashing and destroying the existing system to bring in his vision.** This is done by divide and conquer and concepts like the Cloward-Piven strategy https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cloward%E2%80%93Piven_strategy
You should make a post containing this information, maybe slightly abridged.  The common refrain whenever Holmes' father is mentioned is "that's been debunked", your comment here is probably the most comprehensive explanation I've come across.  And I agree with your speculations that this goes much deeper than a simple lone gunman, I suspect it ties into all of the strange and unexplained deaths that have been reported these last couple of years.
If they bombed israel back to stone age will be good step in peace process.
&gt;Its because you were being disingenuous about wanting to have a race dialogue.  No its not  &gt; You want a dialogue about "blacks".   Yes, I do actually want to have a real dialogue about blacks in the US now that issues like sanctions against confederate tapestry and the destruction of war memorials is happening.   &gt;Your allusions were shady(heh) from the start. I'm sure you would love to be able to place me into a racial category, but I won't give you the pleasure.   You already did. You are either white and have never seen the real world and therefor ignorant, or you are black and a denialist.   &gt;Your implications that white and asian culture are infallible is laughable  Support your argument. I have yet to see a roaming gang of Korean kids in gang flags, wearing grillz, and robbing people. Sorry to use an extreme stereotype, but Im sorry, only poor black culture encourages such behavior.   &gt;I suggest you find your own 'facts' abouts whites and asians (get creative!)  Facts dont require creativity.   &gt;pin them on their biological origins  I wont even begin to touch on that. Ill be here for hours giving you a biology lesson that will be ignored.   &gt;Point is, you've only had negative things to say about 'black culture' which is to say people with dark skin. You're not opening any positive dialogue here at all. What are you goals here? Lets talk about whatever it is you wanna say.   I have was a victim of hate crime from a group of black kids during the Trayvon Martin case. I was assaulted because I was white. Racial slurs were hurled at me while I was being attacked. I regretfully, was forced to defend myself.   The five black kids that attacked me never made the news. Nor do any of the other ones who go out and play the knockout game. Why?  How about yesterday when the story about the gang beating in Bangladesh (Sic) that made world headlines.... what about the daily beatings that go down with just as many onlookers and cheering daily in the hood? Why?   Ive lived in the hood, Ive run with gangs doing all kinds of shady shit. I know many people are doing what they need to; but the gangsta image is sold and venerated in current black culture. I think thats a problem for America at large. I think that by calling out anyone who dares point out the real danger to the black community you are making that danger even worse. My biggest issue is that it is that issues with black America are swept under the rug for fear of being racist. You are already attacking me for focusing on it; as you have been programmed to do (but thats part of the conspiracy).   Thats why I have to associate with the likes of coontown.  Furthermore;  As a white person I am forced, through systematic idealism into silence about other people. A black man can say the exact same things and no one would accuse him of anything.  A black man can speak freely of whites.  A white man cant speak about any race, he cant even be proud of his own.   As a white person I am accused of being privileged , despite having all the disadvantages of "disenfranchised" groups. I get less aid that I *need*.    Racism is a live in America, but its not what you think.         
&gt; Bugliosi and Posner books   [This guy](http://mileswmathis.com/tate.pdf) claims the Manson murders were a government propaganda operation. He has a huge logical gap in his argument but I wonder if there isn't some way to read him esoterically which could legitimate some fraction of it. That Bugliosi has "proven" the official JFK story is not a significant datum to me.
This discussion is hopeless.   You can't have an opinion on anything if you don't have at least some things that are true because they are true.   Are you going to tell me now that "Cogito, ergo sum." is not actually true?
yeah, well its already begin. The 2 cops in NY, another I believe in Missouri randomly killed. Some are actually killing back, so even though I wouldn't exactly call it a trend on the part of citizens, it definitely can eventually become one
Good.  You've already exposed yourself for exactly what you are.
wow
I think we should just end the discussion at this point.  You are clearly assuming that all contradictions must have been resolved because you know the earth is a globe.  You don't even know what contradictions I am speaking of.  This isn't the topic of the thread, so I don't really want to dive into it.  If you are interested, you should look for yourself.  Just know what it means if you dismiss without looking.
And high tendency for the owner to be speeding, because boost.
&gt; Not a conspiracy theory: its a fact. Sorry.  Not a proven conspiracy. But an unproven conspiracy theory. Still not a fact. Sorry.   &gt; Except that part where I provided direct quotes from the people involved.  Except that just because something is a direct quote it doesn't make it a fact. Except that is 0 of the quotes states that it wasn't peer-reviewed. And 0 of the quotes are proven.  &gt; Those are facts that you yourself admit are not disputed.  That's because you're confusing statements with facts again. Just because someone makes a statement doesn't make it a fact. If these statements had any validity there would be a revision, retraction, or ERRATUM. The unproven statements were ignored. Disputed. Sorry.  &gt; If it wasnt a fact, dont you thing someone would have submitted a revision, retraction, ERRATUM in the past six years to refute the statement.  If it was a fact, someone would have submitted a revision, retraction, erratum in the past 6 years to the paper. But no one has. Because it is still just an unproven statement. An unproven conspiracy theory actually.  &gt; You keep trying to say that. What I said was that there is no actual evidence that Pileni said she was not qualified to review the documents.  Your own source isn't evidence. Got it. You attack your own source again. Thanks.  &gt; And once again, that statement is not relevant to the FACT that she didnt review the document at all before it was published.  And once again, that statement from Pileni has never been proven to be a fact. Even if you type it in caps. Sorry.  &gt; I've never begged for your opinion once. In fact,  You've been doing it for months. You're doing it now. I told you, you aren't going to convince me. You don't have proper evidence. Whether or not you agree with this is irrelevant. You don't have enough to convince me. I've told you this for months. And here you are. Still begging.  &gt; I've proven time and time again that your opinion is not relevant to what I am stating.  The only thing you've proven is that you don't know what a fact is. And that you desperately seek my approval. Keep begging.
Jade Helm fan-fiction? Really?
Do you think that the people will know one day? Do you think that one day your truth will come to be realised?
Not sure how that is substantively different. But i changed it so you can proceed.
It's not a matter of knowing it's a matter of saying it. Everybody already knows, yet nobody says it.
missing body cam video, missing details in his police report, and victim claims everything he said was false.  surprise.  
Which makes it your worthless opinion as you just mentioned so you can keep those to yourself and stop proving something coming from your braindead life
Ah, Lloyd Blankfein.  It's a jewrassic world. 
This isnt fan fiction man! WE ARE IN DANGER!!!!! Everyone needs to grab their foil hats and ARs and get ready because the government is coming for us!!!!
holy fuck that's shocking, seriously. This is wrong on so many levels it should be conisdered as a attack against your human rights.
Well I can tell more and more of my friends start to think about the American Government as kind of a 3rd world government. Besides that Americas Government is also more and more hated in Germany.
Iam a former military too but from Germany and even there we learn to always act de-escalating and avoid a conflict with all means. But ofc if someone attacks you you're free to defend yourself. Guess the main problem lies within the training.
At first I wasn't sure about the meter, but thanks :D
So he was wrong...  That makes more sense. But then wouldn't a more massive object fall quicker with no wind resistance?
Their forbidden in the sense that mentioned that you hold those opinions is the same as saying "give me all your downvotes". That's not how an open community is supposed to be. There is no tolerance here for differing opinions. Period.
You literally just listed things present in every major country. If you can list just one major country that doesn't have a corrupt government, I will give you something worth 5$ or less from Amazon or Steam. I would buy you gold but I do not want to give Reddit money currently.
And... Absolutely nothing there tying James Holmes's father to LIBOR: conjecture, "could it bes" worthy of *Ancient Aliens* and no evidence worthy of the name. Though I was amused by the "chilling memo" supposedly from a retired general, stating there would be a bombing at the opening of the London Olympic Games. LOL.   Credibility = zero.
That's what happens with crappy fear porn.
Lovely propaganda, are you posting for CDC HQ? 
&gt;&gt;The study that claimed vax were harmful was bogus and there is nothing else to support that silly claim.  This quote, with slight modification, is used all the time by supposedly random people on the internet.  It always has the same format.  I hope you're paid, at least.  If you're just regurgitating, you're simply an unpaid, unknowing foot soldier in someone else's war.
Never go off you meds without your doctors help. This dude doesn't know what he's talking about.
Thats what it means when it says they wont let commerce without it
For all you "prophecy believers" how do you rationalize all the false prophecies?  I mean how can you claim this shit is divine knowledge when they get half the shit wrong? Of course you can vaguely interpret this stuff to fit into modern day events.   Wars, execution, famine, genocide, hunger, rich and poor, etc.  These things have always existed in human history so if this book talks about these things it's not prophetic... The prophecies are just vague statements and metaphors that can be interpreted in a hundred ways.  Some of it may apply but that's not really an argument for anything.
Still waiting for an example of a building being destroyed with thermite.  Still waiting for you to explain to me why both explosives and thermite would be used.
Pictures of people rioting.   Don't want to encourage people I guess. 
&gt;I have been IQ tested and am borderline genius, and was in honors classes throughout my schooling  M'humblebrag
Kickbacks. Oldest trick in the book.  
Pretty amazing that the subject of the video is commenting on it. I don't have an opinion either way but I thought that was interesting.
More information on the multiple shooters and a possible accomplice.  tl;dr: check out the side-by-side pics near the end (last link)  Main thread:  - [Accomplice Identified in Aurora Theater Shooting: Alex Milano](https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3bu6hv/accomplice_identified_in_aurora_theater_shooting/)  ----- Reposted here: ----  Although James Holmes is the sole suspect in the Aurora shooting, initial reports spoke of multiple shooters:  - [Aurora Massacre: ABC Reports Multiple Shooters](https://willyloman.wordpress.com/2012/08/06/aurora-massacre-abc-reports-multiple-shooters/)  Throughout the investigation, there has been speculation that James Holmes either had assistance or was entirely framed. This speculation is bolstered by the presence of a second gasmask:  - [American Gladio: Second Gas Mask Becomes Huge Issue in New Aurora Narrative](https://willyloman.wordpress.com/2013/01/08/american-gladio-second-gas-mask-becomes-huge-issue-in-new-aurora-narrative/)  Witness Corbin Dates told Hardball with Chris Matthews that there was a second shooter, **a man with a goatee** (Holmes did not have a goatee), who was lingering near the emergency exit.  - [Corbin Dates appears on Hardball to describe "Man with Goatee" - Possible Accomplice ](https://youtu.be/D4Gv3PGtsHg)  A "man with a goatee". A goatee. Like Alex Milano, a noted gun-control advocate, who just happened to be present at the shooting and coincidentally interviewed on local news:  - [Aurora Theater Shooting Eyewitness Alex Milano Interview](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aHVQOMxzrqI&amp;t=1m10s)  Alex Milano appeared in the gun control advocacy movie, [*Bowling for Columbine*, as "DJ"](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=h_3MFZYni6Y&amp;t=9m5s), although [he's been scrubbed from the IMDB credits](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0310793/fullcredits) for some reason.  Screenshots/portraits:  - ["DJ" from Bowling for Columbine](http://i.imgur.com/uaNFaNx.png)   - [Alex Milano from the Aurora Massacre interview](http://i.imgur.com/ZSFBeNo.png)  Side by side comparison:  - [Alex Milano from Aurora Massacre vs "DJ" from *Bowling for Columbine*](http://i.imgur.com/BkjRHNB.png)  Gotcha.
2spooky
Yeah! I expect a higher caliber of journalism from The Sun.
And I could waste time trying to explain it to someone who clearly already has made up their mind.  See, the middle east conflict has been going on for 5000+ years.  Some people want to discuss it and others have already made up their minds.  This same argument has been going on between those that have already made up their minds for thousands of years.  There is no need to try and sway him.  There are literally millions of websites dedicated to his side (no matter what that is) He can go and be with others of his mindset.
lolbible? jews suffering?
ESP when it's not a guest that is someone you like the show is shit.   Not only that. But any talk show/ podcast that can't talk about anything without having a guest. Such as a lot of these celebrity podcasts. Are usually shit.   It first hit me when I couldn't find any shows with people I would want to listen to on joe rogan podcast is wen I noticed that he can't talk about anything really. He needs guests and te guest are more and more just becoming celebrities and not any type of thing I want to listen to. I'm glad to say he's not on my list of podcasts I listen to. Or even check. If there is some recent episodes that are worth it let me know but I don't think there will be 
Why does a flat earth need to be discussed?  Do you discuss whether or not the delusions of a schizophrenic are real?
I usually keep up to date on RT but missed this one. Thanks.
Two things: they don't care if two billion of us die from starvation and exposure to the elements, pay attention to how they treated "the little guy" during Occupy and the 2008 crash.   Socialism is a caste system much like Capitalism it is entirely based on how useful you are percieved as being. Just because you get a bare minimum payment of "basic income/housing" does not mean you will be able to thrive or be healthy from that small payment every month. The idea is to weed out the weak regardless if it is capitalism or socialism. The externalization of the hierarchy has no place for "the little guy" unless you would like to be a slave.
Wow... that is pretty amazing.  I remember reading somewhere that when our country started, the runner up in the election became the vice president.  I don't know when that tradition was stopped, but I think that the idea was to bring together opposing political groups.  I think the reason why JFK went with LBJ was to get more votes from texas or other conservative states.  He was an Irish Catholic from Boston after all, and many people in conservative states  wouldn't vote for him because of that.   I've also heard rumors that Michelle Obama is actually a man!?!?  I don't know about that, but I do think that squeaky clean politicians without any skeletons in their closet, are rarely selected to government office because they can't be coerced through blackmail.   So I suspect that if we knew about even a small portion of the skeletons in the closets of our elected representatives, we would all be shocked at the depravity.  This is just a hunch, but it seems plausible and likely to me.    I'm not saying all are corrupt but all one has to do is look at the voting record of reps for things like the fast track of the TPP to see who is owned and who isn't.  
They also moved norad back into the mountain. 
Just pick one already.  Jesus Christ!
I guess this one is directed at me too. I didn't downvote anything.   Circumcision is pointless almost 100% of the time. 
&gt; that say there are radiation belts   yes, there are.  &gt;and the earth is pear shaped rather then perfectly circular..  yes, it is. As far as I know I don't recall anyone ever saying the Earth is perfectly circular.
Hey, I was reading that and something freaky came to me.  It says that the star of Bethlehem was seen in 3BC, and we know that when the AD/BC calender was created, there was a margin of error by 3 years or so.  2015-3= 2012  21 December 2012 - The Mayans were right after all?
&gt;  Operation Bid Rig... Chertoff  Ok will do. Would be wild if we can trace the roots.
I finally realized after the ISIS interviews...now my age group (24) is just starting to love Vice cause of alll the random artivcles they post
Your not a cop are you?  Or you never lived it as a kid. Cops feed the drug habit to these losers than say OK I am a cop. New informant ok. THese people go about there lives as before ok. And about half the time cop gets a cut from that and know body would know. As with hookers. I HAVE SEEN this. Making crime to cagth crime. Over and over over. till I joined the army. at age 17. Stayed in basic training for almost a year till I was 18    
-
This thing was a shill bot, arguing the official narrative on.. I don't even remember what. Maybe Ukraine?  I think there are also bots who drop random thread shits like "This is why people laugh at /r/conspiracy" or "You're an idiot" -- an insult that requires zero comprehension of the subject. Doesn't even need a parser. I mean you could write a whole database of insults and just watch it go, wasting people's time and raising hackles.
[Some have said](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6FbOiIdgbl0) that Mars is already populated by a multitude of life - among which are three intelligent bipedal beings (Earth humans, a Reptilian species called the "Ga'alukka", and a Mantid race called the "Sheehn-ha").
Thank you.
How should it look if it weren't stage? 
They don't get pulverized. They are broken into small pieces. I've seen controlled demolitions of buildings and a giant pile of rubble still remains that looks like the size of the said building but broken down. This was not the fact for the wtc
http://i.imgur.com/V0EXIfB.gif
Like germany, france, canada,uk?
Yes 
You wouldn't need optics on the moon.  You can see stars on earth during the day using optics - you need them because the atmosphere is lit up by the sun.  If there were no atmosphere on the earth you would see the stars without optics.  This is very basic science.      Neil Degrasse Tyson explains it here starting around 17:15  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZpHh_TU2kcI&amp;list=PLjl-hlmIfpJx9AHHnAaqnKbyf734NY5qc       
Welp, it *isn't* called "I'll Answer Anything."
guyz, don't hate, its just a "conspiracy" ;;;;;)
Have you really looked into that? I have, you use "multiple" but the amount of people manning the lasers is very very small, and the raw output of the measurements is not publicly available (despite taxes paying for it), they only provide "compiled" data (i actually asked one of the laser station). There is absolutely no way to check what the results would look like not pointing towards the alleged mirrors but towards a random spot of the moon or empty space. They say the results are different and i would love to believe them, but without the raw of these particular experiments to compare with the raw on the mirrors, there is now way to prove the apparatus works at all. It's very interesting science, but until there is raw data, it can't really be considered confirmed by experience.
Need more transport tubes.
You're right, I was a tad out of line. I did listen to many episodes simply because he does have good guests on... I suppose I feel he's not doing justice to the topics handled and seems kind of disinterested. I definitely feel he is not a 'serious' host; nothing wrong with being a pothead and I didn't mean it in a derogatory sense. Its a legitimate way of dealing with the stress forced upon us in today's unnatural society... But when it gets in the way of being an interested, engaging interviewer of some VERY interesting guests, I feel its time to lay off a tad.  Just gives many serious topics a very bad image, I feel. Which is a gross disservice.
Oddly, over a hundred people who frequent that website have made that choice. It's almost like it's a website devoted to people who hate other groups of people enough to kill a bunch of them.
The governor is able to do this because the national guard is considered a state militia, and already the only ones allowed to carry weapons in the states.
God cares
Actively being downvtoted 1:1 - https://www.reddit.com/r/conspiracy/comments/3doobl/racist_bernie_sanders_takes_offense_to_being/
Very
sign of the times: possible citation/fine or arrest to feed the homeless, loss of job, jail time, or disappearance/suicided for dissenters/whistleblowers and now doctors that refuse to push big pharma are being killed.   maybe holistic practitioners should should go 'underground' i know i would, it's dangerous now. smh, similar to being burned at the stake.
Agreed. That situation escalated quickly. 
Wait... Are you saying titanic was a conspiracy?
Exactly.   They want to profit from mechanically "sequestering" carbon despite mother nature being able to do it for free.  - **TIL: There is a fern that has such a high level of atmospheric carbon sequestration that it caused an ice age. Azolla captures 6 tons of atmoshperic carbon per acre per year and could reduce global CO2 levels, while providing high protein livestock feed, or nitrogen rich fertilizer.**  - https://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/3dojw4/til_there_is_a_fern_that_has_such_a_high_level_of/
[deleted]
America is daily blasphemy at this point, and we have done it to ourselves. We were lead here, true, but we've always had the choice to turn away, to live differently. But our freedom and free will have been perverted and used against us.   The days are running short, I think we all see it. The world will not end, but it will not be the world we knew. Pray to God, ask for guidance, forgiveness and mercy. God listens.
So many wholes...
Remember the dancing Israeli's? I'll be the dancing Englishman the day this utter cunt dies (a hopefully painful death).
people these days enjoy being stupid. With the most information available in history, people actually enjoy being clueless  i mean look at the politicians on both sides elected, look at how they know literally nothing about the laws they pass. and people vote for them. the stupid leading the stupid
[deleted]
Either everything is controlled privately by corrupt individuals and corporations or everything is controlled privately by the corrupt government. False dichotomy. This is also hyperstition. We, being hierarchically integrated, are designed to take orders from above and dominate that below. Our imagination does not venture past this infantile state of dependency on instructions. This is how the hierarchy works. This is not how the network works. People solve problems much more efficiently without the systems of appropriation disguided as systems of control disguised as democracy.
&gt; don't you think it is excessively arrogant and insulting to proclaim that the vast majority of people in support of a theory you disagree with are idiots who believe what they are told.  No.
Where is the proof she did write a diary? The proof she didn't write a/the diary is in the article  "Roemer appealed again, and this time the court asked for the technical services of the Federal Criminal Office (Bundeskriminalamt, similar to our FBI), which carried out a careful analysis of the original manuscript of the diary with microscope and ultraviolet illumination in order to confirm its authenticity — in particular, to determine when it was written.  The report of the technical experts was given to the court in April of this year, and it contained a bombshell: large portions of the alleged “diary” were written in ballpoint pen ink — which was not manufactured prior to 1951!"
[deleted]
Don't mind me, just searching for the AIPAC logo on the flag.  
Yes the disenfranchised are drawn towards extremist groups. However, the real problem are not extremist groups but the fact that western societies disenfranchise a very large amount of people, especially young people. That's why ISIS gets many of their recruits from western countries [(source)](https://counterjihadnews.files.wordpress.com/2014/09/20140830_mac990_595.png) even though the muslim population in those countries is comparatively low. It's also why the extremist SJW ideology ("die, cis scum!") is so popular among young people. 
Way to live up to the money stereotype, Israel.
For politicians, I'm guessing it's not so much that they're stupid, but more that they just don't care. They just won't vote for anything that affects them personally. Most of them live in a bubble. Pay cut on their salary? Fuck no. Increase tax on the wealthy? Fuck no.   Mass surveillence on the common folk? Fuck yeah. 
This is what happens when the truth starts coming out.  The liars start getting scared and go on the attack.  It is its own proof. 
There is this video of Phil Schneider where he says he saw an alien with his own eyes and the alien shot at him and he lost his arm. I entertained the idea for a while, but came to the same conclusion as you. It looks like a manufactured topic, and that along with Area 51 make people who look into conspiracies look like kooks and removes any seriousness from the act of scrutinizing government's claims. In a democracy, we have to hold the government accountable and it is their duty to furnish proof. They are guilty until proven otherwise. But very few people realize that, that is how it should be.
Funny, Puerto Rico was set for failure at the same time these emergency Greece talks were going on.  All of a sudden they said they were going to make their payment just in time, though they were in a "death spiral" previously. Then, they missed their payment. The IMF is loaning money to countries/states knowing full well at the end, they will take over any assets they may have had to sell off to private investment companies. Symbolic that the seat of republic history is now going to be dismantled by predatory lending. Africa is next, and a high priority. Check this out http://allafrica.com/specials/IMF_2014/
Power and money.  
Those pictures do not necessarily show children in a cage.  The pics are much to close up to make a reasonable determination that those are cage bars.  Could be a barred window that the children were inside/outside of when the pics were taken.  Could be a cell that the kids were happily playing in (they do not seem in distress).  All of these would be available at a military instillation.  Infact I have a pic of myself at a long unused military fort local to me that looks just like that.  I close up of my face pressed against bars that looks like I'm in jail.  Infact I just had my sister take a close up of my face pressed against a barred window on the outside of the old store room.
Actually you speak the truth mostly. I did watch the first two legally blondes. And I did claim to be a lawyer on Reddit. 
He is sucking Hillary's dick. She made a similar comment a few months ago. Mark my words, Clark will be a VP option if Hillary gets the nomination.
seconded 
Neither party needs outside assistance in wrecking their credibility, they do a fine job of it themselves. 
I agree with you. I don't buy into the idea that he's a part of some agenda.   He's not a career politician like the other candidates. 
Planes don't fly over antarctica. Also why can you not take a straight flight from santiago to sydney. It goes to the united states making the flight twice as long, using twice the amount of fuel, but if you use the flat earth map it's on the same trajectory.
As a American. Fuck America. Or to say its government not its people.
That's a lotta likes.
LOL.
companies are a normal part of any country.   these types of things (this flag drawing) are idiots misplacing blame to not feel bad. There is one reason why things are so shitty, the reason hospitals can charge you $100k for a ER visit, the reason why a senator can introduce some of the most restrictive gun legislation while selling RPGs to gangs in the US  because americans are willfully stupid and allow themselves to be manipulated by the (corporation and government influenced) media. 
I deleted it already. Other, more important threads were being blocked by what may or may not have been a hoax, so it was getting deleted regardless.   Too many upvotes on this one...The skeptics here are a fucking asset, as I said yesterday. You guys keep doing what you're doing, filtering out the garbage. 
I believe it is the best english translation we have. The words are meaningless in themselves, it is the teachings of the book that make it truly profound, it has taught me an amazing amount of great of a person jesus was. I never knew how much people pervert the teachings of Jesus to their own means. The basic teaching is love your neighbor like yourself and everything else will fall into place. It has so many more things to teach you though. If you pray and spend time to not read but understand the gospels you will be truly amazed at how God will impact your day to day life. I can't ever trust the intentions of the source absolutely because it was written by men, but I know all the teachings are truly great. I think it's very important to read each book of the new testament front to cover and understanding his teachings in context and full meaning, rather than your own preconceived notions. I am still well on my way to fully understanding it and am only 2months into my journey. I wish you the best of luck in whatever path you choose, but know that God is waiting for YOU with open arms. I am here if you ever want to talk or discuss anything! If it's about the bible or just daily life. God Bless You 
The Incorporated States of America 
well i'm old. it was a nice run.  i've seen the downfall of the greatest nation on earth that ever was. Think i'll play more video games til i die.  You kids have fun!
I will never understand why comments like this, which are meaningful parts of the discussion, get downvoted. Who the hell is out there just down voting people for no reason?
Do whatever you like man. I was just trolling these Mods who are in my opinion overstepping. Just curious, did you feel the comments I choose leaned either way on the argument at hand? Did it seems as though I had a pro-israel agenda?
Dude give it up! Go get laid get out of the house and go smoke a joint and then reflect back at what you've been promoting in this sub.
In [the video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=doN4t5NKW-k) that /u/NCC_1701A linked to, the shot that begins at the :50 second mark doesn't show a cut until 6:21. I didn't think you could achieve weightlessness for that long while in one of the zero-g planes. So either 1) her weightlessness is achieved by a craft that can simulate zero-g for that long of a time period, 2) they put cuts into the video that aren't noticeable, or 3) it's real.
[deleted]
Lol First your mr liberal and call others conservative pejoratively. Now my posts are what? Too progressive. I take it youre a professional since you have the wisdom to dictate what is and what is not professional.  Im all ears. Please tell me how my page gives the profession a bad name.  I said call me if you wish to verify. Numbers there. Also on kriminaldefense link there.
Kitty history... Exactly like ours!
